Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Tundra;-;Start game ---- create an account --- choose warframe --- play game --- kill enemies/rescue buddies/defend a pod/etc --- kill bosses --- open new planets --- rank up --- build new warframe --- find clan --- build new warframe --- farm farm farm --- build new weapon --- farm farm farm --- build new warframe --- XP XP XP --- farm farm farm --- build new sentry --- XP XP XP --- farm farm farm --- build a Kubrow --- XP XP XP --- farm farm farm --- build a prime weapon --- XP XP XP --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- build a Prime warframe --- XP XP XP --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- farm farm farm --- play the same new event mission x5 --- gain new mods --- polarize weapon --- XP XP XP XP XP --- need credits - T4 T4 T4 T4 T4 T4 --- NEW UPDATE ---- FARM ARCHWING FARM ARCHWING FARM ARCHWING FARM ARCHWING --- go build arch wing - "No resources" --- farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm - build arch wing *NO CREDITS* --- T4 T4 T4 T4 T4 --- build archwing *** waits 36 hours*** thats pretty much my experience on Warframe --- 10/10 ---
Gravedigger Fagus;-;It's a game about space ninjas destroying space nazis and futuristic EA representatives. I don't think I need to say any more here.
XFA;-;Best free to play i ever played.. just look at my play record
Graced Marcus;-;-Start the game! -Create an account! -Sign in! -You're in a Pod! -You awaken! -Woman with a Purple-Blue insect hat tells you to run! -You delay and do cool spins! -You backflip off walls! -You think this game is fun! -Finish the first mission! -Craft your first weapon! -Waste your beginners platinum on a Syandana! -Wish you got the other Syandana! -Make friends! -Play more matches! -Grind heaps! -Reach level 8! -Try making the Dragon Nikana but make the Tonkor instead! -Tonkor is awesome! -Turn the Tonkor into a machine gun! -Run out of ammo! -Die! -Use all your Revives! -Die! -Incubate a Kubrow! -Name it Scruffy! -It dies after a few weeks! -Have a tantrum! -Make another Kubrow! -Realise there's a health bar! -Put Kubrow in Stasis! -Quit Warframe! -Rejoin it three weeks later! -More grinding! -Get your first Prime Warframe! -Get your first Prime weapon! -Get a rare event mod for cheap! -Accidently sell the mod! -Tantrum! -Play a Tier IV Void mission! -Encounter Vor! -You Solo'ed! -Die! -Revive! -Die! -Use last revive! -Kubrow is stuck in the wall! -Run for your life! -Accidently find a secret spot to get you out of the map! -Ramp up the Graphics to the maximum! -Burn your Graphics card and CPU! -Buy a new Computer! -Try again! -Success! -Never leave Warframe again! The End. Or is it? -Wait... What's this?!? -The lights are flickering! -A black teletubbie! -He's telling you you've been a naughty boy! -OH GOD HE'S GONNA FOKIN KILL YOU! -RUN -RUN -RUN -RUN -HIDE -OH SHET HE CAN TELEPORT YOU -.......... -.................. -............................ -IM SORRY SANTA I WAS A NAUGHTY BOY Thanks to GrandAdmiral for the bread crumb! Yum.
Grimshaw;-;Space... Ninjas. I shouldn't have to say anything more. Fair warning: If you're not willing to spend a LONG time playing this game, you'll find your options kind of limited. You start with 2 character slots, 6 weapon slots and 50 plat, 20 plat can get you a character slot and 12 plat can get you 2 weapon slots. You'll pretty much want to spend this 50 plat on slots, as everything else is a waste. Getting more plat costs money and I highly recommend that if you want to spend some money on plat, log into the game every day and wait for the 75% discount to show up. With the discount, a one time purchase of about 1000 plat should set you up for life if all you buy is slots and you don't care about having all the weapons. If you want to collect ALL the weapons, you'll probably want to spend $50 and go for the 3000 plat option. The mod grind (collecting thingies to improve your stats and the stats of your weapons) can take a stinking long time to work through, but if you can have fun doing it (after all, it just means playing the game a lot), you'll be rewarded with weapons that feel like they do more than tickle the enemies you fire them at. Good mods and good weapons are required if you want to be more than a leech on the later planets, but everyone's usually blasting through the missions so fast that they hardly notice if you lag behind and die horribly to the handful of enemies they overlooked. I'd say the biggest problem this game has is a lack of reasons for veterans to return to old content. It can be really difficult to get a group for that one mission you need to unlock the other mission you need to unlock the mission that unlocks the next planet you want to get to to work your way towards that boss that drops the parts you need to make the warframe (class) you wanted a week ago and still haven't reached. Playing with friends is recommended.
Somerandom18;-;I hate grinding as much as the next guy but there's just something soothing about it in this game.
Cageymaru;-;Warframe in it's simplest parts is a amalgamation of Mass Effect 3 shooting, old school Diablo looting / hoarding, Free Running / Parkour, and freaking space ninjas! Did I say Space Ninjas? It's really really fun living out your childhood dreams of dropkicking baddies in the face while throwing stars at a secondary target. If you ever wanted to be Bruce Lee; this is your game. It has boss fights with actual strategies, plenty of unlocks to find, lots of socializing for those that want to chit chat as much as kick things in the derriere. The new weapon damage system gives hardcore mathematicians something to theory craft about, but is as easy as Paper, Rock, Scissors in it's simplest form. Weapon choice is varied in feel thus you many choices to find the perfect weapons that suit your playstyle. Alternative playstyles such as Stealth plays a prominent role in Warframe. You can absolutely wreck targets from the shadows! You can choose between Support frames, Offensive frames, and Defensive frames for a mission. Invite your buddies or grab some guys / gals from the recruiting social channel. If you want to meet new people, join a completely randomized group of 4 players hell bent on conquering space! You have multiple saved loadout slots for free! Digital Extremes doesn't really nickle and dime you in this game like other F2P games. They do need to make a profit so they sell cosmetic items, XP boosters, warframe slots, weapon slots, and materials for those too busy to go fight. Nearly everything in the game can be acquired by doing fun events that last nearly a week so you can choose when to partake of them. They give away the best guns for free during those events. They have a XP system that also nets you some of the best guns in the game for just running missions to collect loot and crafting that loot into weapons and warframes. Leveling up those frames and weapons gives you the XP necessary to unlock the sickest weapons! This is a Play to Win game where you can buy materials to craft if you are impatient, but you can just play more and get it. Isn't playing the game the purpose of it? Of course you can buy completed Warframes for real money, but spending a couple hours of your time you can get the same thing for free. Of course you still need to buy the inventory slot for that frame to use it. At less than $1 a slot, no subscription fee, and no initial game purchase, this sounds like the steal of the century. And you don't have to buy them and still have fun, but it's nice to be able to support the developer for their time and effort. In short play this now!
The Salt King;-;There's so much grinding you would think that you're a Puerto Rican hooker...
Peashooter;-;There is only one thing you need to know about Warframe: It's free. Oh, maybe I didn't make myself clear enough. When I say that Warframe is free, I mean, literally speaking, it is free. Still not clear enough? Alright, I'll elaborate. Apart from two different types of items - appearance items (such as skins and coloring pallets) and weapon/Warframe slots - it is possible for all players to access almost all types of in game items and entities (apart from a few that are no longer available to everyone). In this manner, it is possible for you to obtain every Warframes (characters or so to speak), every weapons, every non-visual-based items and the likes. Of course, there are conditions to fulfill, and obtaining everything will most likely take up a good portion of your time (isn't this what you are looking for?), but the point is, it is perfectly possible to play Warframe in the long run without paying a single cent. It's your choice. So, what is Warframe? In this game, you are basically a character known as "Tenno" who fights battles within a futuristic solar system. You will be teaming up with 3 other Tennos (this is a 4 player co-op game) to complete missions laid out by Lotus, a female commander issuing you orders. Nah, she is nicer than your ex-girlfriend, so don't worry about that. You will basically be facing three separate forces, Grineer, Corpus and the Infestation (think of the three races in Starcraft if you want to get a better idea). There are different types of missions, ranging from elimination, rescue, spy, to defense and rescue. As for weapons, basically you get to equip a primary weapon (rifle, shotgun, sniper and many others that are hard to categorize), a secondary weapon (categorization is hard for this as well) and a melee weapon (sword, mace, fist... you know the deal). As for your character, you will be using one out of the somewhat 10-ish (slightly less than 20, though the number is gradually increasing as more update comes by) Warframes. Each Warframe comes with different stats, such as self-repairing shields, like those in halo, health, energy (mana) and speed. Still, more importantly, each Warframe has its own unique set of 4 skills. These skills are great assets for the players as most of the times they will come in handy. One thing to note is that gender is preset, so those transsexuals don't have to fake their gender anymore, which is, well ... you decide if it's good or not. There are also mods (modifications) that you can insert into your weapons and Warframes to make them much stronger than they originally are. Oh and there are parkour. Learn how to press "WASD" + "LShift" + "LCtrl" + "Space" in fluid coordination. It will be helpful and painful, but you will definitely need them. Simple? Unlike many co-op shooters, Warframe definitely has its merits. One of the most apparent distinction of the game is that it has a leveling system that can be found in most MMOs. You can level up both your weapons and Warframes to a maximum rank of 30. Moreover, you can rank up your mods as well to make them more powerful. In this way, Warframe won't be a simple "run-shoot-kill see-score go-sleep" type of game. Never. There are things more important than that. Another merit of Warframe is that there are frequent updates. When I say frequent, I mean FREQUENT, as in one big update per month or so. There will be new game modes, Warframes, weapons, mods ... etc. I mean, come on, who thinks that L4D2 came too fast after L4D1 is released? I do. Who is still waiting for L4D3 after all these years? I am. Who thinks that Gabe Newell should fulfill the unsaid promise of completing the trilogies of Valve games? I do. Come on, we have been waiting for L4D3 and Portal 3 and HL3, and we are sick and tired of being sick and tired of waiting. This won't happen for Warframe though. The game has a gradual and comfortable pace of updating. You get new contents every now and then, and they usually blends well with the game. Usually. Still, like most games, there are pros and cons of Warframe and I have to sincerely admit that there are shortcomings with this game when compared to other games. One major shortcoming (I won't say flaw) of this game is that it lacks a concrete story line. Apart from some trivial storytelling, there really aren't much of a tale going on. There are stories told, I'm not saying there aren't, but they are rather weak. I know, that is not their aim, and that is not really the point of Warframe, but compared to the rich (though monotonous) storyline of L4D and Portal, Warframe needs to good a better job here. Also, the game can be rather repetitive. You know, this applies for most Coop shooters, so there really isn't much to say about this. Yeah, repetitive. So, in general, try Warframe. It's free. If you don't like it, drop it. Simple as that. If you do like it and if you feel that you will be playing it in the long run (like how I felt after my first 100th hours), do consider buying a little platinum to expand your weapon and Warframe slots. I bought like 19.90 USD worth of platinums. Not much, but it is the spirit that counts, right?
ReaperTeh [No PC];-;It'll give you back your virginity.
Odlid Togaf;-;Warframe was there when my dog died. Warframe was there when my girlfriend left me. Warframe was there when I lost my job. Warframe was there when I was depressed. Warframe was always there for me when I had nothing else to turn to. Warframe was also the cause of the terrible things that happened in my life... ...but that Lato Vandal and Excalibur Proto Armor skin was worth it. UPDATE: Some people seem to think that the events in this review actually happened. I am sorry for deceiving you. I was merely making a jest about how Warframe took a lot of my time (and money) and was very fun. Thank you concerned commenters for making me have to put this update.
Beeferist;-;Played it, liked it, got addicted to it and eventually started failing school 11/10
P-13 Inconsequential;-;A grindfest better than Destiny.
A Toasty Engineer;-;My god. I have not had this much fun since I discovered tf2. Warframe easily takes the cake for one of the best free to play games on steam. There's a nice balance between what you can get without paying a cent and buying stuff, which imo is what makes this game so good. I was always a sucker for third-person shooters, and this might as well be my favorite. The gunplay is a bit bumpy starting off, but once you get through the first mastery rank test there are many weapons to choose from. Something I really like about this game is that it lets you play how you wanna play. You can be be at the sidelines of the battle, assisting your team and picking off targets. You can mess with your opponent, lining them up for a perfect slash dash. You can soak up hits while your team flanks for the objective. Or you can  all the ninja  and come from the front, guns blazing. Also melee play is an actual, and reliable choice. The controls are laughably easy to get into, after an hour I was completely used to it. And, now with the new update 14, there is an new and better intro to the game. It might take a while to discover what this does, how that works, what happens when I do this, .etc, but that can be cleared away with a quick look at the wiki. I would give it a 8/10, has yet to disappoint me.
dyrak55;-;[06.21.2015] Edit: made some changes and fixed some grammatical errors So, i playing this game nearly more than 2 years and i want to write this. This game have Great Graphics , but with only graphics you can't make a good game. So this game have a great choice of Weapons , but 70% of them feels the same and more than half of them are not very useful with high-level enemies. And this game have a lot of Enemies , but all of them feels the same and doing the same tactics, nearly only things that change with them are weapon, models and protection types (flesh, cloned flesh, robotic or ferrite armor, etc.), all enemies dies the same in your daily slaughter. Edit: But, they adding new Mini-boss type enemies, such as: Grineer Manics, Corpus Bursa and Infested Juggernaut Diversity of Tilesets , and they all beatiful and atmospheric, but it doesn't really profitable to play on 60% of tilesets. because some of them (Dark Sectors have bigger Resource Chance and more XP and Orokin Void which have Prime Parts and more XP for example) are more profitable. Archwing , it's nice to fly in open space and shot\melee every enemy who flies near you, but right now it's just barebones, nothing more interesting in it than few Extermination, Sabotages and Interception Missions and all of the Archwing and their specific weapons are locked behind a grind. Kubrow , you can got and rise your own dog-like loyal companion, but they are just running everywhere and dying and then they losts their loyality which you can refill only by 30% per day (they losts it like 20% per their dead), and their health drops about 10% per day, you need to buy refills (DNA Stabilizers, 6 things per 75,000 credits) which refill only 40% per use. and to find a egg you need to spend about 2-200 runs (depends of random and your luck) to get one. so in point of view they are just credit-sink and any normal sentinel can replace every type of doge (and sentinels don't require credits to take care of them and don't lose loyalty after death) This game have great variety of Warframes and their awesome abilities, and most of them have many differences in abilities and different stats (and cool looks) This game have a nice amount of Bosses (one boss per planet), but most of them are bulletspongy and boring, for example you need to wait until they become vulnerable or you need to shot into specific hit-point to kill them (example: Councilor Vay Hek, General Sargas Ruk, Lephantis, or Mutalist Alad V) and some of them closed behind grind for keys to get frame which drops from them ( Vay Hek(Hydroid) (No longer needs a key), Lephantis(Nekros), Mutalist Alad V(Mesa)) In this game you can get every weapon\frame without paying platinum (in-game currency you need to buy with real-life money (but still you can get it through in-game trade with people)), but you need to grind for them (blueprint costs credits (in-game currency you get through doing missions) some blueprints requires research from Clan Dojo 's laboratories, which requires credits and resources too, and blueprints requires resources and credits to craft them (Resources you can get through missions from killing enemies). Cool variety of Mods for Warframes and Weapons, which drops from enemies and you can make you weapon\frame more powerfull with them, but some mods are rare and some mods drops from rare enemies, and some mods are very, very close to be useless (Intruder: +6 seconds for hacking Maxed, Rifle Aptitude: +15% status chance Maxed.) But even so this game is very good, and i had a good fun with it, i'm recommending it, try to play it with friends and kill things together. Developers support this game with Weekly Updates and Hotfixes in which they fixing bugs, glitches and adding some new changes or items 9.5/10, this game still grows and becomes more interesting with time, i hope on this game's release developers will get rid of all disadvantages in it. Honestly, this is best F2P game on Steam (don't count Valve's TF2 and Dota 2) in my opinion
Hotshot;-;>To my right was Bly as Nova with a huge- sword. >To my left was Sir Butters as Nekros with an axe. > I am Volt with Paris Prime > Bly yells "FOR FRODO" > We charge. 10/10 Would be Space Legolas again.
wa;-;grinded for 2 years straight still not max serration FML
Ashley;-;Warframe's relaxed take on third person combat, impressive visuals, and vast combat customization lets it appeal to both hardcore gamers as well as weekend warriors. Latency issues and high system requirements can put off many but its free to play model is fair. All of the content is provided to players free of charge and that makes it difficult not to recommend it to everyone. You assume the role of one of the Tenno; an ancient group of warriors that were placed in cryogenic stasis in order to survive a losing war.Your character then awakens to find the solar system in extreme turmoil. Caught in a war between three major factions and being the only ones able to disrupt the stalemate, they soon attract attention. Awoken and lead by a mysterious identity going by the alias Lotus the Tenno's intentions continue to remain unknown. Warframe's third person combat is simple but refined, providing a very relaxed and smooth shoot-'em-up feel, while a complex but easy to follow weapon modification system offers endless customization to the gameplay. Enemies will drop many modifications during missions, which allow players to change weaponry and their character to improve combat performance without limitation. This design allows players to modify all of the smallest aspects of their character and weaponry while maintaining the games RPG elements. Each of the weapons have their own specific function, attack patterns and style, which further compliment your playstyle. Dying can come across as cheap as some enemies will stun lock players to death or simply hit through their shields for an instant-kill. Included to increase difficulty; it often feels unjustified and overly punishing. Mission maps are generated randomly based on pre-existing tile sets depending on the planet and type of mission chosen. Each mission has a specific objective, however many of these feel overly similar; often consisting of back tracking and repetitive fetch quests. Missions are unlocked by completing the adjacent nodes connected to them; however this soon branches off into many directions, though many of these use the same tile-sets as the previous mission with only a few varying objectives between the two. Missions can often feel too similar to one another on a single planet, giving little reason to play ones that branch away from the main path. The matchmaking system can be frustrating, offering little choice in terms of selecting a mission or joining a game already in progress. Offering no options besides public or private, you may often find yourself leaving a laggy game only to be thrown back in again numerous times. The matchmaking system definitely needs work and its constantly overlooked throughout updates. Warframe's free to play model uses micro-transactions to speed up the acquisition of weapons and characters with the use of in game currency called platinum. Free users are still able to access all content within the game but will struggle to gain access to everything without consistent farming for materials and parts needed to create new weapons. Platinum allows players to directly purchase weapons and characters without the need to craft and collect materials. With free players able to access all content while giving paying customers faster access to new content, Warframe shows how the free to play model doesnt have to alienate non-paying users. While Warframe doesn't provide the adrenaline fueled action we're accustomed to in shooters, its Shoot-'em-up style combat remains satisfying for many hours and the endless customization options add much needed padding to help overcome the repetition. The heavy reliance on a random loot table for item drops throughout the game can lead to extreme frustration at times, especially when farming for a specific item. Bugs can be prominent at times, especially the ones that affect the user interface, however most major issues are fixed quickly with a hotfix provided by the development team. Pros: + Stunning visuals, especially for more powerful video cards + Plenty of weapons and characters to level up + Customization allows any type of design and play-style which adds replay value + Frequent content updates Cons: - Dying can feel unfair at times, leaving the player stun-locked until death - Matchmaking system needs work, often selecting poor hosts - High repetition within missions - High system requirements - Microtransactions are a little overpriced While rough around the edges at times, most bugs and technical issues are not persistent. As long as you can meet the system requirements and bandwidth isn't a limitation, theres no reason not to give Warframe a try with its fair free to play model. If you enjoyed this review, please check out the Analog Reviews steam group where we strive to provide honest and unbiased reviews: http://steamcommunity.com/groups/AnalogReviewsOfficial
Cow;-;You're looking at a player who has logged in a beefy amount of hours. After playing some hours, I am sure that you will be hoofed on into this game as well. So let me write this review to mootivate you to start playing. Pros + Beautiful graphics + Active gameplay + Endless content + A broad range of customization + Over 100 ways to kill something + F2P Cons - A lot of farming and repetition - Very limited for a low rank player The only major downside to this game is the farming and repetition unless you don't mind doing so. Overall, this is a great game to satisfy your inner space ninja needs.
CuG;-;Warframe is a great game, with a few issues surrounding it. The pros, in my opinion are: You never feel pressured to buy platinum, since trading is easy and so is getting credits. Each Frame (Character) that I've owned have all felt unique and pleasurable to play. The game looks gorgeous, hands down. It's use of lighting and such make it look fantastic. The missions, while repetitive at times, are enjoyable. Especially if you have a friend with you. There is a great variety of Frames, Weapons and Mods to challenge yourself to learn. Co-op is easy, and lag-free as far as what I've experienced. The cons are: The game can bug out at times. Missions can be slightly repetitive, as said before. Some players may just stand around doing nothing, or be bad at the game. In summary, pick this game up if you have a few friends with it, and become a ninja today.
PP Not Isn't Not Not-Gaz;-;SPACE NINJAS. IN SPACE. WITH SPACE GUNS FIGHTING SPACE CLONES AND SPACE MERCHANTS AND SPACE ZOMBIES. IN SPACE. As a F2P game it is a bit grindy, but the aesthetic as well as the feel of downing enemies and the sheer fun of ripping apart hordes keeps me coming back. Is even better with friends.
Super Muffin;-;I cut a guy in half, then cut both of his halves in half while they were still in the air.
Talkon6;-;Run sliding is so addicting that you will be trying to do it in every other game you play, and then get upset with the fact that you can't.
Spectre;-;An excellent example of f2p game done right. Pros: - nice graphics - dynamic and engaging gameplay - unique visual style and story - good co-op PVE experience - non-intrusive and balanced monetization - excellent devs communication and feedback - game is constantly developing and new features become available regularly Cons: - the gameplay becomes grindy over time - PVP is almost non-existent So I higly recommend this game if you are into co-op PVE third-person shooters. It's a kind of game when if you get tired of it - you can always take a break, return at some later point and see a lot of new and interesting stuff added with the latest updates.
Falem;-;Intro Warframe is a fast-paced third person shooter. The developer, Digital Extremes, is the studio behind The Darkness 2 and Dark Sector. Digital Extremes gets involved with the community, by providing regular patches, video updates and participation in the forums. Digital Extremes borrows heavily from their previous game Dark Sector that was developed in 2008 and scrapped on 2012 in favor of making Warframe. Summary +Great Atmosphere/Environments +Great Weapon/Skills/Character Selection +Great Clan System (Dojo is impressive) +Great Developer Support(updates are good chunks and come often) +Great movement opportunities(Running across wall is fun) -Grind(Blueprints/Materials) Gameplay The gameplay is pretty solid, if you are looking something flashy like Devil May Cry, you are not going to get it here. That being said, the variation of weapons really make up for this. The warframes themselves are great in terms of variety and design. Each one has stats and abilities that set them apart, which results in a fresh experience every time you play with a new warframe. Being able to run along walls or run up them makes mobility in the game more dynamic in terms of getting from point A to point B. Rank System Rank system emphasis on developing experience with Warframes, weapons and equipment rather than getting exp in general. Your rank is a signature of how much firepower you have accumulated in your arsenal. Since rank challenges vary it will test a wide array of your skills from marksmanship, mobility, and combat abilities. This system results in the player being more well rounded by fleshing out your skills in a multitude of areas. Customization Upgrading, transmuting, and fusion are several methods to improve your options. The level of equipment acts as points for attaching mods. This allows for multiple combinations of mods to get different desired advantages, to fight certain factions or missions. The forma is also a great way to make a weapon use less points in certain slots allowing you to develop it even further. Atmosphere The setting is great and in my opinion helped attract alot of people to this game. The atmosphere and level designs are becoming more varied as the developers are updating the game with new environments. The new environments are really fun to play in and sometimes have their own perks. Updates As someone who made a long guide for this game I can say that their updates are so solid I feel my guide gets outdated every month and requires me to go back and make it relevant. This is most apparent in their UI changes they have made which made my videos a-bit weird to see for the newer players. Clan The dojo is one of the nicest additions I have seen yet. Not only does it offer a nice place for members to go to but in a sense its structure is an achievement of everyone who has helped contribute to it. The dojo offers a wide variety of nice side things like being able to do pvp, and being able to craft new weapons that are only available through research. Pay to Win? If you are worried about this game being pay to win rest assured thats not how it is. The only real benefit to paying besides cosmetics is being able to get slots. You can put time in and get the same results you just can't have many Warframes/Weapons at once. They also designed it in a way that is hybrid in some areas. For example in foundry you will be able to pay money to speed up the process. So instead of buying the weapon, you can collect the resources, craft the item in foundry and then pay to speed up the process so you don't have to wait. Grinding? Yes, there is grinding when you are looking for specific warframes and materials. Generally you will grind in the places where you reap the most benefits and try to get the pay-off aka the warframe as soon as possible. The grinding got a bit worse in a way when they introduced more materials which made the chances lower of getting blueprints. This is setoff a bit by the fact that they introduced alot more environment maps which increase its replayability. So if you do not mind grinding, buy slots to make more warframes if you like the game enough. Conclusion Overall Warframe is a classic example of how free to play games can be great and interesting and still give developers plenty of profits without turning it into a Pay to Win game. If you are looking for an interesting game.... just give it a try, I am sure it won't disappoint.
Section-Nine;-;There are very few games that have held my attention for 1,000+ hours over the years, this is one of them. I created an account back when the game was still in Alpha (late 2012), back then it was was just a simple module with some enemies to kill with a handful of warframes to choose from. Even then though it showed promise. Over time they have added tons of content, new warframes, weapons galore, new planets, mission types, Archwing (fly in space!), events, clan dojos and foundry, player to player trading system, syndicates to join, player HUBs (relay stations), PVP, 8 player Raid etc etc. If you enjoy third person shooters, 4 player coop, pvp, raiding, RPG's and/or ninjas in space (lol) this game is a dream come true then for you. Being that it is free to play there is literally nothing to lose checking it out. The game is a constant work in progress and the developer Digital Extremes (DE) is constantly tweaking and adding new content all the time. Warframe has a very decent crafting system and you will most likely find yourself trying many different warframes/weapons combinations to see which one(s) fit your style the best. Believe me the game encourages you to do so, it is surprising the amount of variety in the game. When you find something you like it is a rewarding feeling and you will too it is just a matter of time. Also decent customization for your warframes, weapons, Sentinels (companion), Kubrows (dog companion), Liset (your ship), with a multitude of color choices, skins and attachments. Every Warframe has its own set of individual abilities, they all have a total of 4. Some are better at being tanky, dps, sneaking (cloaking), solo play, healers, AOE damage, defense etc. There is a Warframe for every situation it seems. You can also make your own builds for each frame based on what mods you have (you attain them while playing missions they are dropped by enemies) For example "Continuity" mod allows for longer power duration time, when you ability is activated. More ammo, damage mods etc etc sooooo many. Making building your perfect Warframe/weapons very flexible and enjoyable. You have the opportunity to have a Primary, secondary and melee weapon. With the opportunity to make your own builds for everything here adds to the games replayability imo. Same goes for sentinels and kubrow companions they all have their own set of mods, especially made for them. That being said the game can be very grindy, especially for newer players. That is to be expected though being that it is an MMOish experience. Especially to gather enough resources and credits to craft your items. Well worth it though if you have the time to invest. Sometimes they seem to nerf warframes and weapons for no reason at all and then they rework it again and "fix" it. Nerf/Un-nerf is the nature of free to play MMO' ish kind of games. (Constant "balance" tweaking) This is not an instant gratification game either, the game gets better the more you play it. You can also purchase items with real money from the in game market, it is NOT necessary though. Most things can be attained just playing the game gathering resources and crafting them accordingly. Except, of course vanity items, skins, unique color palettes and limited time only items that have been available over the course of the game. DE sometimes gifts players new color palettes and send them to your inbox (valentine's day, halloween, St. Patrick's day etc.) Free weapons too, they seem to do somethings special on the games anniversary every year. The developer also listens to community feedback and designs and have added many things based on that. Which is always a plus. The game can also get repetitive at times, but with the amount of content in game now that is harder to happen. You just have to mix it up from time to time and try new things within the game. All in all the future looks bright for this game. A Developer that actually listens to community feedback. Constant updates/hotfixes. Plus there is so much new content coming soon! Game is not perfect of course, but what game truly is right. There is a lot to enjoy here and unique setting and premise to the game, definitely sets itself apart from the competition. MMO's are hard to review, but at its current state I give this game a 4 stars (     ) out of 5
Dream;-;Why is this game free? 11/10
Nickel Bank;-;WARNING: IF YOU DON'T WANNA BE ADDICTED, DON'T ING INSTALL THIS GAME. This game is the , there are so many options of playstyle here, even though you're basically a space ninja, doesn't mean you need to be stealthy and sneaky all the time. You can slash and shoot and blow-up everything as you like at NINJA SPEED. Burn  up with Ember. Impale soldiers to wall with Bows. Electrocute ers with Volt. Slash robots to pieces with a WHIP GRINDER THINGY. Freeze them to death with Frost. Or even bring em back to life with Nekros. And it's literally Free to Play, not Pay to Win because you can craft anything you like here, no need for money and you can always trade with someone to earn Platinums. And with mods youd have so many choices of playstyle. I AM TENNO.
Ikaruga-Chan;-;Still 1 of games that i still play for many years. -Gunshooting? Checked! -Super Power? Checked! -Melee Weapon? Checked! -Various Armor? Checked! -Customize Skill & Passive Ability? Checked! -Customize Color & Style Appearance? Checked! -Hardcore Mode? Checked! -Co-OP Win freind? Checked! -F2P Not P2W? Checked!
Galaxy Paradox;-;> Is bored > Downloads Warframe > Plays Warframe > Abandons friends in a firefight > Gets a ship > Gets a gun > Grinds for 4 hours > Gets 5 XP 11/10 would grind all day for 5 XP again
[UG] Trisimix;-;It's ok I guess.
DJ MATTTAM;-;You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for over an hour. Please don't forget to take a break.
GoM Murasakibara;-;Warframe is a simulator game where you travel around space, destroying Hitler's instagram followers from space to get back your good kush and alcohol. You are given several euphoric powers and weapons to help you on your quest, along with a depressed spaceship AI who watches you while you sleep. The main bad guy of the game is named Small Biggie, he doesn't believe good kush and alcohol is MLG and wants to destroy it and the people who like it, but you have Snoop Dogg's main hoe on your side so it's okay. Will you ever get your good kush and alcohol back? Pay money and you might get it back faster.
Zyga;-;Warframe was another one of my 40-100 Hour trips. I enjoyed this game, I really did, I can tell you exactly what I liked and exactly what got me to stop playing make the choice on your own for if the game is worth your time though. Things I really really liked about the game, and why you should play it: It's free It has an interesting arcade shooter puzzle dungeon layout feel thing going on. It has tons of goals to keep you going Kubrows are adorable You can play how you like, if you like stealth go stealthy, if you like running and gunning go do that. aaaaaaaaaaaaand you don't HAVE to buy anything you can earn Prime blueprints from the void and sell them to suckers other players for platinum. Generally enjoyable. Things that pushed me away from the game: I guess the only thing that really got me was when I was waiting for the next mission but I had to go through the next few planets to get there.... Kind of a drag and finding groups for normal missions, everyone just wants to do void missions and alerts. #Rip matchmaking. So now the standard game rating: Story: 10/10 (Enjoyable, and forces you to learn how to get a kubrow (without paying plat).) Gameplay: 10/10 (Arcade-y-shoot-y-stealth-y-f2p-y-fun-co-op-y-time-based-and-stuff-yeah.) Presentation: 9/10 (Warframes are ugly, but they grow on you, and other than that the whole game looks fantastic.) Soundtrack: 8/10 (Not memorable, not annoying, having your own music in hurts nothing.) Replayability: 10/10 (This game is great, I will come back to play it, but rght now I'm waiting 2 days for playing a new warframe and I just dont feel like grinding.) I want to provide a second note, which may actually be different now as the whole thing seems to be under new management: The support guy can blow a . When I went to them the first time with an issue about the game, I was playing on a  laptop that wasn't able to run warframe, I asked what the problem could be and he told me the stupidest  in the world, I can't handle when the support team who is supposed to help just sends you to virus filled websites and helps you in no way whatsoever. I simply asked if there could be anything wrong with it and as it turns out I just didn't have a good enough computer (big shocker there, playing on a laptop from 2007) I would rather him telling me there's nothing that can be done than sending me to a download from a 3rd party site to try and update my drivers using some random virus filled wizard. EDIT: after scanning my computer I came across adware on the name of "SearchProtection" It came from the CNet download that I was given, so  you old support, long live the new. Now at my normal computer I properly enjoy the game, I can't speak highly of their support as of 3 months ago though. (July/August 2014)
T.w | prcss;-;Time it takes for "longer lasting" Juicy Fruit to lose Flavor? 43 Seconds. Time it takes for Warframe to lose Flavor? 1,200 Hours.
Lobogris;-;5 hours playing Warframe "Dude, this game sucks: grinding non-stop, useless weapons and my warframe seems to be made of paper" 50 hours playing Warframe "Okay, I built several warframes, one of which is potatoed and properly modded. I also managed to snipe some sweet wargear from the Void and events, things are turning out great" 500 hours playing Warframe A lone Liset vessel travelled through the atmosphere of Pluto. Ordis, the AI onboard the ship, spoke again: "Your Scindo Prime has been previously supercharged and does not require further modification. Are you ready for deployment, Operator?"
XGPREDATOR;-;There was a big bunch of bugs back in 2013, but most of them have been fixed by now. So Warframe is overall a good game for a F2P , with enjoyable combats, awesome graphics and all those weapons and frames that you could get . It's true that Warframe's Coop missions are repetitive but it is still an impressive title, with those awesome devs, this game is totally worth a try!
Le Poon;-;Uh... I don't know what to write here.. So i'm just going to give you the recipe for making waffles. Ingredients: 2 eggs 2 cups of all-purpose flour 1 3/4 cups of milk 1/2 cup of vegetable oil 1 tablespoon of white sugar 4 teaspoons of baking powder 1/4 teaspoon of salt 1/2 teaspoon of vanilla extract Steps: 1.Preheat waffle iron. Beat eggs in large bowl with hand beater until fluffy. Beat in flour, milk, vegetable oil, sugar, baking powder, salt and vanilla, just until smooth. 2.Spray preheated waffle iron with non-stick cooking spray. Pour mix onto hot waffle iron. Cook until golden brown. Serve hot. 12/10 - Would make waffles again. All in all yes, Bugframe is a good grindfest and no, it has nothing to do with waffles. :(
Cerberus;-;Great fun. It's clearly still beta as the game offers little information about how to actually set up your character, luckily the Wiki is superb. Think Left 4 Dead with Space Ninja's. Loads of classes and even more weapon variety.
Tupac;-;well this game is just like the Pringles chips........ "Once you pop, you can't stop"
ZechsX18999;-;Warframe is the best FREE online game out there! Warframe is 100% free. You will always have access to all of the game's content (except cosmetics) without needing to pay any money. If you want cosmetics, you have the option of spending money on Platinum (the game currency) or you can just trade other players for Platnium. I've played over 3,000 hours without spending any money because I just sold items to other players for Platinum and then used that Platinum to buy cosmetics. You control a Warframe. There are over 20 Warframes to choose from and they all have unique themes (Fire, Berserker, Stealth, etc.) and special powers (Fireball, Warcry, Smokescreen, etc.). There are hundreds of weapons to choose from (Rifles, Snipers, Shotguns, Launchers, Pistols, Swords, Axes, etc.) and every method of killing is perfectly viable. I have the most fun when I use all the tools available to me. For example: I'll use my Fire Warframe to burn five enemies, then I'll use my shotgun to shoot another six, and finally I'll use my sword cut up the rest! Warframe is a co-op game, but it's still fun if you want to solo. There is also PVP, but it's not balanced and not the focus of this game. Warframe updates pretty frequently, so there is always something new and interesting to do. Warframe has good graphics, but doesn't require too much from your computer. If you have any questions about Warframe, feel free to add me .
Dewgong;-;Now half of you will just rate the review unhelpful because it's negative, but be reminded that every one of these problems is something I want to be fixed, not that I laugh about, read on if you care, or be one of the many who would disregard what I say because they think it's bad to point out issues, and will blindly follow Warframe to the depths of hell itself to shoot down critisizm. Look at my hours, I know what I'm talking about. Off-putting Community with really short-sighted Devs. First The Positives, +It's free to play, (With some restrictions.) +Playing with friends can be a lot of fun, the problem is trying to get them to play the game with you. (It's harder than you might think) +Combat is fun, albeit a bit buggy at times. +Weapons and frames a quite varied, making almost every item a new experience. +Not bad in terms of graphics, everything looks like plastic and rubber but hey, it's a free game. Now the Negatives... -The game is an infinite power creep. -The forums, I have never met such a nasty group of people in my life. -The game doesn't have too much grinding, the game IS grinding, you are grinding to grind more. -The game is ridiculously easy, you can get almost every item in the game in just about a month. -The paywalls, unless you only want to have two Warframes, you gotta pay up, that or attempt the horrible trading system. -The generic enemies of clones and spacemen, most of the concepts are quite unoriginal. The enemy designs seem to be based on freaking shapes, or just generic space zombies straight out of something like Halo or Dead Space. -The AI barely makes enemies a threat, they will suicide rush you solo, all while getting slaughtered. -The bugs, this is a beta game but good god, it's been out for 2 years, they simply neglect to fix them. Hell, sometimes they create more bugs than they fix. These things are so rampant, it actually makes a SERIOUS impact on the games sometimes, from camera issues to getting stuck in walls, bugs ruin SO much of the gameplay that it hurts sometimes. -The balancing, DE couldn't balance a seesaw, some items are worthless, others OP to the extreme. The developers have proved time and time again to be completely incompetent when it comes to the issue of imbalance with weapons and frames, they will leave the top teir weapons that completely outclass anything that comes near them alone, while nerfing random items that very clearly didn't need it. It makes no sense, the whole update process is an endless stream of nerfing and ignoring. They also just straight up ignore useless frames and items, theres nothing more to say, they just ignore them. -The updates, most just introduce a shiny version of something already in game, or a useless gun. -The end goal, if you don't care about a number next to your name, there is none -The asskissing, DE will release a patch to fix something THEY broke, and people thank the  out of them, yeah sure, that makes sense, not to mention ANY critisism of ANY of their decisions, (no matter how stupid they are) will be shot down by their White Knights -The gameplay, stealth is a neglected factor entirely, the whole game is just trying to get ahead of your squad to try and do more damage, any other gamemode is just killing  with some minor objective to focus on while you spam your skills or choice of over-powered weapon. -The devs greed, they will ignore major problems so that they can release a new Prime package and find more ways to suck your money out, (Like slots, for example) -The idiotic community, just go look at the wiki, every page's comments has someone  on a weapon and telling you some other one is better, they just bicker endlessly about everything. -The matchmaking, there isn't any, you have to go sit in a chat room, (Unless you join a clan, WHICH YOU SHOULD BE!) and wait for some Rhino Prime to join your game, unless you're doing normal missions, cause then you are  out of luck cause unless some random person is doing the same node at the same time, you're doomed to play it solo. -The money creep of cosmetics, every new item that comes out is more expensive than the last, you know why DE does this? Cause they know their brain-dead community will eat it the  up, and throw tons of money at the screen while mashing "THANKS DE" into their keyboard as hard as they can. -The lack of progress with updates, sure they come often, but seriously, they give us random weapons that who's gonna care about when there is elite top level gear that cannot be out-classed. The updates never bring ANYTHING new or significant. -The lack of variety in gamemodes, there's like 4 or 5 gamemodes and you better like them cause they are gonna be the only thing you play, ever. -The PvP, this should have never been added, the Conclave is straight up dead, being horribly unbalanced and incredibly laggy, (I'll get to the reason behind that next.) and Dark Sectors are controlled by clans that use DDoS and other shady tactics to force massive taxes down players throats. -The lack of servers, every game is hosted by a player, which means lag, a LOT of lag, it sometimes makes the game literally unplayable, and it's incredibly common. -The crashing, I crash 2-3 times a day on Warframe, just... my god, if I had to list the amount of times I had to Alt-F4 out of the game, this review would be three times as long. -The movement, you simply latch on to walls when you wall run, nothing feels natural, every jump, every vault, they all feel stilted and slow. Not to mention sometimes you just FLY mach 5 across the map when you jump from a sliding position, the jumps are so irregular. -The melee combat, you run up to the enemy mash the E key and you MIGHT hit them, it's completely random. And just like other weapons, melee weapons are completely unbalanced, for the most part heavy weapons are useless, and certain weapons destroy the rest hands down, its borderline . -The Argon issue, every new weapon requires Argon crystals as an artificial way to make them harder to obtain, this simply comes from DEs issue of being uncreative with ways to acquire new weaponry. -The fact that certain frames are one trick ponies, certain frames are only used for one (sometimes two) abilities, while the rest of their entire arsenal is completely ignored. -The lack of a challenge, this somewhat correspondes with the game being too easy, with a certain frame and weapon, anything can be completed by a braindead child, people actually have to make up their own end-game of getting to high waves simply to have the RISK of being defeated. -The lack of a skill requirement, as I said directly above, so long as you have the right weapon and frame, you can conqeur literally anything. There is no reward for being good at the game, in fact you don't even have to try your best, simply having the numbers 1-2-3-4 on your keyboard is enough to be just as good as anyone else. -The most ignorant developers I've ever seen, here is an example, there is a weapon called the Dark Dagger, it is awful, as every single handed dagger is. However, the hilarity insues when you realise, that the tiny Dark Dagger, is around the same speed as the giant two handed hammer Fragor. And you think that's bad? NONE of the dagger stances actually match the Dark Daggers stance polarity, NONE. That is the most idiotic thing I've ever heard in my life to be honest. If you want to play with other people, join a clan, most of the community is elitism  who don't care about the gameplay, and are simply waiting for the next prime to come out. The more people who dislike this only proves what I'm talking about with the asskissing, every one of these points is true, no matter how much people will try to deny them. Fanboys will be ignored and most likely have their rant deleted, think before you post.
Kyjerwa;-;Once upon a time there was a bunch of glowing white people living in a magical realm of reality known as the VOID. It was in this VOID that a war raged between the glowing white people and an unknown, let's call them yellow people. In a desperate attempt to succeed, the glowing white people created magical spandex suits to contain the power of those affected by the VOID's magical glowingness. The war turned, and yet for unknown reasons the magical spandex people of the VOID turned on their former masters. Zing to the sort-of-present-in-this-universe, you play as a WARFRAME; a magical man enveloped by the most staggeringly beautiful piece of spandex to grace the seven galaxies. The magnificent contours of your spandex allows you powers beyond your wildest dreams, from jumping really high to tearing people apart with magical fire-gloves. Your magical journey through candyland starts off in a Cryotube getting ravenously bullied by blue crab-people named GRINEER; one of the 3 warring factions in this ed-up universe, comprised of clones that wear really stupid armor. In self defense, you gracefully tear the crab-people into tiny gibs and escape into your own personal ship named the LISET, accompanied by a really annoying voice named ORDIS. Your adventure continues through the black  expanse of space to further terrorize the crab-people of Earth, and rescue DARVO, tied to the CORPUS; s who care only about money and wear 80s spacesuits designed for really wierd fetish porn. After escaping the grasp of the crab-people and spacemen, the rest of the story falls into your hands, the sentience behind the spandex. Only you can write your own destiny, tell your own story, spin your own tale. Go forth, spandexman, and bring forth with you wrath the likes of which never graced by this generation, nor will ever be for generations to come. TLDR: Lots of grinding
Barthomeloi;-;My name is Artour Tennovsky. I grow up in small Liset to have make potatos. Lotus say "Artour, potato harvest is bad. Need you to have play professional farmski in Derelictski for make money for potato seeds for babushka." I bring honor to komrade and babushka. Sorry for is not have English. Please no  pasta. no copy pasterino frapuccino ronaldinho siniorino , this my life. This game, I love this game, teach you patience and farm tekniks to make good situation out of no situation.
Sumnus;-;I started writing a review for why after a year of playing the game, I changed my review for it from recommended to not recommended; and it ended up being far longer than is a reasonable length for a review. It is not the proper forum for me to write four pages as to what happened to the game, and why I can't suggest playing it anymore. If you want to read more on it, I suggest going to the actual forums for the game (not through Steam, but through the official website). The players there are very active in posting, and there will be a lot of threads going in detail about the faults of the game, and talking about how DE's actions have never been further out of sync from what players want from the game, and from the direction they were once taking it. Instead of writing four pages, i'll summarize it into something short and concise. Again, if you want more specifics, feel free to go look into them, but I'll summarize, as I have logged more than enough hours into the game to be very familiar with it, and what has happened. What it really boils down to is this: The company is using grind walls, and severely crowded RNG tables to deliver content. Which is one of the least creative, and worst examples of game design I have ever played. It wasn't originally going to be that way, but that is what it has become now. And considering it is supposed to be an action game, and not an MMO/RPG, the grind really kills the feel of the game, you are much less of a Space Ninja saving the solar system, and more of a mindless drone collecting resources for new weapons, all for literally no reason at all, due to the lack of story. In my 20 years of gaming experience, I have never seen a company so unwilling to work with what their player base wanted, and just outright ignore them. The community is incredibly vocal with ways to make the game more enjoyable for the players, and keep them interested, and avoid just getting burned out on the game, and patch after patch, they go ignored. From the past year of expereince with this game, the current state is that it is a fantastic concept, being delivered in one of the worst ways imaginable, by an inadequate design and balance team.
Picklez!;-;Playing warframe is like being an irishman- you could always use more potatoes
WhiteGuyChaos;-;AMAZING  GAME... What i kinda wish destiny was like
Creamed Syrup;-;eh its alright
RSA.eadeye;-;Warframe is kind of like Mass Effect 3's multiplayer but better in many ways. It has a power system similar to ME3's power system, but it has a variety of missions instead of only a deffence/horde mode. It has some really cool weapons. And it has bows. These bows are what sold me when I first started. I saw a bow in the store and spent $10 to buy the thing faster than *put Flash joke here*. It's not a PvP game. Some of the Warframes, like Rhino, are REALLY OP in PvP. But overall it's a good time, especially with friends. I should note that you can buy almost anything in the game via Plat, this does lead to a "Pay 2 Win" kind of game. You can get almost anything in the game via Plat / trading, BUT you can get EVERYTHING in the game without paying anything. A lot of the weapons in the store are around 275 Plat (which is REALLY overpriced) and Warframes will run from 75-375. (which is a little better because of the pain it is to build them) I must stress here that Warframe is the most fun when you are just playing and not grinding for something. Yes, grinding is something that you HAVE to do in order to get anyware in Warframe, but (at least for me) this does not ruin the overall experience.
KirktheJerk;-;I have a bow and arrow that can pin people to the wall. Enough said. Edit: After tons of time on here, it does get a bit grind intensive. Some nerfs have made it even more grindy too. Still fun but end game isn't really there still.
Sll cl;-;So, I've been playing Warframe for around 2 years now, and I have to say I've had fun. It wouldn't be fair to review this game with a negative bias like the one I have, so I'm presenting facts as objectively as I can here in as fair of an environment as I can. Warframe is a scifi third-person action game that plays more like a firstperson shooter on steroids. It essentially feels like a cross-over between older fast paced games like Quake and Unreal Tournament, with properties akin to that of a more modern shooter. That being said, I can't call into question the fun other people have playing this game, so I can't consider that a worthwhile approach to determining whether or not the game is worth paying any money into or not. But I can say it's fair to judge other factors, for example... This game is based heavily around "Modding", the use of items to upgrade weapons appropriately, and Crafting, the use of materials picked up from fallen enemies / broken containers or enemy storage lockers, to build things like weapons and characters to use. It takes a very long time to gather these materials, and because of this, it has been referred to as "Farming" when a player repeatedly runs the same mission, or runs a mission for a very long time in order to gain more of a material out of it. Now, here's where my reasoning comes in as to why I don't like this game as much as I could. It takes too long. I am someone who has a lot more free time on my hands than the average gamer, so I haven't had to buy much in this game using the in-game currency Platinum ( which is purchased with real world money ). Now, that's fine. Having micro-transactions to skip the time consuming part of a game is okay, because you can still have the option of acquiring it yourself over a longer period of time with simple hard work. What's not okay is something Warframe players refer to as RNGesus, the Random Number Generator. What's also not okay is the extensive nature of "Farming". A significant portion of content in this game is hidden behind a 'grindwall', or rather, an extensive task or list of tasks that MUST be performed before you can access certain parts of the game. This is not as bad as DLC, and it isn't as bad as micro-transactions in some other games, but it can be fairly irksome at times. All in all, this game is fair about how it treats many things, especially how it treats micro-transactions ( in the fact that a huge number of things can very easily be acquired with time and effort ) except for one problem... Pricing. It effectively costs around $10 to get a typical weapon, and $15 or so for some of the more expensive ones. This is a problem that is very hard to argue against or in favour of because of an even larger problem, the value of time. Calling into question the fairness of the pricing of micro-transactions in this game is difficult because you call into question the value a player has of their time. Is it worth spending $10 to get a weapon now, or is it worth spending a day to collect the credits and resources to buy it, then wait an additional 12 hours for it to craft? Is it worth spending $15 to get a Warframe ( Playable Character ) immediately plus bonuses, or is it worth it to spend several hours acquiring the parts and the credits and resources, then waiting approximately 4-5 days on average for it to build? The problem here in my eyes is that it is not worth it, typically because in the time it takes to acquire these things, I could have done much more in other games, or even worse, for $15 I could've bought an entire other game. Now we move on from pricing, and Platinum / Microtransaction issues, to another thing that irks me. Balancing. I admit that Warframe is technically still in beta, and that many things still do need to be complete, but this does not feel like a beta game any longer. There is a huge quantity of content in this game, which I would easily value as being worth well over $40 ( Generous for a game that has no form of very specific story or singleplayer campaign + no straight up form of sandbox, as well as being restricted to missions that are run from your Liset, which is essentially your 'main menu' of sorts. ) The audio quality is impressive, and the visuals are even moreso; The animations for melee weapons are both practical for gameplay and impressive to actually look at, though the game begins to disappoint when it comes to the secondaries and primaries which all share one unified means of holding primaries and holding secondaries, where you hold all primaries as a rifle and you hold all secondaries as a pistol. There are unified reloading animations for some weapons, although thankfully it also seems many weapons have their own unique reloading animations and firing animations in some cases. Bow weapons all share the same animations, and no one single bow weapon has its own animations unfortunately thus far. Countless assets are recycled in this game, although this has no significant effect on gameplay so I won't consider that something to tally against. "Recycled assets" in this case being many enemies who share the same model with different colours. For example, an enemy known as the Nullifier makes Abilities useless ( Abilities in this game are essentially akin to spellcasting from other games, where you can throw fireballs, set up shields, etc. Many things really. ) I personally dislike Nullifiers simply because they detract from an environment where the use of Abilities is one of the main things that makes the game stand out from similar shooter games. Many enemies in this game rely on actions that knock you down ( Rendering you unable to fight back by any means ) using attacks that, in some cases, are completely unavoidable. Thankfully unavoidable knockdowns are rare, although the true problem is not the knockdown itself, but the fact that knockdowns have no counterplay ( Once you're on the ground, you're unable to do anything to make your character get up faster / unable to defend yourself even if only rolling out of the way of incoming fire ). This game has plenty of cover, but no cover system to make greater use of it, thereby unfortunately making no use of an otherwise potentially unique addition to an otherwise straightforward gameplay system. The enemies are fairly intelligent, and make use of cover to the point of it even being annoying in strange ways at times, for example enemies will frequently change course repeatedly ( Running back and forth or even running in circles ) because they are trying to move towards two different sources of cover simultaneously. AI bugs aside, the AI is intelligent and fun to fight against. There are countless weapons to use, but another unfortunate thing is that with how the game treats enemy scaling, the most useful weapon always ends up being the one that cranks out the most damage. Generally speaking, you will always perform better with a weapon that does much more damage than another weapon that operates in a more unique fashion ( For example the flame-thrower weapon does so little damage and has so little effect on enemies that it's generally just a better idea to use a heavy machine gun or rifle that does vastly superior damage overall ) Artificial difficulty is a topic commonly talked about in Warframe, with the most common subjects being the repeated nerfs and buffs being done to characters who typically aren't deserving of the treatment they get. Another topic tends to be the way in which difficulty is "improved" or "upped" as the game gets into higher levels, with enemies becoming textbook Bullet Sponge enemies and increasingly cheap tactics such as unnecessarily frequent knockdowns or locking the players' movement and so on. All in all, I can't really recommend this game to people who either lack free time, or are at all prone to being frustrated by what can be described as an unfairly balanced environment.
[BTB] SandCastle;-;My review of Warframe Warframe is an amazing game with a truly original story and setting. In the year 2029 Austria, birth place of Hitler, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Money Boy and Joseph Fritzl decided to place a ban on all other forms of national production. Farms were closed, factories shut down and local stores were forced out of business. The only businesses allowed to operate were the ports, for importing food to feed the now practically enslaved workforce. All national production refocused on the construction of the "Door Frame" Austria's answer to your door hanging needs. By the year 2031 rogue factions within the Austrian government decided it was time to strike, uploading a selective virus in to the entire nations production lines. This led to the creation of the "War Frame" a door frame so focused on war that it caused conflict wherever it was mounted, homes across the globe now featured Austrian doorframes and unfortunately a rogue batch of Warframes were also set loose across the globe. These Warframes were notorious, sealing front doors to homes to prevent you visiting your neighbours, sealing doorways to places of worship so people could no longer pray to their chosen gods and gradually over time the world fell to darkness and chaos, as even the doorways to power plants and gas stations refused to open. Some Warframes gained sentience and self awareness and as they saw the human uprising finally coming to fruition, their evil colleagues and companions burned in the streets and smashed to splinters they rose up to assist their human allies in the fight against their own kind. You take the role of one of nineteen types of Warframe, from Oak, to pine to cedar wood. The choices are limitless, your skills totally customizable, from 'tea tray services' to 'Opening for the elderly'. As one of the newly freed warframes, you must take up the mantle of free-DOOR-m fighter, fighting across not only earth but the moon, Mars and Titan to free the oppressed human people from their true foes, the evil Warframes of the Austrian Mega-doorframe-corp. 11/10 would open and close door again.
Lester (Elit3) Allan;-;Lots of fun, and probably the only game where it's fun to grind. great trade community also, with constant content updates. this game is not Pay2Win.
Dabluechimp;-;I hate this game.
Lucifer;-;This game is based on the biography of the Late Abraham Lincoln. It Takes place in 1998, Right after Lincoln finished his music career in Rap/Hip-hop. His number 1 single of the time was "The Fresh Prince of Bel' air" His life ended in a very tragic way, as he overdosed on prescription lincoln logs.
xX_Tungsten_Xx;-;People may say it is a pay to win game but if you put some effort into it you'll start to get some badass stuff which is what I love about this game, VERY FUN
Sick Boy;-;Do pushups during updates/patches. Mad gainz.
Smokey P;-;Pros: - There seem to be lots of updates rolling out things like guilds, space stations for your guilds, etc.  and as a result the game is already much better than it was in March - For a free to play game Warframe has top of the line graphics and controls - A huge variety of warframes, mods, and weapons results in a lot of customization potential - Running around as a space ninja is obviously gonna be a recipe for a good time Cons: - The game is basically a grindfest to find materials with which to construct items, and at this stage the gameplay definitely gets repetitive fast - Not only does the gameplay get repetitive, but the locations strongly remind me of early Halos copy paste level design - The story has been worked on since the beta started, but its still pretty threadbare and/or incomprehensible - As every mission is an instanced encounter, its sometimes very difficult to find other people to group with on the lower level planets - Even when you do manage to find a group, there is almost no communication, teamwork, or strategy. Instead everyone is just essentially racing one another through the level to get to the loot. Furthermore, the game even aids this mentality by providing an exclamation mark on your minimap directing you through whichever mission you are in- helping you maintain top speed at all times. Verdict My first instinct was to add another piece of slag to the stuff listed above: that I feel this game is a little too far towards pay-to-win on the freemium scale. My reasoning for this is that it just takes so much time to get new Warframes and armor without caving and paying real money. I played Warframe for around 22 hours and I only managed to build one new sword and one item enhancer In my opinion thats a really poor rate of return. Add to this that the packs you can buy with real money are 40 bucks or more on Steam, I got mine for $10 during the summer sale, and its easy to see that the game is designed to siphon away either your money or your time. The thing is, this is maybe the only kind of situation where Im not enraged at what I would normally decry as Pay2Win . This system works because the game is almost entirely PVE and you arent really competing against anyone. Due to this important distinction, I feel like the player cant really resent it when others pay real money for fatter lewts, because the only time you see them is when youre helping one another kill stuff. Though it waxes too far into a grindfest for my tastes, Warframe is a decent free-to-play with nice graphics and uncomplicated controls. See other game reviews and articles at GameSmelter.com
Captain Avis;-;went to grind so much I ended up in a corner office of a theripist... he said I had an addiction. I asked him what kind?! His only response was, THE SAME DAMN ADDICTION I HAVE, Now pay me AND GTFO, I need the money to pay for more Platinum you fool!!! 10/10 would grind again
Tactical Lolicon;-;My friend got all the content I've been grinding for weeks in ten seconds. 7.8/10 too much water
Kaneki Ken;-;Similar in some ways to the multiplayer experience seen in Mass Effect 3, Warframe wastes no time in telling stories particularly elaborate. The background narrative, in fact, will give us an excuse to put ourselves in the shoes of ninja called to fight a futuristic alien faction. Home menu you can choose between different worlds to visit where we await missions to complete possibly in the company of three other players. Challenge between intergalactic ninja! The objectives vary enough, but the main flaw of the title Digital Extremes is out soon given the limited variety of levels. You will be prompted to save the hostages, locate a reactor to destroy or find an object, but whatever the delivery, in Warframe you'll almost always eliminate waves of enemies, chasing the various waypoint marked on the map. The gameplay, fortunately, fairly obvious problems of repetition of the title. With the view placed behind our Tenno (the name of the metal ninja who impersonate), we will have firearms and trusts katana. Come into play the Warframe champions representing the different possible configurations of the armor. These identify the different classes of ninja, with unique features useful to customize the game experience. Challenge between intergalactic ninja! Initially there are three, while the other can be purchased with real money or get through the crafting system included in the title. The Warframe not only change the appearance of your character, but activate specific skill such as enabling stealth attacks, rather than providing armor thicker than usual and so on. The user then accesses to further customizations to buy with credits earned in each mission completed successfully. These enhance the efficiency of its Warframe but not only. There are in fact many consumable items to carry around for the later missions, useful to address the weaknesses of its configuration and style of play.
Dakkadakaa;-;great grinding game, great graphics great development team, new things to explore all the time by the constant updates.
Hell Hath No Fury Like Me;-;You are Tenno. What is Tenno? Nobody really knows. All they see is the suit. The Frame. Beautiful and deadly. An instrument of war and destruction. You awaken, weak and powerless, with no memory of who or what you are. Vay Hek, leader of the Grineer, the genetically modified mechanically enhanced remnants of humanity, is after you. He wants to harness the power of your Warframe to fuel his campaign for galaxy wide domination. You cannot defeat him. You must escape. If you somehow manage to elude Vay Hek, and escape into the depths of the dark and unforgiving galaxy, you might just encounter other lost and memoryless Frames. Perhaps your race has a chance for survival. As you explore the galaxy, you are guided by a mysteriously entity known only as "Lotus". For reasons unknown, Lotus has taken an interest in the Tenno, and appears to be on your side. For Now. Your mission: Disrupt the three dominant powers of the galaxy through terrorist missions and guerrilla warfare. Amass the most powerfull and exotic weapons and frames known to galactic life. Discover the mysteries of the galaxy, and the secrets of the Tenno Race. If you can do all this, maybe there is hope after all.
N;-;I always wanted to be a space ninja.
Shade;-;Warframe is an impressive work of a game. You might think, just by looking at its store page with the "Free to Play" tag and the "dlc(?)" packs underneath that it's Pay to Win. That is not the case. Not even a little bit. You can obtain everything non-cosmetic in the game without paying a dime. You can even trade rare items for the in-game currency, platinum. So you really can get everything without paying. You start off with little, taking a weapon of choice for a Primary, Secondary and a Melee weapon, as well as one of three Warframes. Your Warframe has certain abilities that set it aside from others. As you master your weapons and Warframe, The Lotus takes notice and allows you to test your abilities and Rank Up. After you've ranked up, you now have access to better weaponry to take on bigger things. The mission variety is good, the amount of weapons can be overwhelming, but there's always something to do. Give this game a shot. DE is an excellent company, they do livestreams every other Friday(could be mistaken on schedule) and talk about what's going on, what they're working on and what they want to do. They listen to feedback from everywhere; Steam Forums(ugh), their own forums, or even Reddit. They are not a greedy company. Give the game a try, it's pretty fun.
Mathef;-;This game is ing great! You can run and slide like a motheer and cut other motheruckers in half. The last time I saw this kind of  was when I played Soldiers of Fortune 1! You can also upgrade your ing cyborg  to the max thanks to ing awesome upgrade system. Mobs drop upgrade cards (which can be even more ing upgraded), weapons and warframes blueprints and ing materials for crafting. Yes, you are right! There is ing crafting, but dont expect some minecraft ! You can craft nearly every ing item in the game ! No ing Platinum needed! So you can play for ing hundreds of hours and dont need to spend a dime. But you will, because this game is ing great! So if you like cyborgs and , action gameplay with ing great mechanics, endless grinding, deep upgrade system and lot of ing fun and gore, install it now!
Rosie;-;If I wanted this much grinding, I would get a boyfriend
Vekxs;-;Gameplay The player starts off with a simple questline, which guides him to restore parts of his ship whilst learning the basic mechanics of the game. The player learns the majority of the controls through in-game 3D prompts, making the learning smoother and more integrated with the gameplay itself. Minimally experienced players can easily get the hang of things and start slashing their way through hordes of enemies. Of course, later on, your character can become very agile with the proper upgrades, and this can be used for some advanced and fun maneuvers, all of which are beautifully animated and visible from the 3rd person perspective in which the game is played. After this initial learning/tutorial phase, the player can freely play (replayable) nodes on select planets and moons in the solar system, each unlocking another celestial body with every completed boss fight node. The maps are seperated in rooms that fit with one another like puzzle pieces, with every level being somewhat randomized in order for it to not get repetitive if you were to replay a node. Depending on the planet and enemy, different tilesets are used to further minimize the redundancy of replaying a level. Every node is a specific type of mission, ranging from exterminate (kill all the enemies) to mobile defense, where you must defend certain points on the map. You have 3 weapons: primary, secondary, and melee. How you mix these up is completely up to you, as there are some players who go full-out melee, and others that like to remain far from their targets with sniper rifle primaries. On top of your weapons, you have your warframe: a body of armor that allows you to use the 4 abilities unique to your warframe. There are currently hundreds of weapons, over 20 warframes, and more are being added as the game progresses. Warframes and weapons alike level up to a maximum level of 30, gaining 1 mod capacity for each level. This capacity is used to install mods dropped from enemies or rewarded for certain missions. These mods are a core mechanic of the game, and can be treated as a sort of "loot system", as most weapons are obtainable from the market through crafting. These mods upgrade your speed, power, health, add a certain damage type to your weapon, the list goes on and on. Mods themselves can be upgraded by sacrificing other mods, in order to increase the initial statistic on the mod. It gets a bit complicated to explain, although it's very simple once you develop an understanding of which mods suit your gamestyle, and how to best mod your loadout. Your mastery level increases as you gain levels for weapons and warframes, and eventually allows you to buy and build even more powerful weaponry. On top of that, you can be accompanied by a companion, be it a sentinel that flies behind your shoulder and shoots enemies, or a kubrow (wolf-like creature) that can render you and itself invisible from foes. These companions can take on a specific strategic role, depending on which one you decide to get. They and their weapons also level up, and there are mods for them as well. Not only are all these things upgradeable, but you can also custimize every single one with emblems and your own color scheme. The overall feel is very entertaining and fun, there's nothing more satisfying than watching your enemies get split in half whilst you slash your sword through their torso, or having their head explode after you rain a barrage of bullets onto them. There is indeed a grind, and the maps might begin to seem repetitive, although this is masked by the pure fun and addictive nature of Warframe. Recently, a new update called Archwing has been released, allowing the player to fly out into space. This heavily 3D based combat is as fun and enjoyable as the on-foot combat. The archwing, its ranged weapon, as well as its melee, are also upgradeable, just like all other tools the player utilizes. Graphics It looks great, and if you've got an Nvidia card, PhysX makes it even better with more particles than your eyes can handle. It's made for new machines, though, so your old PCs might not handle it well. Otherwise, looks great, performs great. Story In Warframe, you are a space-ninja "Tenno", awoken by Lotus, and sent on a mission to keep balance between the three factions: Grineer, Corpus, and Infested. This is, unfortunately, where Warframe falls a tad bit short. The story itself has potential, and if you were to read the lore on the wiki page and forums, you could easily develop an interest for the plot. The game itself, however, rarely attempts to engage the player in this story. Aside from the beginning quest, and a couple of other missions for the archwing, kubrow, or a few warframes, the story is fundementally absent. This can be either a good or bad thing, as some players would prefer to stick to simply killing the baddies and levelling up. Much of the story can be experienced through the codex, where the player must scan enemies in order to gain information about them and their origin. Although this is, indeed, a way of making the player learn about the story through their own effort, scanning enemies is not encouraged enough to motivate players to go out and learn the lore. For those who are interested, though, this can be a very fun mechanic. This greatly depends on your preference in how in-depth the plot is, so how much this affects the game itself varies. If you are curious to know about the plot, I urge you to read about it here [warframe.wikia.com] . Community The Warframe community is usually nice and welcoming. I have had some bad experiences with certain players, although in almost all cases, it is very enjoyable to play with others. Up to four players can be in a single mission, and Warframe members are free to create giant clans with their own dojos and seperate rooms for item R&D. Warframe is primarily PvE, although there are certain mission nodes where players may battle against other Tenno. Players can also trade mods, and this means money can get involved. Free2Play Warframe, as any F2P game, has microtransactions. Thankfully, this is not a Pay2Play game, especially since the gameplay focuses primarily on PvE combat. Players can, however, purchase XP boosters and credit boosters, as well as weapons with real money. All weapons and mods (with the exception of limited-time exclusive items) are fully obtainable through regular gameplay. The large portion of purchasable items are purely cosmetic. Overview All in all, Warframe is a very fun and addictive 3rd person instance-based small team hack/slash/shooter. It is especially fun in groups, and the constant flow of updates keeps it fresh and new. And hey, why not give it a try? It's free!
Kharn (Offline for 3-5 days);-;I'm just gonna be simple with this: No pay to win AT ALL, there is a lot of maps that are also randomly generated and you can have a clan with your friends too in which you can create a dojo to duel in, research weapons and do much more. There is a trading system in which you can get Platinum (basically SpaceBucks so you don't have to buy it rather just trade rare items for it). It's mostly a PVE game but PVP is fun too although with bad hosts it can suck a bit. I have around 2000 hours in this game at the moment and I enjoyed every single bit of it. In the end you are a space ninja that can wallrun, use crazy abilties and be badass :D. 10/10 and it's still in beta, I'm impressed. REALLY FUN MUST GET.
MaliRok;-;90% of the game is talking on region chat, waiting on ship, singing with kickbot. 10% of the game is actually gameplay 11/10
Lubi;-;If this was any more grindy I'd have it arrested for sexual harassment. EDIT: As this has become relatively highly rated I should probably elaborate: Damn this is grindy.
Nikolai;-;At its core, Warframe has the potential to be an enjoyable game. With fast-paced acrobatic combat, it evokes the feeling of old-school fast-running shooters. I even got flashbacks to The Specialists. But for every minute of enjoyment I got out of the game, an hour of disappointment presented itself. As a free-to-play game, there was an expectation for some grind. But grind is deliberately an essential part of the game, for the same reason it is in subscription-based games; to encourage users to purchase Platinum. In fact, every decision by the developer seems oriented around profit. As someone used to the hobbyist approach of indie developers, this bothered me. But even beyond that, there just isn't much of the Game here. The missions are repetitive, all factions use a swarm mentality, the AI is shallow and simple, and there isn't much variety in the weapons. The game is purely gear-based. If you don't have the correct mods (which you have to grind for) or good weapons beyond the starting gear (which is deliberately weaker than most weapons) then there's just no amount of skill that can compensate for that. Despite community feedback, weaker weapons rarely (if ever) get buffed up to the current power curve, and instead get "retired to the vault" to make room for even more powerful new purchases. Unless you're allergic to variety, there is a paywall. You only get access to a paltry amount of slots for Warframes and weapon slots, and you can only purchase them with platinum. You can't even grind for them like you need to with everything else. So if you want to try a new frame, be prepared to sell the old one. Finally, just as most free-to-play games, the price of in-game currency is bloated beyond belief. The cheapest Warframe costs 75 platinum, which is a $5 purchase. More expensive frames cost up to $20 worth of platinum. For that price, you could just get another game. There are occasionally discounts you can receive for logging in daily, but these are exceedingly rare. Overall, despite how many hours this game has given me, I just can't recommend it. Most of those hours I can't even recall, as they consisted of mindless farming for Neurodes or Orokin cells so I could have something new to play with. But only a small part of it was actually fun. If you really love grind, or repetitive, shallow gameplay, you might like it. But if you want challenge, depth, or a developer that cares about more than making money, this game isn't for you.
HeartFelt | BDay;-;Want to be a Ninja? In Space? With a sexy tight suit? Then get this game, it's free anyway.
CustomsOS[649];-;For a TPS, it's a blow-up. I stabbed a guy in the balls and shot it until it came off. 11/10
Lumadurin;-;Speaking as a player from the Steam Release in 2013. Wasted potential: The Game Horrible weapon and frame balancing. Devs seem to outright refuse to fix fundemental issues with the game and are just content with piling more shiny things onto the garbage heap. Endgame can be hit within the first 5-10 hours of play. It's just grind and scamming other players in trade-chat. Game is incapable of being difficult without also being tedious at the same time (meat sponges; insta-gib-capable foes; forcing gear limitations; stat restrictions, etc.). In part due to the satisfying but ultimately imbalanced movement system and fundementally broken mod system. Mod system relegates player progression to the mercy of RNG's whims. Mod drop tables are over-saturated with useless things (like +7.5% radiation resistance) that absolutely nobody runs. If anybody tells you that they run those mods, they're simply horrible players or their mod count is lower than the number of combined digits across their fingers and toes. Stances; advertised as a long-awaited fix to the horrible melee system, were a disappointment and also relegated to the drop tables, futher saturating them. No variety in builds if you want to grind efficiently. Stack damage mods on guns; slip in crit mods if the base chance is 20% or more; put every power mod that would be suitable on your frame, then fill the rest with durability mods. Melee has been awful forever and only serves as a mobility tool. Enemies are either inconsequential glass figures or spicy meat-sponges due to the messed up scaling bought upon by the mod system. Don't ever buy platinum (paid currency) unless you get a 50% off coupon or better as a daily login reward. It's horrible value for money otherwise. For the love of god do not buy the starter packs on Steam at their base price. They are a HUGE rip-off; only reason I bought the Tenno Pack last year is because it was like 75% off during winter sales and became excellent value-for-money. Weapons and Warframes in the market are hideously overpriced considering you'll need to go through tens of weapons and warframes to rank-up. PvP is an absolute joke. You know how in most RPGs you deal a lot of damage compared to enemies, but also have a lot less HP compared to them? It's like turning party members in those games against each-other. You just run about instagibbing/getting instagibbed and finding ways to cheese the system. Enemy variety is poor, with the only real distinctions being the differences between heavy troops and regular ones (the former of which is the only thing you should really consider when modding weapons as they're far, far more resilient than regular enemies). There's no pay2win, only pay2notgrind. Warframe utilizes a time-based gating system like those commonly found in mobile games. You kill enemies in missions, they'll drop materials. You'll buy the blueprint from the marketplace. And then you'll craft the item. Weapons take a minimum of 12 hours to craft; clantech takes 24 hours PLUS the time spent crafting the pre-requiste materal (this can make the cumulative time of some clantech to be over 96 hours if you're dead-on with your timing in moving through each stage) Although there are many missions available which offer those special materials as rewards, massively reducing the total clantech crafting time. Warframes take a minimum of 84 hours to craft; get the helmet, system and chassis blueprints as random boss drops, they take 12 hours each but can be crafted simeltaneously, then combine them into the main warframe blueprint from the market, which takes 72 hours to craft. To be honest, I don't have an issue with the time-gating system as it isn't coupled with pay2win stuff like most time-gate systems are. Although some might, which is why I've explained it here. The good things about the game? It looks very nice. Although the atmosphere is non-existent as opposed to how it was years ago (go search for early-2013/late-2012 footge and compare it with 2014 footage). Movement system is fun but is almost impossible to balance around without introducing tedium. Gunplay is okay I guess. Devs don't do rollbacks whenever exploits pop up and are fixed. If you're fast, you can capitalize. Only real reason I'm still on-and-off with this game is, plainly put, some form of addiciton. Although I did quit cold-turkey for about 8 months earlier this year out of plain disgust with their implementation of the stances system. At the time of writing this, it seems I'm phasing out again. Whether or not I'll come back I don't know. Although I'm looking at this from the perspective of a long-time player; so if you're new then you probably haven't become disillusioned with the game quite yet and will enjoy the bit that you play. It's like a worse version of Mass Effect 3's multiplayer. Also: Warbros #1
Veos;-;What is power? The Corpus ability to field destructive cutting edge technology to impose their will on their foes or perhaps is it the sheer amount of capital they possess to influence man, markets, and bureaucracy alike? How about the Grineer, whose sole purpose in life is their devotion to their queens and total domination of the universe. What they lack in technology and in capital, they more than make up in conviction and their endless numbers. Neither. In Warframe, you represent power. The power to end conflicts with a swing of your sword. The power to tilt the balance of power between civilizations at will. The power to render technology obsolete because YOU, are a living weapon. The run down. Pros: - Customization at its finest. Everything can be recolored. Mods are available to further enhance yourself, weapons, and kubrow because wrecking one army isnt enough. Everyone has to go - Parkour. Prerequisite for ninja status - Graphics - Everything can be found without paying but patience is a must. - Raids a step in the right direction - Developers engage with community. Frequent updates Cons: - F2P but pay for convenience. Nearly any weapon, mod, and warframe can be bought with money. The only limits being the size of your wallet and the amount of trades available per day (determined by rank) - End game can be monotonous and certain frames consist of spamming one or two buttons to kill entire rooms of enemies. RNG is a big factor in drops - PvP is a work in progress - Experiences connection issues and bugs at times Youll feel powerful but perhaps, at least in this case, can too much power be a bad thing? End game becomes a cake walk once you have your warframe and weapons properly geared. Worth a shot if playing casually but towards end game when youre literally a walking god, dont expect much of a challenge
Diablo;-;Warframe is a fast paced RPG, Hack and Slash, and Third Person Shooter mix that blend concepts from popular games like Halo, Assassins Creed, and Call of Duty into one jam packed free-to-play online game. This game supports nearly every play style, and there is no one way to play. Unlike other games with four or five classes, this game includes 20 unique armors with unique skills to aid in your fight and with new ones added frequently. Also unlike most other free-to-play games it is not pay-to-win. Granted, you can only go so far in the game without the special currency which you have to use to get extra slots to store your armor and weapons, but thats is one of the best parts of this game, you dont have to spend a penny to get this currency, you can trade it with other players for things youve obtained in your missions that they need, you know how some people want to just buy their way to the end of the game, so there are always people buying and selling things to each other passing around this currency to each other. As far as the graphics go I am extremely impressed. The graphics surpass those of a lot of games that cost $40+ and still remain free-to-play. The gameplay is even more impressive, with 20 different warframes to choose from and each having unique abilities, the game is very dynamic. The way I might use my favorite warframe might not work for you and you might be killed frequently while I blaze through killing everyone. Also there is a miniature card game involved and each warframe and every weapon has slots where the cards go drastically changing the stats, survivability, and the abilities of your warframe and weapons. These mods are sometimes dropped by your fallen enemies with different enemies having different mods they can drop. These mods can also be traded with other players for the special currency, other mods, or for blueprints for special items found only in a special kind of mission. Which brings me to another aspect of the game: crafting. As you progress through the levels you will pick up materials that you use to build new weapons, armors, and some very useful equipment. Different locations have different components that drop from them. Being a game that takes place in space, each of the different locations is an entire planet, although most of the time your missions are inside the ships orbiting these planets. Each planet has most of its nodes ruled by a single one of the factions, from time to time there will be missions where you support one of the factions to either invade and take over the node or defend it from the opposing faction. There are three distinct factions: The Corpus, The Grineer, and the infestation. The Grineer are the first faction you come into contact with, they rule the entire first planet and are the faction in the tutorial. They are a race of humans deteriorated from years of excessive cloning. They are heavily armored units with standard bullet shooting guns and feature everything from standard machine guns to flamethrowers and rocket launchers. The next faction is The Corpus. These troops are a mix between robots with mounted laser guns and cyborgs with different laser shooting guns. These units also have recharging shields like those seen in Halo. This factions weaponry is comprised of mostly repeating energy guns, again much like those in Halo, and continuous beam lasers, also like those in Halo. Another Faction is the Infested. These are troops from the Grineer and Corpus that have been afflicted with a parasitic growth that takes over and changes their bodies, a lot of Halo references here, these being completely identical to the flood in how they work. These units are almost all melee units that are very strong and attack in swarms. As far as weapons go they have their claws and the heavier unit will slap you with its stretching arm. Almost every planet has their own boss which will randomly drop one of the three pieces you craft to form you new set of armor. Each boss has its own set of skills which most of the time will have some correlation to the warframe obtained from killing them. For example the boss General Sargus Ruk uses a flamethrower and has a variety of fire based abilities he uses to try and burn you alive. Upon his defeat he will drop one of the three parts needed to craft Ember, a fire based warframe with two abilities nearly identical to those of Ruk. While on the subject of bosses, I am going to mention another of my favorite features. Upon killing a boss you have a chance to receive a death mark. Getting one of these will give you a chance to have a deadly assassin, appropriately named The Stalker; spawn randomly into literally any mission many levels above you with extremely overpowered weapons. He is thought to be a rogue Tenno, those who can use the warframe armors, and has the same weapon load outs and many abilities shared with other warframe armors. As far as weapon load outs go, you may carry around a primary, secondary, and melee weapon, and have the choice of only bringing one weapon with you if you would like to. With this comes even more diversity in play styles. Personally I prefer t use mostly just a melee weapon, relying on a powerful long range primary and short range secondary for those tricky kills. Others might use only there primary weapon completely ignoring their secondary and melee weapons. Each weapon can be outfitted with mods to drastically change how the weapon works, one mod can cause your weapon to fire two bullets at time, while another may cause your weapons bullets to travel through enemies and objects such as walls or doors. Right now there are nearly 350 of these mods with new ones added all the time. There is also a large variety of mission types. Some of these include defending a certain object from the enemy, destroying targets such as the ships power core, or special machinery, to straight up kill everything on the ship. This game also includes a very popular RPG tool: customization. On top of the mods you add into your weapons/armor, you can also customize the clor of your weapons and armor, and there are special attachments, bought with that special currency or obtained through one of the frequent events. As a paid game I would give this a 9/10, but being completely free-to-play it gets a 10/10. Definitely a game worth trying, and if you dont like it you can just delete it with no worry about money you waited because its free
StarNight;-;Jebus chrst of Cyborg Space Ninjas with pirates, parcore, and a birdy. Much fun, very grind, so builds, wow
Squidlfied;-;Space Ninjas, Cloned flesh that say "GREAT SWORD OF GLENN," and robo-dudes with box heads. 11/10
sandpaper my gooch;-;Mindless farming. Farm 20 hours to get a new weapon, then use said weapon to farm another 20 hours for another weapon. Repeat.
Radio R^4;-;This is the only game where I can run through a wall and die after falling 1000m. Elevators work too.
Donquixote Doflamingo;-;One of the games that really marked itself in history everything is amazing+ its an online RPG that means it will keep you bussy forever with the future updates etc no wonder why its the 3rd most played game on Steam its worth every moment
TennoSkoom;-;So after playing Warframe for 1,040 hours (Steam says about 658 hours, but it's incorrect.), I finally decided to write a review on the game. In this review, I'll be stating how "Free to Play" the game actually is and what the gameplay is like, what the game offers in terms of content, and a pros/cons list at the end of the review to sum things up. So first off, how Free to Play is this game anyways? As a lot of us know, most Free to Play games have you paying for microtransactions to get most content in the game, with no way of using the in-game resources or currency to get them instead. Warframe does not do this, only cosmetic items, color pallets, interior decorations for your Liset, etc. Things like Weapons, Warframes, and Companions can all be earned by playing the game and getting enough resources/credits. Although Warframe and Weapons slots can't be obtained without platinum (Warframe slots are 20 platinum each and weapon slots are 2 for 12 platinum), you can trade items in the trade channel to people in exchange for platinum. Another thing I should mention is Foundry build rushing. If you are building a weapon or Warframe in the foundry, you will notice a "Rush build" option. This isn't spendy though, usually only costing 25-50 platinum to do so. Trust me, if you have what people want, you can obtain a hefty amount of platinum without paying a dime and have plenty to spend on rushing builds or buying slots. Now if you actually start liking the game and want to spend money to get things quicker, this is where you could have a tough time. Market prices from Digital Extremes are, you could say, "Extreme". With Weapons usually costing about $5-$12 depending on the weapons and Warframes costing $5-$20 depending on the Warframe. To put this into a better perspective, it costs $5 for the most basic package of platinum, which is 75 platinum, all the way to $200 worth of platinum, which is 4300 platinum. There is a cheaper way to get platinum though. The game has a login reward system and sometimes you can get a coupon for 25%, 50%, and 75% off your next platinum purchase. This would be an ideal time to buy some. They started doing Prime Access, which allows you to access the lastest prime Warframe and weapons instantly.....for $150 of course. The cheapest package you can get in Prime Access give you just the prime accessories, a 90 day Affinity Booster, and a 90 day Credit Booster....for $50!! I feel Prime Access just isnt all that affordable, but maybe that's just me. My rating on Warframe's Free to Play factor is a 9/10. Alright, next thing to talk about is the actual gameplay. Is it fun? Is it rewarding? Well, Warframe can be very fun to play at times, other times it can be annoying and tedious to play. It's a 3rd person view Co-Op/PvP shooter with unique elements that will be talked about later. In the beginning, you will have a choice among 3 Warframes ( Excalibur, Mag, or Volt), you will have a choice between 2 primary weapons ( MK1-Braton or MK1-Paris), you will have a choice between 2 secondary weapons (Lato or MK1-Kunai), and you will have a choice between 2 melee weapons (Skana or MK1-Bo). Either of the Warframe are fun to play, in my opinion. The MK1-Braton is garbage, both secondaries are good for beginners, and both melee weapons are good for beginners as well. Getting used to some of the controls might be a pain at first (Such as wall-running and sliding), but eventualy you'll get the hang of it and be flipping around like a space ninja in no time! Basically what I'm saying here is that the beginning of the game is hard to get past, in the sense that you feel underpowered and weak compared to your foes. If stick with it long enough to get better equipment, then it becomes much more fun to play. Weapons are fun and all, but I think the Warframes are what spice the game up the most. Each Warframe has a set of 4 powers that you unlock as you rank them up. The powers are some of the most fun this game has to offer. Example scenario: You are a rank 10 Excalibur surrounded by 25 Grineer troopers and there are just too many to shoot and kill before you die yourself. What do you do at this point? Activate Radial Javelin, which is your most powerful power as Excalibur, and watch as all 25 of them are pinned to the walls around you. Eventually, you'll be able to do the same thing, but with 50 guys surrounding you. Warframe powers, yes please. Now what about rewarding gameplay? This game can reward you at times, however, it can be very grindy. The first thing you'll probably farm for in this game are resources. Resources aren't that painful to try to get, although Orokin Cells, Neurodes, Neural Sensors, and Argon Crystals are the ones you will be grinding out on the most. In terms of farming, the only real things that could be tedious to obtain are Warframe parts, Prime Warframe parts, Prime Weapon parts, and Archwing parts. Speaking of Archwing, if you have played the game awhile now and feel the need for something new to do, try getting the Odonata Archwing and fly through deep space in Archwing missions. It's a breath of fresh air if you feel like ground combat is getting boring. Gameplay can get pretty intense at times, if you finally have the loadout to survive 30 minutes on Warframe's survival gamemode or 30+ waves on Warframe's defense mode. All in all, the gameplay is fun, the farming/grinding usually isnt fun, but once you get that weapon built or Warframe built, the fun begins yet again. Overall, Warframe's gameplay gets an 8/10 from me. Now to talk about what Warframe has to offer in terms of content. Well, it has a lot of content to offer compared to when I started back in June 2013. There are 22 Warframes available to play as, not counting the Prime Warframes (Only difference is they have an extra polarity and look way cooler). There are 100+ weapons in the game as well, not to mention the primes of course. There are 14 planets to visit, each with increasing number of missions available. Tons of mods to choose from, including melee stances, which enhance your melee weapons by allowing you to perform combos. Just, plenty of content for a newcomer to explore. Every other Wednesday, Digital Extremes usually updates the game with new content, bugfixes, and changes that improve the experience of the game. Usually every two months, Digitial Extremes puts out a massive update, usually going up a whole number ( As in Update 14.5 goes to Update 15). These massive updates add hours upon hours of new things to do. Warframe's amount of content gets a 10/10 from me. Now finally, a pros/cons list to sum everything up (And some things I didnt talk about): Pros: -The game is fun to play once you get the hang of things. -Easy to learn thanks to a tutorial -PvE and PvP -You can earn content in the game without paying -Friendly community -There is a wealth of content -At least 7 gamemodes to play -Endgame is cool, more to come! -No Pay to Win business models -Rewarding exploration (Especially in Void missions) -Warframe powers are fun as hell -Most boss fights are awesome for a F2P -Alerts, Invasions, and Infestations as daily missions are great and rewarding -Most all weapons past the beginner ones are great -Pet dogs Cons: -Market pricing is a bit steep -Prime access is ridiculous -There is some farming/grinding -Some bugs still in the game a frustrating -Napalms are jerks -Beginning of the game loadouts can be tough to get past (Because of how underpowered they feel) -Higher mastery rank Tenno entering your game could ruin the experience for you -Some people in trade overprice everything ever Let me know if there's anything I could add, as this is my first review :). If you need any help in-game, add me as ttrlabs02. If I'm online and not busy, I shall help you out! Thanks for reading, Tenno.
Wiggle;-;This game has bad guys with turkey legs 11/10 would fap again.
Skillcoil;-;They banned my account for requesting the support to refund me. I spend real money to buy an ingame item which they deleted.
Velvet;-;I Ninja Gaidened my way through a ship and cut through E.Ts' head 10/10, Would Phone Home again.
Aegan (BoorishBear);-;This game is soooo well made! It's the best free to play I've played. It's a fun free to play, yay! I love the way you don't even need to pay out real money into this game to get that epic gear you want. Good work, DE.
hann;-;Becomes more Grindier with each new patch, not fun anymore. Quickly becoming like Blacklight retribution with all the RNG and Grindwalls
Human Required;-;*Update 4/3/15* I started playing again once I heard about the Sanctuary update. It had a dragon warframe included, so why the  not, right? Any, I picked up right where I left off months ago, and some nice changes have been made. The new Law of Retribution raid is pretty much the only reason I can recommend this game now, for a variety of reasons. It gives you a purpose, for one. Before, I was just swapping gear and getting more powerful just to do the same old  and get even MORE gear. Now, with a massive raid as challenging as this, I finally had a reason to get my frames up to snuff and whatnot. Secondly, this raid is the only gratifying victory in the game. I felt accomplished only by the end of LoR, nothing else, as this was the only mission that wasn't just a fetch quest or grind. Another thing I've learned to love about the game since I picked it back up again is the glory of trading. Do you know how fun it is to rip off people who paid REAL money for digital  in this p.o.s. game for your digital ? It's insanely fun. Yes, kind sir, you can pay $30 for platinum and exchange it for my crappy rare mod that I have lying around. Then I'll buy the Mesa warframe with your cash, and you can enjoy a crappy mod that I can farm again in under an hour. It's great fun as long as you're not on the idiot side of things. In short, here's the scoop: Chroma, The Law of Retribution raid, and ripping people off for plat are the only kicks I can get out of this game, and now that I've done all three I assume I'll rarely be picking this up again after my recent binge. This game is still the equivalent of smoking, in that just because you unwittingly catch yourself doing it doesn't mean you'd recommend it to others. *Update over, enjoy the original review below* It's addictive for all the wrong reasons. Sure, the space ninja gameplay starts out fun enough, what with the stabby-stabby and shooty-shooty . But then, well, you realize that your only options to explore more of the game consist of A.) spending real world dollars on ridiculously overpriced content or B.) grinding and farming your way to the top of the free-to-play food chain. Now, of course, the game is built for farmers and grinders because there is a LOT OF FARMING to be done. Every single item requires a blueprint, which requires farming, then materials, which require farming, then parts of the blueprint which need farming, then the final assembly, which requires farming and grinding. In short, you could be looking at seven hours worth of work and literally three days worth of waiting just to build a new ing pistol. Unless, of course, you'd like to speed that process up for a measily $9.99. Now, I'm not not knocking the monetization as considering the game's target demographic, the farming aspects are very well done and you're ultimately never really shoved into a corner where the devs beat you up and steal your lunch money. But here's the thing: it's not addictive because the gameplay is great, it's only an okay time killer. And it's not addictive because any of the rewards are great, because no one gun or warframe is that spectacular. No, it's addictive because the temptation to get more , whatever that "more" might be for you, is always there. After 40 some odd hours wasting away my life on this game, I realize that there was no real accomplishment to show for it. No overarching story, no greatly increased OP character, no real progress. Just a swap of this frame for that frame, this gun for that gun. In short, it was like shuffling a deck of cards for 40 hours. If you have literally nothing better to do with yourself and want to spend days, weeks and months of your life like that, Warframe is hands down the free-to-play game for you. But poke past its initially endearing facade and you'll find a game so utterly trivial (even by video game standards) that shame is all you'll feel long after ignoring the clock.
Vulder13;-;Shooty-Slicey-Magical-Space-Ninjas! Liquidate the chilling space capitalists. Cripple the deteriorating cyborg clone army. Eviscerate the nasty gribbly horrors. Then kill'em all again later in the void. (When they finally turn up). Scrap the ancient should-be-dead robots. Murder fellow super assassins, 'cause slaughtering everything else wasn't enough. Willing to go through hell and back to obtain absolutely anything. All to become the fanciest, danciest, powerhouse of slaying in the cosmos. ...And maybe help save the solar system. Should anything actually go wrong, just tell the devs in the appropriate forum. I should slap past me for not buying a founders pack.
Angel;-;Pros: - Fun to play solo or co-op - Very cool action - Parkour :D - Vast amount of areas to play Cons: - Some times its hard to Connect with your friends :l - Can get pretty repetitive - Some items are very hard to get, other than buying them. Overall: It is a fun and exciting Co-op game for you and your friends :D think left 4 dead 2 but while in space! 7/10 stars!!
Darkwraithdan;-;10/tenno would play againo
Kitten;-;Space, future-ized tech, alien and robot enemies and ninjas.... what else do you need? ITS THE GRINEER... PROS: Good gameplay Nice Graphics Lots of customization options Lots of guns Can modify your frames and weapons to make them better Actually (Really!) Free to Play Large community Devs pay attention to needs of players Cons: Only con is that the missions sometimes seem repetative. This game is worthy of your time and effort: APPROVED
Homura Akemi;-;IT'S THE GOONEER 10/10
Unwind Fellow;-;The core gameplay is good, but the game's world isn't as fleshed out as it could be. Movement feels good, combat is solid. Grindy as hell and you need a good clan to really get all the content. Overall 7/10, you get what you pay for.
homicide hare;-;the missions in this game include classics like "do a frontflip" and "slide your sword into the rectal cavity of a beefy marine"
TheCommunist;-;Space ninjas... need i say more?
Origibro the Nalaholic;-;It's darn good for a Free to Play title, and it does that excellently as well. Pick it up!
Sparhawk - Canada - Idle Master;-;Way back then I have had a good look at Firefall and Warframe. Both quite unpolished and in so much need of work. Gave Firefall the benefit of the doubt, and just loved it. I needed a change though and a good buddy of mine in Firefall, was also playing Warframe and so I asked how the game was these days. Three months later, and I am all in on this game. With Firefall having open space and more of an MMO feeling, Warframe is level based, with a mission. A big change for me, but liking it lots. You get to know the mechanisms, the frames, mods etc etc and just get better at it. Frames keep leveling, so are the mods. All these things give you a feeling of accomplisment in this game. The frames are quite distinctive, and all have their specific abilities that make you come back for more. DE is adding more features, releases frames or updated/upgraded frames (Prime) and hopefully in the near future I'd like to get more into the lore of the Tenno. Every week a live community stream and I believe every other week a dev stream as well. Both with giveaways. All in all a great game that will let you have a great time with your buddies. ps. It's certainly not p2w at all. Almost everything you want, you can get it by playing certain levels etc etc. If you do pay, that's great. The game deserves all the support :)
Peripherat Rocket Launchers;-;After not realizing how much time Kiwi has spent in this game, he had an epiphany. Life itself is both a grind and P2W. You shoot the same man over and over again to level up your stuff so that you can shoot that same man faster, sending his family into terrible debt paying for multiple funerals, just as the daily grind of life leaves families in deeper and deeper debt. With no way out, you keep shooting that poor man, hoping that eventually there will be something beyond shooting the same dude, you don't care about him or what grief comes of your action, you just want to shove a potato up your butt. Edit: As of now there are space poopies. You can even shove a potato up their butt.
Carnival;-;If you like mass slaughter games, capable characters, pretty colours, milions (AND MILIONS) of weapons, then this game will definetly suit you. It includes variety of warframes ,each with its special set of abilities. you can fly, turn into a watter pudle, go invisible, melt everything around you and much much more. there are various weapons from gunblades, jet-powered hammers, whips, launchers, sawblades, cookers, freezers, burna's...your imagination ( and what DE has put in the game :D ) is the limit. Game flirts with your reward-center in brain which can lead to addiction if not monitored correctly. Some say game is grindy because it requires this or that which is either rare or hard obtainable ( for new players ) to make XY weapon or warframe, but if you're sort of person i mentioned above none of that would matter. There are various missions, daily quests, alerts, skins and cosmetics for your ship, kubrow,sentiel, warframe and weapon. Community is nice in 99% of the time ( there are always few rotten apples ). All in all, game definetly worth checking!
[MhSV] LOLoFighter;-;10/10 SpaceNinjaPirates ruined my life
dire hell swan;-;It's an interesting twist on third person shoot man games that leaves a lot to be desired when it comes to accessiblity versus a grind. It's free to play, so obviously you're gonna run into roadblocks, but eventually you'll be wondering why you're running through the same levels blasting the same enemies for the same (if not less) rewards. If you're a sucker for aesthetics, though, then it'll suck good twenty hours outta your life with the player character designs and weapon variations. Give it a spin, but don't bother dropping money on it unless you really, really wanna be a Space Ninja.
Tsunari;-;Everytime I return to this game, I always get excited to see what I could do. Everytime I leave this game, I always have the same feeling.
Ampoth;-;It was good, but with every patch it's getting more and more grindy. DE appears to be incapable of bug testing, so all of our new content is riddled with them, and the dev teams lacks focus, hoping from one thing to the next never applying the final polish to anything they add. I wouldn't recommend any new players pick the game up.
WackyModder84;-;Without a doubt, one of THE BEST Free 2 Play MMOs I've ever played in my life. I would highly recommend this game if your PC is at least Medium-Spec, and you're into Parkour Shooters like GunZ, S4 League, or any other Games similar to them. It's ing SPACE NINJAS, for Christ Sake. You can't go wrong with that! GET THIS GAME! You will definitely not regret it!
[DOD] Emperor {Grandez};-;A great crusade to take your friends to and just rememebr its Free to Play but its a damn good fine lookin one with alot of action. Yet the grind is real and its still in beta!
Furrikane;-;maps manage to feel empty despite being full of enemies everything depends on grind objectives get boring gunplay gets boring because everything feels the same everyone is an  because they're constantly pulling mental gymnastics to try and justify their sunk costs/time and are frustrated that they can't admit they're bored
Paper Rabbit;-;I have... very mixed feelings towards Warframe. When I first played Warframe, it was a little bit after it's debut on Steam. In terms of content, it was after they switched over to the current ability system. When Banshee was still the hot stuff. Since then I've grinded my way to near end game, collected most of the shiny macguffins they've thrown at us, and felt generally terribly annoyed with the developers. There have been a lot of mistakes, bugs, and some downright stupid decisions that should not have happened in the first place. There are times where I do wonder if they ever bother to think how the players will react. Yes, there are constant hotfixes and updates. But the real issues frequently brought up on the forum are not addressed in the updates. The contents released feel slapped on, empty, and almost always really buggy. The beta excuse is lame and abused. Warframe is released on PS4 and we are still in beta? People have been asking for better net code fix for ages and there have been no significant improvements since I first joined. Hiding and encrypting the data to prevent people peeking into drop rates is an overkill and does look suspicious going by what they did around that time. (IE, not doing thier job of fixing the drop rates.) The recent release of Prime Access and its outrageous pricing makes me question if they even have an inkling of how to properly price a F2P game. Their digital currency, Plat, is pretty expensive enough as it is. Only with a 50% or 75% coupon would the price be more reasonable. Oh, but you can't use the coupon for Prime Access. The concept of a space ninja is great, but Digital Extreme doesn't have a clear direction for their "baby." All this incessant padding with gimmicky weapons and frames is getting old and stale very quickly. Older weapons and frames won't get adjusted unless people are really vocal about it. There's only nerf, nerf, and nerf if they think a weapon is too over powered. Buff is rare. Valkyr is also a poor choice of a Berserker frame is she has such a squishy stats. Damage 2.0 might fix some things, but the biggest problem of connection issue hasn't even been touched. While Warframe is indeed a game where the important content such as weapons and frames can be farmed without digital currency, I still would not recommend it. For those who are looking for a co-op online game, this is not the one. This game is very grind intensive and not very friendly to the new players. Connections WILL be an issue if you don't have good internet, as Warframe doesn't have any official servers to host missions. Because of the way is constructed, the envrionment doesn't always encourage good cooperations between the players. You are better off joining a good clan or kidnap some friends to play with you. Public matching can be boring and disastrous. The recent events also brought out a lot of campers/leechers...
Misanthroplonker;-;There is no need for other video games.
Baysick;-;For a game in it's beta version it is actually quite impressive. This game is a 3rd person co-op shooter game featuring (the generic definition) "Mothering space ninjas with magic." There is a large variation of characters to fit anyones play style including various and very unique and powerful energy abilities and weapons. I have never seen a game with such advanced player movements including wall runs, sliding, jump kicks, and dodge rolling which really keeps the game feeling fast paced and exhilarating. The game excels in graphics, level design, and combat keeping the game very dynamic with the best experience making this one of the best free-to-play game in existence.
Evanz111;-;It's very rare that a F2P game with a model like this keeps my interest for over a few minutes, but I've been playing Warframe for 7 hours within the first day of downloading it. Really surprisingly quality and well-polished combat as well as loads of different mods and abilities makes for a really entertaining game overall.
arkhamthecat;-;I've been M.I.A lately because of this game. This game is extremely addicting. Most people are extremely friendly and helpful. I've played over 10 hours non-stop today, basically doing the exact same thing. I have no social life. I basically lost all little contact I've had. I've gotten little sleep, but when I do, I dream of trying to find squad members to heal them. I've been so tired, that I thought I saw a grineer walk pass me. It was just a very round person wearing green. This game is so much fun. Be ready to be completely isolated from the world.
Warmongrel;-;The game is a huge grind. It takes too long to craft and collect ingredients. Plus, the game is insanely repetitive.
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
SwartKat - Shaun - Kspuppy;-;Well this game has actually surprised me... I love anything Ninja based and when they said Ninja's with Guns in Space at first i was like WTH. But after playing for the past few weeks i have to admit this game is Freaking Awesome. A few problems here and there but the design team are always coming up with new content and fixing those bugs faster than they pop up. I absolutely love the starter selection of Warframes (your cyber ninja suit) and would only recommend adding a notice that the weapons and sidearms you select in the first mission will be that you are stuck with till you can make your own later on. And also a way of maybe choosing to play the first mission as one of the alternative warframes. A way to test the different classes out you are offered. I mean as a new player the skills and stuff mean very little And the only way to test it all out and find your Niche' is to play the different character types. With alot of game where you have to pay for certain in Game items you know from the get go guys who have cash to blow will get the best and the rest of us meer mortals with  Exchange rates will be stuck with the scraps... Warframe gives you the option to jump ahead with Paid content but everyone can get there eventually. No items that are Platinum(in game real money Currency) only that can not be found or made later. Its all just a matter of time and according to some higher level friends you can actually start trading platinum at a later stage. Overall i love the game a bit of a rocky start but well worth it.
[ZKA!] PhoenixRizing;-;Artifical gameplay lengthening from farming items to unlock other items to craft the items you actually need, then waiting days of real time for them to craft (or pay money to have them right now) rinse and repeat.
Rubat;-;A very well made Free to Play 3rd person shooter. Uses a custom lanucher/updater. GAMEPLAY Gameplay is quite repetitve in the long run. There are a bunch of planets available to you, each with sectors ( missions ) with different gamemods which you complete for rewards. The game uses tiles to randomly generate levels. Some planets have unique tilesets, etc. Has a bunch of different weapons and weapon types, each item has to be ranked up with XP. You can then mod your weapon/warframe/etc with a huge amount of mods to tweak each parameter to your liking. Has a lore, but there's no campaign as such, just a few story quests. REAL MONEY Basically almost nothing is locked behind a paywall in this game. The only exceptions I found are some cosmetics ( character attachements, color pallettes, animations sets ) and inventory size ( For weapon and characters ). You can trade in-game currency bought for real money to other players at higher levels, which means that you can unlock pretty much everything for free, which enough time put into the game. Not only that, but you can get a -75% discount on Platinum ( Currency bought for real money ) as a daily login reward, and for 5$ you can get enough of it to lift all restrictions on the inventory size and buy some cheap cosmetics. Buying weapons/characters for platinum is pointless because you can simply craft, or acquire them otherwise. SCORE If I had to give it a score, I'd say 7.5/10.
(HR) Ineffable Cupidity;-;Warframe is a squad based third person shooter with RPG and brawler mechanics where you play as a psychic space ninja known as a "Tenno", which is an oddly adorable and not fittingly threatening name for a species which exists purely to create psychic space ninjas to commit genocide as a day job. The game itself is free to play, and it means it. While there's a cash shop, you can buy almost everything in it with in-game credits if you're willing to do a light bit of grinding. For everything that isn't purchasable with in-game currency, you can farm in-game for the cash shop currency. Grinding is very important in Warframe. Effectively, if you wish to obtain new weapons, "Frames", or the like, you can either pay for it with the cash shop currency, or gather the materials from playing missions, pay a fee of in-game currency, then wait a few hours or days--real time, regardless of whether or not you're online--for it to finish. That said, the loot system is surprisingly fair, and it doesn't take much time to start building an arsenal of weapons and Warframes to play around with. The storyline is fairly basic, but servicable. It's just tangible enough to help develop immersion, and that's all it attempts to do, assuming you don't think too hard about how a character can be your mortal enemy, but also simultaniously a bisected reanimated corpse, and a power hungry commander that's never seen you before. Warframe would be relatively forgettable if it didn't have its incredibly rewarding, surprisingly in depth combat system. You have access to a wide variety of weapons ranging from high tech railguns to a whip made from the spine of a feral beast coated in lethal parasitic growths. Melee combat is deep enough to stand on its own, with a variety of weapon classes, fighting styles, combos, and the built in 'mod' system which allows you to customize the your Warframe, firearms and melee weapons. Most mods are fairly generic, offering things like increased reload speed, or higher damage. However, some are more interesting, being able to change the functionality of your abilities, or, say, allowing you to replenish your "energy" when taking health damage, which adds a considerable difference to playstyle. You have your standard parkour system with wall running, slides, cliff hanging, flips, rolls, and the like, which combined with the weaponry, and the individual abilities of each frame, results in incredibly engaging, immersive combat that supports a wide variety of playstyles. Altogether, if you're looking for a third person shooter MMO with incredibly strong gameplay, and a fairly pleasant aesthetic, and don't mind a bit of repetitive grinding, I recommend giving Warframe a try.
Deep-Fried Tagalongs;-;Interesting, but very grindy and samey. Artificially difficult, you need to have grinded enough to not be dead weight to your team. The weapons are horribly imbalanced even with the new damage system and while you're supposed to be stealthy ninjas, the best way through a level is to gun everything down with the heaviest weaponry or ignore enemies and alarms entirely. The developers seem to almost genuinely care about the community, but some of their ideas are half-baked and their quality assurance team appears to be nonexistent. Ultimately, a casual run-and-gun with severe balance issues that still manages to be one of the better F2P games on the market.
Sizzlechest;-;It's unfortunate when a game with this much potential chooses to be crippled by all the standard free-to-play tropes in the name of profit. Everything you hate about free to play games is front and center in Warframe: an unenjoyable, crippled experience if you don't buy ingame currency, infinite grinding and farming, and pay-to-win that makes your character and weapons twice as powerful if you don't play and farm 40+ hours a week. A special note needs to be made about the level of grinding in this game. The game is literally nothing but farming and grinding. There is nothing else in the game. One of the central mechanics of the game is to level, then relevel, your character and weapons. Each time you completely relevel something in the game you gain a few more points to put towards the abilities of the character or weapon. Imagine if you played World of Warcraft and upon reaching level cap you had the option to relevel your character from level 1 to level cap, and the reward for doing so was you would gain half of an ability slot. The game was fun but flawed until the recent "Combat 2.0" system was implemented. In one patch Digital Extremes changed all weapons so that any weapon you choose is only effective against 1/3 of the enemies, experience gain was cut by more than half, and coincidentally the same patch also added the ability to purchase any abilities or "mods" you might need from other players using in-game currency. To put it more pointedly the developers made weapons 1/3 as effective and not only did they not reduce the amount of grinding necessary to level those weapons they made levelling items and acquiring resources more than twice as difficult. They simultaneously added an option to spend real money in order to buy whatever you may need from other players, presumably in order to not be accused of having the game be blatantly "pay-to-win" if they sold the items directly. As you can see I put over 700 hours into this game, and there are some aspects that are (were) fun. Greed and hubris have finally overcome and outweighed the enjoyable aspects of this "game". If you enjoy pay-to-win, farming, grinding, levelling then relevelling you character and weapons, "content" that consists of running a few mission types infinitely, and overpaying for virtual items and goods than Warframe is probably the game for you.
Dr.Fragg;-;Warframe simply put is a solid, well rounded video game. I spent a while trying to sum it up with a genre but it borrows from several. Mass Effect with jumping! It's a third person shooter/brawler that puts you in the role of a Tenno, a nearly extinct race awaking to find several factions ruining the galaxy and various shenanigans occuring that are for your detriment. Going on missions in various space stations, ships and planets using tons of weapons and warframes in a free2play game that looks and plays like a current gen AAA game. + Good Graphics & Sound Design + Large amound of varied enemies, unique styles and boss battles. + Procedurally generated maps with dozens of tile sets. + Very satisfying gunplay and indepth melee combat/combo system. + Fantastic replay value. + Hundreds of weapons covering all different categories and type & Plenty of warframes to get with very unique abilities. + Decent story and universe created. + F2P - Lack of direction to new players after initial quests. - Late game can slowly get repetetive. - Minor inconveniences to be had if not spending any real money. - PvP is currently Peer2Peer and very laggy with no tangible rewards for putting time into it. - A lot of mechanics go unexplained unless you actively check the codex/wiki. In essence you are able to progress through hundreds of missions that are instanced for up to 4 players in a squad, completing random objectives in procedurally generated maps against one of the 5 possible enemy factions (or sometimes a combination!) This is a solid formula, with a lot of different planet/map tilesets, a ton of very well crafted rooms and a very hefty roster of enemies for each of the main faction. Combine this with the hundreds of weapons you can craft (varying from pistols to grenade launchers to crossbows to electric boomerangs to rail guns), 20+ warframes (classes with very unique 4 abilities, akin to a MOBA) to choose from, a very good looking engine and some solid gunplay/melee combat and you've got a fantastic game in it's own right. You level up and upgrade all of your gear with mods that drop from enemies constantly, so everyone can tailor their weapons and warframe to their own liking and you do get a very solid sense of progression. You can parkour around the maps, wall run, pull of some complex melee combos and act like a space ninja, or you can be moving from cover to cover, co-ordinating with your team and playing it through like a tactical third person shooter. It has a very good looking engine that stands up by todays standards depiste the game being nearly 3 years old (counting the closed beta) It's got a godly particle system, as well as full usage of PhysX, very cool looking units and maps and a consistent art style throughout. The sound design is very competent but the music stands out the most, there are several dynamic sound tracks when fighting each of the factions that change depending on how much combat is happening but they all sound very unique and cool to listen to in the middle of some hectic shenanigans. The kicker being that this is completely free to play. This is a hybrid co-op/MMO without the 1-9 button smashing on the keyboard and it relies entirely on your skill with the weapons, abilities and movement to be good. It being a F2P MMO esque game, you do have to craft new weapons and warframes which take time but due to how inherently fun the actual gameplay is, farming for materials or blueprints never feels like a chore and 99% of the time you'll be collecting more than enough materials just while playing normally. There's a ton of PvE mission types, some new PvP, horde modes, a space combat mode (think zone of the enders) and plenty of replay value inbetween. There are several story quests and tutorial missions to all new players a grasp on all of the basic mechanics however once the tutorials are over you are just sort of left to your own devices. The lack of constant direction might annoy a few players but I strongly reccomend just deciding that you want to go and check out a planet or get a cool weapon then work toward those goals, seeing new things and acquiring more equipment on the way. Planets have bosses, new planets need to be unlocked and so on so there are tangible goals to set yourself. You can create a clan with your friends, build a very large Dojo that can be used for trading, researching exclusive weaponry, dueling, storing event trophies as well as assisting in building solar rails for the very large scale PvP solar rail conflicts. I would reccomend if you're really into it getting just a few dollars worth of platinum then buying a scarf, they're cool, because it's in space.
Gandorf;-;I love this game, You can make new weapons, You can make new Warframes, Many and many updates that will add more frames and weapons, It's highly addictive, It's fun to play with friends, I just ing love it !
Captain Metal;-;It's ok.
The Buzzing Quantum Canine;-;Time Played: 104 hours Past week: 103 hours ... I vaguely remember that I had a life once....
Zael;-;THis game has nice graphics and the gameplay is fun. However, there's a reason why this is still in beta. After playing for a week or two you'll see that pretty much all the missions are quite similar. Sure there are different ones like Extermination and Survival, but most of them end in getting the task done and then running back to "Extraction". Also, this game is a complete grindfest. The Devs put up ridiculous prices so you either have to buy the item or you have to grind for DAYS in order to get it. However, if you do get your item, it usually takes days for it to be ready. A new warframe takes THREE DAYS. THREE! And you need three components (which all take a day each to build) in order for you to move on to the main blueprint (takes 3 days to build). So this game emphasizes on you either having money or time. But yeah, not much content or backstory either. I seems interesting enough, but it's so vague. I would just play this for a week and then get on with your life.
spam pills get kills;-;Grind + reskins + microtransactions + overbearing devs and PR = this game
burnedrobot;-;warframe more like farmframe still really fun 10/10
Genis94;-;Warframe is undeniably one of the most satisfying experiences I've had with a Free to Play title. It contains an ever expanding arsenal of weapons, mods, and warframes that can be mixed and matched for endless possible combinations. The game also features a highly satisfying clan system including the ability to build your own clan hall, which provides several bonuses besides the simple meeting area with cosmetics. And the great feature of Warframe is that it always contains a challenge. From raiding the Orokin towers, to hunting down the elusive Stalker and Harvester, something is there to put your mettle to the test. And in case it wasn't clear, you play as freakin' Space Ninjas. What's not to love?
Fluff Ball;-;For Hardcore Space Ninjas, and people who got loads of money and patience to waste on.
HomeyCDawg;-;Over 2000 hrs and I still play it. This game is incredibly addicting. Also pretty much everything can be gotten for free, eventually. One of the most fun and fair F2P games out there.
The Universe;-;Well. After almost 1,000 hours, I think I can judge this game. I started playing just before Update 12 was rolled out. (I think it was 11?) Let me start off with the pros: Nice graphics. Large diversity of weapons (Can be an issue - see below) Large and (mostly) friendly community Definetly NOT pay to win. (Can be difficult at times, though - see below) Tons of new content (Again, can be an issue - see below) IGC purchased with real money (platinum) is available through in-game trading. (Can be VERY difficult to work with.) Mod system that can slow/speed up progression (Can be an issue, explained below) Now to the cons: With the weapons, they get very repetitive, and unimpressive. You do get a few gems rarely, but the amount of bad weapons (in my opinion) is extremely annoying and unfair. The grind. Oh, my. This game is an endless grind. (Explained below) No story line. (Again, explained below) Credit farming is a nightmare. Too much new content being introduced and long-standing bugs are being ignored. Confusing to newer players. (not so much anymore) Unimpressive and prehistoric social menus. The (lack) of story. Warframe doesn't have a story, at all. This makes it an endless grind to have the best gear and be as rich as possible. I find this extremely annoying, as this just makes the game, as stated above and endless grind that goes nowhere. The game has no purpose, and is not immersive at all, as a result. (There are obviously more reasons. Although, they did implement a quest system for obtaining certain Warframes. (suits) But due to how the crafting system works, (You have to wait 12h - 24h for most items to craft. 72h for Warframes) quest progression is EXTREMELY slow. Bugs/improvements There are quite a few game-breaking bugs in the game, which DE (Digital Extremes) have refused to fix/ignored, if favour of new content. I have nothing against new content, except when the developers focus completely on that, and only partially on fixing bugs. And the parkour system - It is absolute trash. ( although, there has been speculation about an improved parkour system ) THE NEW PARKOUR SYSTEM HAS BEEN CONFIRMED, BUT ITS ETA IS UNKNOWN. It makes doing what this game is advertised as - being a space ninja - nigh impossible. When you wallrun, you fly off the wall when you let go of space. It is clunky, badly animated, and extremely difficult to work with. (The parkour). And stealth. Goodness me, I've never seen a stealth system so bad. Just like parkour, stealth is the worst I've ever seen. Imagine accidentally walking in to an enemy's line of sight. In reality he might become startled, and go to check it out. But never would an enemy instantly start firing and alert the ENTIRE ship. It makes being a 'ninja' impossible. The only way to 'stealth' is to get a Loki (Invis frame) and spam invis. Hence the quotation marks, by 'stealth' with a Loki, I mean go invis, use Hushed Invisibility and spam your Tonkor or Boltor Prime. They really need a rework of stealth. Oh yes, and they completely ruined accuracy. At one point they would fire like stormtroopers, and now, oh, boy, now, the have pinpoint accuracy. They will RARELY miss. In-game currencies The in-game currencies work well, and in fact, it's probably the best I've ever seen. The currency that's purchased with real money (platinum) is available to trade, using in-game items. As you would imagine, it has its drawbacks. But the only thing Platinum is mainly used for is rushing items that are crafting, trading with other people, and buying cosmetic items. You can buy weapons and Warframes with it, but it's not necessary, as you can get weapons via grinding. It can make getting platinum extremely difficult. But, say if, a new player was to buy platinum, most weapons that AREN'T Primed can be bought with platinum. This CAN unbalance the game, but it usually doesn't due to how the mod system works. Credits can be extremely difficult to farm without a booster, and are spent up far too quickly. For the sake of newer players, the drop rates/amounts should be buffed, or the prices for everything should be lowered a bit. And now, on to the Mod system The mod system works, because it limits progression. As you can imagine, this has its drawbacks too. It can make higher level missions difficult, or extremely easy. In short, it can unbalance the game very, very easily. Summary/TL;DR This game has quite a few flaws, i.e. the mod system, stealth, parkour, in-game currency farming. But it is a real gem, and it has potential. Stick with it, chip in at the forums, and maybe, just maybe, some of the issues may be addressed. (I may update this later, as new content, and/or bugs are fixed.) Thanks for reading!
Pale Dolphin;-;For a free-to-play online shooter, this is as good as it gets. Really great graphics, pretty interesting co-op gameplay. Basically, you're getting Left4Dead + Mass Effect in this one. It gets a little repetitive after some time and monetization is forced sometimes, but hey -- it's overall free and the game is pretty good by itself, even when you're not paying to get some stuff. I'd rate this game 8.5/10.
John the Cynic;-;Before I even begin my review, Warframe is still an open beta. There are always glitches, bugs, and issues that accrue the ire of many players, but DE (the company behind Warframe) is next to always on top of releasing patches. Warframe, in a brief nutshell, is a space-age, sci-fi ninja hack-and-slash with an intriguing storyline (the "prequel" to Warframe is Dark Sector) where the Tenno - the race every player is - has been pushed back into the Void, and has only recently come back to find the Sol System in the middle of a three-way war between the militaristic and brutish Grineer, the greedy and technological Corpus, and the overwhelming numbers of the Infested. The Tenno's role in this game is to bring balance back to the Sol System by assassinating key personell from all sides who threaten galactic stability. Gameplay-wise, Warframe is - at the time of this review - very "grind-y", such as other MMORPGs. To level up, one has to fight the enemy, collect resources (a drop from enemies or by releasing a Titan Extractor to systems), collect modifications (a drop from enemies) and clear planetary systems (usually by defeating the boss). Weapons are unlocked via purchasing blueprints and crafting them with one's gained resources, and one must also have the appropriate "mastery rank" (on paper, your overall player level separate from weapon levels, Warframe levels, and sentinel levels), which is leveled up by leveling up Warframes and weapons. Weapon-wise, combat feels visceral and satisfying, for the most part. Some weapons have become outdated while some have begun to shine. The Warframe you control determines how fast, how well-armored, and what powers the players has, with a general rule that caster-classes have low shields, health, and armor, but possess potent powers, and fighter-classes have high health, shields, and armor, but have less powerful abilities than casters. There IS a real-world currency market in place, but 99% of the items sold there can be made/found by playing the game itself. The 1% of items not found are purely cosmetic, such as color schemes and syndanas (capes). The real-world currency to game currency ratio, in this author's opinion, is quite unbalanced, however. 75 platinum (the game currency) is $5 USD, with bonus platinum being awarded depending on how much one purchases in one transaction (for example, 180 platinum is gained from $10 USD; 150 being from the $10, and a 30 platinum bonus). Warframe is able to be played alone, but is much more enjoyable and beneficial with friends or a clan. With a moderate amount of startup resources, one can start their own clan, or can simply join a preexisting clan to save resources. Clans offer clanmates to join games with a player, clan technology (which offers high-end weaponry), and miscellaneous activities, such as 1 v 1 PvP in a dueling arena, trading, and obstacle courses. Finally, Warframe has a dedicated forums page to report bugs, meet with potential clan members, introduce yourself, make suggestions, offer feedback, or generally just shoot the breeze with fellow players. PROS: +Multiplayer with clanmates or friends is enjoyable and practical +Everything save for cosmetics can be obtained without real money +Solid swordplay, gunplay, and Warframe powers +Complex damage system which promotes a well-coordinated squad and a variety in weapons +Many side activities +Many graphics settings can be changed, so lower-end PC users don't have to worry as much +Forums have a decent, active community CONS: -Prone to glitches and bugs after major updates, but are rectified quickly -Playing solo can be tough at higher levels and bosses -Real currency to game currency is at an uneven ratio -Damage system can take some time to learn and master -Grinding for resources can be a bore at times
spke;-;Never have I been so happy to grind and farm in true MMO  fashion than I have been playing as a magic space ninja and getting my  pummelled by various cyborgs and cthulus.
Coverop;-;Go Go Power Tenno! Go Go Power Tenno! Mighty force Power Tenno!
Face;-;Grinding. Do not play this game unless you enjoy grinding. I wake up screaming at night because I have nightmares about things not dropping. The same map over and over and over again until that one little piece of gear drops. That is what this game is about. Also shiny asses, but only on the men.
Cheetah;-;I thought i was playing halo 5 when i realized it was actually warframe
hippiecheese;-;YEAH. Ninjas in space, PERIOD. Play it now.
Selrina;-;Great game.. boring at lower levels.. but gets really (and i mean really) addictive as you progress in levels and in the game. It has fast paced gameplay and immersive environment. Overall a good pick for shooting game lovers. :D
Tango;-;You are a lone farmer, being nagged at by your bi-polar roommate, when something occurs to you. You require potatos. You go through all the planets in the solar system, indiscriminately slaughtering space capitalists, incomplete clones and hordes of moldy vegetables. All the while being hunted by your creepy next door neighbour in order to acquire the resources for your potato. After returning home from the horrors of the outside world you now start the gruelling 24 hour process of growing your potato. You go to sleep and then wake up the next day to realise you grew the wrong potato. Repeat.
swuff;-;theres a dog frame 10/10
DFliyerz;-;"Wave your horse  in the air if you can segway better." ~Steve Sinclair, TennoLive 2014
KaShraX;-;Having played quite a lot for almost 2 years I can highly recommend playing warframe, but only if you have got some time to get into it, it is slow to get started but at an enjoyable pace if played with a couple of mates that can quickly get you through your first few missions, mods, and a new weapon and warframe to venture out on your own with. It can be a bit of a grind getting everything you need to get that new frame or weapon that was just released but again, when played with a bunch of friends and you combine your missions for everything you team wants to get, it is a tonne of fun. I think they are getting a bit complex now - but the devs have always done an awesome job of not only adding new content but making sure that they can please their fan base while trying to enlarge it. The Live dev streams are also pretty cool. If you get into it, you will probably spend more money on this free to play than any other title you ever bought outright. You can get by without spending any cash, but it is not as enjoyable.
RancorKing;-;hey guess what  I lost my life
Kernalgohd;-;Reasons to play warframe; -To feel like an awesome ninja -To feel like an awesome robot -To feel like an awesome martial artist -To feel like an awesome marksman -To feel like an awesome archer -To feel like an awesome swordsman -To feel like an awesome mercenary -To drown in content updates Pretty sure the dev team has ADHD or something, my goodness, they cant sit still for a minute. Most companies are down for sitting around on their latest update like "Yeah we did a good job" Meanwhile at warframe HQ the dev team is like "DONE THIS UPDATE, GOTTA MAKE A NEW ONE, GO GO GO" The game feels so good, plays smooth as (shaved) balls. Everything feels good to do, and even if it bugs out a bit, its generally entertaining to some degree (EG. flying off walls at hyperspeed) Downsides? Honestly not many, Im sure computer strength can be a major issue, but its fairly good for the most part, mid grade computers should be fine at like 20 fps on reasonable settings. While it is possible to play this game free, and nearly everything is obtainable without paying (even many cosmetic stuff) It does take quite a long time. The further you get in the game and the more time you invest, the less this becomes a problem. Anyways, it is VERY easy to spend WAY too much on this game, Im sure Ive spent hundreds on this (yes yes, I feel the shame). Also, inventory slots are platinum manditory, however you can get platinum from others in game, selling recipes for stuff like formas and such. You will need inventory slots if you want to have more than a small handful of warframes at your disposal at one time, or weaponry. Long story short, lots of fun, watch your wallet, its tempting, so so tempting.
Carver01;-;Let's take some ninja and space. put them in a blender and watch what happen. come back and look at the space. than you realise you have ben playing for to long last week :D Ninjas Play Free!!
Inigo Carmine;-;This game started out fun enough, especially for a free to play game. Unfortunately, every patch (and there's about 4/week) makes the game even worse. It's been out for almost a year, and I don't think a single bug has ever been addressed, while every patch brings a whole host of new bugs; most minor, some major. The netcode is terrible. There are no dedicated servers, instead relying on one of the four players to host. It seeks out the absolute worst host imagineable for every game. When I play with friends it's fine, but about 9/10 times you play with the public the lag is so bad as to render the game as unplayable. The game frequently refuses to accept certain inputs. It's fairly common to just be plain unable to use your melee weapon, or be unable to crouch for several games. Bosses occasionally become completely invincible. Did I mention the lag? It's bad. I don't just mean there's lots of snap back, and targets become impossible to hit; I'm talking extended intervals (i.e. double-digit minutes) where it's so bad you have trouble leaving the room you're currently in. The variety of weapons started out as neat, unfortunately they've increased the grind factor needed to get them every day. This is the rare case of a an early Beta game being pretty fantastic, but absolutely every change they've made since then has been for the worse. I would pay money for the Warframe of 8 months ago. I wouldn't pay $0.01 for the Warframe of today.
MaliciousMarshmallow;-;Look at how much of my life I have wasted playing this game. It's a free game, so it's not like you're wasting money. It's not that big unless your hard drive is a series of floppy disks. You get to use badass weapons to kill things, and sometimes things get hairy and you die. I've only put $7.87 into this game and I am doing very well and still feel powerful... just stop reading these reviews and download it.
Dogebama;-;Step 1. Install game Step 2. Start game and choose excalibur Step 3. Grind for 2 years straight Step 4. Congratulations you have beat the game
Dalmar;-;Are you a fan of Dark Souls? Are you a fan of Monster Hunter? Then I would HIGHLY recommend giving Warframe a shot. This game is the best of both worlds, bringing difficulty and fun gear collection to the forefront of free-to-play games without requiring any money to be spent , contrary to popular belief! // First Glance // After delving into the deeper aspects of what this game has to offer I am without a doubt mesmerized by its beauty and presentation. The overall design and scale of this game has been a welcoming experience -- as I am tired of most games lately, the same cut and paste formula used from one game unto another. Yes, Warframe is based loosely upon the sci-fi genre but the way Digital Extremes has gone about creating this particular universe and breaking the mold of every other sci-fi game has been much appreciated on my end. The strange and unusual that pushes others away from this game has drawn me closer and given me the desire to learn more about its unique direction. // Key Aspects // This game has a lot to offer. I will admit that I was one of the original beta testers that walked away after closed beta. The fact that the game only had two different tile sets and lacked content was an immediate turn off. But now after returning many months after my last login I find the game has grown substantially, thanks to the community-developer relationship, which in respect has gained a lot of traction due to the various features that keep veterans from the community and development team going. What this game has to offer is, simply boundless, once you've peered through the veil. 280+ procedurally generated missions, which include:  Standard Missions  Alert Missions (randomly generated location and reward)  Infestation Missions (guaranteed reward)  Invasion Missions (guaranteed reward x3)  Challenging Boss Fights  Void Missions (private instances, earned via key drops)  Orokin Derelict Missions  Nightmare Mode Then we have character progression:  Limitless ways to customize your warframe via mods  Limitless ways to customize your weapons via mods  Clans and Clan Hall building  Clan Research for clan specific gear/materials And with each patch there is a special event that takes place, something big and eventful that ties into the lore and awards players with unique gear that can no longer be collected after the event has ended. Talk about gratifying. // Pitfalls // The only drawback I see this game having is with people and their lack of patience. (If you've made it this far into my review then by all means get to downloading!) It should be mentioned that most crafted items need to take 12-72 hours (in real time). Also, using revives is limited. You can only carry a set amount of revives and when youre out, youre out; until you gain another one (one per 24 hours). On the flipside, ALL gear and warframes can be attained through gameplay and the only things platinum (real money) need to be used for is additional weapon slots, warframe slots and aesthetic items. Earning platinum through the game is easy as well, selling rare mods to other users is an easy way to attain this currency in order to make the small purchases you need to maintain your collection of warframes and weapons. Therefore, real money from your wallet is not required . ** To help alleviate confusion while playing keep this Warframe wiki [warframe.wikia.com] close by. // Understanding // From the moment my friends log out, I find it interesting how the community in this game thrives. Aside from the Recruiting chat channel (to enter hidden zones with a pre-formed party) there is little to no communication between users. Its as if there is an unspoken language between those who have survived the tutorial and beginner missions. Experienced players in most missions have zero communication and there is a strong sense of synergy, as if role-playing our speechless Tenno comes with the experience and territory. // Conclusion // I feel most people overlook this game by the sheer fact that their first experience was miserable and they didnt take the time to give this game an honest chance. From the surface its overly complicated and doesnt hold your hand. But for those who carry on, that is the draw that is the appeal. Set your own goals and the game will become very rewarding. What are you waiting for? Masterful Tenno persevere, while the inept are left to drown.
Rapaul;-;it better than sex
Zachmatosis;-;Do you want to play like a ninja? Do you like katanas? Do you like awesome skill shots? Do you like glitches? Do you like bugs? well then, this game is for you. Remember; Ninjas play free.
` NARDY NARD;-;RINOS and HAMMERHEAD SHARKS are in the game
13lackclaw;-;Warframe is a refreshing take on the squad based 3rd Person shooter, in its over all game play and especially its art design. While not every gamer's taste, I find Warframe to be a refreshing take on design. The characters and aliens are unique, very inspired and striking. My compliments to the art direction and the whole team. The gameplay is tight, responsive and franciticly exciting giving the player the experience of feeling like they're a true "space ninja". You'll be parkouring over obstacles, climbing on walls, hacking apart enemies and sliding across floors while going all "John Woo" on anyone that stands between your teams and your objective, Ninja. I've found myself coming back to this game over and over again ever since a friend got me into it way back in June 13'. As of today, I've already spend hundreds of hours in Warframes. Game sessions can be as pick up and play as a half hour or turn into longer survival and raids. Its one of the most open to all FTP's out there. Paying players don't overwhelm the F2P players in the gameplay department. They just don't have to spend the time gathering and crafting those items. All of which can be easily found in the game and created with miniumal grind time compared to how many other F2P's work. Digital Extremes really did this game right, give it a try and you won't be disappointed.
uzan;-;I am very new to this game but already I am enjoying it very much. Great co-op game and lots of fun. One of the most entertaining ones out there when it gomes to free games! If you enjoy co-op shooter games a lot then I recommend you give this a try.
Trueese;-;I've played this game for a LONG while now. I love ninjas and slaughtering my enemies. This game gives both of that to me. I have always been a huge fan of third person shooters. And 'Warframe' gives me the extra boost that I need to be on the top of every game. I mean come on, I'm sure those of you who want to see how AWESOME your character looks while your slaughtering your enemies. I mean, a game just doesn't feel right if I don't look cool, right? Anyways, this game does not really have a story yet and I still love the game, I have spent a lot of money on the game even when you aren't required to. I put this one aspect of the game on the top of this list because the game is not P2W (Pay to Win) and that is the main reason I have stuck to this game for so long. You can craft everything in this game, the warframes, the guns, the ammo and health packs. I mean you don't have to spend money aside from if you want to have more than 2 warframes or if you want an awesome looking cape or scarf that has absolutely no attributes. But, you can buy every gun and every cape and so on. But you can craft it, it may take around 12-24 hours or if you're looking at warframes it adds up to 3 days but you can wait, trust me. Also, if you aren't looking to collect every warframe, you'll be just fine with just 2 frames. I have only used the Frost Prime, and the Vauban. I'm stuck on those 2 frames. I have a lot of other warframes but I'm just so connected to the ones I currently have because they are EPIC. There are some items you cannot buy. And that is what makes them so precious. They have a special name to them also, that way, you can rub it into your friends face that you finally made the weapon or warframe. The first 3 items that came out were called the Frost Prime, the Latron Prime, and the Reaper Prime. They were such a high demand, people were always asking people to take them on void runs. Which that reminds me. To have a chance to get the parts to make the weapons/warframes, you have to get Void Keys from survival missions or defence missions. (Don't worry, it will take a while, but it's definitely worth it!) The game can sometimes get boring to me I will admit, after playing for about 3-4 hours you get tired of slaughtering your enemies because most of the time you will be farming for supplies or just surviving it out on a survival mission with your buddies. But then, you can just go play a different mission and have fun all over again! They have a variety of different mission types out there while your waiting for that storyline to come together, some like Extermination, Capture, Defence,and plenty more. The game does not make all enemies level with you, you can choose to play on a low level mission or you can choose to play on a high level mission. Each planet has its own set amount of missions all with increasing difficulty as you go along. Every update they have had (And I will say, they update frequently.) they have added more and more content. I will tell you this, if you're tired of games having a limit on how much weapons they have on the game, then this game is the game for you. There are TONS and TONS of guns and melee weapons you can choose from, I've played for a while and I can say some guns I don't like, others I love and will use over and over. Each warframe and gun has 30 levels you can achieve. Each level, it adds a mod point that will allow you to add mods to your gun. Now, 'Call of Duty' players don't get so excited, I don't mean mods like scopes and camo, I mean mods that will change fire rate, bullet damage, bullet elemental damage, and SO MUCH more. But, now you 'Call of Duty' players can get excited for this. You can relevel your gun, why you ask? Because you get to change a mod slot to make it have a symbol on it. Now, you're wondering what does the symbol do? Well, if it matches the symbol on the mod card, it only takes up half of the points that the mod uses. It is definitely worth it to relevel a gun, especially if you plan on using that gun for a long time! I can't wait to see the storyline come together, and I can't wait to see what Warframe becomes. 10/10
Guilty Orphan;-;So Warframe. A game where you're a space ninja fighting off stupid robot things while grinding like  to get upgrades and better weapons. Although the game can be fun at times it can get really repetitive really fast. A lot of the missions are rehashes of other missions with minor changes to the layout or enemy placement. And speaking of enemies the AI is not good in this game. Stealthing is very easy as the range of vision isn't far and they don't detect sound making it almost too easy. Also they don't seem to dodge too much and will only move side to side when getting shot at making them a little easy to hit. The grinding is just hell. You will spend hours upon hours just to unlock a new weapon or certain upgrades. Although this may seem fine at first glance it will get tedious as time goes on. If you're into that then good for you but I, for one, am not. The controls are a small complaint for me as they feel awkward and sometimes unresponsive at times. Some controls feel awkwardly placed and some take a lot of time to get used to. Some will argue that it's a free game and that a lot of this stuff doesn't matter. Sure you think that but for me it just isn't a game that I took enjoyment in playing. Recent updates have added interesting things but not enough to keep me playing. It's an average game that has a lot of wasted potential and falls short with heavy grindfests, at times awkward controls and heavy repetitiveness. This game gets a 6/10 from me. You may disagree and think this game's really good and that's great you enjoy but I found no such enjoyment.
();-;to addicting, consumed my life, idk anymore Recommended 11/10
Silent Curse;-;While sometimes a bit repetitive and grindy, the game offers a fair free to play market based system, with just about everything not cosmetic on the market place obtainable in game with a little work. My only real complaint is actually just the community at times. If you aren't used to the games parkour, speed tricks, and moving while fighting mechanics, some of the higher end players doing lower level missions will simply leave you in the dust and not look back, completing the mission themselves, leaving you sort of an empty experience with the mission. The most intimidating thing about the game is its parkour system though, being able to move at extreme speeds, wall running, climbing and vaulting just about anything, sliding while unleashing a torrent of melee attacks or gun fire, and using it all to your advantage. Give it some time, after a couple of hours practicing it can start to become second nature, especially anyone used to combo based games. But in the end when you are feel confident about your ability to do it all, nothing feels more badass then executing a series of attacks while sliding and moving through waves of enemies quickly and efficiently, and being able to turn around when all is said and done to see some of their bodies still falling to the ground. And come on, whats better then being a freaking space ninja with guns.
Weizen;-;Well... if you like teamplay, crafting, gore, aliens, NINJAS this game is for you. If you like to say Noob, Hacker, l2p, report teemo this game is not for you. No Pay2Win, really good gameplay, TRY IT. 8/10
_Vulcan;-;A really fun game. Can get grindy at times, but the grind is fun because of the gameplay. The only reason to pay money is to speed things up and you can get 99% of the items just by playing, the other 1% being event and founder exclusive stuff. TL;DR: Great Game.
XxAciDxX;-;One of the best "Free to play game" on steam ever.
Spam-It Sparta;-;The amount of hours I've invested into this game should give you an idea of how much I love it. Warframe isn't meant for the impatient. The RNG in this game will make you angry. A lot. You will stumble, rage, and even bleed over how unforgiving it can be. But that's what makes Warframe worth it. It's a game that makes you work for everything. There's a certain progression level that, once you hit, you can play Warframe for fun comfortably if you choose to do so. But then there's the extra mile. Warframe wants to test your patience and determination when it comes to farming. It wants to show you that's it's not as willing as other games to just let you have whatever it is that you're looking for.. If it's not giving you a run for your money, it's giving you a run for your time. But if you're willing to spend your time on Warframe, it won't let you walk away empty-handed. It WILL reward you, it's simply a matter of WHEN it chooses to do so. So while the platinum system may be overpriced, it doesn't matter if you're willing to put time into it. I've gotten almost everything in the game for free, just by farming for it. On top of that, I'm sitting on a comfortable pile of platinum, just from trading what I earn to others. Don't let Warframe intimidate you. There's a reason people are still enjoying the game to this day, and will continue to do so for perhaps years to come.
Skell*;-;Warframe is a retrofit, fast-paced, animated novel. You'll encounter deep and thorough story elements along with deep and interesting game mechanics. You'll find no grinding in this game so Farmville lovers beware. This first person, tatical, real-time strategy, tower defense game is very hard to put down and will have you racing around the track for hours on end. I give this game a Square Enix out of an Electronic Arts.
Vane;-;Warframe is an enjoyable game. But here's the list of things you don't wanna do if you wish to play it for a looooong time. -Rushing missions- Warframe gets boring and hard to play if you play the missions just to get the loot, enjoy the game in whole. -Playing every mission online- Now, you might just laugh at this one but, its true! There are many trolls and whiners in this game since its free-to-play, many rushers too. -Getting someone to get you all the things you want- This one is the biggest reason to become boring. I knew this guy, he played for a week, and already had 70 hours on record. He got all the things he wanted in one week. Eventually game became boring and lame to him and he stopped playing. Now the things that will make you play the game: Really neat developers, will often respond to community questions and bugs Constant Dev-streams which spoil all the things you always wanted Often patches Often mini-updates which bring in new weapons and stuff No paywall. You can basicly get everything in game for free except the cosmetics which are here just for those who want them Things that make not play this game: Trolls and whiners Hard to get materials Elitistic s If you really like the game like I do, you will ignore all the things that make you quit the game.
Lebellium;-;I been playing Warframe for almost 1300 in-game hrs. For me Warframe is a game with beautiful graphics, i must admit game artists are very original and it keeps me hooked into this game. Gameplay wise, the game requires you good amount of grinding, if you are a RPG kind of player that is adapted to play repetitive missions this will not be an issue at all. Warframe Developers are great, they release constant updates every month (sometimes even every week) and game support is the best i've seen. Devs are always in contact with the comunity and constantly reading player opinions. A good point about Warframe is that it doesn't require real money to become strong, you can get almost all equipments without Platinum (real money currency) Anyways Platinum is a great help, mainly focused for players that lacks time to play.
KingGalathor;-;Pretty fun game, they keep updating it....
Dexaldem the Aterian Reaper;-;Never have i been so proud to be a Space Ninja. and Warframe teaches you all about it. =/OVERVIEW!\= Warframe is a 3rd Person Shooter hack-n'-slash game that takes a VERY wide amount of choice to the way you like to play. With quests, your own ship known as a Liset, many different locales, space missions in space with a pair of jet wings (Archwing), and 16 different mission types, there's alot of fun to be had, even IF there's not much story to it. Couple that with the good 100+ weapons total in the game and you'll have LOTS of time to try out everything. Now, on to the review itself! *points triumphantly* Warframe was made by Digital Extremes, a company with an already impressive reputation after making the multiplayer for Bioshock 2, helping out with the Unreal Engine and even making one of the Unreal Tournament games. They also made Dark Sector, which was actually supposed to be Warframe, but frankly was turned into something different so they could pitch a sale that the console owners liked. It was alright, But eh...Not incredible. the details were impressive though. The game you're reading this review for RIGHT NOW is packed with action AND stealth depending on your playstyle. You take on the role of Space Ninjas known as Tenno. "You are the Tenno. Warriors of the Gun and Blade." - The Lotus Each Tenno has his or her own Warframe to pick from, and a good third of the Warframes in the list so far have special "Prime" versions of themselves you can get from the Orokin Void. I'll talk about the wonderful funderful Void later. =/WARFRAMES!\= Now, what does being a Tenno mean? It means your a certified bone-breaking, body burning (Ember), heart-electrifying (Volt), Void sentencing (Limbo), gunslinging (Mesa), wolvering claw-slashing (Valkyr), gravity crushing (Mag), Stop-Hammertime'ing (Rhino, LIKE A BAWSS!), Radial javelin'ing (Excalibro, LIKE A REAL BAWSS!), troll-teleporting (Loki), matter detonating (Nova), illusion employing (Mirage), bass boosting (Banshee), bone chilling (Frost), Skin shedding (Saryn), priest powered (Trinity), Paladin styled (Oberon), Captain's ship cannonnering (Hydroid), Pinball Wizarding (Vauban), sky-high flying (Zephyr), Undead raising (Nekros), Mind controlling (Nyx), Stealth style murdering (Ash) BADASS. YYyyyyup. Lots O' Frames. =/GUNS! YOU'LL USE THEM! YOU'LL USE BIG GUNS, SMALL GUNS, SILLY GUNS, COOL GUNS, FUTURE GUNS, STUPI-- you get the idea.\= Aside from Warframes you cabn get some pretty badass weapons, Assault rifles, homing-fire machine guns, compound bows that stick enemies to walls with a full draw, marksman rifles, sniper rifles, shotguns, flak cannons, hand cannons, akimbo pistols (Get out that inner gunslinging boss you hide inside!) of many kinds, freeze rays, rocket launchers....OKAY, FINE! ROCK-IT LAWNCHAIRS! YOU HAPPY?...Uhh...Right, Melee weapons! Heavy swords, sword-an-dagger combos, dual daggers, dual hand scythes, normal scythes, whips, batons, the Legendary Proiva Vandal (Thank you John Prodman for gracing us Tenno with your battle prowess) battle hammers, battle axes, DUAL hand axes, and of course, katanas. =/SENTINELS AND KUBROWS!\= Because the Origin System just isn't fun enough without your own pet robot or Space Puppy. There's a plethora of Sentinels: Wyrm (BLINDED BY THE LIGHT~), Shade (The first two are the original ones. Also, YOU CAN'T SEE THIS!), Dethcube (MY COMPANIUN CUUB! :D), Carrier (VACUUM UP THOSE MODS! *points triumphantly*), Djinn (Ash's BFF. :P), and one of my favorites, Helios (SCAN DAT BOOTY). For Kubrows we have Sunikas (Police Attack Dogs, bruh), Huras (Stealth-trained murder-puppies!), Sahasas (Be careful, they'll dig ALL OVER your backyard.), and Raksas (No, not Roxas from Kingdom Hearts. totally different game...>.> ["WE'RE HIS...BODYGUARDS!" - Neebs "The Noob"] ). There are also Archwings! Your first is the Odonata (MISSILE POWAH!). there's also the Elytron (Dem nukes, bebe), and the Itzal, the newest one (HIGH SPEED SLAMMAH JAMMAHS). In short, you can play ANY WAY YOU SO GODS BE PRAISED PLEASE. =/MODS!\= In addition to this is an awesome way to modify how your weapons, Warframe, Sentinels, Kubrows and Archwings function, Known as Modules, are simply, mods. I just call them Mod Cards...I mean, they basically look like that. xP Anyway, Mods change the way you want to play, letting you further augment how you define fun. Wanty to jump high and slide far? Slap on some mods to compliment it! Want to run walls for longer and have rocket launchers with miniature nuke blast radius explosions? Slap on some mods! Looking to make your dual machine pistols fire three shots with each round released? Slap on some mods! There's TONS of mods, LITERALLY HUNDREDS of mods. So i won't list them all. Now this game does have the capacity to get repetitive, but that's only if you keep using the same weapon for a month. Switching up how you play makes life alot less dull. Moving on to the nexzt series of things now! =/THE FOUNDRY!\= Now this is where you craft stuff from. most things you craft will take 12 hours. Warframes however, will take a WHOLE 3 days. but you can instantly complete the production of your item with a premium currency called platinum. Now, before i get into THAT too, let me explain some about the Foundry. you collect resources from multiple planets, then use those resources to produce weapons, warframes, parts, whatever you need. Just make sure you have the credits and you'll be golden. *thumb up* =/PLATINUM!\= This is the game's premium currency, and you start off with a little under $5 worth of it. You get 50 platinum right off the bat which is pretty cool! I usually advise people to spend it on a Warframe slot and 4 Weapon slots (They come in pairs). Warframe slots are 20 platinum, and Weapon slots are 12 pltainum for each pair. a DAYMN good deal if you ask me. it's pretty easy to make platinum too if you know where to look for items that people will buy! =/PLANET LOCALES!\= so, each planet has a unique theme. Earth is overgrown jungle, Mars is snow and mountains, Phobos is nothing but desert, and so on. But you're not here to learn about ALL the fun places and listen to me spoil the locales in one shot are you? *pokes face* OF COURSE NOT! You're here to know a little bit about the Orokin Void! =/OROKIN VOIDS/DERELICTS!\= These are kind of like bonus reward missions, and it REALLY shows. you get TONS of credits out of these missions, and typically a prime part or Forma. you don't get blueprints of the parts though, OH no (Well, the warframe parts are collected as Blueprints. v_v). You get the full part. You'll see why when you try to complete one. Prime Weapons and Warframes take a little more dedication to complete. The Derelicts are the opposite of the Void's pleasant appearance, looking more like a nightmare done right. Here you'll find OTHER prime parts, as well as Orokin Vaults containing corrupted mods. Make sure you have the dragon key for the vault door though, as there's four different dragon keys. squads work best, and i'll discuss that topic later too...actually, NOW. =/CO-OP FACIAL DESTRUCTION!\= That's right. You can band up with three broccoli or broccolettes, and destroy your way through hundreds of Grineer, Corpus, Infested and/or Corrupted faces in any way you so please! However, rushers tend to be a problem, so watch out. :P =/THE DEVELOPERS!\= This company...They are the epitome of Awesome. If South Korea's best is Neople, Canada's equivalent is Digital Extremes. They're VERY dedicated to the game and its community, hearing any and ALL comments, complaints, suggestions and otherwise about, to or for the game. They also have Devstreams every 2 weeks and Prime Time streams every thursday, and give out awesome prizes because they LOVE their fans. I give this game a 9.7 out of 10. Would grind 9 more times in the name of RNGesus. *9 thumbs up*
[k a z];-;The thing that immediately drew me in to this title was how apparent the use of Zbrush was when creating the characters. Seriously, as a character modeler myself, this is like all the stuff you want to make in Zbrush but can never get into a real game because it's too far away from mainstream design. The dev team is a bunch of hardworking people who outdo themselves with each update. I cannot begin to describe how happy I am with the growth of this game, it blows me away every time an update rolls out. The events are super fun, the weapons modding is full of tons and tons of options, there is an ever growing list of items and warframes, and there is just so much to bite into in this game. I am a person who enjoys deep detail and stats and customization, and this game speaks to that need very well, in addition to the utter beauty of the visuals. Oh, by the way, it's totally free. The only place I find a little lacking is lore. They have done a lot of worldbuilding and set up a great stage for their characters but have not embellished them or the history of the world very much. This grows with every update, of course, but I feel it is growing much more slowly than the game itself is. I'd love to even just be able to read more somewhere, if nothing else. However, there is enough there though to latch onto to make stuff up, and that can be fun. Would love a bit more! Ok go try it now.
Duracell (DJ);-;It's pretty good I guess.
IEVI;-;Warframe is a free to play game where you can play co-op up to four players or solo if you wish. Really great games and a lot of customization for different play styles and it gets updated constantly which is always a good thing. You play as a space ninja wizard with guns, exploring different planets in the solar system, obtaining minerals, blue prints and mods to create your character build and craft new weapons and make new warframes. After playing for 68 hours I'm still having fun so that's saying something. I still have not explored all the planets yet. Overall, I really enjoy the game and love that the game gets updated with new content so frequently.
FartingPuppy;-;Really good game. For those who enjoy a good Third person shooter
[FeC] Jack of Life;-;Hell, Ya! This game makes me  lazers.
coath3;-;great game + free to play
Tate;-;I HATE THIS GAME. IT STEALS ALL OF MY MONEY BECAUSE IT'S SO GOOD. EUGH.
MasterDeBunker;-;Pros: Nice graphics Great variety of Warframes and weapons and... it's "free" Cons: "Ninjas play free" - more like "mindless drones collecting resources so they can make better gear to collect more resources with play free" Even though the game is "free to play", there is only very little you can't buy with real money. As in, you can either spend 3-4 days (depending on how much do you play) farming for resources to get a new Warframe (character "class") and then spend another 2-3 days building it OR you can just buy it for 20 dollars The game does everything in its power to make you throw money at it - Want a pet? You can either farm for an egg which can drop from dens present only on one planet, usually found in quantities of 4 per mission, then you have to farm for credits and resource obtainable only in special area accessible only with a key received from several missions as a random reward, then you have to craft an item to even begin the breeding and then you have to wait 4 days before your pet matures. OR you can throw money at the game to bypass all this . But that's not all! If you happen to not play the game for a while, your pet will die because you have to "feed" it with item that costs quite a lot of credits. There was also a new resource introduced some time ago, which drops only from one enemy in the game that also happens to attempt suicide whenever he sees you to make you even angrier and drop money to bypass boring grind Cash shop is incredibly overpriced - 40 dollars for a discounted pack with three weapons, out of which only one is "good" and a color palette (weapons in that pack also have extremely small chance of dropping from a single enemy in the game, who happens to be someone who can and more often than not will kill you before you even notice... coincidence maybe?) Those color palettes cost about 4 dollars each and there is about 10 in the store... The game is focused on grinding and farming - if you want to play high level content you have to level up some gear and farm credits and resources to get your mastery rank up so you can then start farming resources for the good gun viable in high level missions so you can grind and farm even more to get even better weapons so you can grind all the mods and credits faster so you can repeat the whole process more effectively Game is intentionally gear based - Literally no amount of skill can help you if you don't have good gear/mods Bosses are just bullet sponges with the "weakspot" mechanic Drop tables are diluted, especially when new gear comes out Games are hosted on players' computers, so expect heavy lag and common disconnects TL;DR If you enjoy doing the same boring and tedious thing over and over and over again, this game is probably for you. On the other hand, if you don't like being ripped off by greedy developer, you should look somewhere else.
TheOnlyDeluxe;-;I see this game going up to its 10 rating I think it deserves. At the moment it's extremely linear design-wise. Despite that, I play it religiously. At least every other day. Also, it being a f2p you seriously don't need to buy anything with real money ever. I bought 8 dollars worth of platinum for a color pack, weapon slots, and character slots. It's the only free to play I have ever bought anything from(excepting Dota 2). I highly recommend getting this game.9.3/10
e-Bosh ' Farmazone;-;I've been playing this game for 1000 hours and it completely ruined my life. Never try it. +11/10!!!! But being honest, this game is just great. The only true FREE to Play game. Where you are not forced to buy DLC with weird crap that allows you to shot enemy, or buying some weapons to make a kill on a low level farming loots. You can choise between Hardcore farm and Trading with people, or quick purchase using your wallet. That what I truly call F2P (Free to Play), not Pay to Play.
Marshie;-;This game is so awesome, you can do parkour stuff in it kinda, you can decapitate enemies, and you have an awesome looking character (which you can customize >:3), and well it's so fun! I give it a rating of 10/10!
Zegirom;-;This game is a MUST have.
Dubstep_Samurai;-;Best free to play game ever. Probably much better than some paid ones either.
MageSlayer;-;I'm quite surprised at how far along this game has come along. The graphics have gotten better and the gameplay, while repetative, has also gotten better as the beta has gone on. If you enjoyed games like Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer, Gears of War Horde mode or any other type of game where you and your crew of 4 take on endless waves of baddies in pure co-op awesomeness sprinkled with the loot grind of dungeon crawlers like Diablo or Torchlight, then you will have a blast with Warframe. If had to say one thing in the negative about it, it would be the real world dollar cost on any of their items. Luckily everything can be gained in game with some RNG luck and time, as well as the in game "won from missions" currency. All in all a great game, definitely worth checking out. It's FREE! What have you got to lose?
Monsieur Merde;-;Pros: +Excellent F2P model (the only things you are forced to buy with the premium currency, Platium, are purely asethic; everything else can be crafted or traded for with enough patience) +Addictive gameplay +Good community +Lots of weapon and character choices +Involved dev team +Very pretty graphics for a F2P, and character and enemy designs are quite nice +Fun parkour system +Balanced difficulty +Highly customizable characters in terms of appearance and play-style +Multiplayer is some of the best I've seen Cons: -The same maps will show up again and again (though the devs are working to avert this) -Not all mechanics are fully explained in-game (such as the channeling mechanic for melee weapons) -Crafting can take DAYS of actual time (Ash Warframe: 72 hours), though thankfully it will track time even when you are not logged in Overall: One of the abosolute best F2P games on Steam, if not one of the better games overall. The game is free, so I highly recommend at least trying it out and deciding for yourself. Invite some friends while you're at it.
Tato;-;ENGLISH and Italian Review Recensione Inglese ed ITALIANA English: Prefixing that the Steam game time isn't correct, and that is since the first Closed Beta that i'm a member of the Warframe community, i guarantee that this game is awesome. i've been watching it growing up, being developed step by step with the improvement and the progressive addition of contents. What about, the graphic is great and also the gameplay. As in every Free2Play, you can Shop items with real money, but the concept of "Pay2Win" is definetly relative: All the items and the equipments that you can Shop, you can also get them by playing well and a lot, with patience. What else? It's based on Teamplay as every good PVE has to be, and the variety of playable Warframe and Weapons (In constant increasing) is impressive. The only defect it's that the scenario tends to be repetitive in long times. Trust me, and give it a try, possibly with some friends, you will not regret. (Sorry for my bad english.) Italiano: Premettendo che il tempo di gioco di Steam  inesatto, e che  dai tempi della Closed Beta che faccio parte della community di Warframe, vi assicuro che questo gioco  geniale. L'ho visto crescere, venire sviluppato passo per passo con il miglioramento e la progressiva aggiunta di contenuti. Che dire, la grafica  ottima e il gameplay pure. Come in ogni Free2Play non manca la possibilit di Shop ma il concetto di "Pay2Win"  decisamente relativo: Tutto ci che pu essere comprato nello Shop si pu benissimo ottenere con impegno e pazienza, guadagnandolo all'interno del gioco. Che altro dire? E' incentrato sul gioco di squadra come ogni buon PVE dovrebbe essere e la variet di armi e e Warframe giocabili (Tra l'altro, in continuo aumento)  impressionante. L'unica pecca  che le ambientazioni alla lunga risultano ripetitive, ma questo accade nella maggior parte dei F2P. Fidatevi di me, e provatelo, possibilmente assieme ad amici, non ve ne pentirete.
UndeadSmileyFace;-;One of my favourite games.
(  Ace  );-;this game is so mindblowing that i have customise all my warframe and weapon till it's like a god like stuff - fun when playing with people - you can be a ninja - many warframe to choose from - big clan dojo where you can have a blast in it - parkour those mission with your awesomeness
Yesaye94;-;Oh boy, this is gonna be a long review... Buckle your seatbelts, Boys & Girls, Grab a snack and enjoy the ride. So I've had the game for about a year & half, Two years, Something around that long. Though just to make it clear, I might get one or two things wrong about what I know during this so just bear with me. ------------------------------------------------------------------------ THE GAME: So how do I explain Warframe? To put it in simple terms, It's a game about some kickass space ninjas. You play as a Tenno, You have been in cryosleep for decades until you are finally awoken by a character we known only as The Lotus, Your guide through this journey. As you are awoken, you are giving a choice between three different suits, which are called Warframes that allow you to channel power, and three different weapons in primary, secondary and melee. You are a defender of the Solar System and all its inhabitants, You will find yourself travelling to all kinds of different planets in our Solar System, Earth, Mercury, Mars, Pluto and so on. So far, There are five different factions in the game, Four of them are your enemies which you must defend the System from. Tenno, Grineer, Corpus, Infected & Orokin, Each with all of their own unique units and bosses. Tenno is the race that you play for, So you will not be finding any other Tenno units as enemies during Gameplay, Unless you count PVP, Where you fight other Tenno warriors in online battle. So, You've picked your Warframe and your weapons, you've completed the tutorial, Now you have your personal stealth ship, The Liset, Controlled by your (un)trustworthy companion, Ordis, a computer AI. This ship is where you will be spending a lot of the game and is pretty much your main menu. From here you select planets and missions, you check the market for weapons and Warframes, You customize your gear in the back of the ship, You craft new weapons from materials you pick up in the game, you select mods to put on your equipment or sell or even transmute them into better cards. This is basically your own little HQ. ------------------------------------------------------------------------ THE GOOD: - Variety of Warframes, Each with their own abilities. - Huge variety of different weapons in all areas. - Good planet variety, Each with enviroments detailed to that specific area. - Decent level scaling, Higher level planets having tougher enemies and more variety. - Detailed graphics, Apart from one or two pop-ins or missing textures, though it's very rare to find one. - Brilliant lore in the game (Even though it could be hard to find...Use the Wiki, People.) - Mods of all types to apply to your equipment, allowing you a different variety of elemental attacks to use on various enemies and specializing for different scenarios. - Teamplay. You will always find yourself playing in a squad of up to four, Though this isn't forced on you as you can play strictly with friends or completely solo. ------------------------------------------------------------------------ THE BAD: - Very repetitive. The game involves a lot of going back to the same areas for grinding for credits and resources. - Controls can be difficult at first for new players, Though they should easily become used to them after tutorials and a few hours of gameplay. - Very grindy game, You'll need to work hard to get that specific gun you just bought for 20,000 credits with 1,000 salvage to craft from. ------------------------------------------------------------------------ FINAL VERDICT: So I know I went easy on this game, Not a lot of bad and plenty of good but this is my own opinion and how I see the game. Yes, The game is very grindy and it does have platinum in the game which you purchase with your own money to buy equipment instantly without having to craft it at the Foundry. Although this is in the game, I personally wouldn't say that this game is Pay to Win, Because you can still get every single piece of equipment you can buy with Plats, Though it will take some grinding to get to but it'll be worth it. Even if you do choose to buy a piece of equipment with Plats, It gives you a little extra by giving you an extra slot for another weapon and putting an Orokin Reactor or Cell in it, which doubles your mod capacity. Personally, I LOVE this game, It's one of my most favorite games ever and will continue to be for the next few years, The Developers do amazing work and they can only make this game better than it already is, They have a great community that they keep in touch with and the players and clans are just as amazing. And there's no subscription fee for this, All completely free for as long as you like, So I definitely recommend at least checking this one out. My final score is 9/10. The game is brilliant, Has a lot of future potential despite a few faults here and there. If you're interested in finding out more, I'd recommend checking out the Wiki to learn more about this game or go on Youtube and find some gameplay videos or tutorials to learn more about the mechanics of this game. There is SO much more about this game that I can't fit into detail here, Things such as Companions, Syndicates, Relays, Bosses, Units types, Clans, Dojos, Levelling. Though I guess I must leave something to the discovery. I hope to see you all on the battlefield soon. Have A Nice Day!
Exmortis-EN-;-;I only played this game a little, not addicted at all. <3
Frank;-;The life of a warframe player -Gets game. -Plays for 30 hours . -Starts noticing the paywall. -Puts money into the game and it feels like a whole other game. -Starts the farm for "prime" parts. -Hits 600 hours and has all prime frames and weapons. -Just sits there wondering why the  they just did all of that. Edit 1: Ok for all of you saying "there is no paywall they drop in alerts." You do realise they drop ONCE a bloody fortnight. For a non casual player playing this that drop rate is too bloody small. You will gain more weapons in one week that you want to catalyst than the amount of catalysts drop in a whole damn year. NEXT TIME READ THE DAMN REVIEW BEFORE YOU SAY THEY DROP IN ALERTS! Edit 2: Oh yeah i forgot to add. Don't bother with the forums if you want help. Its a cesspool of DE's personal  kissers.
frzyc;-;Warframe- or as we call it, ninja-sliding simulator 2014, is a great game. Visually, its absolutely amazing, and the art style is very distinct, with very identified personality between the factions. The combat may be glitchy at times, but it flows and shows a degree of freedom seldomly seen in other games. Movement is also very in-depth, wall runs, slide-jumps, and they can all chain together so that you dont just run anymore, you run, slide, jump, land, slide, attack slide, wall boost, land with an almighty smash of your melee weapon. By this time you commit these moves to muslce memory, your left pinky would be substiantially strong than your right one, so if you were plan to thumbwars with your pinky, i'd highly recommend this game. Game play currently is very diverse, with several game modes: assisination or sabotage missions for those who enjoy Hitman; survival or defence missions for those who have nothing better to think about than SHOOT THOSE DUDES for 30 minutes+; boss fights for your inevitable grind for blueprints. Not to mention all the weapons and warframe you have, once you get to the 400hr+ mark, you'd have more suits and accessories than a spoiled-rotten 16 year old with her own creditcard. The bad- unfortunately, being any hardcore tenno require a lot of GRIND, as every weapon, warframe, needs to be grinded to level 30, and then repeat if you wish to forma(make it better). Not to mention all the grinding for material needed to craft the weapons and these awesome suits. Of course, it being a MMO, grinding is tolerated, and since I have 600 hrs in this game, certainly entertaining enough. The really bad- MONEY. credits and orokin cells are easy enough to grind for, but to get to the real end game(OWN EVERYTHANG), you need PLATINUM. certainly, you can now sell blueprints and mods, but that's very inefficient way to get plat. So if you are willing to commit to the game, dunk 50 bucks in the game during a deal, its well worth your time.
Hella Finn;-;Worst game.
~;-;Pretty fun if you like to go fast.
ok;-;Fun Online game to play with friends. Costs for free and is definitely worth getting.
Lunskee;-;Warframe is the best grindfest game I have ever played. havne't played it yet? Be sure to download it and get playing!
Zoreslav;-;Suddenly, a very high quality f2p game. The co-op size, for 4 people, as has long been the actual start, you have to shoot the enemies of the crowd, whether robots or mutants. The game has a great variety of missions. There is a pumping system, with those experiences not only gets the character for whom you play and weapons that you fight. Interesting system improvements. The visual part of the game is full of colors and effects. Lots of explosions, lots of glowing stuff. All very nice. It should say that the game is not PVP, PVE only, can in the future it will be in the game and, well, until .... the battle against hordes of mutants! PS I almost forgot, in the game at first do not understand what they want from you in a mission where to go and who to shoot but eventually everything falls into place. sorry for my english)    f2p .  , 4 ,    ,    ,    .      .  ,      ,         .   .  ,    . ,  .  . ,    , ,       ,,  ....    ! ..   ,     ,        ,             .
Darkmatt3r;-;One of the best F2P ever created . It has ton's of replay value & you can always play with friends. One of the best feature of this game is crafting . You can craft various weapons & helmets & many other stuffs that you need for causing havoc or showing off . A must play for those who likes shooter . I recommend this game to everyone.
Harleen Quinzel;-;Keep Farming Tenno, you may get the item you need in the next run, or next, or next or next or next or next or next or next or next or next
a worthless protoplasm;-;Initial thoughts: PFFFFFFFFFFF WARFRAME MORE LIKE SNOREFRAME OH LOOK AT ALL THESE THINGS I CAN NEVER HAVE UNLESS I GIVE THE DEVS $80 AND MY SOUL TCH WAIT THIS GAME IS ACTUALLY REALLY FUN EVEN WITH THE BUTTLORD STARTING WEAPONS; MAG IS PIMPMASTER FLEX AND LOKI IS SWAGBRO SUPREME Beginning thoughts: OMG I CAN ELECTRIC NINJA SLIDE AND CLIMB EVERYWHERE AND SLASHING MAKES IT EVEN FASTER I WAS NOT EXPECTING TO HAVE A ROBOT PAL OR ANOTHER SWEETASS NINJA BODY IN THE FIRST FEW DAYS OF PLAYING BUT HERE I AM Secondary thoughts: OH DANG YOU CAN EARN BASICALLY EVERYTHING WITHOUT SPENDING REAL LIFE MONIES IF YOU'RE SWAG ENOUGH ALSO THE DEVS ARE AWESOME BEARDY CANADIANS WHO DO THINGS TO MAKE THEIR GAME AWESOME AND COOL Last thoughts: [Hype intensifies] (Warning: Above review was written while drunk.)
hunter H4;-;This game is one of the few Free To Play games that you can enjoy without spending a single dollar !!
gatsurage;-;Introduction: This is a dungeon/instances based action third person mmo (kinda like vindictus, dragon nest, etc) I have 1k+ hours.. and I play this since CBT (which was way before it came to steam) I can say for sure I gave this game my time and hopes for get a good experience as the game gets made on the go~ I really wanna write a wall of text explaining why this game is soo good and WHY is kinda bad at the same time, but let's be honest here nobody likes to read now days~ so ill try to keep it short starting with the good and bad things, but if you feel like reading bit more, please, do so. Good and Bad things: +New content every week. +Developers that are close to the community. +Not real paying restrictions that will f*ck up your enjoyment. +Nice graphics (they're nice, not mind blowing but nice) +Great amount/variety of characters with their unique set of skills. +Cool upgrade systems with mods (that look like 3d cards) which you can add to your character, weapons, pets, etc. +Well set up, in depth and immersive enviroments. +Variety of missions. -It gets repetitive (yes, even though it does has several game modes, maps, and lots of content) -Long period of wait time for build (craft) each thing in the game, and you will be doing that a lot (we talking from 12h to 72h of wait time) These can be rushed with in game currency, but you don't wanna be doing that with every thing you build.. so it is definetly a downside. -Glitchy and buggy at times, plus cam angle will be a total mess if you downside your aim in close to any in game model (npc/other players will turn into giant monsters if you do so hahaha and I doubt they ever fix this) -LAG yes, this game will lag if you get paired with a bad host, you can "fix" this by putting ping/region restriction, but keep in mind this is a F2p, most people playing will be people with not great internet connections and if you put restrictions you will find yourself playing alone most of the time. -Broken pvp, as this was never meant to be a pvp game, DEVS put it almost by force by high demand from the community and believe me, you wanna stay out of that and stick to pve experience. -It gets grindy at times, mainly toward 60+ hours when you start farming for new mods, and weapon parts.. etc you can get these by trade but the most rare ones will requiere almost an equal item rarity or platinum for make the trade happen. Also for rank (level) up your stuffs will need several time of grindy missions for get it done, no matter how many game modes they add into the game~ for get the stuff level up fast you will often find yourself playing the same game modes: survival and defense. A short txt of what you should know: The game started to be a very early beta (more alpha like) with only 1 map type, and the overall game was barely 2gigs size.. Now after 2 years (I think) the game is 10+ gigs. and that fact should give you an idea of how much content the developers put into the game ever since it was released. The game gets weekly updates, most of the time every wednesday and is just a new weapon, skin, or some random thing but you can be sure new content will arrieve every week. For MAJOR content update, these come every 2 to 3 months, and normaly it's a HUGE update that will change the entire game experience (unfortunally, so far, the core gameplay it's still the same and grindy.. I highly doubt they can improve that no matter what crazy content they add into the game) The So called "F2P Restrictions": As almost every F2P they need to make some money out of you, and unfortunally is not just costume, or skins, they have a system in the game that went worst over time, this system is that will requiere certain amount of time to build (craft) every new weapons, warframes (heroes you play with), almost anything will requiere at least 12+ hour to build. BUT if you do decide you can "RUSH" the build time instantly if you use "Platinum" (in game currency that you can acquire by paying real money, or by doing trade with other players) It is not a huge downside, but it is something to keep in mind, as you won't really see it when you start playing, and more when you get at least 20 to 40+ hours in the game. Other restrictions that you will notice right when get into the game, is that you will need Platinum once again for buy warframe slots, weapon slots, pets...and almost everything will always requiere a slot that you will need to buy (these are cheap tho, 20p warframe, and just 12 for the rest.. you can get 75p for 5$ also, once again, you can get plat by trading with other players) Overall and all I give a thumbs up because I did had my fair fun time with the game, and I do really recommend it, but keep it casual, this is not a game you wanna put 100s of hours in, as it will get repetitive and boring fairly quickly. The small restrictions are a bit of pain in the , but is not that bad, is playable, enjoyable, but I feel the need to say that these restrictions will get worst over time so if I was you, I would play this casually. If you put the time in it (which I already stated that you should NOT do so) you could have a truly full FREE TO PLAY game. --HAVE FUN!
FusRoMeow;-;Warframe is a free to play co-op or solo third person shooter. This game obviously had A LOT of work put into it, which is why I do not understand why it is free. It has outstanding graphics, even on the lowest setting. However, this game in some aspects has a "pay to win" feel to it. To be able to get new items and characters in which they call "Warframes", you can either buy them with real life money, or invest immense amounts of hours into the game to get them, which isn't that bad at all because the game is really fun. The gameplay is terrific, and the given ability to free roam each individual map is superlative. Each map has different objectives, environments, and climates, whether its to the inside of an enemy ship, a snowy mountain, or some abnormal planet. If you're looking for a new game to play, that's free and not to mention fun, then Warframe is most definitely the game for you! If you heard any previous bad reviews about this game, just remember, it has improved a lot since its release date back in March.
bearhiderug;-;Grind, grind, grind. Fun, fun, fun. An expirenced gamer will see the levels for there seperate pieces. They are randomized every time you enter a mission. Very quickly you will begin to realize there are not alot of pieces to the level, just the same ones. Controls are good. Gameplay, pathing, and combat AI's are good as well. Nearly P2W, not pvp p2w but p2w in the sense that aot of the "good/decent" gear is pricy as  if you do not pay.
Dibbin;-;I played a bit in closed beta, then came back around the time Nova was released. I put a lot of time and money into this game. I like the game, but I can't really recommend it to other people. The majority of the game is spent redoing really similar missions to level up your weapons and warframes so that you can have enough money to buy more weapons and warframes so you can grind those up to get even more weapons and warframes. And that's only if you want to use half of a weapon. To unlock a weapon or frames full(ish) potential you need to install Orokin Catalysts or Reactors that double the amount of mod points the weapon has. The recepies are pretty rare too. You can get one from a daily log in reward but the chance is  poor. The lack of free Orokin Catalysts/Reactors has been dubbed "The Great Potato Famine" since they're shaped like potatoes. To get the actual full potential of a weapon, you need to potato it and get these things called Formas which add polarities to mod slots. If you put a mod with a matching polarity (the symbol in the top right corner) it costs half the usual amount of mod points. The thing about Formas though is that they reset the level of your weapon to 1 each time you use one and can only be applied to weapons at level 30. Warframes themselves can also be potatoed and Forma'd, which resets their levels as well. So what do you get for grinding up all of these Warframes and weapons? Nothing. You go out and find more weapons and frames to grind. That is the entire game. There are so many weapons and frames to grind that you'll spend the better part of 1,000 hours to level up most of them, just for them to add more to grind. But there's nothing beyond that. All of the updates are essentially "You can now grind in this new tile set" or "You can now grind in this new Warframe". All of this considered, I loved the game. I loved my clan (Warbros number 1), I loved the atmosphere, the grind just became too big to handle. DE is an alright company with a rather extreme fanbase who will behead you (or in certain cases, ban you) for complaining about anything that's wrong with the game. You think the loot drops are too rare? "Just farm more". A Warframe underpowered? "They're fixing it!". Lack of anything to do other than grind? "This game isn't grindy! You're just a troll! This game is perfect!". You can still like something and acknowledge its flaws. Please calm down, shills. If you do decide to delve into this world, I'd heavily suggest ignoring as much of the playerbase as you can. Bring in a group of friends, start your own clan and do missions with them. That is (in my opinion) the best way to play the game.
Van;-;Ninjas Pay Fees would be more appropriate, let's be serious for a moment, yes, this game is no PvP oriented and yes, you can get almost everything by grinding, but this game is not only lacking any direction and making its developers look like the lovechild of EA Bioware and IGN. The whole thing is made for you to feel frustrated enough to buy some stuff, the moment you jump into it you will feel like there is almost no way to progress naturally, you are stuck with a very underpowered loadout in the first three planets for a while, you may think you are getting some nice loot until you realize you are not able to craft anything useful until later in the game when you can access the harder missions and once you complete the star map you will find little to no reason to play unless you want to get new stuff to painfully level up every single time you want to fully customize it, not to mention the huge prices in the cash shop if you happen to consider skipping some of the "content" in this game (that is grind to grind), please let me make this clear, once a game has monetization, cash shop or the like is no longer "BETA", it is just an incomplete released product using a buzzword to avoid criticism. If you seriously want to play this game just be warned. * You will have to grind for days or play with matchmaking which is almost a never newbie-friendly experience. * You will need to be in a clan ASAP if you want some of the better gear to tackle the "challenging content" later in the game. * You will be tempted from every front to spend real money in the game, either by the poorly implemented trade system or the painful grind. * If you happen to have some complaints you may find half of its community to be really hostile and blindly loyal. *Also, you will experience game breaking bugs in every major update, while this is kind of expected the loyalists will dismiss all your complaints as "gamer entitlement" and thus slow down the process thanks to how developers take negative feedback into account. In short, a nice artistic concept completely botched by pure greed and lazyness.
Cheezitzrice;-;It's an MMO where you farm potatoes.
Monty Python's Shopping Force;-;You play as a space ninja who can slice people in half while running very fast. 12/10
Creatures Lie Here;-;It's an awesome concept, but the game gets stale after the first 30-40 hours of gameplay. You find yourself collecting the same things in the same levels against the same 3 basic enemy types. The only thing that changes as you level up is the variety of weaponry available and the number of enemies on-screen. Imagine ME3's co-op multiplayer mode turned into a giant standalone, minus the variety. That's Warframe.
Sention;-;Want to be a Ninja? In Space? With a sexy tight suit? Then get this game, it's free anyway.
Chauntecler;-;Warframe was a good game, back in the day. Although the gameplay in general is solid and fun, the payment model and new trading system have completely destroyed what little economy the game had. With the addition of "Prime Access", those of us who don't have $250 to throw at a pack are stuck farming endlessly, with no chance ever to recieve the "exclusives" that are in the high-cost packs. I have many hours in this game, with 1500+ before it was even on steam. If you have money to throw, and you don't mind being forcefully excluded from exclusive items because you can't afford it, by all means try it out. Be warned, though, the trading system has created a severally unbalanced pay-to-win blackmarket among players.
ekungiba;-;It's a cool game.
Dorgarr;-;The only game were you can play as a Magical Hammerhead Shark Space Samurai with machineguns who fights aliens and robots with lasers. Really, the only things missing from this game are dinosaurs, pirates, and trains.
Trouvo;-;Space ninjas! Space ninja weapons, space weapons, and even ninja weapons, lots of killing, parkour acrobatics, fluid controls, exciting and extensive gameplay and devs who know they rely on their players and listen and support them accordingly. Most recent example players had been wanting a grappling hook kind of weapon they not only did it but they made a whole new space ninja to play that has that as an ability! and the best part, its still in beta and its already this good! Did you click download yet? What are you waiting for? SPACE NINJAS!!!!
Tei;-;Nice graphics and a high-sci-fi ske story. The shooting is not bad, nor decent. The maps are too large ans shameish, and all are the same metal-wall corridors, with too rare exceptions. But is a nice game, what make it nice is some adictiviness to unlock stuff, how easy is to go somewhere and shot things, and the diablo-ske mania of collecting upgrades. A mix of Diablo and some japanese nightmare.
Retude;-;I've been playing this game nonstop for the past few weeks. It's a great game. Although i feel that there isnt a lot of story or plot, there is, however, a nice backstory/lore and a unique setting. The game allows you to customize your character (to an extent) and has a large selection of weapons and warframes to suit one's playstyle. In the beginning, the game felt very pay2play; everything i wanted at that point costed platinum(premium currency) and wasn't available until i progressed further and it required (what i assumed to be) heavy grinding. But now, having progressed much further, i've found that most things could be acquired with just time and patience, and the only things that truly required platinum were cosmetics and bundles. And platinum is a tradable currency, so if you really want x that costs y platinum, you could make platinum by trading with other players. But is the game fun? Yes, it's loads of fun. The gameplay is relatively unique, progression freels rewarding, and it looks great. Updates are pulled out quickly, fixes are adminstered hastily. Overall, it's a very refined game (especially one that's in beta)
KIR_AKA_NIK;-;Happy farm with exosuits. 10/10 Would farm again.
Appley Hooves;-;Does being a space ninja saving the universe from vile technology, oppressive tyranny, and malicious infestation with guns, swords, and other implements to destroy bad things sound interesting to you? Even if it doesn't, this is an awesome example of how to do Free to Play. Even though most of the maps are randomly generated sets of similar rooms, once you start getting better equipment, you'll start to ignore and possibly enjoy that you know the way through the different rooms. You can access nearly everything without spending actual money, instead only having to spend time finding resources in missions and waiting for them to build once you've got the parts you need. If you feel like supporting the developers and getting something sooner, you can buy Platinum (real world currency equivalent) and get things straight away. (Also, only buy that stuff through the game's official site, Steam's packs of DLC are overpriced unless on deep sale. There are also discounts you can get through in-game login rewards, ranging from 20%-75% off Platinum, so wait for that if possible.) Now get in here and help me get potatoes, would you kindly?
NillaWafer;-;Saying this game is Free to Play is a bold lie. Let me tell you the story of when I started this game. You are only allowed to pick 1 of 3 starting classes, or warframes, out of the existing 10 or 15. So you play around and you want to make a weapon. You can either 1. use ingame points to unlock a blueprint for the weapon, if the weapon you want even has a blueprint, farm the resources to make the weapon which can take a really, really long time, especially for a starting player, after obtaining everything, spend even more ingame credits to START the making of the weapon which takes 24 hours (not joking), wait an entire day, and THEN you get to play with the weapon. Or 2. give Warframe your money. Making warframes is even worse. You have to fight the same boss over and over just hoping you get the right drops from it. You need a Chassis blueprint, systems blueprint, helmet blueprint, and a warframe blueprint. You need to build ALL those items before you can even begin making the warframe, which all use ingame credits AND TAKES 3 DAYS TO MAKE. Or you can throw your money at Warframe. Oh, and you can only have 2 warframes out of the 15 to play with. You only have 2 warframe slots and like 5 weapon slots. You want more weapons or warframes? Looks like you have to spend some MORE MONEY. You need to give Warframe more money so you can get more slots just to get more warframes and weapons. Let's talk gameplay. The gameplay is "fun". Sort of. I enjoyed playing solo missions more than playing with 3 other strangers . Why? Because if I play solo, I can try using stealth, which is impossible if your new "teammates" fly down the halls shooting everything in sight. Also, if I play solo, I can play at my own pace. Every single game that you play online with 4 people, the game becomes less of a fps and more of a race. Actually, that's a perfect description of what happens. It becomes less of "There's 2 guys over there, I'll sneak up on one and shoot the other in the head" and more of "RUN RUN RUN OH LOOK AN ENEMY OH HES DEAD RUN FASTER FASTER". It turns into a clusterf**k of color.... I'll summarize all of this. So basically, this is micro-transaction the game. The only way to enjoy the game to it's full extend is spending a lot of money. And I mean a lot. I would actually prefer it if you had to buy the game. That way, Warframe wouldn't be a lie, and you wouldn't have to deal with half the bullcrap in the game. Sadly, even IF they did that, you would have to deal with the OTHER half of the bullcrap, like waiting 3 days to play with a warframe. It's just a stupid system, and is just used to siphon more money from your wallet. Oh I forgot to mention, you can spend real money to speed up the process ._. so yea, more ways of spending money... great... The game is "fun" ish, if you can look passed all the crap, which I cannot. If you ignore the facts that you need to spend money to use more than 2 warframes, spend money to use more than 5 weapons, wait 3 days to use a new warframe, wait 24 hours to use a new weapon, how the game puts micro transaction after micro transaction in front of your face every single time you open the game (oh, if you stop playing for a day, the next time you open the game, you win a "random reward", which is ALWAYS a discount on your NEXT MICRO TRANSACTION), then you might like this game. I don't
Kiprus;-;Verry fun game, and can be verry adicting. This game has a long learning curve, but when you got the basics there is always something to do, always 1 more mission to play, 1 more thing to craft, 1 more resource needed to find. All these things add up in the big picture and make Warframe much bigger then it seems to players, its not your typical Free to play game or pay to win game, no you can do all free theres no advantage in paying. Its super fun for me and my friends with who i have spent in this games are numerous days. Several h a day and we never got bored, we only runed out of energy to play the game and was super fun to yell at each other to help him and not to run away from reviving a budy,  arround and all that cool stuff. There are numerous guns from mashine guns to shotguns, from pistols to laser rifles.You play on planets arround the solar system, and in each planet there are multiple missions in wich you can unlock mods to upgrade your warframe character and guns, those are called mod cards, wich are randomly droped by enemys or boses. Each warframe, or gun has a lvling system from 1-30 leveling a warframe makes him to have more shields, hp armor etc, but with mod cards you can upgrade him the most you like him to be bore tanky or to dish out damage its all up to you. Theres a clan DOJO where you and you clan buddys can go and build structures like power plant, and reserch facilities. In reserch facilities you can reserch new guns, mostly that enemys use, can reserch warframes but all that takes multiple day resech time. There are game events in wich players allways kinda keep their aye on the game to see if there is a alert mission in wich can be droped a mod card they want, or a accesorie item they want for a warframe wich can be bought only by real money but with alerts can get them free. Anything is posible when you play like a true ninja warior. My score for the game is 9.5/10 Game worth a try not your 2h bot it deserves more then that.
Alonzorion;-;Played Warframe with a few friends earlier today. We all agreed while it's great for a free to play game containing some beautiful graphical work, some interesting game mechanics, and good controller support, it gets tedious very quickly and nothing really makes it stand apart from a failed third-person action game like Too Human unfortunately. It's also quite a tough game to get a grip of as it contains lack of explaination about how certain aspects of upgrading and customising a character work. Regardless, I'd recommend giving it a bash, it's a good bit of fun at first but nothing I can see myself playing in the long term and spending money on! :)
DOOMJESUS;-;nothing to write home about. unless you just enjoy endless, mindless repetition and soulless characters dressed up in nonsensical art.
Deadpool;-;This game is A-M-A-Z-I-N-G ! I love it ! It has so much customization and surprise ! Its not Pay 2 Win ! Really nice campaign and very cool Co-op. I recommend this game especically playing with friends. Its a MUST HAVE !
Thagorom;-;Warframe is a great game. It's a PvE where people actually use teamwork! It's F2P and almoast all of the items that can be bought with real money can also be crafted by getting in-game resources and credits. The graphics are great, and so is the gameplay! It's a really fun game! The devs are great, and actually listen to the players on their forums! If there's a bug, you report it and they fix it in the next update! In short, warframe is a great PvE teamwork game. Also don't forget: Ninjas Play Free.
Tonight May Have To Last ME;-;Now when you WAnt a action MMo thats intense ,beautiful ,and unique from a third person perspective this is your answer "SPACE NINJA" .......enough said ....XD
Alvazia;-;Digital Extremes crafted an amazing free-to-play, third-person hybrid action-shooter in Warframe. Technically the game is just a more polished up version of their 2008 outing Dark Sector, but the polish has turned the game into something for the ages, making it one of the most badass free-to-play games on the market right now. The game originally launched last year to little fanfare but managed to grow a strong community based on the game's infectious lore and equally infectious gameplay. Basically, the story revolves around an ancient race of space ninjas known as the Tenno, who must serve and protect the interests of the galaxy from various overlords amassing their forces in the hostile alien races known as the Grineer and the Corpus. Simply enough, players in the role of the Tenno must don their Warframe bioskins (yes, the Warframes grow on the Tenno like skin) and sabotage, destroy, and disrupt the forces of the Corups and Grineer. The very basic plot outline sounds like typical MMO fanfare but my goodness does it work and work well, mostly because it's set against the motif of space-Ronin without proper masters doing all that they can to save the galaxy. The game starts when the Excalibur Tenno is freed from his chamber while Grineer forces are trying to collect and breed their own Warframes from the Tenno race, and that's where players hop in and start kicking butt and taking names. The actual tutorial stage is short, sweet and simple and doesn't even begin to tackle some of the more complex elements of the game. So how complex is the game? Well, the story is barebones, the dialogue is simple and the quests are all mostly repetitive and circulate around the same formula. What makes Warframe so complex and so badass is that the gameplay is just balls-to-the-walls awesome. You can wall-run (which isn't anything new), you can climb up anything you can reach, you can backflip off anything solid and you can shoot dodge like nobody's business. The game also has a variety of melee weapons that offer very, very, very different styles of play. For instance, using the dual-bladed pole-ax is nothing like using a long blade, or dual daggers, or boxing the crap out of enemies with modified armored hands. Each melee weapon requires a completely different approach to the gameplay that's rarely seen in many games. The attention to detail in the combat is one of those added reasons why Digital Extreme's free-to-play shooter is so addictive and yet so versatile in its approach to a tried and true gameplay format. The above example isn't even a remote exaggeration but more like an under-representation for some of the absolutely mega-badass things you can pull off in the game. It's insane. The game also has a variety of melee weapons that offer very, very, very different styles of play. For instance, using the dual-bladed pole-ax is nothing like using a long blade, or dual daggers, or boxing the crap out of enemies with modified armored hands. Each melee weapon requires a completely different approach to the gameplay that's rarely seen in many games. The attention to detail in the combat is one of those added reasons why Digital Extreme's free-to-play shooter is so addictive and yet so versatile in its approach to a tried and true gameplay format. But it doesn't end there... you can combine your melee combat with seamless transitions into special powers and abilities on a whim. Even more than that, you can transition from your powers and abilities (or melee combat) into shooting with your primary or secondary weapons with ease. For example, you can run across the side of a wall, jump off, split an enemy right down the middle with a sword (literally, split them down the middle Mortal Kombat-style) and then do a sideways flip and land a headshot while in mid-air, blowing the brains clean out of another enemy (and yes, you can see the brain particles fly if the graphics are turned up enough). And did I happen to mention you can customize your weapon stats, affixes and abilities like a micromanaging RPG fanatic? Well, you can. You want to freeze enemies with every pistol shot? No prob. How about combine fire and ice together along with electrical damage so that they burn, freeze and then convulse on the ground in a single swipe from your warhammer? Sure can do. Increased critical damage for fast-as-a-fly instant kill headshots? Done and done. While the game is as grindy as a butcher factory, the fact that the gameplay is fun more than makes up for it. Even more than this, all that fancy-schmancy Matrix-style, space-ninja stuff you can pull off isn't done to the effect of boredom. The game's difficulty scales like a crazy mofo. Instead of choosing a difficulty, the planets themselves work as the difficulty factor  the further out into the solar system you go, the harder it gets. The best part about Warframe's difficulty is that the game isn't artificially difficult. Yeah, a lot of you know exactly what I mean. Saints Row, Call of Duty, Mercenaries, Just Cause and Uncharted are prime culprits of having difficulty that scales artificially, and by that I mean that the AI isn't smarter, it's just more of them standing around and shooting incessantly without missing. It's a cop-out on difficulty. In Warframe the AI takes cover, calls for reinforcements, uses ship panels to lockdown areas or suppress players. It's difficulty done right and forces players to adapt cooperatively and get out of a situation using both skill and intelligence. Again, it's difficulty done right and this is just another reason why Warframe is so badass. After fixing some of the mod cards, balancing some of the Warframes themselves and expanding the universe, the game has come a long way since launch and offers players a really unique free-to-play experience that's hard to find anywhere else. Maiet will have their work cut out for them in Gunz 2. (This review was written by (CINEMABLEND)
Zer - Friskydingo;-;Best F2P game I've personally found, has held my interest for going on a year now. Frequent updates (usually every other week), better than average community, and is easily the most polished (despite an 'official' release) F2p I've seen. Highly recommend.
robert;-;very good game to be free to play
HellscarE;-;Best way to become a ninja !!!
StacyRect;-;It's like super cocaine, it doesn't kill you but after aweek, you wouldn't know the difference.
Triangulo Invertido;-;Awesome game, awesome characters, stuning lands, nice coop. Just great.
Imanatas;-;Pleasantly addictive game with human mutated space ninjas. 1st time I tried Warframe was almost 2 years ago (I guess) - its was approximately 900mb big. Didn't played much that time, because it became quite repetative and visually boring pretty soon. I downloaded it again 3 weeks ago (almost 10GB!!) and I can't even describe the huge improvement. Audio, graphics, level desing/variety, ...everything. While there are still some bugs, I didn't encounter one that would discouraged me from playing. Fair business model which dont force you pay at all. What can be little annoying are frame/weapon slots. But either that can be obtained by earning platinium from marked. I got myself little more than 200 platinium (which is equal to 15 USD) by selling rare stuff to community. If you don't mind grind I highly recommend this game. 7,5/10 (if you play alone), 9/10 (with friends) for free 2 play game.
Brother Primus;-;Warframe is a very fun game with space guns, space ninjas and space bad guys. Oh, and space-badassery. Once you start playing it's hard to quit, Having login rewards really keeps you going, The one drawback is when you're just starting. YOur weapons dont do much damage anymore, even though they're maxed damage. But you can use all your hard work to buy blueprints of weapons and build them. The Boltor is very good to start with too. This game is very fun with friends and a group of 4 people, with a wide range of game modes and modifications for your 'warframe' and weapons. There's even lot's of secrets and lot's of hidden lore. I hope people enjoy the game like i have.
StacyRect;-;It's like super cocaine, it doesn't kill you but after aweek, you wouldn't know the difference.
Krumpled Forezkinz;-;If you like shooting games Play this. If you like hack n slash games play this. If you like stealth games play this. If you like space games play this If you like ninja games play this. Now if you like all of those types of games WARFRAME IS YOUR GAME.
ZilethRyderZXC4;-;That Moment When you Realize that Destiny is free on PC.
Curaidh;-;Once this was a fun and great game, but over the time it has turned into a pure grindfest without any resemblance of balance and a Developer doing everything to throttle your progression while trying to force you to "play it their way".
NightSky;-;Spending That Much time To play this game , Did you see me i quit game Yet ? Third Person SPace Ninja, Time to Make it worth to play
A Bowl of Noodles;-;You know what? Within a month(Possibly even a few weeks) I sunk over a hundred hours into this game. And I would like to say those are the best hundred hours I've had in awhile. First of all, THERE WILL BE GRINDING/FARMING. This game kinda works like that. I understand not everyone has the patience to well grind for a certain items(In the newest update, kubrow eggs will be your worst nightmare in farming, unless RNG is on your side. Then I hate you), but I do think it's worth while because it gives you that feeling of progress towards what you want. And that feels pretty good. Second, there are microtransactions, but they are not needed. You will only need them when you want to fully buy/rush something, want to but additional accersories(color packs, armor, etc.), and when you want to trade for certain items. I must say, this game handles microtransactions very well. As long as you don't spend it too fast. Like two of my friends. Which I will not metion either of them. Third, this game will (sometimes) require some sort of teamwork. Like other people to help you. I used to think you can fully "beat the game" all by yourself, until a certain entity called "The Stalker" absolutly whopped my . Then I realized, "I need a team to play with...". I'm not sure if you can fully solo the game from the beggining but if you can, i'd be happy to know. Last of all, it's just fun to explore every weapon and warframe in the game. I mean when I first built a warframe that had the ability to stop ALL damage coming to her, bring out energy claws to rip people up, and gain her health back? I was damn well surprised and I still enjoy the warframe up to date. I recommend this game to anyone who is interested in RPG like elements and a game that you and your friends could enjoy. I mean who doesn't enjoy being a space ninja cutting people in half, shootting people up, and jumping all over the place? I enjoy it. Immensely.
Johnny Walker;-;Addictive game! Never tired of playing this game. Amazing graphics, goog AI and maintenance which is very impressive for a F2P game. Hope I've convinced you to at least give it a try, nothing to miss.
<NOG>DogManDan;-;One of the best F2P games I have played. Proud member of the Design Council.
KidKyu;-;Great graphic's, one of the best dev teams i've encountered to date, probably the best F2P model i've seen as well. If you don't mind a grind and have the time to actually work to obtain your things in this game it's definitely worth a look. It's Co-op need's some work to actually make missions feel as a team effort, as it stands it pretty much Run n Gun and blow everything up, which is pretty great too. The constant hotfixes which take place through the week also show their dedication to the current community. Just an overall refreshing experience
Warhorse;-;Played a little bit, quite fun, you can have a dog.
Leonair;-;I've been a part of this game since the closed beta. I've seen a ton of changes and don't let steam fool you. I've logged in more than 400 hours on this baby right here. You play as a Tenno. A master of the warframe armor. The universe is set years and years after Dark Sector (DE confirmed that Hayden Tenno was indeed the "O.G." Tenno.) where the Tenno are at war with 2 factions: The Corpus and The Grineer. Both of which are at war with each other and the result is an imbalance in the system which the Tenno are tasked with balancing. There is a fourth faction, the sentient Infected. The technocyte ravaged beings twisted into monsters after years of dividing and acquiring biomass, they pose a threat to everyone in the universe. The game itself has quite a learning curve but the community makes it so easy to learn. There are a ton of events and rare items as well as alert missions that allow you to take certain rare items or platinum items that you could buy in-game with microtransactions but the game allows you to get them for free. You don't need to spend unless you want to. Prime frames are the same. (You grind for them to get em for free) I personally spent money into this game and am a founder and have not regretted spending money on this game. It has given me so much fun and joy and i just love being a space ninja. 10/10 Easily one of the best games i have ever played.
Ret;-;10/10 Needs more fluff.
-SNiGS- BakedBam;-;so take ninjas then stuff them into robots, have them thrown into a maplestory game and you get warframe. 10/10 Cheers
Luggy;-;6:44 PM - _charon: this ai has the dumbest voice 6:44 PM - _charon: you should have included that in your review
Felanna Eraani;-;Before I get on with the review, I'd like to say that my opinion on this game in particular is sort of "mixed" but leans more toward the recommended side, so just keep that in mind as you read. With that out of the way, here we go: Warframe is a PvE co-op multiplayer online third person shooter, that brings in elements of a variety of different games and genres that make up its gameplay as a whole. There are similarities to hack and slash, RPG, and stealth/espionage, though the stealth aspect is rather lacking and more of something that's just "there" rather than something that is a large focus. All in all, the game can tend to feel like the developers of Dynasty Warriors, Mirror's Edge, Mass Effect, and any MMORPG game you prefer to imagine, got together and said "lets make a game", then occasionally went to the devs of Ghost Recon, Assassin's Creed, and Hitman for small suggestions on stealth here and there. But is the game fun? Is it original? I can honestly say yes to both. I can't say I've seen another game that was exactly like this, and the experience is definitely an enjoyable one. Possibly the greatest part about it is that you don't have to pay a penny for anything in the game, save for aesthetic items, and slots for Warframes and Weapons. But there's an alternative for that too - it's called trading. However, whether or not I recommend this game for you depends on whether or not you have a few friends you would be playing it with on a regular basis. If you don't, then let me be the first to tell you that you're going to get very bored very quickly. If you do, then by all means, you could have as many hours as I do, if not more! Why is this, you might ask? Warframe is set up in such a way that the gear isn't "ranked" at all, there's no weapon, nor frame that is part of the "pro gear" that you work up to, aside from Primed items. Primed items are your endgame, and they're a pretty easy endgame to reach. Rather than a long time spent visiting new areas, and slowly working your way up to the "cool stuff", your starter character alone can be modded correctly to take on the void decently, if you know how to use it. Most planets don't have their own tilesets, and there's only four families of enemies, the Grineer, the Corpus, the Infested, and the Corrupted, the Corrupted of which are limited to the Void only, and Infested only appear during certain quests, specific invasion types, dark sectors, and derelicts/Eris, meaning that you'll really only be seeing the Grineer and Corpus frequently unless you do Void runs all the time, or choose to go to Eris/Derelicts/Dark Sectors/Invasions to fight infested. However, once you reach "endgame", which is the Void, which doesn't take long at all to get to, you won't be seeing the Infested, Grineer, or Corpus all that much, because the Void is where you'll almost always be, trying to get Prime gear, and/or credits, since the Void offers the most credits per run out of any other area in the game. From then on, it's just a matter of first getting a decent set of gear you can use, and learning how to properly mod it to get a viable build for surviving T3-T4 Void, once you can do that, it's just a matter of grinding the void over and over again to get the parts you need for Primed gear, which all lies in the hands of RNG - you go through RNG on the regular worlds to get keys for the void, and then you go through RNG in the void to [hopefully] get the parts you need for the item you're trying to get. Note that on some runs you may not get a part at all and instead get a Forma blueprint, or maybe 5 fusion cores, because that's definitely what you wanted! But once you have your primed gear, you'll bask in the glory of having such items, and begin grinding to get more of them - until, that is, you ask yourself the question that ruins the game as a whole; "why?". All that's left for you is making yourself OP so you can do the same things you've been doing with more efficiency, so you can get more gear to grind more with. There is no "content" you're working towards, there is nothing else you're actually accomplishing other than getting more toys to play with, and you're going through heavy amounts of grind to get them. All of this can be ignored if you're playing this with your friends, as it's definitely a fun co-op game, but if you're hoping to find something to just do by yourself in your free time, you'll get burned out fast. Warframe also, however, features a PvP mode that was recently "enhanced". However, this new PvP leaves a lot to be desired. Will it be enhanced in the future? Maybe, but honestly the devs will (and should) be more worried about the main game than the PvP, meaning it'll be much like the Archwing mode in the game - a decent concept that does add more to the game, but it has no impact on the main game whatsoever, is lackluster compared to the main game, and there's little to no incentive to actually do it. How is it lackluster? Well, for starters, the weapons and frames you're allowed to use in PvP were carefully hand-selected by the devs and worked specifically for the PvP, yet there is still a vast lacking of balance overall. Some weapons and frames are statistically superior to others, limiting it all to an even tinier number of the tiny amount of things you can actually use. Add to this, that the PvP only has around 4 maps, and there's only one mode - CTF. You're not awarded credits, nor mods for doing any of this. In fact, you only get EXP with the conclave if you wear the conclave sigil, which, EXP with the conclave is used to get special mods - mods that can only be used in PvP. There's also the new "raid", which is what DE believes to be the answer to the lack of endgame it seems. The Raid is where 4-8 players join together to take on a much harder mission than what players normally face. However, unless you pleasure the idea of everyone spamming mics and some kid screaming at you for not being 100% perfect, take my advice and avoid the raids like a plague. So, all in all, a good game, but the devs need to focus less on giving us more stuff to grind for, and focus more on giving endgame players more content to enjoy, less RNG grind, and overall providing more incentive to actually play the game. Another thing they should focus on is the quests in the game that provide a bit of story for the game, as those are interesting, but there's not even close to enough of them. It's to my understanding that all of this is planned to happen "eventually", but there's no telling when that will actually be. I give Warframe an 8.5/10.
TsunamiFPS #Vacation til Aug 10;-;Cool, 3D game, more in a near-future mode and in-game items to be brought to make the game more worth it.
LickinFriedChicken;-;I castrated a man with a bow and arrow and chopped him into 4 peices with my glowing ninja sword. 10/10 would castrate again
Mr. Cypher!;-;Ok im a new player of this game. I just started right before the new UI update (Your Ship) that just came out a few weeks ago.I have to say this is without a dought one of the best F2P out there at the moment.The game starts were you can pick out of 3 free Tennos.You can get more Tennos from the store for Plat (paid currency) or you can farm them for free by buying the plans off the market for credits (free currency) .You can get Tenno Parts and Plans and weapons plans off boss fights and as login rewards and misson rewards.The games game play is pretty much 3rd person action game,think Gears of War meets the pilot part of Titanfall ;) The GFX are amazing ,has to be the best gfx i have seen in a F2P!!The games controlls are spot on you can slide dash and run off walls and melee your target real fast and move very fluid back to your main weapon or side arm.As for the missons they do get repetitive, but there is so much action that you dont seem to mind bigtime when your tenno and mods lvl up :) There are a buch of diffrent mission modes are as follows --> Assassination  Capture  Conclave  Deception  Endless/Wave Defense  Escape  Exterminate  Hijack Interception  Invasion (Solar Rail)  Mobile Defense  Rescue  Sabotage (Hive)  Spy  Survival PvP  Environmental Hazards!! There is also mission Alerts also this pay good credits and have gear and weapon plans at times you can make in your Foundry . The game has Solo Play and Squad Based Action of 4 players. There is also settings for Friends Only and Invite Only.So you can be Social or Anti Social as you want its up to you :) The real beauty of this game shines in the MODs they are like cards you collect and lvl up and add to your Tenno and Weapons.They can take a average Tenno or Weapon and make it superior. As for the paying part of the game they have a good slection of prices and you really dont need to buy any unless you want stuff fast and dont feel like farming or want cosmetic addons for your gear and Tenno.I would recommend saving your Plat or buy Plat just for Tenno Spots(20 Plat) and Weapon Inventory slots(12 Plat 2 slots) ;) But if you are like me and dont mind spending on a few Plat to help suppport a real good F2P by all means spend away !! :) Plat price packages range from $4.99 (74 plat) to $199.99 (4300 plat + Rare Card mods).I give this game as a F2P a wopping 9/10 only reason i gave it a one point deduction is i think the prices in the store could be a tad cheaper.But all in all a darn good game so give it a shot if you are looking for a solid action game!!! See you on the Battle Field TENNO!!!!
Bobospider;-;Awesome game,awesome graphics.You spend some hours in this game, I can guarantee this
Naia;-;Amazing shooter worth cheking out.
|RaSTa*| INSPIRED;-;I played this Game together with a friend and I have to say: I AM SURPRICED. Really great alternative to the always-same-Call-of-Duty in my option :D And on the other side its FreetoPlay and seems to be completely NON-PAY-TO-WIN. Does this be even better? I dont think so Grab it untill it is still Free^^ hahhaha
Capti in Tartara;-;i cant wait to be a useless piece of  all day and grind kela de thaym  IM FALLING DOWN ALL THESE ROLLER MINES I WARNED YOU ABOUT ROLLER MINES TENNO!!!! I TOLD YOU MAG! IT KEEPS HAPPENING I TOLD YOU MAG I TOLD YOU ABOUT ROLLER MINES!
RockstarCRO;-;Warframe is a third person over the shoulder shooter with customizable options. At first glance, this game seems like it has it all. Upon closer inspection, there's a few key elements missing. For a quick first impression, imagine the games Destiny and Halo having a child except they gave them a sword. I have to give the game credit for putting jumping, sprinting, dodging/rolling as well as crouching into the game. Any game that puts basic movements in, make it all the more enjoyable. Your weapons can be modified and changed as you please (including armor), but I can't help feel like I'm playing Brink when using the guns in game. It's not necessarily bad, but it can be bland at times. They did provide a secondary handgun though, which to me, the more the merrier. The game itself provides a good foundation for game-play, but if you are looking for over the top missions, doesn't seem quite here. It feels as though your running to point A to point B, press this object then done, onto the next place. Enemies sort of stand and shoot at you when you make your move, they don't quite react to your movements or shots. What was a good addition was the melee weapon (or sword). I feel like a bit more could have been done with it (maybe allowing for more control), but either than that, you're mashing a single button to take a guy down. It does however, also have a double jump feature... sort of, or at least I think. I did a back flip while running full blast at a wall, and sometimes I jump twice (as if I bounce off an obstacle) when trying to climb ridges. This game has quite a bit, but just feels it can have so much more. Put that together with paying to get better stuff, well, that depends on which side of the micro-transaction side you're on. The games graphics are good and can ask a lot of your computer depending on what you're running. I haven't noticed any hiccups or glitches, not even clipping as of yet! The textures they used were nice, but in dark scenarios I feel they could have added a bit more light. The sound is good but can be bland to those looking for authentic qualities. For a free game, definitely not a bad choice. Rating : 7.3/10 It could have gotten a 8 easily with the addition of local co-op (and removal of micro transactions). If they were to add vehicles and some sort of practicality to use airships, that would have been greatly appreciated. WHAT YOU SHOULD KNOW : There are micro transactions in game. If this sort of thing pisses you off or you don't support it, I wouldn't suggest downloading the game. ScreenShots : What standard shooting looks like Using a special attack Using a standard melee attack View from the front of the "menu" ship
Tim;-;TL;DR: If you love RNG or spending real money on in-game swag, then you've come to the right place...if not, then GTFO and never look back. Gameplay-wise, Warframe is actually a great game, but the really messed up RNG ruins the hard work that the gameplay has done. It's so random in fact, that I've encountered several scenarios wherein energy orbs are either a dime a dozen, or harder to find than Waldo in a Carmen Sandiego book (now apply this to loot, enemies, currency, and crafting materials). That being said, it isn't lost to me that the developers did this intentionally, just so that it would be easier to entice players to use actual money to buy the in-game currency (platinum), or the other "pay to win" options available (buy warframes, weapons, boosts, and materials as opposed to farming them). Got a lot of money to bypass the crappy RNG? Play this game. Got a lot of time to waste on the crappy RNG? Play this game. No money or time? GTFO and avoid this like the plague. EDIT: If you want to play this game, but also want to reduce the wild RNG's relevance, then I suggest that you keep logging in till you get the 75% discount to Platinum, then buy the 4300 Platinum pack from the store for 50USD. That much platinum is more than enough to get you started and then some, and the value is great.
Crane;-;This has hot female warframes that gives me raging boners. My favorite is Saryn because she has the biggest boobs out of all of them. I really want to motorboat and tit them. OH YEAH?
Jaller;-;Acrobatic Parkour Space Ninjas with guns. "It's just like Teenage Mutant ninja turtles, but with guns. In space."
Vash(88);-;This is a top notch f2p 4 player co-op shooter / plat-former; however, if you and your friends are looking for a game with a solid story line and character development, look some place else. While the free running is tons of fun to master, the levels are massive and the combat is fast pace and thrilling, the game is without a doubt a grind. Get a mod; level a mod. Get a frame; level a frame. Get a gun; level a gun. There are tons of guns, mods and frames to level, but without a team of friends to do it with, I could see the task being a bit daunting. The levels you play in are HUGE! But, The maps are cooky cutter to say the least. It can take ten minutes to make it to the escape, passing one deja vu after another. Lots of detail and care went into some parts of the environment while others are dull and uninviting. The free running is a blast! So fluent and fun to play around with. Tough to pull off in combat, but that's what keeps you trying it again and again. Unless you look up videos that show all that there is to learn, it will take a long time to figure out all of the techniques. The graphics are shiny and clean. A fun game to look at and it is extremely well optimized. The character models have great detail and the colors can be customized... that is If you buy a color pallet, the b***ards! The weapons fall a bit short. There are a ton to choose from, but a lot of them feel very similar; fortunately, the melee weapons are a good balance with the guns. Each player can also have a "sentinel" that does a number of useful things: attacking enemies and picking up loot items are examples. All the weapons can be modified through a unique leveling and modding system that I have only seen in this game. It works well, but adds to the inescapable grind. The combat is splendid. There is a good variety to the enemies, and a solid balancing system that can lead to easy push-over style fights, and intense battles that have the players pushed to the edge at all times. The free running plays a large role in the combat. Over all, the game is the perfect addition to any group of friends looking to add another good co-op shooter the their lists. Plenty to grind and plenty to uncover and discover. I recommend buying "some" platinum in the being. It can take a while to get going without it. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=221726417
...;-;SUPER POWERED SPACE NINJAS...and this stuff too: guns....lots of guns and swords, punching gloves, wall running, ice throwing, fire conjuring, attack dog having, teleporting, pew pew pew pew, bazookas :{D , scarf wearing, lightning bolt zapping, flying tornado powers of death, multi-playing coolness and EXPLOSSSSSSSIONS!!!!!!(Mr. Torgue voice) 20/10
Crazedanimal;-;More of a Warfarm than a warframe. I have become quite addicted to this free to play game. Most things are available in the game with out having to pay cash for it. Just requires a bit of farming to get. Only things that arent, are Warframe slots, weapon slots, and vanity stuff like scarfs and colours. Third person 4 player co-op shooter/hack and slash. But of course if you are too lazy to farm stuff up... you can always pay money for new frames and weapons too.
Ally;-;Grinding has never been so time consuming
Hean;-;Albeit I do not play this game anymore I cannot do anything else but whole heartedly reccommend it. It has been one of (if not THE) my best F2P experiences, with intense action, a wide variety of characters, weapons, abilities and customization (still expanding often even) you hardly ever get bored. Plenty of clan-housing with many different options, once again with loads of customization, seriously, the amount of customization in this game is friggin' nuts! The only bad thing is if you feel its becoming a grind, so play it with people you think you'd enjoy it with to increase the life of the game for you. I'd probably give it a 8/10.
SpentFern;-;Honestly, this is one of the best video games i have ever played. If you are a fan of mass effect than you will have a great time with this game. everything from the graphics to the market, to the battle mechanics of the game, are all well developed. At first glance, i saw that they provided a tutorial for this game which blew my mind away, usually i have to figure out controls on my own with games, but this game ensured that everyone will know the basic mechanics of the game and how to keep up with the players online.
}{/\/;-;Everything you once knew about this game has changed. Back when all of us tried it in beta, this game was only "OK." It did get repetitive, and eventually, my wife and I quit. Recently, I've come back to what seems to be one of the most expansive changes ever. This game has me completely hooked in so many ways now. Base building, PvP, Void Key missions, New Frames, New Weapons, etc... Everything can be earned with enough patience. No money is needed to be spent. (Though it does speed things up quite a bit.)
Hopey Swag;-;Space: the final frontier. These are the voyages of the starship Turbo Pecs. Its continuing mission: to explore strange new worlds, to seek out new life and new civilizations, to boldly go where no tenno has gone before
Kerma;-;Extremely fun game, Good graphics, and a whole lot of things to do. Pros +Replayability +Wide Assortment of Weapons +Very good graphics +Smooth controls Cons -New weapons that come out are usually a tad overpowered -Some very odd framerate issues -Lots of bugs but these are usually closer to the "bethesda hilarious" bugs rather than bugs that ruin your experience Yeah, try it out!
Tane;-;I don't really find this game as enjoyable, it's extremely repetitive and it is pay-to-win. People just dump a ton of money in to this game just so they can look cool and act cool. It's a really big waste of time in my opinion.
Arciela V Adoulin;-;Absolutely horrible game compounded by horrible development team who has no clue what they are doing and don't need to be in charge of a game and horrible community managers who have no idea how to do their jobs. The fact that I spent money on this game is something I regret deeply.
Darkwave;-;Shooting, dismembering, throwing, evaporizing, melting, to name a few. This are one but many things you can do to your unlucky enemies in Warframe. Sure the game has its flaws, the main one being the Netcode of the game using twice as much PC resources when you host, but with the newest patches it has been alleviated by a lot. Still needs some polishing and refreshing content to keep you hooked, but it's an incredible game with better graphics than the newest AAA titles. Definitly worth trying out and keep up to it's growing array of content.
Skjald;-;One of the deepest shooters in recent times. Highlights include tons of interesting weapons, challenging and entertaining gameplay, awesome graphics, good performance (even on older computers like mine), a friendly and helpful community, solid and robust game mechanics, and a store which isn't Pay to Win. What's not to love? I'm at 300+ hours of gameplay, and there are still a thousand things on my to-do list to look forward to. Highly recommended.
Zippa (In Italy);-;I haven't played this game to much, but I gotta say... it's really good. Warframe is a free to play space ninja game where you play as one of a couple of differenet characters called "Tenno". It's a 3d person shooter combined with hack'n slash where you do some different missions against some different enemies, for example the first one, the grienear (think I butcherd that). For being a free to play it has very nice graphics, but of course it comes then with some market stuff, like buying money, starter packs and those kinda stuff. Saying that it takes a long while to level, to get money, and to be able to buy anything! There is some customasation where you can change colors on yourself, as well as your weapons. You seem to be able to craft different items, aswell as getting some kind of "drone" to follow you around, but I'm yet to experience that. To settle that it's a real fun game to play with your friends, but you got to have patience. A real must get if you need free to plays!
Taison4Pinki ~VACation~;-;Spankin'  action 'n'  yo,drink Cola and hype yourself up and play the  outta' this game while listening to dubstep and you'll be aswell in IN' HEAVEN YO.
panini;-;It was all fun and all when I first started playing this game. However after a couple of hours here and there, I feel like I have lost my passion to like this game. The only thing thats keeping me to play is the aesthetic look and the graphics. Everything feels like a grind fest and it's just seems so ridiculous you have to wait 12-24 hrs for an item you are building. The only way to get around this is if you use plats to speed up the process. :'(
97;-;Spent over 200 dinero just on this game and fully regret it. Every time a new weapon or frame comes out. They make it extremely op then nerf it a month or so later. Most of my rank 30 weapons are useless now. Also VERY REPITITIVE.
~Gth Kght~;-;This game is wonderful... sure its an endless grind but thats the fun part its killing things and its a beautiful game nothing more nothing less I play as Saryn all in pink everything i have is pink the customization is getting there.. the graphics are great i recommend this to any person that is a stat lover
INTERITUS;-;Ratting: 8/10 Graphix: Good Gameplay: Awesome Story: Good Multiplayer: Good customization: Amazing This game is really fun and its worth giving a try.This is my favorite free to play game so far. I Recommend this game to people who like [3rd person] games.
Krcko;-;If you don't own a console to play "Destiny", then this is the game for you.
Kidef242 DDOSIA;-;I've never been a fan of free to play games on steam, mostly because most are Pay To Win or Pay To Play (seriously what is going on with all this garbage on steam nowadays?). Anywho, WarFrame is the exact opposite. To be honest, I wouldn't mind buying this game. It is worth it, mostly because of all the things you can do in this game. You can craft weapons, you can attach mods to your weapons, change color, buy weapons, BUY WARFRAMES AND ALL THAT WITH CREDITS. IN GAME ITEMS THAT BUY THINGS. DEVELOPERS TAKE NOTES. The multiplayer is great as well, if a mission is too hard to accomplish call a friend over, it is more fun and easier for you as well. I rate this game a 9/10, if you don't fancy buying games, play this one, it is worth it.
Maxzilla;-;Two words: Space Ninjas. That is all.
ShaDoWLaZeR;-;Warframe's a game of grinding, grinding to get better weapons, frames and much more. But in the end, the game's still in beta. The game is constantly evolving for the better, by adding new game modes, new frames, new weapons and new features. Which are sure to keep you busy for a good while.
King BaconNips;-;For a free to play game, I honestly didn't have much hope in this. Yeah, it had the cliche flashy trailer with great special effects etc etc, but still, we all know how free to play games are. They're almost always hooked up with that pay-to-win crap that everyone truthfully hates. I must say, after playing this game once with a few of my friends, I was immediately hooked, and still am to this moment enjoying the game's graceful fluent and loose gameplay. The mixture of freerunning with combat, very unique weapons, and lovely little original touches, truthfully made the game quite graceful to me. It doesn't over-dramasize everything, but at the same time, it isn't exactly boring. Everything is nice, balanced, and even the community is fun. I highly recommend this game to anyone looking for a nice free-to-play experience, and even recommend it to those willing to spend money. With or without putting real life currency into the game itself, doesn't change the joy of playing it in my honest opinion. I joyfully give this game a 9/10.
Solly: Panparam;-;If you like to upgrade multiple stuff to rank/level up and get attention from other players, get hunted, pvp sometimes, mvp every second, are used to MMORPGs, buy shine things aaaand... if you dont care about needing to pay for game credits at some point, Warframe will be your favorite game.
Dr. Shenanigans;-;Warframe.... warframe you strange beast, you're repetitive, and obnoxious but damn I love you. I love you because the implications in your universe make me want to know how people live in that setting. combat is a bit choppy but well done, F2P is one of the better models (aside from a wait-to-progress gear and a few powerful frames being locked behind absurdly hard-to-unlock-bosses) updates have been both fleshing out the content and the universe, actual languages given to the inhabitants, unique bosses that are less reskins and more something that actually challenges- well, entertains at least. when I left in 2012, warframe was space-ninjas with unique powers fighting nebulous empires with bland-voiced stormtroopers. when I came back, I returned to a four-way galatic war, between a dogmatic corporate religion, a militarist legion of recursive clones, transhuman assassins struggling to retain their humanity, and an infestation so virulent that it makes the former three point their guns at it in unity. there needs to be some frickin' books made about this game!
TitanObetile;-;In my opinion it is the best, i play the game most of the time and this shows space ninjas rule. The fact that the story is straight and forward (save the solar system from evil aliens) the Tenno are called to do the job and fight of waves of Grineer e.t.c and rescue other Tenno to save our solar system. SPOILER ALERT! Play the game to find out more and other wounderful content it has like warframes(Tenno), weapons, sentinals, pets, dojos (remember Tenno are ninja), your very own ship, its insanely awsome. Play the game and remember ninja play free.
ownosourus;-;In Warframe, you play as a Tenno, a member of a species of ancient warriors that have reemerged to lay waste to the various nefarious species populating the solar system. Your foes include the Grineer, a jackbooted army of deteriorating humanoid clones; the Corpus, a mix-and-match crew of robotic and human parts; and the Infestation, a bunch of shambling organic creatures that vaguely resemble the Flood from the Halo series. While your enemies are visually uninteresting, a lot of the Tenno suits and weapons have a great sense of style that imbues Warframe with a spark of personality. Each species has a cursory backstory, and there is some lore to be found buried in the menus, but there's no narrative thrust or intrigue to speak of. And so you run mission after mission, moving outward from the sun as you level up your loadout and become a more proficient killer.The core combat of Warframe is straightforward. This is a third-person action game in which you wield two primary weapons and a melee weapon against foes who are largely content to come right at you. You also gain suit powers that allow you to dash and slash through a bunch of enemies, or stun all foes within a certain radius, though these abilities can change drastically depending on what suit you equip. You could unleash fiery maelstroms, turn invisible, create a decoy, use teleportation to switch places with an enemy, or manipulate your foes to fight against their allies. Acquiring new suits, however, requires a significant investment of time or money.Regardless of what powers you have equipped, you can often wage effective war against your enemies by firing on them from a distance, then slicing up the ones who manage to get close. This tactic grows tiresome after a while, however, and doesn't serve you well as you take on tougher levels. Fortunately, you can combine your ability to jump, sprint, and crouch into an acrobatic array of slides, flips, jump kicks, wall runs, leaping slashes, and more. Though there's a certain rigidity to your movement, your mobility is one of the most interesting and enjoyable things about Warframe, and it's fun to zip around your enemies, slashing and shooting until the only ones left standing are your fellow Tenno.You can run Warframe missions with up to three other players, and while flying solo is definitely possible in the early going or when you're grinding for experience or resources, teaming up becomes necessary as you tackle tougher missions. ighting your way through fiendish hordes with the help of some allies can be very satisfying, especially when there's a good mix of powers in play. Coordinating with friends is the best way to get this kind of experience, because jumping into matches or having folks join you can lead to lopsided situations.If there's a gap in player level or a mismatch with the mission challenge, as often happens, your cooperative missions can devolve into all-out sprints as players easily cut their way through enemies they far outclass.To minimize such gaps, you can focus on playing only new missions, since those tend to scale toward the upper bound of your capabilities. To spice things up, you may want to acquire a new gun, a new melee weapon, or a new suit. Warframe is free to play, but you must spend either time or money to acquire new items. Currently, new suits range roughly from $5 to $25, with new weapons falling close to the lower end of that spectrum. Alternatively, you can purchase blueprints to craft new weapons and suits using in-game currency. It takes a significant amount of time to save up the money for a new blueprint, and then you must spend even more time acquiring the resources to actually craft it.Even if you skip the lengthy crafting process by using real-world currency, you still have to spend time leveling up your new gear. Jumping into a high-level mission with a brand-new suit is a death sentence, so it's back to lower levels to grind for experience. As your gear levels up, you gain more slots to modify it using boosters picked up during combat. Adding abilities to suits, improving the attributes of your gear, and imbuing your weapon with elemental damage are just some of the things mods can do. Unfortunately, the system to apply and improve mods is poorly laid out and barely explained, leaving you on your own to figure things out.Some problematic menus pale in comparison to Warframe's real problem: a pervasive tendency toward repetition. Whether you're forging ahead with a high-level suit or leveling up a new one, Warframe repeats enemies, environments, and scenarios too frequently. Without new challenges for your combat abilities, the excitement soon dries up, leaving you without a compelling reason to keep playing.As it is now, Warframe's interesting combat mechanics are too quickly overcome by the grind of repetition.
Aazeon;-;best play to win game. you dont need to pay for this game to get any content and it makes a lot of fun
Sir Demotana;-;Playing this game is a must if you like Third Person Shooters and parkour. It's just perfect in everything; The developers are very nice people, the game is completely balanced as a F2P game with real currency(i.e. Platinum which you can get for real money or during giveaways). Graphics are stunning, gameplay is great, ofcourse there are some bugs. Also, there's not a single thing such as "IF YOU WANT TO KILL EVERYONE IN A FEW SECONDS, BUY THIS PREMIUM STATUS AND BUY ALL THE OP GUNS THAT YOU CAN ONLY GET FOR REAL MONEY!" unlike in most of the other F2P MMO games. You can get every single weapon that is in the game just by playing! You can suggest things to be added into the game as well(you can do that on their forum). This game is in good hands, therefore it is good itself aswell. I have to tell, I barely ever make reviews, and if I do : it's either a perfectly done game or a terrible one. This one was worth the time I spent typing this. :L
Dr. Shenanigans;-;Warframe.... warframe you strange beast, you're repetitive, and obnoxious but damn I love you. I love you because the implications in your universe make me want to know how people live in that setting. combat is a bit choppy but well done, F2P is one of the better models (aside from a wait-to-progress gear and a few powerful frames being locked behind absurdly hard-to-unlock-bosses) updates have been both fleshing out the content and the universe, actual languages given to the inhabitants, unique bosses that are less reskins and more something that actually challenges- well, entertains at least. when I left in 2012, warframe was space-ninjas with unique powers fighting nebulous empires with bland-voiced stormtroopers. when I came back, I returned to a four-way galatic war, between a dogmatic corporate religion, a militarist legion of recursive clones, transhuman assassins struggling to retain their humanity, and an infestation so virulent that it makes the former three point their guns at it in unity. there needs to be some frickin' books made about this game!
kennerbobber;-;You play as a space ninja in a robot suit fighting genetically defected space nazis, Apple's future products and zombies. You have a huge arsenal of weapons to slaughter these enemies with ranging from assault rifles to chainsaw whips and even more. You also have unqiue Warframes (Classes) to choose from ranging from Jack Sparrow to a Dragon. The downside to this game is that you'll need to spend hours grinding for resources to build things or getting mods to help you slaughter stuff. All together it's a really good game if you can get around hours of grinding, build times (Average build time is 12 hours per weapon) and losing your friends. Overall 8/8 m8
TitanObetile;-;In my opinion it is the best, i play the game most of the time and this shows space ninjas rule. The fact that the story is straight and forward (save the solar system from evil aliens) the Tenno are called to do the job and fight of waves of Grineer e.t.c and rescue other Tenno to save our solar system. SPOILER ALERT! Play the game to find out more and other wounderful content it has like warframes(Tenno), weapons, sentinals, pets, dojos (remember Tenno are ninja), your very own ship, its insanely awsome. Play the game and remember ninja play free.
hootdini;-;Totally not pay2win
Hanne;-;This game is such a good game, its free to play, and its worth playing it. There's alot of different things, like weapons and warframe's. Nice quality and sounds.
Saarai90;-;Been playing since the first beta. Here's a small review off the top of my head. Pros: - Free to play - Beautiful - Fast action - Fun co-op - Friendly community - Diverse missions - Crafting - Deep character customization - Frequent new content - Ability to get any weapon or Warframe you want without paying real money - Item trading system - Space ninjas Cons: - Repetitive combat akin to a dungeon crawler or beat-em-up - Very grind heavy to aquire specific items Summary: Great game and would gladly pay around $50 just for the game itself, but it's already free to play!
Ambihealiac;-;Who do you want to play with? Solo, PvP, public or friends-only co-op... Pick your poison. What does the game offer? A shooter with satisfying and unique ranged and melee options, powers, and customization. How do you want to play? Choose from a healthy selection of customizable classes, weapons, and aesthetics. Why would you want to play? Cyborg parkour space ninjas with superpowers. And guns. I had a longing in my heart for a good, new shooter until I was introduced to this. Still new to it, and absolutely loving it! Cannot recommend this enough, it's a ton of fun solo, with, or against friends! If nothing else convinces you to at least give it a go: It's free. Free is good.
StrikerSaint;-;Warframe is love, Warframe is life.
John-117;-;At first this free game was not in my interest but when I start playing, it makes me want to explore more. The graphics, the gameplay, the controls, really cannot stop you from playing this grinding game.
Richard Conway;-;Very well done. A lot of fun this game provides, really makes you think youre a ninja.
Hanne;-;This game is such a good game, its free to play, and its worth playing it. There's alot of different things, like weapons and warframe's. Nice quality and sounds.
Paul;-;I have been playing this game since very early beta. I can say that through the years, the game has evolved into a legendary title. This is to say that it doesn't have it's flaws or anything, but it is without a doubt a great game for grinding game lovers. Here is a list of a few cons that could be improved after the post of this review (to list the pros would be too long) : - early game struggle (from me going back to the beginning by creating a seperate account) - no directions for people who don't know how to look (if someone doesnt know where to look for info on the game, they might dislike it out of misunderstanding) Overall, this game isn't for everyone, but in my opinion, it's a fantastic game! :P
qwrvee;-;You get to play as a ninja in a kinky spandex suit. This fulfills all my fetishes. 10/10 would masturbate again. ...I'm gunna need more tissues.
anikj2020;-;This game is just amazing :) Great gaming community,good old friendly devs,new content almost every week and best of all it's all FREE!!!!!! Only thing you need is time(patience) and if you got some do give it a shot. After spending 2000 hours on it i can say it's a great stress buster too. So stop reading mindless reviews and jump in!!!!!!
Hunt3r;-;Great game for all play styles, customization allows you to play the type of game you want to play. You can build your warframe up to be a tank (absorb and deal a great deal of damage), stealth(for the ninjas out there), manipulation(yup mind control your enemies) and or room clearer(not overly strong but power to kill everything close by). Overall just a fast paced, configurable, very enjoyable Third person shooter.
tuordiel;-;Interesting non-standard cooperative shooter
Fruitbowl M.D.;-;A third person action shooter with a high pace of speed (at least in public games with randoms) that uses gear levelling as progress as well as it's endgame (the game IS the endgame, basically). The crafting system provides you with said gear, while the business model allows you to skip this tedium by purchasing the items directly instead of crafting. That said, some of these can not be bought and in general require thorough effort to acquire. The visual quality and other effects basically scream 'Triple A' while new events often keeps the playerbase interested. Many of these events are in fact 'previews' to an upcoming permant feature that eventually gets added. To coincide with weaponry being the only way to progress or level, the developers churn out a steady stream of new weaponry and Warframes at frequent intervals, ready for you to directly buy, acquire a blueprint of to build or research in a clan Dojo lab. Warframes are combat suits, with each one differing from the other, primarily in their defensive stats as well as their four skills. Across this review, I refer to them as weapons as well. Everything that can be leveled can also be modded. This is done through a card system, with every weapon having a limited amount of slots to have a card fitted in. These range from positively boosting stats, to adding elements (if the element wasnt already present) such as fire, ice, shock or poison. In case of Warframes, these elemental additions are replaced with mod cards that represent their innate skills. These need to be fitted in in order to make use of said powers. These cards can be leveled using mod cores so that the stats they influence are affected more greatly but requiring more mod points in return. With weapons having a mod point ceiling, a mod can still be put in a slot with a fitting polarity to halven their mod point requirement. These polarities can be added on a maxed weapon using Forma, which in return brings the weapon back to unleveled. The main complaint with the game is that the developers seem to Nerf and Buff willy-nilly. Often noticing how a new weapon becomes insanely overpowered (or turns out to be painstakingly underpowered) in a way they hadnt foreseen. The addition of Damage 2.0 (which makes maintaining optimal stats and damages more complicated) seems to have largely alleviated this issue of balancing, though it may still happen. The aforementioned events are the main source of story and/or lore for the game. These progress the Warframe story in a way that never limits the current availability of features, but rather adds features. Such as a invasion/conflict of one enemy faction invading another enemy, allowing the Tenno (the players) to support one faction and eliminate the other one on said mission node. These fights are constantly tallied and balanced out in a figurative tug of war, with the victorious faction taking claim of the node. Where future missions will involve said faction. Warframe mainly shines in the satisfaction in both creating and levelling your weaponry, allowing you to perfect your builds using Forma, keeping the player interested with the occasional new weapon or event.
Swanky Rumbling;-;Warframe. One of the best games I've ever played. And it's free to play, baby. STORY: Isn't much of one, but you control a faction in the future known as the Tenno. You build a warframe (certain type of Tenno) then go ahead and kill some other factions that are bad. In the end, you must continue fighting through the planets in the milky way (Earth, Jupiter, etc.) and upgrade your character. Boy, I will get kill for saying this but it's...it's.... BETTER THAN MASS EFFECT I SAID IT. AND I MEAN IT. Graphics are amazing, it is truly the future in gaming graphics. Collecting mods is lots of fun Tailored Warframes to go with your playstyle (There's like 30 of them, go ahead and try one out!) GUNS! GLORIOUS GUNS! Engaging and fun multiplayer. Clans! Clans! Join your friends and become the best one out there! I don't even think there's a con to this game. 10/10. I've never rated a game this high.
russiaftw;-;This game is great. Its just too bad brian10113 is racist
guardian2112;-;Great game. Deserves more than 66/100. Its still in beta, but is suprisingly polished. It's free and barely has any pay to win. All you really pay for is ressources, cosmetics and slots. The combat mechanics are pretty solid. I'm looking forward to seeing how this game develops. At its current state, i'd give it a 8.5/10, but i'm expecting the game to get better in the future.
Jemyen;-;This game is basically a third-person shooter that incorporates magic-like abilities,offering both a playstyle of being just an ability spammer or an all out brawler.Of course it has pretty great weapons,and pretty cool looking characters.It's actually a really fun game for those sci-fi,shooter game fans.I would say from my experience it is focaused on a type of genre where there are tons of enemies against you and a few others.The mass murder and mass obliteration of quite a lot of enemies in certain gamemodes is actually really fun.So basically this game is for those who like space ninjas who use guns and swords to commit mass murder to a bunch of enemies with a few other friends.Ninjas Play Free.
ApythiaMara;-;Great for FTP, the graphics fit the style and mood of the game. It's extremely repetitious but that hasn't stopped me from playing it. Love the idea of my Space Ninja kicking  and getting better tech. I love the alert missions which allows the tech that you'd normally actually spend money on to be truly free. Thumbs up!
Ryu-Ran;-;one of the real free to play games. you can really get everything that is in this game by just playing it and never spending any money (it will take some time). and for the game itself: it's amazing but remember it's still in beta so expect some bugs.
guardian2112;-;Great game. Deserves more than 66/100. Its still in beta, but is suprisingly polished. It's free and barely has any pay to win. All you really pay for is ressources, cosmetics and slots. The combat mechanics are pretty solid. I'm looking forward to seeing how this game develops. At its current state, i'd give it a 8.5/10, but i'm expecting the game to get better in the future.
Jemyen;-;This game is basically a third-person shooter that incorporates magic-like abilities,offering both a playstyle of being just an ability spammer or an all out brawler.Of course it has pretty great weapons,and pretty cool looking characters.It's actually a really fun game for those sci-fi,shooter game fans.I would say from my experience it is focaused on a type of genre where there are tons of enemies against you and a few others.The mass murder and mass obliteration of quite a lot of enemies in certain gamemodes is actually really fun.So basically this game is for those who like space ninjas who use guns and swords to commit mass murder to a bunch of enemies with a few other friends.Ninjas Play Free.
ApythiaMara;-;Great for FTP, the graphics fit the style and mood of the game. It's extremely repetitious but that hasn't stopped me from playing it. Love the idea of my Space Ninja kicking  and getting better tech. I love the alert missions which allows the tech that you'd normally actually spend money on to be truly free. Thumbs up!
Ryu-Ran;-;one of the real free to play games. you can really get everything that is in this game by just playing it and never spending any money (it will take some time). and for the game itself: it's amazing but remember it's still in beta so expect some bugs.
AleX810;-;Warframe, almost 800 playing. My first game since i used steam. Played since the first version of the game. Iv seeing it evolve to became a better and better game. All i can say is that this game is really fun to play, either solo or with friends (always better with frineds of course). Maybe people can get bored if they play alot, but tis is one of this games that u will want to play later on. On my case i never get bored and collecting all weapons and warframes on the games is like a challenge to me that i have to complete. They keep adding new stuff, and biger and better everytime. I see a good future for this game. So i recommend this for the people that like this kind of FPS game. And you can wallrun!!!
xDark_TI;-;Please play this game it's worth a try. I Promise! :D <3 I haven't been able to stop playing it! :D It's AWESOME! Warframe is the only game I play :p
ez katka;-;Awesome 3rd person shooter sci fi game
[D]readnaught;-;Gears of Ninja with Mass Effect Stupid Face + Fake Unreal Engine 3 of Hell Hardcore with Coop LOL PLOX WTF H4X0zRD... Who are you? no... NOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!!! OIAHSFIOHJFepihWF0OH HWG34GREAOWEH 678QGPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPP
Desulie;-;Game said I can get a dog. Still doin' the same mission over and over again to get the forking egg ;w; and my "ship KI" is making me mad with saying "these eggs are rare" .... Q_Q A lot of different weapons + nice atmosphere + Enough randoms to play with + farming for ages >.< +-
pax;-;A game for in between. Nothing special
jumanji;-;epic game, too good, unspeakable joy, i can`t go into details. you have to experience it for yourself to understand. if you`re a skeptic, its free so you have nothing to lose anyways.
Rozei;-;Running around with a Fang Prime is like running around with dual wielded kitchen knives.
CortGaming;-;Best F2P game out there, no doubt. The game never pressures you to buy anything, and even provides ways around it just by taking the long way. I've spent some money, but not much, and the game never really asks for more. I think this game is fit for anyone who can respond quickly and learn fast, because it takes some getting used to. Above all, it's really addicting, and with the game always changing at such a fast speed, you never get bored. Good work.
Average Pepe;-;The game is pretty cool, and its just in beta yet. A perfect mix of co-op, tps, and hack-n-slash, and you can get every warframe and weapon for free.
Ringo;-;It's the Grindneer.
~ Antiblique ~;-;I never thought I would be so satisfied with being a space ninja, but warframe brings excellent content, phenominal mechanics, a nice community, smooth graphics and extraordinary gameplay. Although, it falls behind with the P2W mechanics and repetive aspect, it is worth the time to become immersed in the games crafting system to suit your needs to become an assassin, a manipulator, a crowd controller or even a class that slices and bursts through a mission. I find this game much more satisfying after playing for about 9 hours, when equipment, ablilities and gameplay clearly improves for your warframe. :D
materasu;-;Well this game is the best "NINJA" games ever. Its hard to get the similar game like this one. Full of fun!
EmBaTa;-;Cool game i like it so much. I make short video(its not in english)so if someone wana see the game you can do ite heare.--- http://youtu.be/HHmtrPQ0aio I like so much the wall walcking and abilites are fun too :)
.VeX & the City;-;Good game, nice artstyle, fun gameplay and immersion. A good change of pace from the usual action shooters. Quite challanging and feels complete even without utilizing the pay features. 8/10
killerghost;-;give my hours back... edit:I said it because before updates (nullifiers,nerfs,leaders and more) it was a great game
bassturd :)))));-;I thought I get free picture frames 1/10
Amanda Tapping;-;I like this game , its pretty awesome , hope someone wants to play it with me :D
Nova;-;This game is amazing. PVE with Ninja Robots, fairly easy to get into as well. Downside is crafting takes forever so upgrading your warframe and weapons will be a bit of a grind. I love this and it's free!
Derako;-;Fans of Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer,Blink,Borderlands will enjoy this game. Pros -Many different Warframes to choose from -Different Weapons -Customization, both combative and visual -Co-op or Solo play -Free to Play but not Pay To Win -Ingame VOIP -Join in progress missions Cons -Blueprints can be hard to come by -The amount of customization can be staggering -Might have to grind to get materials for the blueprints you do have. As with most F2P games there is a currency which you buy with real money. This game has "Platinum". You can use platinum to buy Warframes/Weapons without having to build them.
VoidHaunter;-;If you like co-op shooters, this is really worth giving a try. I loved the multi-player in Mass Effect 3 and, for me, this is very reminiscent of that game, but with more options in mission types, maps and character & weapon options. Be warned, the character progression can be a little slow at first but really opens up after you collect enough credits, blueprints and resources to start crafting in earnest. Just keep moving along with the missions. You'll have an generous number of warframe and weapon blueprints after you finish the missions on the first 4-5 planets. I'd recommend staying in online mode as you can move through the missions more smoothly with a group (and it's more fun). I've only rarely run into a bad/abusive player as the community for this game is surprisingly good. Don't spend you Platinum (real world cash) on characters or weapons! Save your platinum for warframe/weapon slots and (maybe) the Orikin Reactor/Catalyst to upgrade mod points.
Mr. Double;-;This game has to be the most fun I have had with a game since Call of Duty: World at War. When I first saw it, I expected it to be a run-of-the-mill sort of PvP Free to Play game that is attempting to mirror the style of Team Fortress 2, a titan of F2P. But, I gave it a chance and boy was I wrong. This Co-operative space ninja game with out-of-this-world graphics blew me away and I asked my friend that surely they would charge money for this but he said, "Free forever, forever fun." The customization of this is astounding from various weapons, colors, materials, and even warframes (which are utilitzed as weapons too). The game designers also implemented loot rooms in the more difficult "Void" tilesets that require you to use your Warframe's ability to basically do parkour to go places where you typically wouldn't think. Personally, it feels like if Mirror's Edge and Team Fortress 2 birthed a demigod of a child that had some awesome genetic mutations. I currently have logged over a hundred hours and with the release of Update 11, I'm predicting many more. My rating? 10/10 for superb graphics, engrossing gameplay, and endless customization.
Zerox the Sweetie;-;--- Review as of Update 11 --- The game is really fun and good. It's free to play so you can't complain about it. The game can be played in singleplayer or with other people(max 4 in group). Playing with others makes the game more fun. There is no vs in the game aside from some dueling areas. These are optional though. The rest of the game is co-op. Parkour your way through the levels and find the secret locations on the levels. They will mostly reward you with extra credits from lockers and such. There are different planets and different factions. There will be some repetitive rooms here and there that you will notice. But the room layouts is always random. Clear all the levels and upgrade your weapons and warframes. Craft or buy more weapons and warframes when needed. Upgrades are done by levelling up the weapon or warframe to max level 30. For each level you will get a mod point. With a mod point you can add mods you collect during the levels. Each mod adds something to the weapon/warframe. For example: Fire damage, higher crit rate, more health, ect. Mods can be upgraded to a certain level. Once you reached the max level of a weapon/warframe, you can change the add or change a symbol of one of the mod slots. but this will reset the weapon level back to 0. I will leave a link at the end of the Warframe Wikia There is a lot of content in the game that will keep you going for a while. Getting craftin matarials, completing levels, playing hardcore levels and go to the Void. which are harder areas but they repay you better. There are 2 different kind of ingame currency. Thos are Credits and Platium. Credits you will get by completing levels or selling your stuff. With the credits you are able to buy blueprints and stuff from the clan you joined. Platium is used to buy the weapons and warframes directly. Without any need of crafting them with a blueprint. It saves a lot of time. But Platium can only be obtained by buying them with real money. Luckely you aren't able to buy the best stuff. There are better weapons and warframes obtainable in the game which requires you to play. It's hard to go into the details of the game. It's better to read a guide. Luckely they have an in-game tutorial in the game which explains you the basics. The rest you have to figure out yourself. Reading a bit on the Warframe Wikia is usefull. I did this a lot and I still use it here and there. I would say you should definitely try out the game. It's free so what do you have to lose. They are updating the game pretty often. Mostly fixes and small things. But every 2-3 months they will release a big update. Check the game out, grab some friends to play with and enjoy the game~ Warframe Wikia [warframe.wikia.com]
i wish i was at home playing pso;-;In which you grind and grind and grind endlessly. Early game is grind, end-game is grind. Occasionally, the devs would put up new features which are either more grind or something no one had ever wanted or asked for. This game is chock full of wasted potentials and shattered dreams, glazed with sweet, sweet empty promises. I don't know why I am still playing this crap. I really don't. Warbros #1. EDIT: 0.0 hrs last two weeks. I am finally free.
Wulfric;-;Unfriendly to free players, VERY friendly to people with ALOT of money to spend. +Neat movement mechanics +pretty to look at in some areas +Interesting upgrade system (once you figure it out) -"I have no memory of this place"....is what you will never say, because they reuse maps so often youll wonder why the game bothers to take place in an entire solar system instead of one single room. -Melee is absolute trash. It can only be used effectively by charging it, but you cannot hold a charge so theres really no point in using it. This wouldnt be SUCH a big deal but.... -The gunplay is horrible and not at all thought out. It seems to have pulled right out of a dollar bin third person shooter, which reminds me -The enemies lack any variety, and are all pretty much just bullet tanks dispatched in massive numbers purely to make up for how utterly stupid they are. -The game doesnt explain itself for crap. One issue I keep finding is that im getting missions with level ranges like "11-20" but I have no idea what level I am. There are two systems which act like leveling (one for your weapons and suits, one for...something) but neither are called by that name or identified as being this level the game speaks of. -Grind, Grind, Grind. You do NOT put grinding in an action game, what the hell were they thinking? (of course you can skip the grind if you lay down a fat stack) The sad part is that many of the games problems are not even hard to fix. Simply making it a pvp game where two PLAYER sides fight for territory would make the game instantly worth playing, but without that its hard to recommend because youll just waste your time mindlessly shooting at equally mindless enemies while flipping and sliding around to convince yourself you can find a new experience in the game.
The All-paca;-;This is the best Halo I've played. 10/10
Pineapple Man;-;I usually enjoy writing long and in-depth reviews for games, specially for games I enjoy with a burning passion. I will now make an exception. PEW PEW PEW KABOOM YEAH. GET THIS ING GAME.
| "H";-;Really well done one of the best Free To Play Games I ever played! Becoming good loot (gear) is a bit hard at the start , but If you play with some friends ist totally fine. -Brako
Pyndul;-;you can be the mall ninja of your dreams
TOM;-;probably the best true free to play, when free to play has lost all its meaning, this game, you can truly obtain all items in game without purchasing or any micro transactions whatsoever. P.S. Having friends that play it and playing it together makes it much more fun. or join a clan.
Wealthy Racoon;-;Shiny Space Ninja's Murdering Humans. 10/10
ArisYourBro;-;Awesome Game! Nice Graphic, New Featured Brings More Fun!
DarkyFeaver;-;Movement and shooting feels smooth and responsive..I really like this game.
SGTxPLA1Dpony;-;@Turtle Man I will fight u irl bro! My computer crashes from this game! I see u at PAX u fegit
creepyunclerayray;-;this game is one of the best free games i have ever play this is fun to play
Maebli;-;Pretty addicting, but gets repetitive after a while. Eventually it gets boring but that's after some couple hundred hours of grinding.
Feeding Spree;-;Shooting things, farming til you dry and graphic depends on your taste. : 3.5 / 5 In general, Warframe is a good game but there are some issues that could annoy you. Not every body suffer the same fate but I am one of the sufferer. 1. How It Likes Gameplay is simple; shooting, slashing, smashing a typical 3rd person shooting game with some decent Ninja elements such as swordplay and wall jumping. Basically,you will doing the same thing (shooting stuffs or smashing them) over and over again. However, the game offers variety by there are so many different characters (we call it a frame ) and so many weapons to choose. And most people often refers to a space ninja game. So it's a ninja doing stuffs in a space. 2. Fun Part 2.1 Variety Everybody have the different fun part. As I mentioned the game is nothing more but shoot or slash. So what make you happy will be what frame you use and how you modified your frame. Each frames have different skills and stats which mean they can kill things differently. You have to find what you like. However, there are some frames which is a must for everyone to have but you can collect so many frames at the same time. And you can switch it between mission upon your need. Same idea with the weapons, there are ton of them. So the fun part is about trying it out how you like each frames or weapons. But if you don't have funs with playing with different frames. This game may not for you since the rest is about shooting things. Nothing special. 2.2 Free To Play Moreover, the game is free to play so you can try it out any time. 3. Annoying Part 3.1 Graphic Options For game graphic, it is about how you like it. Because enable every options on graphic may not be the best for you. You have to adjust it. Basically it's nice but something is too real for game like this. For example, the motion blur. It's not fun when everything around you get blur when you turn around and shooting things. 3.2 Internet Speed I know this may be about me but hey ... I'm one of the player. It's about internet connection speed if you play with a people on a differnt region you could suffer a lag. But not so much but still it is annoyting when you have a team but you are on different region and you can't play together very well. 3.3 Game Development The game is on progress project. So something in the game still can change at any moment. But those are for improvement which is understandable but it could annoy you. 3.4 Community Features Lack of non-gameplay features. Such as community features. Sending in game email to player, auction houses. Something like that. The game offers a chat room and a guild and you can do something in the guild. However, this is a multiplayer game, a community feature is vital but... everyone live like this for years ... it's ok but I feel like missing some features that the other games commonly have. 3.5 Farming As I mentioned the game offers you a veriety of frames and weapons. But these things come from framing it and trust me. Sometime, it takes forever. Hoever, you can buy it using a few dollor so this could be an annoyting part but you can solve it using real money. The choie is yours. 4. Give It A Try Try it, if you like to modifying things. If you love game where you can modify things, the game is for you. There are tons of things to collect and modify. But the game play is simple and repeatitive. So as I metioned the fun part is doing the same thing a different way.
[Aimnot.exe] |  Crow767;-;Optimized for all computers , gamer's one or cheaper ,it's really good game where we can fight with our friends or alone ,different options for each missions ,stealth or not ,it's the best sci-fi game ever . A lot of missions , planets (but some mission are using same maps with some modifications and it still fun ) ,a lot of heroes with specials abilities for each . 10/10 Great Job
Comrade Cheshire Cat;-;space ninjas what else is ther to say?
M'aiq the Liar;-;I've spent far too much time and money on this game, so I can say that it's one of the best free to play games out there. They've managed to make it free to play without making it pay to win, so props to Digital Extremes for that. There's a huge variety of ways to play this game, and there is no single best playstyle. Whether you like to stay unseen and pick off your enemies from a safe distance or you just want to get in your enemies' faces, whether you like to play co-op or solo, you can do all of it, and all of it very well. Its gameplay is an absolute blast. Space ninjas are ing awesome. It's a bit of a work in progress, and DE periodically releases huge updates that greatly improve it. I have few complaints about this game, but it does have flaws. The first one is an almost absolute lack of story. It has a good introduction, but then it just kind of throws you out to a solar system filled with seemingly out-of-place boss battles, some of which just seem a too hastily thrown together. It also has numerous logical fallicies, such as how it's always snowing on Venus. My last complaint is that it's pure grind. You spend the whole game farming resources and leveling up your stuff so you can get better stuff. If you're willing to overlook its flaws, and are willing to accept it as a work in progress, you will have a great time with this game.
Osama Bin Lagin;-;This game can be a pain when first starting off but gets greater and greater when some time has been put into it, like if u get put with some people with prime everything they take over and u dont get any kills to level up your weps but u still get xp for letting your friends get the kills. There are also many updates on warframe as well daily 7mb updates and each month a larger one, that can be very painful for people with slower internet speeds like I. when it comes to trading, too many people are willing to sell than buy from others witch can can be frustrating just to sell a single piece or to trade for it. but when u get up to the harder missions u can just find the part that your looking for on a hard planet. In conclusion if u have a spare couple of GB's u should download it for the gameplay.
techbloodbath_19;-;This game is fun and I would call it exotic only because your thrashing on monsters from other planets. The game starts as you have been captured and have to escape from the enemy. Overall the game is amazing and is worth the "Free" price tag that they give it.
Kirito;-;Fast pace game that can be difficult to learn, but it won't take to long. The game is fun with friends, because you can all do a mission completely silent without someone you don't know comes in and ruins it. Besides its ninjas who could hate this game?
Roxxos [Fanta];-;Its a really nice game.
Yung Fresh;-;Its probably my favorite free game, and I think it is amazing for free
Theros / Amaa;-;It's a great game. Whoever says it's pay to win lies. You don't have to spend any cent on the game, and tbh you can get all the items without spending a single penny. I did and i can do any mission on the game without problems. Only problem it has is that the end game might not be that great yet but it has plenty of updates and they care about players opinion and feedback. Also the community is great. Only drawback is the bugs, but hey is beta and most of the time (over 95% of the time) works fine. It has continous updates and events and also the alert system keeps you always busy. Archwing (next patch) looks awesome. This game has great pontential and they wanna be sure to explore it. Its an awesome game and it's free... Hope to meet you there!
yourfemfatal;-;free to play, awesome motherfukkkkkooon awesome. think Halo, but with bada$$ warframes with powers. worth a try its a great shooter to play alone or with friends ......(.`.) .......)...) ......(....) .......\...\ ........\...\. .......-.'......`.-.... ../...................`..... .(............)............`..-.._...,..........._ ..)........,.'.......................(...\.-.-..'..( ..\......(...................)..../................\. ....\.....\._.(.........../....(........<6....(6 ......\._.).).).\........(.......`.._.........:Y.).__ ....................\........`-..._....'..-..-.-^._.).).) .......................`.-..._...).).) ................................... l ..........................................................................   ............................................................................l ~ ............................................................................f_, ) Meow!
Aki;-;One of the best F2P games ever. This is a need to play. No P2W, No unfair ... Everything is legit and nice even while you can pay to get stuff faster than the ones farming upp the stuff. Tho the farming is really fun and keeps the game entertaining while you set your goal for epic looking warframes and weapons. Soo much to do, so much to see... don't miss it.
Lazor Commander Bill;-;You play as space ninjas with assault rifles
Mad Max;-;A much better game than when it launched. Much more content, much more polish and a ton of more fun. Really enjoyable at the moment. There is a big UI update coming out in a couple of weeks. Get back to playing when that update is out!
TheDestroyer017;-;Great game its free , nice graphics, nice story idk how they can make it free if its this nice but hey whos complaining :P
Pedocide;-;Potatoes are forever.
Blueovalman;-;enough to make a black man cry
Stock;-;My graphic card exploded. 10/10
Farlander;-;Normally, when you write a review for a game, it's a one and done sort of thing. Warframe, however, has surprised me, because it has proven to evolve so quickly, in the space of half a year, Warframe has transformed so drastically, it has practically become a whole new game. And the changes have only been good! As always, the graphics are impeccible, but efficient. Despite the fact that Warframe still insists it is a beta, this game has more quality then many games I've played that are not betas. While it still lacks it's story mode, and still lacks its endgame, there's more than enough content to keep anyone occupied for quite awhile. As most people probably already know, Warframe allows you to take control of a Tenno, basically a space ninja, and from there you face off against legions of enemies, using both melee and guns. With more weapons and warframes then you'll be likely to know what to do with, achieving Warframe's overarching goal of mastering them all will alone tide you over for a long time. Some say Warframe is grindy, and it can be, though it is only mildly grindy, and it is becoming less grindy with each passing month. The primary reason warframe is somewhat grindy at the moment, and was even more grindy in the past, is that Warframe is always growing and evolving. Back in Closed Beta, there was virtually no content. There was one map, and 3 mission types. So you can imagine how grindy it felt to level up all the gear, piece by piece, mission by mission, doing the same missions over and over. But they've added to the Warframe experience since then. Now there's many more missions to do, many more places to go, many more things to kill, and many, many more toys to play with. (By toys I mean weapons, and by play with...well, you get it.) So sure, the game still revolves around killing baddies with an awesome powersuit, but there's just so much to kill, and so many ways to do it.... The developers behind this game have proven, time and time again, that there is nothing that they feel is beyond the reach of this game, the most recent example of their ambition being the ArchWing expansion for Warframe, in which the Tenno added deep space flight to their already impressive list of abilities. To sum up the gameplay of Warframe, it is an action packed, diverse and highly unique experience, with a broad difficulty curve. Warframe also offers an admirable monetization scheme, among the fairest I've seen. While Warframe will accept money in exchance for almost anything, Warframe strives to allow players who are unable or unwilling to pay cash to still be able to have everything the paid players do. Whether it's obtained via crafting, rare drops, secret locations, or merely trading items for platinum, with you can then use to buy what you want, you won't find a single pay-wall in Warframe, not even where the costumes are concerned. In short, Warframe is a triumph of both game design, and proper execution of the F2P model. As it continues to grow and evolve for another year, if you haven't played Warframe, I highly recommend that you do. And if you have, and for whatever reason thought it unremarkable, then I would suggest that you try it again...you won't recognize it.
Lord Stein the Rook [GBS];-;Free to Play Scifi with Mass Effect style combat. Detailed customization (The good colors require real money), everything is available to be crafted, the most powerful items are only obtainable by CRAFTING so this game isn't a pay to win. Mostlly PVE missions, but there is PVP. Cross Platform play with players on Play Station 4. Game gets updated every month with weapons, maps and Warframes (Characters). Very addicting coop.
Spender-de-Lucius;-;interesting game both in shooting and close combat
Sheep;-;ONCE A TENNO ALWAYS A TENNO! THIS GAME TROLLS AND IS A BLOODY TRAP DON'T PLAY IT!
Cera Ralaz;-;Nice 3rd person shooter with interesting wall-running system, tonz of hardcore action and badass setting
Valiton;-;When someone presents you with a game that contains mutant, gunslinging, cyberpunk space-ninjas you should be willing to throw some money at it. When that game is free you should frantically search for the nearest download button immediately. Warframe puts you in the twisted-space-shoes of a Tenno, who are basically known for their ability to shoot and/or stab anything between them and their next objective. The meat of the game revolves around picking a character, picking your weapons, then picking an area to use them in. The levels themselves are tile based - meaning each level has a random bunch of rooms put together differently each time you play it. You race through the levels with up to 3 other Tenno, killing bad guys and collecting loot on your way to complete each objective. Everything you collect can be used to build new characters, weapons, and more between missions. Each weapon is unique and vary greatly from one to the next, as do the different characters who each have differing base stats and special abilities. Of course, being a Free-To-Play game, it has a real-money store that uses the in-game "Platinum" currency. Platinum is purchased and can be used for just about everything. Luckily, since the game is primarily cooperative, this benefits everyone and only serves to make your life a little easier. For those of us who don't have bottomless pockets, nearly everything can be built without the need for Platinum with resources collected from each level; admittedly this can be a grind for some of the more pricey items but never feels unreasonable. With lots of great support from Digital Extremes and a $0 price tag, there really aren't many good reasons you shouldn't try Warframe out and see all it has to offer.
Non;-;I cut 2 legs off an enemy without legs. 10/10
CptBrian;-;Grind to wait, then wait to grind. That's all you do. Apart from that it's a great game and it has the best dev team of all time, but they seriously need to cut down on the grinding, it's insane.
[IRWF] MooMooGhost;-;This game is phenominal. If you are looking for an intense Online Sci-fi Third Person Shooter, you've found it right here! Assume the role of a Tenno Warframe, busting out some ninja parkour moves to get around with a very smooth movement system, craft your own weapons, kill enemies, find mods, use mods to upgrade your weapons, and much much more. I HIGHLY recommend this game to anyone looking for an amazing online co-op shooter!
Jonas;-;at first i thought that this game would require me to use real money to make it worthwhile...but the more ive played,the more i realise that we dont need to spend any money at all to have fun in this game.i recommend this to everyne who wants to have fun without spending any money:)
Ty;-;This game is the definition of addiction. Warframe is highly addictive don't start! (or do I dont care)
XKrieg;-;Fast paced Space Ninja Action! Love it so much. Getting some of the resources feels like a grind but overall the gameplay is great. Needs more level variety but they seem to add content at a regular pace so it's okay. Free to play, looks good and plays good. no reason not to try it out.
AngryAlbinoCroc;-;Yes I highly recommend it. It can get a bit repetative, but it can still hold its own for a free game that is not pay to win. After 1000 hours I can say that I will probably never leave this game. The devs really listen to what the people are saying, and have taken some huge steps to ensure that our needs are met. That being said gameplay is better then ever and the weapon selection is now insanely large. The grind is still there though you really need to add your face to it if you want to get all the big boy toys. But hey if you are complaining about a little work for a lot of profit then be lazy and sit there and not get anything done.
Zinivoya;-;colored my character like donnatello and remapped my melee to mouse1 then ran around acting like a ninja turtle. 100/100
Spooky;-;Ruined my life 10/10
ALIEZ;-;F2P 4coopTPS ()
ZloGlaZ;-;Well, I like it. However, be prepared to grind :)
Robonator;-;There is a reason why this is my all time favourite Free2Play game. It is just badass. I think i never had that much fun with a F2P Game. The Game changed alot over the past 2 Years and i think there is no F2P developer that is similar to Digital Extremes. DE has a very friendly and cool staff, they do lots of Livestreams/Developer Streams, they answer question and actually listen to the community. The Economy of Warframe is really fair and you don't have to pay a single cent if you don't want to. You can also earn the real money currency called "Platin" by just trading with other players and selling them parts for Weapons for an example. This Platin is used to buy Skins, Colors, Gearslots and it can also be used to buy Weapons or Ressources but you really don't have to because you can get nearly everything by just playing the Game. There are a few exceptions but those exceptions can't be bought with Platin either. Those are things from Events or from the old Founders Packages. If you do decide to buy Platin then its worth to wait a bit because you get discounts from the login rewards from time to time and they go from 20% up to 75% meaning that you can basically buy a 180 Platinpack for only 45. You also get alot for your money, for an example: In the Platinpack for 180/45 you get about 4300 Platin. A Slot for a Weapon or a Warframe costs around 10-20 Platin. Skins or other visual things are at around 50-75 Platin. You might need some Platin if you decide to buy Reactors or Catalyst, which are used to enhance a Weapon or Warframe. Those can be used one time on a weapon and cost both 20 Platin, but there are lots of events and i think one special mission each week where you can get one. Depending on how motivated you are this amount of Platin could be enough for a looong time and you are also able to earn more by trading with players. Now a bit more to the Game itself: Warframe is a Coop Multiplayer Game that can be played alone or up to 4 other Players. You are basically a space ninja, called Tenno. You are able to use all kinds of Weapons either melee or ranged or even both combined. Machine Guns, Swords, Lasers, Revolvers, Rocket Launchers, Scythes, Axes there is nearly every Weapontype you can think of and new content keeps getting released. You are basically able to play the Game however you want, even though it might be a bit hard depending on your type of enemy. In the first few hours of the game you will grind yourself through different kind of Missions while following a Questline. The tutorials are pretty new and not really good at all, but at least have some kind of Tutorial now. Before that you had a little introduction and then it was basically "gl hf now go" Every now and then you unlock a Bossfight. Those bosses are a special kind of enemy and can be pretty hard, especially for newer players. They also have the possibility to drop Blueprints or Parts for new Weapons or Warframe. Every Weapon and Warframe etc that you can't just buy straight from the market, needs to be build in the Foundry. The Blueprints you need for that can be found on the Market, in Clan Dojos and their Researchingstations, in Bossfights or in the Void. I will talk about the Void later. To Build something you need to gather Ressources or other Parts for it first. Then it takes about 24h or 3x 12h + 1x 36h, for Warframes, to finish. While playing the Missions you will also find Mods for your Gear that is used to enhance it. After a while you might have gathered some decent Mods to upgrade your Gear. As soon as you are strong enough, you want to enter the Void or the Orokin Derelicts. Those are a special kind of Missions and they are basically the Endgame. The strongest Weapons and Warframes can be found in the Void while some of the most important Mods are found in the Orokin Derelicts. Those are Places with pretty tough enemies and maybe even deadly traps. Depending on the Mission you choose, you can get a wide variety of rewards. Besides your Weapons you also have to level up your Account itself. It's used to be able to use special kinds of Weapons that require a specific level before you can use them. To level your Account you have to level your Gear. Most people build and gather every piece of Equipment and level them up to their max level to push their own Accountlevel as high as its possible. Thats why most people try to collect every weapon as possible to level them up to their max. The main focus of the game might be the collecting of Gear and Mods to level up and make ones equipment as powerful as possible. If you don't mind spending lots of hours into farming Ressources or Equipment then i would totally recommend this Game to you, but even if you don't like farming stuff: Give it a few hours like 20 or so. Most people i know didn't really stopped to play after they got used to it. If you are still unsure: Look at the amount of positive reviews and the average playtime of those people.
Captain John Sandman;-;Warframe. This is an peculiar little game. What is so strange or not usual about it is that it's focused a lot on gunplay and ability usage between players across more than 200+ mission map tiles. I will review this game by different mechanics/parts of the game with a rating system of 10 points and I will pull the average for the game. Oh, and before you read, FORGET THE SLOGAN. This game is NOT even Ninja-themed because the stealth elements and the overwhelming amount of brutal killing missions implies that the Tenno aren't even meant to be Ninjas, but instead, somewhat Samurai-based. Even the lore confirms that. MAP TILES: 3 out of 10 The map tiles in the game are really original, and interesting as well as have a bit of an exploration, however, when it comes to variation between planets, they're a massive letdown. What I mean is, they don't fit the planets they're on, they don't offer any diversity by planet and overall they feel somewhat strictly limited. EXAMPLE: Mercury is supposed to be this super-scorched planet right next to the Sun, however, the game doesn't offer any visuals on Mercury's surface or the size of the Sun when you are playing on Mercury. GUN VARIATION: 9 out of 10 Possibly one of the best things this game does right is the gun variation. You get dozens of different guns, normal versions and Prime variants and all of them are equally exciting. Some are very weak with base damage, but offer destructive critical damage, or are simply awesome in basic damage but lack in critical or status damage. It's shy of a 10 because some guns just fall short of their value entirely and are pretty much useless. MODDING: 10 out of 10 This part of the game is simply awesomely executed, and when I mean awesome is that NO OTHER GAME COMPARES to this mechanic. Modding features mod cards that offer different upgrades for your weapon, for your Warframe, for your Sentinel or your pet Kubrow (Space dog). Your builds are heavily dependent on which mod cards you apply for any piece of your equipment and if at least one card is wrong, the entire build will not work as planned. You can apply only 8 mod cards per piece of equipment, and there is a ''power limit'' of 30 units. The power used is determined by the value of the mod card. Power limit can be doubled by applying an Orokin Reactor (On Warframes, Sentinels and Kubrows, also known as a gold potato) or an Orokin Catalyst (Applied on weapons, also known as a blue potato). Warframes have aura slots which grant an additional passive boost (for example, energy regeneration or armor decrease for enemies) and offer additional power limit boost depending on the mod slot's polarity or the rank of your aura card. WARFRAME VARIATION: 10 out of 10 Not a single Warframe feels like a copy of another and that is something I've seen rarely in any other game. For example, you have the Volt who is an electricity-based Warframe and spits out electricity with high damage, or you have Mesa who is a gunslinger and focuses on gun-play and buffs damage and so on. This is a great feat that the developers achieved and that's why it deserves 10 points. CUSTOMIZATION: 5 out of 10 It's not too bad, but it isn't anything to be proud of either. Customization in this game so limited, and, as a matter of fact, ugly with issues, that it barely deserves 5 points. Its only saving grace is the few sets of plates and Syandanas (like discount capes) that make your Warframes appear quite good. The severe lack of any good or real decorations or greaves and gauntlets and stuff also makes me quite frustrated because I can't make damn near any Warframe look good with the given accessories. Personally, I want SPARTAN-IV-esque armor pieces perfectly crafted to fit any Warframe (Like armored greaves, chest sections, gauntlets, thigh armor and arm armor as well as shoulder pads) with greater variation and such, but my point stands, this isn't the best part of Warframe yet. Customization also falls short, because you can't customize your guns to feature scopes, underbarrel attachments, silencers or heavier barrels, flashlights (which just happen to pop out of nowhere in dark missions) or laser points. PARKOUR: 6 out of 10 Parkour in this game is just basic with vaulting, wallrunning and wallclimbing without any other really awesome feats of physical conditioning and training and such. What would perfectly suit Warframe would be something taken out of the latest Assassin's Creed games - the parkour mechanics that include different vaulting animations each time, as well as enhanced wall-climbing with the ability to grab on to a ledge and hold on to it, say, for stealth, or with the ability to scale high surfaces that would otherwise be unaccessible by typical wall-climbing as well as brand new map tiles to complement the enhanced wall-climbing mechanic and additional stealth features. MISSION VARIATION: 3 out of 10 Exterminate, Capture, Rescue, Spy, Deception, Defense, Mobile Defense, Survival, Sabotage, Hijack, Hive, Assassination, Excavation, Interception. What do they have in common with one another? Total unoriginality (Murderfest). Sure, Exterminate, Defense, Rescue, Hive and Sabotage are the ones that fit with the overall Murderfest theme, but not the others. The developers continuously say this game is based around Ninjas (Shinobi, for those Japanese speakers that don't fully understand English), but where is this Ninja-themed game that we've been hoping to play? I kind of don't see it at all. There must be a total rework of all game modes. STEALTH MECHANICS: 2 out of 10 For a Ninja-based game, stealth is severely lacking in this game. There are only two Warframes that can achieve absolute Ninja-level stealth in this game (Ash and Loki, coupled with bows, kunai and any melee). The game is out for three years, in development for far longer, and the most trademarked asset of this game is possibly the worst mechanic out of every one in the game. You cannot hide anywhere, there is a severe lack of weapons with silent fire, or better yet, ABSOLUTELY NO SILENCERS in the game, so you literally have to rely on a melee weapon or pick a weapon that you might not be good with, but want to play with your favorite one. QUESTS: 7 out of 10 Now, the quests in Warframe look cheap and they come out once a month, even though it would probably take precisely six days to finish one of these quests at most. That is not to say they are not entertaining as, in fact, they provide some replay value and an interesting change from the usually silent missions and offer a slight increase in overall dialogue and that's the quest saving grace, however, none of these quests really offer an explanation as to why and how you were born/made and so on and instead they act as fillers or something, even though the developers probably didn't want that. ARCHWING (Space sections): 5 out of 10 Archwings are a really annoying part of the game. They're like jetpacks with Korean MMO-style wings which quite doesn't seem right in an IP like this. It feels out of place on a massive level. Most of the players don't even like Archwing as a matter of fact, and consider it to be a massive shortcoming of Warframe. The most preferable replacement for the space sections would be starfighters with actual cannons, missiles and afterburners instead of this, but Archwings are better than nothing. THE FINAL RATING - 6 out of 10. Warframe is still a game that's under heavy development (lazy development at that), but it's a perfect filler game while you wait for some grander releases that might dwarf Warframe and its community once and for all. Warframe isn't bad, it isn't perfect, and it's a pretty much slightly-above-average as a game for me, but you can definitely play it.
Biscuit N. Gravy;-;fun game, lots of stuff to do, but, if you cant handle grinding or working for any ammount of time on things THIS GAME IS NOT FOR YOU. If you do however join in the fun!
L33tH4x0R;-;Warframe is like Christmas, except all the presents are detonite ampules.
Zinivoya;-;colored my character like donnatello and remapped my melee to mouse1 then ran around acting like a ninja turtle. 100/100
Spooky;-;Ruined my life 10/10
ALIEZ;-;F2P 4coopTPS ()
ZloGlaZ;-;Well, I like it. However, be prepared to grind :)
kopa;-;When you play this game, you will realize that Destiny is very similar to Warframe.
Zireael;-;I've played only little. But what I saw, was fun.
Halo1m;-;"Jeenyus gam Dezine" -Gabe N. "Many Good. Such Free." -Doge "No such thing as unfair gameplay when it's all co-op. Unless you're one of the whiny es who complain about people being too good on your team. If that's you then go  yourself." -Me "ENGLISH MOTHER ER DO YOU SPEAK IT!?" -Samuel BAMF L. Jackson
4-eyed Night Man;-;you are a spice ninja with super duper secret magical powers made by the nsa so you can defeat ennemy races so space ninja can rule universe
Hatsune Miku;-;I still love this game even its nearly 2 year. Probably the best F2P game i have played. compare to the game before updates, i really do like it much now. But this game will still getting bored after playing for few month. When that happen, just play some other games and come back later. just got through 1000hr, 2000hr is my next goal.
Cmd.TowelNinja;-;Every enemy has a d1ck texture 11/10 would fap agian
Biscuit N. Gravy;-;fun game, lots of stuff to do, but, if you cant handle grinding or working for any ammount of time on things THIS GAME IS NOT FOR YOU. If you do however join in the fun!
-=BIG=- AnImE FrEaK;-;This is any extremely addictive game at first it'll be hard but once you get the hang of it it becomes a breeze and it becomes fun when a challenge is involved... Need any help with this game? i can help you both in-game and out of the game but i prefer you play by yourself for a good amount of missions that way you build up your courage and skills
gE;-;I must say the game is excellent in almost every way if u enjoy sci-fi action but if u have time to waste as well it wuld be the perfect game for u, i may not have played as long as most but i've realised that this game is just a repetitive masterpiece. U spend hours trying to new equipment only to find that there is even stronger ones coming out later, which of cause u will and want and spend more hours farming to get it, so if u got nothing to do anymore and enjoy sci-fi action i would recommend because i have to admit this is a good game
Revadarius;-;As a free to play game, you cannot really complain about anything from the get go. It is a high action run-n-gun Third Person Shooter, incorporating parkour maveuverability and a variety of skills in order to dispose of the mass of enemies that come between you and your objective. There are also a variety of game types, enemies, maps, weapons, abilities/mods, warframe suits and bosses and each of the maps, though they use similar textures and areas, are randomly generated per game. The missions are seemingly endless with other 200+ missions across a dozen or more planets. Although, like every game, there is a few cons that go against its pros. For example, it can get repetitive - especially replaying certain missions in order to get certain drops from that missions, or having to level up your warframe or weapons in order to be able to advance to more difficult and challenging maps - though that is not as bad as it sounds as there are plenty of weapons, warframes and abilities in order to build and switch up your character to change the way you play reduce the boredom of repition. And that it has an item mall where you can buy things without having to struggle or earn them, or that F2P players will be at a disadvantage of inventory space which is key to keeping your favourite and more powerful equipment whilst you're using equipment that you wish to level up. My overall view of this game is that it a fun and expansive free to play game with endless amount of achievements to gain, such as defeating ever boss, conqeuring every planet, completing every mission and collecting and leveling every piece of equipment. There's also a great clan system that's rather complicated, I will admit, but it's set up in a sort of 'rank' fashion - and clans can also level up over time in order to build up your clan dojo to gain more powerful weapons that you cannot find elsewhere, as well as the dojo being fully modifiable and being created to your own tastes and liking (granted you have farmed enough credits and resources to do so.) My score for this game is 8/10 - it's graphically beautiful, it has great sound effects, a nice fluent gameplay and fighting system that allows you to use the map to your advantage, expansive armoury and a limitless amount of build variations and to top it all off.... IT'S FREE, so if you do not like it you are not losing out.
Rei chu;-;Down right the BEST free to play game ever (:
Usui Sachi;-;Grindy to hell and back but fun if you can get past that check dem booty too
Buck;-;Had to buy a skateboard to help me grind
kopa;-;When you play this game, you will realize that Destiny is very similar to Warframe.
Backshifted;-;Cool game, you should really give it a try :D
FreshlyBakedBaka;-;Almost all the best things ever are in this game. Ninjas, Robots, Swords, Guns, Space, Ships, Spaceships, Planets, Markets, Pets, Sentrys and more
RPGpro;-;Personally I overlooked this game at first thinking it was "just another trashy cash-shop-heavy free-to-play", This is the first time I've been proven wrong on this point. While the game DOES seem very cash-shop-heavy at first (especially to new players) all of the "best" equipment cannot be bought with cash and require a LOT of work to earn through gameplay. In addition ANY cash item can be earned through gameplay though many of them require the player to have access to several late-game missions. The game is very team-based with most missions almost REQUIRING a team to complete. Your warframe (character/class), weapons and sentinel (pet) each lvl up individually, higher lvls mean both higher stats and more upgrade points, which allow you to customise your stuff with various abilities/passive bonuses/etc. such as fire/ice/lightning damage on weapons, larger clips, longer blades, more hp, better shields, etc. There's literally 100s of possible upgrades and you can switch/swap them as many times as you want. The only thing I dislike about the game is the lack of variety in missions, there's a limited (small) number of maps which, though large and randomly setup have a lot of repeated rooms/corridors/visual styles, the enemy AI can surprise you sometimes but generally becomes very predictable in any given room/situation. The warframes available at the start are relatively basic and it can take excessive amounts of time to reach bosses that drop the blueprints for ones you want, though the "best" warframe blueprints are still only available from end-game missions the availability of any other warframes in the cash shop makes you wonder if it's worth spending so much time trying to earn one of the more basic ones. Overall the game is good, a little repetitive and...while cash-based cash is NOT a requirement. 7/10.
(HHG)TheCanadianSyrup;-;Knockdown Simulator 2014
J'ani Saj;-;Warframe was really fun for the first time, and it was pretty addicting for a while. However, once I started constantly grinding I began to lose interest for the game and end up not being interested in it anymore. From the short time I've played I ended up having 2 dreams and other stuff happening due to the Tetris effect kicking in so quickly. It's addicting as hell for a while, so I recommend it (so long as you don't mind reducing a few grades).
Cloud Catcher;-;one time i tried walking through a door and it shut down on my head and i fell through the floor and out of the map
Yoonix;-;Fun, Grindy as , nice looking, super sci-fi ninja action game that will leave you farming for... lets say weeks
Mr. Owl;-;Have you ever wanted to be a moin space ninja?! yeah i guess that was a pretty ing stupid question... BECAUSE OF COURSE YOU HAVE! This free to play has fleshed out amazingly since closed beta, the game is PVE focused so there is no element of pay to win and virtually everything can be earned in game without spending a dime! That being said you should totally give Digital Extremes your money because they deserve it.
Tinklehopper;-;One of the best free to plays ever. Its a third person intense co-op action shooter set... pretty far in the future haha. Amazing graphics tons of weapons and characters to play as (the warframes or characters to play as are very hard to obtain.) The only bad thing I can think about is how much the real money currency costs. Oh and its still in beta so they keep adding tons of new stuff!
Pinguefy;-;Why hello fine friends! I see you have shown interest in this game by looking at its steam page. And here I am right below the download button, about to persuade you whether or not you should spend your oh-so-precious time and give this game a go. In short: Do it. It's free and you've got nothing to lose but all of your free time and all social communication. But who needs that anyway? I was asked to download it by a friend of mine, and here I am already with 63 hours in one week. Thanks to Steam having an absolutely stupid character limit, the full review can be viewed here: http://pastebin.com/LffiN0gY FINAL VERDICT (tl;dr) Warframe is a ton of fun to play by yourself and with friends. There is a massive progression system that requires a lot of grinding, but is rewarding at the end. The Free to Play system is fair, althought waiting forever for your weapon to finish can be torture. The combat isn't exactly innovative, but still combines melee and gunplay nicely making every skill extremely satisfying. Levels are proceedurally generated, factions all have unique enemies, there are a ton of weapons and frames that can be awesome to downright ridiculous, and the grind will make you want to keep playing, however environments can be repetitive and even the combat can become stale over time. From all of this, the game has fairly good replay value. Finally, while the game does have its shortcomings, it has overall been an excellent experience and for the low, low cost of free, you owe it to yourself to play it. 8.75/10 - Excellent. (By the way, this was done at 4 AM, so I've bound to have missed some important
Drone;-;welcome to grind enjoy your stay
red_belmont456;-;I had reviewed this game WAY back when after I Tried it the first time, I didn't like it too much then... But I must say, even though the game is still FAR from complete, it has come a LOOONG way and has gotten WAY better than before. The PvP (conclave) is significantly more balanced now and enjoyable finally... the PvE is still grindy as hell so new players may find it a bit difficult to get off on the right foot without help (luckily you can start getting good stuff if you DO have people to help you :3...). And with many more changes made to the game (Hell, they even added a RAID mode which can have lots of tenno in at once) I CANNOT recommend this game enough. You should give it a try if you like Pointless but fun grind as well as third person shooter with parkour and fling physics (lol, seriously... Flying around the map with a Bo or any other staff never gets old)...
akrasul;-;If you like fast paced crazy wall running while shooting, this is the game for you ! Slide into the wonderful world of warframe and join a community of gamers who have helped build this game. Come be a space ninja, a Tenno. Awesome Game !
ArisYourBro;-;Awesome Game! Nice Graphic, New Featured Brings More Fun!
DarkyFeaver;-;Movement and shooting feels smooth and responsive..I really like this game.
Travingel;-;HOW THE HELL IS THIS F2P? that sums it up, its amazing
AngryAlbinoCroc;-;Yes I highly recommend it. It can get a bit repetative, but it can still hold its own for a free game that is not pay to win. After 1000 hours I can say that I will probably never leave this game. The devs really listen to what the people are saying, and have taken some huge steps to ensure that our needs are met. That being said gameplay is better then ever and the weapon selection is now insanely large. The grind is still there though you really need to add your face to it if you want to get all the big boy toys. But hey if you are complaining about a little work for a lot of profit then be lazy and sit there and not get anything done.
Kaneki;-;I'm loving this game, never gets boring and never will because there constently updating it. Even though i spent a little bit of time on warframe such a great game, and ill defenetly be playing more!
Kazuki;-;It's gewd.
VoldeBokos;-;Ninja's in space with guns and dogs... Best game ever!
Wolf;-;Absolutely stunning. One of my most favourite games ever played. This game is really enjoyable to play. There are so many missions you could play, and I love how each mission has a different type of mode, that way it doesn't get so repetative. I love it. When I first started the game, I couldn't believe how fantastic everything was. The graphics and the combat system just blew my mind. Great effort put into the game. The game isn't too difficult, yet it's not too easy. There are so many warframes and weapons to choose from, and I cannot believe how much effort was put into making every single map. This game is very addictive, yet this game does glitch out a bit. When attacking enemies, they sometimes wouldn't take any damage at all and it really stuffs up everything. Other than that, everything else is just absolutely flawless. If these glitches were fixed up, then this game would be much more better and easier. Fantastic job. Rate: 9/10
Lipton Ice Tree #Maximani * LGN;-;This is how it feels to chew 5 gum
Brendomir;-;Click That Play Button CLICK IT!!!!!
RV R@ge;-;Warframe+Continuous Updates=It never gets boring.
Sir.Shrimp;-;Day Juan: OOhh this game looks interesting. Day To: Man this is fun. Day 3: That gun looks awesome, i should get it. Day 4: I suck at this game, BREAK TIME! TIME WARP Month 7: Just look at me. I have 2 prime Warframes, 6 Prime Weapons, a dog, have no life, and pretty much no one wants to play with me. Man this is great. Year 2: Im the highest rank, have all the best weapons, all the best Warframes, i feel dead inside. Living the good life. Year 2 1/2: *Computer breaks, explodes and is never to be seen again. Commits suicide minutes later* 10/10 best game to the year. Not really since its 2015. Whatever. I love this game. Go download it. Its worth it. At times. Lol. :D
Jon Snow;-;WARFRAME pros: good TPS wich is also SCI-FI the solar map is kinda like mass effect preety much of a good co-op game balanced between your frame and your weapons cons: bugs and the hosts have bad internet wich you will lag (example me :( ) result: 4.5/5
Stinging Gonnorhea;-;Warframe is a superb free to play game that you will be able to pump endless hours into. I downloaded it and instantly fell in love. This is by far the best free to play I have ever experienced.
Kazune Nazumu;-;Warframe is an Action-MMORPG game, and a great one at that. AND IT'S FREE TO PLAY ! Duh, people often mislead F2P game as P2Win, but this one is not (Eitherway this is a PvE game in the first place). you could gather almost everything that could be bought with cash, with a little extra work. You're playing as Tenno, a space ninja. Well, they often mention tenno as a space ninja, but you could even become a warrior. Okay, now to the review. (y) Gameplay 9/10 Game mechanics (I just mention a few of them) Warframe There's a lot to choose in this game, each warframe have varies gameplay. Pick your beloved playstyle, you could become a tank, or master at crowd control, healer or even. a ninja ? Weapon There's a lot. A LOT. either you like to burn your enemies to ash. or freeze them. or just shoot them to death Sentinel / Pet your comrades in the game, each sentinel and pet have a diverse playstyle. again, pick one that suits you. Pet is better in stats though, but you need to take care of him daily. which makes it's hard, but still worth it (y) Level & Mod Weapon, Warframes, sentinel. Each of them have a level, you could increase them by using them while playing in a mission, well it also gains some exp even if you're not use it, but only a few. you could improve them by using a mod, there's a lot of mod in this game, again. choose which one that would make your weapons more deadly. a quality/quantity of the mod you could install also depends on the level of the weapon. There's a lot of mission you could choose in this game. Like to play something along like MGS ? you can play stealth mission. Maybe you just likes to kill something of ? Try Survival mission. Exterminate, or a defense mission could do. you could even battle in space like gundam esque game. Eitherway, there's a lot more to choose. I just mention a few of them. Music 8/10 DUN DUN DUN- DUN DUN ! The music is perfectly fit to the atmosphere of the game. it also changed depends on the situation. Graphic 9/10 The graphic is real smooth and good, you could check the screenshot. the graphic customization is really detailed and well-optimized. Replaybility : High. This game has a lot of replaybility, but at the same time, it could be repetitive if you grind too much. Take your time and enjoy it, don't need to rush. Is it worth playing : Totally. and again, it's free. it's worth trying at least.
Mr.BossSauce;-;Played it for a couple hours. Pretty fun.
Mr.BossSauce;-;Played it for a couple hours. Pretty fun.
Kaneki;-;I'm loving this game, never gets boring and never will because there constently updating it. Even though i spent a little bit of time on warframe such a great game, and ill defenetly be playing more!
Kazuki;-;It's gewd.
Great Grandpa *NAME REDACTED*;-;After a large war, the warriors of Orokin race, known as Tenno (they use weapons of the old ways, gun and blade, and wear a suit called a Warframe), went into hibernation. During the course of that time, an oppressive empire of beings called the Grineer rise to power, along with a robotic race called the Corpus. They compete for power, dominating the solar system and other races. A woman(?) named The Lotus wakes the Tenno(you) up, to take back the solar system, and restore peace. This game is free. While there is an option to buy things, you can play this game without ever spending a cent. This game's graphics are beautiful... The gameplay is engaging and fun. In my opinion, 10/10
Vengeful Spirit;-;This game has eaten more hours of my time for a free to play than even Team Fortress 2. I could write volumes about the merrits of this game, but alas there isn't room enough in this window. All I can really say is that this game is expansive, immersive, and addicting. 10/10, I will keep playing this and would recommend this to even the most casual gamer.
Captain Tight Pants;-;So this game is pretty addicting. Everything levels up so you get to watch all sorts of bars fill up. Even leveling up levels you up. Very manipulative, my endorphin levels have never been higher. The shooting is pretty good too.
Zephyr534;-;Great Game
[FALC] Jithvan;-;Epic Game! Love the Co-op Capanilities and customization options! The fact that you can create your own type of play style is epic!
du.;-;Are you into grinding 5ever? Do you enjoy getting  after actually grinding 5ever? This is the game for you. Get ready for endless pain caused by RNGesus, because this time he didn't die for your sins. No, this time he causes you agony and puts you into a state which can only be described as "emo". At the end of the day, one of many days that is, you will probably feel either great or like  because you spent 5 hours trying to get one stupid part for a new weapon/warframe. This game however taught me that patience is virtue and that RNGesus truly is a messiah. TL;DR: do you love RNGesus? This game will love you back. Mindless killing at a master level.
unya;-;Grindfest w/ friends. 10/0 would not bang.
Moki;-;Do you like singleplayer/coop thirdperson action games? Do you have nothing against repetitive map elements and enviroments? Are you in search for a time-consuming game? Then get this, and I guarantee you that you will have some fun. The only thing I dislike majorly about this game is the actual online play; it's too damn fast. But then again, it's the players that make it so. Craft stuff, level gear, collect blueprints as you kick  in space with your super-ninja space marine.
Sphirical;-;About Warframe, This game looks amazing, plays amazingly smooth and is really addictive. Some people might say it's a grindfest but that's something that is possible in every game. If you have friends to play with it will only increase the amount of amusement that you have. It's not pay-to-win which is with almost every free to play game and it will keep you entertained for hours upon hours. I have been playing this game for over a year now and I can't get enough of it with their constant updates that add new stuff every week! Keep it up DE!
AlexCrytek;-;I totally recommend this game :D
Fuzzy;-;It's a free game where you play as a space ninja with magical powers. Why the hell wouldn't you play it? 10/10 This game's great.
AWACS;-;CO-OP game, repetitive and grindy, lots of farming, however, still in beta, constant updates and a unique combat system with interesting mechanics. PVP is there, but the main focus is PVE. Also PVP is unbalanced, no pay 2 win, however limiting for someone who doesn't pay money, can trade for currency to buy store items. Limited Customization for starters, being limited to 3 Warframes and a small pallete of colors, but still fair in terms of unlocking weapons and crafting other frames. Warframes offer plenty of playstyles, however, certain playstyles, like stealth, are unrewarding compared to just running through the levels with someone who can blow everything up. Certain weapons are useless, other weapons are OP, creating an uneven field and also making the game boring by having less variety until weapons are balanced. Unique movement system, however can be greatly improved upon if the devs worked on it. Current movement has wallrunning, sliding, and using melee weapons to turn yourself into a helicopter due to the speed boost from swinging it. Despite this, many viable playstyles and a decent amount of variety, but again, would be more variety should other weapons be balanced. Terrible AI, the AI is very dumb. Some AI are just faster than others and can perform different manuevers, however, they still lack a logical thinking process. Many will run up to you head-on, or will hide and take cover and allow you to pick them off, without thinking to move. Bosses have unique prospects, but are still pretty stupid. Game currently only rewards rushing, stealth is not possible, and few tactical options outside of warframe abilities. Very few variety between missions, there is defense, survival and extermination, along with another mission type which involves blowing up an object. There is also one where you run around and capture points, but that is only one ONE mission. Could use plenty more mission types.
Captain Seasick;-;With a bunch of developers that really couldn't give less of a fock at all about you, your wallet or anything that isn't making them richer, this game hits rock-bottom like a flamin' sack o' crap. While most "buy-2-shortcut" games have some kinda decent price-range for in-game stuff, Warframe is going to extort you until you are not just broke, but broke, homeless, utterly destitute, and probably dying because of having sold all your internal organs just to afford the ludicrously high pricing. Then, throw in the fact that the community is full of idiots and braindead twits, the gameplay is HORRIFYINGLY dull and repetetive, with barely any variation whatsoever, it makes this game one of the weakest "free-2-play" titles on the proverbial market there ever was. 3.2/10
bigwhitehound;-;A fast paced shooter. Lots of maps, weapons, Warframes (the armor/body you use) and endless amounts of customization for all of them. High quality graphics, smart A.I. and a excellent cover system with tight target boxes (you must aim AT the target to hit it not just NEAR it). Parkour around the environment, bounce off the walls dodging bullets to your hearts content, or charge the enemy with guns blazing; however the wall climbing is hard and DOES require a lot of practice. Build everything by finding the blueprints and supplies or spend money and buy them, plus get rewards for improving skills and meeting goals. Add Mods to your character and equipment to improve their abilities, increasing damage, shields, speed and lots more. Want to light the bad-guys on fire (?) or freeze them solid (?) YOU CAN. Play Warframe once and you won't regret it. REMEMBER, IT'S FREE TO PLAY!!
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Nikout;-;Probably one of the best Co-Op experiences you may have with your friends by beating missions, bosses and kick aliens asses. This game is based on Dark Sector though in a far far future. New Damage 2.0 damage, new warframes (characters), new weapons and missions makes this game much more entertaining with each update. It is still on Beta but Digital Extremes keep making a lot of success with it. So far, personally, I love it.
theheliosproject;-;Warframe is the type of game that you can keep coming back to. In the beginning, its grindy but its almost like a good kind of grindy. After playing for about 400 hours I started to get bored, so I took a break from the game for a couple of months. When I came back, so much had been added and improved, it was like a whole new game. Digital Extremes is an excelent developer and is known for listening to its customers feedback. With the upcoming X1 release, I imagine sinking even more time into this amazingly fun and beautiful looking game.
Meyaka;-;A Free-to-Play futuristic online shooter that has an evolving world with new content all the time? That's Warframe and if this sounds like fun check it out! This game is really good. I've played it for a long time now and as time goes on it just seems to get better and better, for the most pary any way. There are a couple things that need to be imporoved on but for the most part is a very solid game. The game is best when played with friends and their is an in-game clan system. We have a clan with all of the clan dojo weapons unlocked so if your looking for a group of respectful, chill people to play with just let me know. We are glad to bring in new members and will train and help level any new or low level players. It's free...nothing to loose, check it out. Trust me. ^_^ Much Love, Kayla
Unmistakabagel Vazzaroth;-;A great feeling 3rd person Online PvE shooter. If this sounds fun to you, play this . Pretty easy to play without spending money, although I bet you'll want to buy some plat before long. Basically a Action Mini-MMO. It's deep as hell. The metacritic score does NOT do it justice. Add Vazzaroth.
SpeedyFalcon3D;-;this is a really good multiplayer game
N0RT' P PUMN !;-;In Warframe, up to 4 players work together to complete missions, such as eliminating enemies or retrieving data from terminals. Players wear a battlesuit called a Warframe, each with its own set of abilites and statistics; and are equipped with 3 weaponsa primary weapon (such as a rifle or shotgun), a secondary weapon (usually a pistol), and a melee weapon (like a longsword). Players earn Affinity (experience points) for killing enemies and completing challenges and missions, which allows them to level up their weapons and armor. Warframes and weaponry have access to modifications, or "mods", that can be installed, removed and upgraded between missions; the higher the Affinity rank of any one piece of equipment, the more mods it can accommodate. The camera is positioned over the shoulder for third-person shooting. The player can jump, sprint, slide, and roll, as well as combine techniques to quickly move throughout the level and avoid enemy fire. The game also allows players to utilize parkour techniques to evade enemies, bypass obstacles or gain access to secret areas. Maps are generated procedurally; with prebuilt rooms connected together so that no levels have the same layout. At times, the enemy faction can initiate a lockdown of the area, forcing players to hack security terminals by completing a puzzle minigame within a small time limit. Credits, ammo, resources, and mods can be found in set locations, such as lockers and destructible containers, as well as dropped by enemies. New weapons, Warframes, and equipment can be purchased in the market (either the items themselves or their blueprints), using either Credits earned in-game, or Platinum purchased via microtransaction.[3] Blueprints can be constructed using resources found during gameplay.
Yura;-;You will feel like a farmer in china. Farming Simulator with Robotic Ninjas 10/10
HR_778;-;You can run on walls. 10/10
(Hot-n-Spicy) Lady Blaziken;-;"They were called Negro. Gangstas of ballin' and guns: masters of the Weedframe armor. Those that survived the old war were left drifting among Detroit. Now they are needed once more. The Five-O, with their vast SWAT teams, are spreading throughout da hood. A rhythm echoes across da hood, summoning the Negro to a dank- weed den. They summon this a: you. Allow Shaniqua to guide you. She has rescued you from your jail cell and given you a chance to walk up to the jam. The Five-0 will arrest you; you must be prepared. Shaniqua will teach you the ways of the Weedframes and the secrets to being the ultimate gangsta. Come Negro, it's time to slam now."
icy;-;if i ever get 400 hours in this game i'll commit suicide
(Hot-n-Spicy) Lady Blaziken;-;"They were called Negro. Gangstas of ballin' and guns: masters of the Weedframe armor. Those that survived the old war were left drifting among Detroit. Now they are needed once more. The Five-O, with their vast SWAT teams, are spreading throughout da hood. A rhythm echoes across da hood, summoning the Negro to a dank- weed den. They summon this a: you. Allow Shaniqua to guide you. She has rescued you from your jail cell and given you a chance to walk up to the jam. The Five-0 will arrest you; you must be prepared. Shaniqua will teach you the ways of the Weedframes and the secrets to being the ultimate gangsta. Come Negro, it's time to slam now."
Havagin;-;This game is a sci-fi fans dream... It's in space and you play as beings known as the Tenno (Ninja like people) who possess suits called 'Warframes'. Each suit has it's own use and purpose, for example Nova is a AOE suit and Rhino is a tank suit. The maps are dynamic; they change everytime you play on them adding more depth to the gameplay. Plus there are tons of different types of enemies from 3 other factions (non-playable): Corpus, Infested and Grineer. The corpus are a robot-like race, the Infested are well... Like the flood in Halo (they don't stop taking over lifeforms to take over more lifeforms) and the Grineer appear to be humans who have gone berserk and have tried to remove all other lifeforms in our solar system (With a few planets extra, even Pluto). Despite it only saying I've played about 0hrs as of today 21/12/13 I've actually played it off steam for over 200hrs... That's how good it is! Star rating: 98.7/100 <--- Absolutely fantastic! IGN: Sinc0ra - Feel free to add me.
GoobiakGaymez;-;The Metascore is incredibly misleading! You dont just run around killing enemies and looting from containers; you train yourself to be the best ninja around! The main thing that people like about Warframe is that there is a nice selection of parkour techniques that make the race of the Tenno just that little bit more awesome. Theres now Operations (of the mission kind) which involve you deciding whether its best to assist the Corpus or the Grineer in each mission. Finally the best part feature in the game the Modding. Modding allows you to constantly decide what upgrade you want to add to your weapon or warframe on every level-up. This can either make your weapon best stronger versus a certain faction, very fun to play with, or, very simple and sometimes very weak. It can take a while to find the best mods for weapons but when you get them the whole experience changes for the better! What more could you want? Its simply a Masterpiece! The game can get repetitive with the constant grinding for weapon or warframe levels, But the difference everytime is that you get to try out a new type of weapon; some are just basic guns, others have unique firing techniques. But it never gets boring if you know what your doing. Bottom line: Its worth playing if your into FPSs and definately worth trying if your unsure. There are a few connection bugs but its hardly noticed. The grinding is fun when you fight in different missions and areas and it helps to play with friends but if you get it, you wont regret it!
Snowy ^^  - zZz -;-;Warframe. What can i say? If you can see through the whole massive grind and see how great this games community is. this is a game for you. it has interesting story elements through lore that you learn as you play the game the farther you get into it. sure when you start out its a tough grind because not all the places you need to go to farm for resources and items are unlocked. but thats when you bring in friends to join with you or get a random person to taxi (join a squad to the place you need to go) and start farming things. most of the friends who i've talked to about this game won't play past a few hours on this due to what i said the massive grind needed. This game gives the massive grind for items and materials "this was freaking worth it !" at the end of the day. sure you have to wait 12-72 hours (72 hours only for building additional warframes) but still its worth it in the end for the grind. and yes there's stuff you can buy with ingame (real money) currency . but all the weapons feel balanced. and you can mod them up to fit any fight you may get. that also includes your warframe itself. since the recent update to this game you no longer have to worry about your abilities being tied to mods to install. instead they unlock as you level up your warframe. i have to admit when i first started playing this game i didn't really have anyone to play it with ... till recently that is. i also have to say there is still a bunch of bugs in this game that hasn't been fixed yet. like for me getting stuck on the mission screen and having to kill the game from task manager and then starting the game back up again. its still a great game to play after all. if you can make it through the massive grind you'll feel really rewarded at the end of the day. I give this game a 9.5/10 (because of the bugs that cause me to restart the game / kill it from task manager / making me log out of windows ) still a great game i'd recommend it to anyone !
HR_778;-;You can run on walls. 10/10
Yura;-;You will feel like a farmer in china. Farming Simulator with Robotic Ninjas 10/10
JAGuzman;-;WARFRAME PROS Brilliant Concept Beautiful Graphics Loads of Content Free To Play Developer Communication CONS Minimal Story Integration Shameless Grind Terribly Redundant Empty and Meaningless Missions/Maps Practically Impossible Single Player Overall Rating : 6.5/10 and would recommend. Some more personal observations and realizations: 1. It's a brilliant Concept: Ninjas in Space! 2. I really like the sleek and sexy look of the actual Warframes, but hate the ugly enemy designs. While they may be unique, they just look comically bad. I half expect Pauly Shore, Andy Richter and Carrot Top to be voicing the Corpus and Grineer bosses. 3. While the story is there, it's integrated terribly into the game itself. I don't want to have to read the Wiki to find out why 'X' faction is fighting 'Y' faction, or which Syndicate is the right one for my playstyle. There's a lot of lore in this game, and it's friggin' great, but they way it's implemented leaves one feeling directionless. 4. Despite thousands of players being online, finding people to play with is pretty hard. Most (+90%) missions have no activity at all, while the bulk of the player base is farming/grinding only in a few select locations most of which you won't be able to access as a new player. I can't believe there is no available list of squads actively looking for additional players. Solo play and PvP still has a lot of room to improve. 5. Even though I have logged in over 100 hours of game time as of the writing of this review, I still have barely begun to experiment with all the content this game offers. However I've reached the point where I no longer really care to advance any further because the grind is just so tediously repetitive. If I do manage to find the single blueprint I need to finish creating a second Warframe, the grind will start all over again in order to unlock a third, fourth, fifth ad nauseam. Then you have to do the same thing for your weapons, mods, archwing... seriously? The End Game is what, bragging rights? In closing, yeah, I would recommend this game. It's a free download, great concept, pretty pictures and can be a whole lot of fun if you have some friends to play with.
Safety Wank;-;Honestly an amazing game for a free-to-play MMO. Quick third-person-shooter gameplay is complemented by interesting free-running and mobility mechanics. Digital Extremes really want you to feel like a space ninja with Warframe. Perhaps Warframe's greatest allure is the lack of restrictions many MMO's seem to have taken on as staples. For example, there is no mechanic to explicitly limit the per-day play time of 'free-to-play play'ers, but rather a 4-revive per frame per day mechanic, and players can still continue when these are consumed. This also ties into Warframe's focus as a team game, with up to three other players present in a squad given time to revive you at no cost. In-game items can be purchased with credits (rewarded for normal gameplay) or Platinum (paid for with micro-transactions). Several rare weapons, rare items and cosmetic skins can be obtained through real-time Alerts and Operations, and certain weapons can only be obtained from special 'Void Runs' made possible with keys found during play. A 'Daily Reward' system offers increasingly valuable rewards for consecutive log-ins, and can even provide players with generous discounts on Platinum. Those looking for a 'But...' should be aware that Warframe is still in open-Beta, and still has issues such as the occasional clipping-through-wall trap, as well as some connectivity issues. But these are being discovered and addressed by the very active and actively-monitored community. The growth of the game with each update is obvious, and the developers have regular livestreams to discuss new and upcoming content. Warframe is a brilliant action game that is DEFINITELY worth a look. Just don't choose Loki as your starting Frame.
Safety Wank;-;Honestly an amazing game for a free-to-play MMO. Quick third-person-shooter gameplay is complemented by interesting free-running and mobility mechanics. Digital Extremes really want you to feel like a space ninja with Warframe. Perhaps Warframe's greatest allure is the lack of restrictions many MMO's seem to have taken on as staples. For example, there is no mechanic to explicitly limit the per-day play time of 'free-to-play play'ers, but rather a 4-revive per frame per day mechanic, and players can still continue when these are consumed. This also ties into Warframe's focus as a team game, with up to three other players present in a squad given time to revive you at no cost. In-game items can be purchased with credits (rewarded for normal gameplay) or Platinum (paid for with micro-transactions). Several rare weapons, rare items and cosmetic skins can be obtained through real-time Alerts and Operations, and certain weapons can only be obtained from special 'Void Runs' made possible with keys found during play. A 'Daily Reward' system offers increasingly valuable rewards for consecutive log-ins, and can even provide players with generous discounts on Platinum. Those looking for a 'But...' should be aware that Warframe is still in open-Beta, and still has issues such as the occasional clipping-through-wall trap, as well as some connectivity issues. But these are being discovered and addressed by the very active and actively-monitored community. The growth of the game with each update is obvious, and the developers have regular livestreams to discuss new and upcoming content. Warframe is a brilliant action game that is DEFINITELY worth a look. Just don't choose Loki as your starting Frame.
Bob Malek;-;All about ninja is BADASS!!! Nice gameplay superior controll OUT OF COUNTROLL iNSTALL NOW GUYS IS WORTH IT!!!
E.N.D;-;Rhino = Uchiha Madara ahahah very funny,play this game,it's free man,awesome,the best,etc...
Cyelon;-;i dont care what anyone says. do not read those negative reviews until you've had your fill of the game. this game is addictive, fun, and incredibly community based. hotfixes almost every week to fix every bug that anyone reports, so for the most part, the Devs are working on keeping it bug - free. FUTURISTIC SPACE NINJAS WITH MAGIC need i say more? but anyway. the game has a lot of grinding in it, but it can be worth it. it takes a whike to involve yourself in the community, but getting involved in game is easy - drop into a mission and make friends! it is F2P but [MOST] of the stuff in game can be bought if you dont want to grind. either way, you get stuff and itll be a fun time. its a fun game with a kick  community, amazing graphics, and awesome lore / story. and. anD aND AND ITS FREE. for all this stuff, for free? why would you ever say no?
Aalhaeuter :);-;Space. Ninjas. Guns. Swords. Parkour. Leveling. Grinding. Awesome graphics. Beatiful. Almost cinematic. Almost no lag. Great game, i love it so far. Spent some hours on it and more will come. 9/10 #PogChamp approves 2k15
Roo <3;-;IM ADDICTED HALP
A Reliable Source;-;Let's see. We got ninjas, space marines, space zombies, space potatos, farming, space traders/scientists, space explosions, space space, and an update every week. All in all, I'd say it's a pretty good game so long as you put some time in to it. It doesn't have the instant gratification a lot of games do, and that might be a big turn off for people. But the more time you put in to it, the more fun you'll have. Trust me, I'm a space potato farmer.
Peinar;-;Shiny grind sim. Looks nice but really empty and boring. Once you get all the mods/frames/prime stuff you work so hard for there will be no place to utilize it. No endgame of any sorts. Just more mindless grind. And really poor and broken small scale PvP. Heavy focus on cosmetics and useless weapons. Empty star chart. You ll be very lonely in this "co op" game until you start doing Void. And when it comes to CO OP you ll be defending pods or surviving standing in one place mashing one button for 40 minutes. Stay away. It is mindless, repetitive and boring. Empty. Could have been so much more. But devs keep throwing in more and more useless stuff to lvl and cosmetic garbage. They just refuse to focus on (lack of) content or story related issues. I d like my 700 hrs back. I gave it so many chances. But devs are either very poor or very stupid. but i believe it's both. I rate it 3/10
Noble Cactus;-;Hey there, Tenno! Looks like you're interested in playing Warframe. Maybe its sleek character designs and world aesthetics that ring equal parts Japanese sentai ranger/tokusatsu superhero and Western science fiction caught your eye. Or maybe the promise of an invigorating third-person shooter experience meshed with light RPG progression elements got your attention. If you enjoy: - Endless grindwalls and microtransaction temptations at every meaningful gameplay decision - A vacuum of engaging content beneath those grindwalls - Undocumented stealth nerfs and obfuscating excuses for these changes by developers - Unfinished projects explained away by the promise that these features will be fixed "at some point in the future" - A lack of transparency between developers and players - A clear lack of direction for exactly what the game wants to accomplish - Game developers who constantly run away from their mounting self-created problems Then you will probably like Warframe. Enjoy your stay. If not, I would suggest playing another game.
Lancerr11;-;I only played a little but it seems fun .
Rizhedron;-;If you liked destiny, you will love this game but it has a bonus, you can fall deeply in love with this game and have limiless hours of fun!!
Valexia;-;Amazing game plus it is free making it even better! I highly recommend this game as it is fast paced and be played co-op or competitive. Enjoy c:
Asagi Boogers - RIP Satoru Iwata;-;It's a succubus in video game form. Did I spell that right?
KraZyJay;-;Best game I have ever played. So much fun with friends and it is truly free to play. Just cosmetic items in the store. Everything else you can earn in game. Also you can sell items you find for platinum. Any FPS fan should love this game. PLEASE JUST TRY IT!
Derpelyn+Vocanatic;-;boyfriend likes game therefore i am bugged to play game with boyfriend i now like game
nikolaos91;-;very good game to play with friends and you dont have really to pay for warframes and weapons since you can craft them
Lemon;-;Why are you wasting time reading this? Play the damn game.
Froobert;-;two words robot. ninjas. oh, and another two words ing. badass.
Goatframe;-;This game now takes up most of my time because there is so much to do, and it gets better if you play with friends!
Jiminez Burial;-;I often see reviews from people that have not had enough time in-game to truley judge it. This review is from a very experienced (addicted) member of the warframe community, in-game, on the forums and the wikia. This game consists of a unique combat style that allows for fluid change between melee and gunplay. The enemies are currently a bit dumb, but as is the nature of this game, that may (as been mentioned by devs to most likely happen) change by further improving the pathing of enemies, and differenciating combat tactivs more between enemy type and faction. The lore is currently hard to find, though based on community smarts, information attained from the codex (think pokemon with some added goodies) and the devoloper livestreams and posts. Lore will be expanded on, but as the devolopers have said "the game is about making your own lore with some guidelines". The difference of experience between first playing, having a hold on the combat/movement along with having a decent arsenal, and then what is dubiously called 'end-game' is immense. Starting off may feel slow, with the generic assualt rifle, pistol and long sword at your desposal. Enemy factions are slowly introduced as you progress through planets, and bring a different style of play with them. The grineer follow basic shooter patterns (aim for head, avoid hit scan weapons and some heavies), the corpus is more about reaction to shots than anticipation of them while keeping on your feet, as well as having a 90% resistance to damage taken to the head (so for once, the foot might be better than the face), and the infested, a pridominantly melee faction with pack mentality and zerg rush style tactics. Once you progress, you begin to make your arsenal unique through mods (extra stat cards) that are dropped vis RNG (Random Number Generater) when you defeat an enemy. Weapons are not as important as getting mods to start off. These mods allow you to take advantage of enemy resistances and status effects, as well as pure damage increase. As you complete missions, real time alerts become available, which is a good way to get credits (basic currency) and items to improve your weapons, and skins and weapon that are either alert exclusive, or otherwise only obtainable from the market for plat (the games premium currency). Mods affect your weapons ability and to some extent, the playstyle of that weapon, but there is also a large number of unique weapons (with more added almost every week) that will allow you a diverse arsenal of playstyles. All weapons are attainable for free (throught the market under the blueprint section, or from farming other areas and bosses, or events). At mid game, the fighting starts to pick up, and more avenues for play start becoming apparent. At end-game, your mastery will have been substaintial increased (the psuedo overall player level based on number of weapons maxed), your arsenal will be full, you will have tried most of the warframes (classes), mods will not be a problem allowing min-max builds, and you will be focusing on farming Defence or Survival missions. This, as the end-game gets a little tedious, and at times, unbearable if you can not find a good group o fplayers, or even a single mate. Enemy level increase (damage dealt, able to soak up, and number of enemies) is really all the diffulcultty increase that there is. New content is always being added, so the focus on what is end-game may very well change. On a slightly different note, this game has its fair share of bugs (96% are no where near game breaking) and refining damage models, optimisation for more systems, and overall increase in stabilty are always being improved. Although this is advertised as a co-op, ninja game, co-operation is not a strong focus with the community. lobby options such as solo, private (only friends can join) or invite only help with getting into the game at your own pace, or with a set group of friends you are chatting to. Trailers depict a large amount of co-ordination of warframe abilities, but this in practice, is lesser. A large portion of abilities are pure damage, with a few twist between playstyles, and the abilities that support the team mostly do not need another ability to contribute the most that it can. Rushers are rampant in online public lobbies, and as there are end-game players only going into missions for a single purpose, they rush past everything else, which as a new player can be a bip, shall we say, disorientating. The learning curve to be able to play this game is not steep, but the learning curve to master the game certainly is. Each enemy has their own resistances and vulnerabilities, and modding for certain enemies can be the difference between life and death in this game. All resistance info can be found in-game, but only after scanning enemy types for information int he codex. If that wall of text was too much to read, then I will sum things up easier before rounding this review off with my opinion. Positive - Uniqure combat style - A plethora of weapons, and customization - Warframes often feel unique, but familiar enough to learn to love - Damage system offers a large amount of info to get sunk into, further increasing some peoples interest in the game mechanics, and devoloping weapon and warframe builds. - Game is constantly being updated, with fixes to community voiced issues, gameplay performance, new weapons and warframes, as well as events, invasions and real time alerts. - Everything that is not cosmetic, or convienience can be attained for free. - Devolopers are part of our community, Negatives - Farming gets repetitive after a while unless you change play styles. - With constant updates, it also brings new bugs. - Your personal objective may be hindered by rushers, and their objective. - End-game consist of two generic mission types to rank equipment. In summation, my personal feelings about this game are tilted towards loving it (when its not throwing a devoloper induced fit) and plenty of patience. The experience is enjoyable, and there is a lot to go in-depth based on lore or gameplay mechanics. The devolopers are always answering questions, and taking feed back. Yes I have put money into this game, but only the equivalent of a low budget disc game. I highly recommend giving this game a try for at least 15 hours before making a final decision. Get to know regular players, and the farming can be easily broken up with informal conversation, which I consider great, as the tenno are a family. I have maxed almost every item in the game, ahve all available mods, and till have an erge to check in every day to see what smal, large, or passive things have changed. Try this game, and you will never feel the same about any other game after.
Lftstrafe94;-;Hello, and welcome I guess to my NEW review of a game: Warframe. Okay so my earlier review got a really postive response so yes thank you! :D But now let's start with the Warframe review itself. So yeah the game is amazing and it has a lot of things to do in it. Missions are not boring but quite the opposite, they are really intresting and acually have sense, I acually played some games in which the missions have no sense with the game or the story. But Warframe as I said is amazing and a really good game if you're a ''super-natural'' fan or something about Ninjas this game is 100% for you :) So yeah that is a wrap of the that... I hope you will like this as you did my earlier review (it was Batman A.C.). Have a nice day of evening depends on the which part of the day you're reading this.
M ....;-;Add this farmville to facebook plis
Flaptus;-;i pressed the button '4' and won it's ok/10
False Hawk;-;Graphics, gameplay, weapons, characters, and storyline are all great. This third-person co-op has tons of levels, characters, and weapons. Since this is a free game, there is a paying aspect; yet, paying doesn't give an extremely unfair advantage to players. The only thing missing here is more enemy factions. Great game!
Nat's sleepycat;-;tl;dr, as with each game, there are tradeoffs. but it's free, at least try it, you panzy. Beyond it's asthetically pleasing graphics and segmentally loaded maps, there is much to be seen, and much to be learned in Warframe, despite the general consensus of the game being "shootyshooty ninjas in space lrn 2 parkur robot grindyfest". The game's in a constant state of beta, so it doesn't have to monetize it for it's consumers, and is receiving a very steady bi-monthly update speed. It is constantly getting new weapons and new warframes for you to play with. It's a wonderful waste of time, but it's very intimidating to do if you don't have a good group of friends willing to assist you with goals you want to accomplish. Starting the game, you'll likely be overwhelmed by the choices and the customization, every game starts like that. But once you can get through that, over the hump of the starter warframes.. Everything becomes more entertaining. I used this game as a breaker between tough games I was playing. (Darksouls, STALKER mods, and Hello Kitty Adventures.) and used it as a stress relief, but once I got into it, I saw that they had put much more into it than I had thought. The lore for this game is incredible. I'll just say that right now. Downsides, though. There's a lot of bugs you will experience, as new content is polished between patches, and there is an overwhelming sense of 'why am i doing any of this' in the beginning. [that's also a part of the lore, imagine that] There's no real variation in where you want to advance through the star-map until you hit earth, and there's just TOO MANY THINGS TO CHOOSE FROM AT ONE TIME . I was lucky enough to have a grasp on the game really early, but I sparsely played it. And some things you might want are only obtainable through real money. (Colours, certain helmets, profile pictures, along with other things) but there are "Alerts" that'll give you occasional chances to find things you want. Helmets, (Nightmare) mods, warframe parts, or just more cash. tl;dr, as with each game, there are tradeoffs. but it's free, at least try it, you panzy.
Phanoss;-;I love it, is awesome, epic, .!
Wolodyjowski;-;Okay, so I am and was a fan of this game. I sponsored it before the present day, I have bought things in microtransactions as well supporting the games development. That being said, I am really tired of the game. It is a pay-to-win fest, despite what people will tell you while you play the game. You CAN supposedly make all of the equipment in the game, but the people that do devote their entire lives to the game essentially, so yeah it's "That" type of game, like diablo 3 or Wow or world of tanks or something. Anyways, the game has enjoyable graphics, and play style, but at the end of the day it takes alot of effort to convince yourself that it's worth it to be this competitive for a player vs. enemy game, but it is just not. There's no excuse for the play to win finances of the game, other developers like that of path of exile don't go that route for example. The game also has absolutely wretched connectivity issues, not only do you have to up your ports for the game, but even after that point you will disconnect, lose connection to host, your friends/guildmates won't be able to stay connected, or the engine tasks you to play alone. I have been in hundreds of 4 player squads and we encountered an area where one of us couldn't stay connected in the game, and it wasn't even predictable, it would affect one of us then another. The developers are also working their keisters off to bring the players more guns, and warframes (characters), and stuff of that nature, but do not fix the issues with the connection, game mechanics, glitches, and etc. They also nerf items that the previous day/week you spend real mulah on, essentially ripping off the players they depend on funding their development, before their very eyes, and alot of them put up with it, which is sad. A game is not supposed to be this unfun, so I can't recommend it at this point.
Martoto;-;Shamefur dispray of samurai, commit sudoku
Exely (abandoned);-;Previously, I did not understand this game. It seemed to me that this is another P2W. How wrong I was. She's great at all (except with bugs :) Excellent gameplay. Dynamic battles. Very large branch UP2 character. Too good for a free game.
Na Na;-;Gets repeatitive but I can deal with it.
King Zee;-;I've played quite a while on this game, and Warframe isn't simply another FPS you need to add to your list because it's free-to-play. This game offers a great opportunity to spend a great time with your friend, and have fun while doing it. It's really addictive since you get started to it, with large sets of missions including base defense, survival, boss fights, or killing everyone in the map. One thing I found a bit disturbing, is the fact that level isn't much taken in account. That's pretty great yeah, you can queue up with anyone no matter his level, but when a warframe level 60 comes in with his crowd control skills that annihilate the whole planet, while i still try hard to get one headshot on that small robot that survived the apocalypse, it's kind of a buzzkill when i see I killed 30 while he got 300. But then again, to get the most fun out of this game, invite some friends and do your missions the way you want it done.
LoZoS;-;very fun to play
gho;-;Why pay $60 for Destiny to stare at loading screens for 5 minutes. Afterwards Destiny just loads Warframe anyhow.
Kaysick;-;This is one on the only games that I've played for a year and still continue to play. I started playing during the early phases of the Closed Beta. At first glance, it may look like a version of Mass Effect 3's multiplayer (because it kinda is in its own right), but deep down it has a ton more content and playability. The game might have some flak about the grinding of the game, but it was a ton worse months back. The company that has been developing this game, Digital Extremes (DE), actually cares about the community's input on everything about the game. About the Warframes, about the levels, the grinding, the weapons. I said I wasn't going to put any money into the game, but I have. A fair amount as well. One thing that is amazing about this Free to Play title is that you can get everything, besides cosmetic items and certain event items, just by playing. Since it's a free to play title, you can buy your way through some things, but the game isn't "Buy to Win". There is no "Buy to Win" part of the game (Unless you play in the PvP areas) since it's a PvE game.
sgrey;-;I want to like this game, but can't. The basic shooter/fighting mechanics are great, the artwork is great, the level design is mostly great, the random nature of the levels is great. BUT, the new player experience is terrible. The UI and map provide terrible guidance about what to do or where to go, especially after completing the main goals for the mission. You finish the main goals and then spend an hour fruitlessly trying to figure out where the mission exit is, with ZERO help from the map or UI. I had to quit and retry the 2nd and 3rd Mercury missions to get a different map entirely before being able to complete the 2nd mission. I gave up on this game after wandering around fruitlessly in the 3rd mission after completing the mission goal. A solid hour back and forth through the entire level, vainly seeking the exit, with zero map indicators. This game is promising but the new player guidance/experience is AWFUL.
NET;-;if u like shoot and also gun and blade then game on! also its in space so thats cool but also scary cause space is dark and not friendly. overall alien/10
Rivalus;-;Oh, man. This game rocks!! I've never play an MMO which play almost like a 3rd person gears of war plus sword. And it's all co-op fun.
cr1mesc3ne;-;Great graphics and smooth gameplay. Did not like the method of grinding to upgrade gear or to craft new warframes. When you initially sign up you have a choice, but did not know that you are stuck with said choice. Found some groups to play in, mostly just rush right to the end of the level as quickly as possible, pulling mobs with them and making the ending a lot harder to survive. As a new player playing in the starting zone of Mars, found myself in random pairings of groups where higher level and more advanced players were farming. Accused me of riding their coattails. Well...there goes the community. I think with some polishing on the grind and lowering of cost in the store, this game would be better. Its an mmo so you are bound to run into an a-hole every once in a while, but my luck was nearly every time I did not play solo.
Gio Gio;-;basically rips off mass effect 3 multiplayer. everything is a grindwall. Lack of end game content Lack of competent devs, the coding is so sleek you'd think it was a From Software game. Lack of challenge, game is  easy once you get a decent weapon. Lack of diverse game modes, pretty much just kill everything or, defend Lack of actual ninjas save one trandgender edgy teenager bait. Why the hell does a beta have a functioning cash shop and premium system? 6/10 would sleek again.
fat asses;-;They banned the clan leader of the #1 clan and pretended it was a good idea
Phoenix (yes, another one);-;I wanted to like this, but couldn't. The biggest thing that jumps out at you is that this isn't a game that has grind, it's a game that was built around grind as a primary design mechanic, and overall purpose in the game. I don't mean Diablo or Borderlands type grind, but incredibly dull, mindless, painful grind, where often the best option, is very low level missions you can just tear apart with ease, or to just leech away in public games. While it has a number of nice concepts, it unfortunately fails to execute them very well. Worst among those being the painfully grind centric, and RNG related progression mechanic, rather limited variety of loot that feels more like resource gathering, than loot collecting, and the overall poor game balance. Although this is shaping up to be one of those infinite beta type games (with a functioning cash shop), as there's always various aspects marked as coming soon, currently being redesigned, or reredesigned. With some of the changes forcing you to wonder if much thought went into them at all, while others are seemingly focused on just looking cool, rather than if it would be an enjoyable game mechanic. The "Space Ninjas" thing is a marketing gimmick, as stealth in the game is not a good option, and only semi-functional in one of the mission types. Although if you play with others they always just charge in with guns blazing like space marines. Mob AI is inept, they like to run in circles, then often take cover while standing behind explosive barrels, things that only cover their lower half, or just right out in the open. The parkour only sort of works, some of the time, the rest of the time it either doesn't trigger, or slingshots you off at mach 10. Warframe certainly has it's fair share of bugs in general. I have all too often had to abort a mission, giving up all my item rewards, because the door to the next area wouldn't open, the last mob was stuck underground, the next sequence didn't trigger, or so on. It might shape up to be a really good game at some point along the line, should it ever get out of beta, and they really sit down to figure out how to get everything to work together effectively. Although, as it is right now, I couldn't recommend this to anyone.
Yabba;-;I was only thirteen years old, I loved warframe so much. I had all the Weapons and Frames. I prayed to Warframe every night before bed thanking it for the life I have been given. "Warframe is love" I say, "Warframe is life." My dad hears me and calls me a . I knew he was just jealous of my devotion to Warframe. I called him a . He slaps me and sends me to go to sleep. I'm crying now and my face hurts. I lay in bed, it's really cold. A warmth is moving towards me... I feel something touch me... It's Rhino! I'm so happy. He is my favourite Warframe He whispers in my ear "This is my ship." He grabs me with his powerful hands, and puts me on my hands and knees. I'm ready. I spread my keyboard and mouse for Rhino. He penetrates my TV screen. It hurts so much, but I do it for Rhino. I can feel my screen cracking and my eyes start to water. I push against his Iron skin and armour, I want to please Rhino. He roars a mighty roar as he fills my screen with love. My dad walks in. Rhino looks him straight in the eye and says, "It's all Broken now." Rhino leaves through my window. Rhino is love. Rhino is life <3 10/10 Ruined my life
Pave;-;Fair warning before you read: On April 6th 2015, ~17.00 GMT +2, my account has been suspended: http://steamcommunity.com//sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=420707826 ((Yes, it could simply be the auto-ban-bot going haywire, especially since no email was sent regarding to this; I just simply have no reason to try getting my account unlocked at this point anymore.)) By the way, it was indeed false positive. --------------------- --------------------- The "old"-text: This is a convoluted, "un-constructed", "messy" "review", which I also kept updating from time to time whenever I felt to do so, whether it's due typo-fixes or there are some other things worth mentioning. I mainly (if not only) used to play this game from time to as a warning for those who are planning to even make a slightest financial or any sort of investment into this game; I was indeed one of the "fools" who funded this game early on, and can only continue due a specific group of people who make this game actually playable or otherwise functional (thank you very much for helping, you know who you are). ------------------ ------------------ A summary: Warframe is a video-game in which immersion is the higher importance to "everyone" than the actual functionality. Arbitrary Metaphoric summary-addition: It's a game build on very good foundation. Soon (right before Steam-release) they they blew a small rock-hill very close to the house, which gave some major fractures / cracks to foundation. The game still kept standing though, even if the floor and walls got quite tilted. Despite the advices of the "experts", instead of adding reinforces for the foundation or even drastically rebuilding the whole game, the foundations only were plastered with new paint, from the inside. As the time goes on and the house is being filled with more items and tenants, the cracks are getting more and more wide: There are already huge water-damages and everything else related at the basement. And it's only getting worse... Main "review": The game is decent "modern'ish-throwback" to times of (mainly) "Phantasy Star Online" and such "collect'a'thons" (generally refencing to any game in which you might genuiely want to collect everything because it's actually fun without feeling like a forefully-repeated-chore (but this is very heavily dependable to ones style of playing the games too). Also there's a very "Unreal Tournament"-like feeling / vibe with various guns (sans gameplay-utility, interfaces, and various other features being quite player-unfriendly; more related text written at the bottom of this "review".) But here is / are the main issue(s): Only guaranteed way of avoiding the (extremely amplified) "no loot"-issue(s) when no player-fault is evident is to simply not play this game at all. That is simply "the" most important game and deal-breaking issue that "Digital Extremes" (proudly / boastingly / "bad kind of" audacitly) on purpose implemented into this game very early on (/ few weeks before the "Steam-release"), especially when no one (with actually better ideas) had asked for one. If they eventually fix this, then I might recomment playing this game: This game is simply that huge of a health-hazard generally speaking. Otherwise, there are far better "dungeon crawling"-games on market, some with much better multiplayer-mode-implementations too. -------- -------- Random "After-thoughts-note": It's actually quite funny that originally this game started as a offline-single-player-project (read: "Dark Sector"): Damned you will be if you're trying to experience this game as a solo-player (E.G. "later-on" especially on "obvious" multiplayer-game-modes such as "Defence". But then you also have "obvious" single-player-missions such as "Spy"...This game / the developers / "Digital Extremes" seems simply being very indecisive and polishes neither of the "modes"...). It's of course a very different story if you eventually will be able to pull the "meta / powergaming + min/maxing"" -moves alongside being extremely lucky not only loot-wise, but also whether the "other random-(number-)elements-gods" are not in the mood of simply stalling you (read: this game has large number of instability-issues alongside on purpose (yes, they did reply as "intented") inconsistency-issues) alongside many of the players on purpose don't want you (yes, you potential paying-customer player) to reach that point however...apparently... Also, there's the fact that people who did want this game to be "less carpal-tunnel-inducing / finger-killing" (Read, requires unnessarily amount of clicking generally speaking,but mainly especially with high-rate-of-fire-semi-auto-guns (E.G. "Akbolto")), mainly get the reply of being free to use any tools to emulate turbo/auto-fire. When asked why couldn't this be an implemented option, both "DE" and most of the "master-community" simply says this takes away realism & immersion, and sometimes they ("masters") say you shouldn't even bother playing this game (with your equipments, E.G. like Logitech-G500-mouse) if you're not coding or savvy with other 3rd-custom-fiddlings. ...I personally simply don't know what to call this kind of behavior...Semi-hypocrisy?.. A summary of the players you're mostly going to find: It's one of the worst embodiment of "FYIGM" or simply "FYGM" (please use search-engine on those acronyms). Unless you're going to find a clan / guild who indeed are willful to help you play through the content they'd personally need to repeat (especially the quests which you'll need to do in order to unlock new "frames", unless you want to dish out ~20$ and over for them), you're going to, as being repeat, hit the multiplayer-locked content. I did mention mention the clan-exclusive equipments and frames, didn't I?.. Worse thing being that this game extremely "griefing-friendly": - Want to "steal-off" the Mission-accomplishment Credit-Rewards from rest of the team? Rush to the extraction point and "flag" the other players being "AFK" once the extraction-time ends! - Want to make sure people in Defence-mission won't get their rewards if they'd want to continue? Keep your "vote" on "Fight/Continue" until the very last second and then quickly click "Extract/Exit"! - Want to guranteen that the Survival-mission won't last longer than 5-minutes / easily less than 10-minutes? Activate all the Life Support / Oxygen Tanks as soon as they're activable. You can do this freely even when there would be "overflow". Bonus points if you rush the extraction and get rest of the "AFK-flagged" thus they won't getting their Credit-Rewards! - Spy & Rescue-mission? Avoid stealth! Bonus points if you bounced a team-mate into alarm-triggering-things with the available weaponry (E.G. grenada-jumo / bounce with "Tonkor") or Tenno-abilities (aka. abilities / magic)! - Capture? Rush & Trigger the "fleeing"-mode on target and let him escape! Of course, you won't getting any rewards either, but so won't the others either!! bonus points if they picked up a some rare-loot, which they're not allowed to keep now!!! - Sabotage? Rush & Hope that the "RNG-gods" activate the "meltdown"-countdown sequence. You'll have to avoid reaching extraction point too to make sure everyone fails! - Interception-well, now this is getting just silly... But you can "deny" enemies from spawning by keeping their "spawn-door" open near / right next to / on many of the capture-points! ...Techinicaly griefing regardless... I didn't mention that the game keeps a public "completion"-ratio stats too, so there's that too! ((Now where did i put that "The Game Makes the Community"-video...)) It's a amazing that all these things are perfectly according to vision & intentions of the developers of this game, especially when they play this game weekly on their live-stream-broadcasting-channel (which are archived on their Youtube-channel, as of writing this)...
Carnage;-;This game is one of the largest wastes of time you could invest in. Despite the fact that the sci-fi elements are intriguing, and promise a feeling of exploration and satisfaction, it satiates neither thirst. The game instead reduces the player to hacking and slashing, or firing guns blazing at hordes of faceless and uninspired 3D models, that don't deserve the title of enemy. They run and shoot towards you blindly, almost as blindly as you attack them, to an insignificant goal. Your rewards are next to none, assuming you don't invest over 150 hours a week (in which case this game may satisfy your urge for bland weaponry). If you so desire either weapons or new "warframe" suits, then you must resort to dedicating your career to this abomination or you must purchase the over-priced "platinum" currency. "For only $15 USD this single weapon could be yours!" is a paraphrase of their store's radio jingle. If you desire a pitfall in your life, then by all means sacrifice your wife and child's well-being to grind for that new "warframe" suit, but if not, don't subject yourself to the boredom and microtransactions.
Hideyoshi Kinoshita;-;Applause is in order for the developers for creating such a truly amazing game. It may be quite repetitive, but compared to a game like Call of Duty or Counter Strike, Warframe is not that repettitive. The game may be a grindfest, but all shooters are in some way a grindfest, and most have minimal customization. Call of Duty is nowhere near the customizational level, and counter strike is static uncustomizable to the max. And who wouldn't want to be a freaking space ninja? However this game is highly... well... Beta... glitchy... and all out hillarious or annoying when it does. I'm in love with this game. When you look in the platinum store and you see a weapon that is 150+ platinum, it's simply the developer's way of saying, "Here, be lazy if you want, but it'll cost you buddy!" There is no way that I can express the fun I've had on this game because the game itself is ever changing and ever updating, and best of all... FOREVER FREE. This game without a doubt has my seal of approval. I the Leader of Boxes everywhere am proud to give this game a 10/10! (and a 50/10 in Betaness)
ckks;-;Fair F2P where skill is rewarded
akarapat;-;great game with lots of variety :) defenitely cannot miss it!!!
josef hotpocket;-;This is one of the best free games you're gonna find on the market right now. The game has tons of levels, diverse enemies, and more weapons than you can shake 12 loosely bundled sticks at. The only minor complaint I had about the game was the need to buy more "backpack" slots using real money, but this has now been solved, with the recently added ability to trade in-game items for platinum. You have no reason to avoid this game. Try it, or suffer a less delightful life.
Lobster Johnson;-;Fun gameplay but absolutely stupid pricing. Grinding is fun if you like that kind of thing and all gameplay-changing things are able to get free with ingame currency.
:D;-;pretty sick game, throws u in the deep end. but pretty damn awesome
Offline;-;came because of katana stayed because of dark spaceships
Vanilla Gorilla;-;Great game. Many hours of fun are to be had. Ranking is a bit of a chore for some things but the boosters which, in the market say 80 plat, can be purchasable for 40 plat for 3 days, which is actually -very- worth it. Game can be a bit buggy sometimes, especially when a new numbered update comes out (14.0, 15.0 etc) but they get ironed out. Plus, if you're an Unreal Tournament fan, Digital Extremes helped creating those games and put some easter eggs in the game, like the Bio Rifle (Stug,) Ripper (Miter,) Flak Cannon (Drakgoon)
Sefiurae;-;To kill time, 10/10 would play. It's only fun if you play with friends you trust and know. But if you're tolerant to others, that's fine as well. Solo's also good but happiness would always be short-lived in this game. Also a good game to screw around~
Danucchi;-;Great game with a great concept, i thought this is another p2w space game, but you don't really need to buy stuff with your real money, you can sell your in game item to all rich  people and buy an item from poor  people, trading is everthing, and buy every premium item on game with your own enterprise 9/10, This game ruin my life
Red Shamrock;-;If you and your mates want some fast paced co-op action, tons of loadout options, lots of character options, smooth gameplay, great visuals, customizations up the wazoo. Here is your ticket for all that entertainment! This ever-expanding 3rd person shooter can provide countless hours of carnage, and a sick collection of characters and weapons that can be upgraded and modified to suit your gameplay styles. Solo is good.. Co-op is fantastic! I'd like to see more developers take a page from this book in regards to making Co-op more exciting. The PVP in the game could use a little work and expansion (fort captures and capture the flag). The biggest critisisms I could offer are that this game could use MORE and BIGGER boss battles. And a little bit of AI improvements on various enemies. Throw in a few more types of battle formats.. (like arena fights for instance) maybe a little vehicle warfare... (space ninjas on hoverbikes would be the bee's knees).. the current maps that are playable in the game make for good "instances" but a more open world approach would help bring more gamers to the scene without question.
Rarek;-;Played it a bit. Somewhat enjoyable. Only play on a good connection.
Fluffles The Killer Sheep;-;Very in depth F2P game. Feels like a high speed version of Mass Effect 3 multiplayer with map exploration. The story is not very well developed however you have a general idea what the plot line is. What really shines is the game play, gun action, sword action, and character/player actions are all really nice. The graphics look very good, smooth framerate, and I haven't spent a single dime to play this game. Without spending a single dollar you have access to 10+ characters and well over 75+ different weapons, just need the components provided by missions to build them all. I would recommend everyone give it a few hours of your time, it is a fun and expansive game now and will only get better as more updates/content keep getting added.
NonaSaido;-;This game won the world record for having the largest gathering of people wearing false mustaches simultaneously in a videogame. Nuff' said.
jac08028;-;I luv it. Mass Effect and Halo had a Co-op Ninja baby.
Consona;-;Good standing game in comparicing for other games in the same niche. +Looks like devs push their Evolution Engine pretty good; +Smooth gameplay; +Good matchmaking; +Nice weaponry and deal damage system; +Game become much better over time with new features, modes and fixed old ones; +Finally some AI improvement is going on; +Music improvements, now is pleased to hear; +Pretty responsible dev team to community; +Okay clan system. -Sadly low level of overall design (but have some tact) and palette and FX planning; pretty influencing, f.e. sometimes you find enemy or ally much faster at radar instead of just looking in front of you! in the middle of a battle. -Different diffuse and normal maps resolution in game assets; seriously? Devs haven't sense of object's scale? -Few quests, poor story; grinding feelings. -Some overload CPU performance; actually You not "feel" it ingame, but! if you monitor your Hardware or have any tasks in BG that using CP during game running you'll find out... -Some breaking logic elements in crafting and gameplay. -Minor not much gamebreaking bugs, some of them you don't even see if you're not so pedantic; things like slightly different damage dealt on host and client side of the game even with good network and data bandwidth and so on...
Alosaur;-;War Frame: BE a ninja alien chopping everything in half, If whilst playing you don't chop everything in half you are playing the game wrong.
ADAS20;-;For noobs, pick Excalliber
UltimationRogue;-;Literally pinned 3 enemies to a wall with a single arrow. 10/10 would stick again. ON A MORE SERIOUS NOTE: Eerily similar to Destiny (or is Destiny similar to Warframe?) but free. The "catch" is the in-game market currency that costs real money. Do not, however, let this stop you from getting Warframe. The in-game market currency (A.K.A. Platinum) only gets you boosters to help out with the game. Anything else that can be bought with platinum is obtained, difficult or not, through gameplay. Fantastic third-person run-and-gun game. Extremely impressive for a game that's Free-To-Play, possibly beating TF2 in that aspect. It's well-developed and updated often. Give it a try. What do you have to lose?
[ TCN ] CryptShade (Back 17th);-;So much details put into this game with so many lvl's and bosses. So much stuff you can build with resources you find in missions. this game sure is amazing :D 10/10
Ebohcalyps3;-;Why don't you have this game?
Degni;-;Do you love shooting them sum'bucks? Do you love magical powers? Do you love grinding your life of for rewards? Then this game is perfect for you. Warframe is without a doubt an awesome game, constant updates, a space themed FPS with magical powers to melt the faces of your enemies, very fast paced action, it's dynamic and you can parkour the entire level. You're never gonna be without a thing to do, but because of this we can talk about the only downside of the game, which for some others, like myself, aren't that bad of a negative point, I'm talking about the overgrind to get stuff like specific mods to upgrade your weapons, weapon parts and warframe parts. This game isn't difficult at all, the early phase is just fine to play without a sweat, and much more fun with friends, but you might reconsider if you're not in the mood to grind when you reach that near mid-game, but it is worth when you two-shot that freaking boss who killed you a bunch of times when you get more levels and better gear.
Romy;-;This Game is amazing , i played this all the time ... it has fancy graphics and a lot of cool looking weapons
Goodmen;-;1.) You're a ninja...in space. 2.) You have access to potential overkill weapons and abilities that you can upgrade any way you want. 3.) You basically become an "unknown hero" by saving the galaxy without a soul truly knowing. 4.) Nothing is ever truly the same time, going though the same area multiple times will show different maps and enemy layouts, so each time in a mission you have to think on your toes. 5.) Why are you still reading this and not in-game right now?
El Wango;-;Even though I don't understand this game fully yet, It's super fun with a friend or two......but this game gets to me because you have to pay for these in-game currency "silvers" to get some of the weapons and stuff. I could be wrong, but ovoerall good game!
Johnny;-;hell yeah! space ninjas! FOR FREE!
Wallarus;-;Best multiplayer F2P I know of on steam. Great for groups of 4, especially when you're relatively close in level.
Lizzard;-;Dispite what the masses say of the amount of grind this game holds (and the lackluster Metascore it has [Like anyone goes of that these days!]), Warframe has been quite the experience for my friends and I. The game is awesome, with the seventeen billion weapons, a wide range of warframes to play for (NO, not "pay" for), and various gametyps to play in. The crafting system implemented is unique, as it takes actual time to craft such weapons, keys, frames, gear, etc. And if this isnt enough for you to try a "Free to Play" game out, the game is still developing! thats right, more warframes, weapons, planets, missions, and all of the sorts are to come in the future. The developers are very good with the community, updating on a regular basis and fixing patches on the spot! and when I say pathces, I mean game breaking bugs. the balance issues come after good thinking and a discussion with there design council. In other words, TRY THE GAME OUT! (and if I were a metacritic rater, Id seriously consider revising that score up there, this game is more than grind if you've got the will and the friends). Did I mention Custom Clan Bases? :D
Windows 7 32bit;-;This game is really good. The new update make it looks really cool! I will DEFINATLY play it more!
SaltyShanghaiStevens;-;you play as a fish person that kills people that aren't fish people.....10/10
Eekling, Queen of the Offlane;-;Decent free to play model. Solid, fun gameplay, plenty of variety in regards to weapons, warframes (suits and their spells) and even personal drones. Great development team that keeps pushing the game further, adding more content.
Your Very Best Friend;-;Very challenging and interesting playstyle. Quite fun to do with other players and the entire mechanism is just extremely fun in my opinion. I would reccomend this game wholeheartedly to just about anyone who has ever played a shooter.
P0LYG0N;-;This game is so impressive, especially for a free-to-play game. I'm so invested, I've spent hours just trying to get it to work. Can't wait to get to the Title Screen, it's been hyped so much!
Ddraig;-;It has Salty Squids
0|\|3;-;For all jaded gamers, this is quick to get into, games are short and fun, and you can have an awesome time with friends. Afterall who doesn't love space ninjas.
Mr. Majestic;-;You sir! Yes you! Do you enjoy 3rd person games? Do you enjoy shooting games? How about games with swords? And what about games with wall running, sliding, flipping, air kicks and all other ninja moves, you enjoy those aswell? Do you like your games with a easy multiplayer setup and amazing clan function with a working meeting hall (dojo) and everything? Well then, my good sir, this game is for you! There is, however, a heavy P2W factor involved that will have you easily spending a couple of bucks a few hours into the game if you're the kinda guy that doesn't like working for his stuff. There is a supreme lack in any story in this game but the devs seem to be trying to patch that up with many new quest releases. Speaking of devs, here we have a development crew that are actually in touch with their community actually listen to them. Which is refreshing in the modern society of false promises and poor delivery in gaming today. All in all, great game, I haven't paid for a single thing yet and I'm having a blast so the P2W doesn't bother me that much. It's got solid game play and is seriously pretty. Did I mention they added moustaches?
Zekail;-;been playin this game for a couple months now got into the closed beta and grabbed a masters founders package, probably the best co-op shooter/hack n slash ive played in years
Zelophehad;-;I laughed, i cried, i learned a few life lessons here and there. But most of all i grinded like ing hell. Like this game is fun and stuff but i mean DAAAYUUUM. Well besides the grinding which isnt too bad if you dont think to much on it, this game is bad . Why wouldnt you want to play  a cyborg space ninja in well space. All in all i rate a 9 out of 10 bananas!
[PSAF] ancodia;-;A really good fremium game. Have really enjoyed the 'Space Ninja' style game play with differeing level difficultly and the ability to create new warframes from just playing rather than spending is a real positive. Lagging is sometimes an issue with this game, but happy to take that as an issue in 'beta'. Would recommend to anyone.
Zacki (  );-;loved this game
AceowL;-;this game is great but need to be reviewed because of update system in steam..
DefactoOverlord;-;playing, playing, playing, glance at the watch, whooops 5 hours gone
TigerTott;-;This game has got a lot of features that will get you addicted to it, but the thing that hooked me was the multiplayer. i have enjoyed this game through out all the patches.
|VEX| Sgt Kekka;-;Two Words. Space. Ninjas -Sgt_Kekka reccomended from Nova Storm
Peahron;-;Space Ninjas. Do I need to say more?
YamadaRyo;-;HI, i just wan't say something that i can't log in game.Then,something came out say Account suspended until Jan 01 2035 due to End User License Agreement Violation. What should i do? wait till Jan 01 2035 to play back again or need to creat new acc? comment pls
Pweness;-;Space ninja simulator with a self coloring system!
Khyber;-;With smooth animation and semi-simple controls, Warframe is on the right path. The graphics are pretty good, enough to run fluently. Gameplay can be a little difficult, with no real levels to train. It pushes you right into the game, and does a good job of explaining the controls for the most part. Some bugs may occur but it's on it's way. The sounds in the game are well done, an atmosphere that really pulls the player into the game. Gameplay may be a little intense. All in all, Warframe is a fairly good game, but it could use some improvements. 7/10
[EcG] VKhaun;-;Highly Recommended for the long term player. This game is still very much in development. The core gameplay works, but they're still struggling with balancing item drops and distribution systems. Bosses and areas are being revamped from placeholders, and major systems have not been implemented yet. Max rank for a player account is 30, and we do not have enough content yet to do more than barely scratch Rank 15 even doing everything. (02/18/2014). There's some negativity from players joining and expecting a finished and polished game as well as from established players who mistake incomplete or placeholder systems for 'bad' systems, but if you're looking for a long term shooter game with lots of progression and variety... frankly there aren't many good options out there right now. Warframe has TONS of weapons, VERY active development, REGULAR weekly content releases and the dev team turly listens and directly adresses player feedback in regular livestreams and forum 'community hot topic' posts. So I highly recommend it for the long term player despite it's struggles. The community also tends to be mostly baddies who don't use cover, don't aim at weakpoints and have no grasp of basic tactics. Sorry if jimmies are rustled but it's true. If you can cut it playing team survival games like Killing Floor or have experience with shooter games and can reliably get headshots, you will find getting started in this game far easier and less 'grindy' than people describe. Seriously. I'm not even trying to say that I'm any good, most people just treat it like it's Tabula Rasa 2 and run around shooting stuff center mass and comparing DPS all over the forums. If you are into action games you will just  all over warframe. Try it. Not P2Win. Everything is available without money except cosmetics and you can trade stuff to other players for the in-game currency they bought. Not PvP. There's basic dueling and some little arena stuff, but the game isn't balanced for it at all. Max players in a game is 4. Don't buy game currency full price. Wait for a sale or login reward coupon. It's like $10 for a gun buying small amounts at full price.
k''L !;-;Is The Best Game For Ever! And Cool :3 !!! >:D<
Kristen;-;Its fun. There have been a few changes that im not fond of, but adapt and overcome, and its really really really fun with a group of friends.
B R E A C H;-;This game is so addicting, it's a perfect example of why games don't necessarily need to have any sort of PvP to be extremely cool. Come and play Warframe. You will not regret it.
an average american;-;If you loved Dark Sector. You'll love this game. Warframe takes place in a far distant future from Dark Sector where the Solar System has been split up into multiple factions. The primary factions being the Grineer and Corprus. The Grineer being cloned brutes with industrial technology and the Corprus being merchants equipped with powerful weaponry and mechs. One of the greatest Space Ninja simulators.
sliento_x_EFF;-;i ing love dis game <3 i wanna marry it! <3
Quash;-;I like this game you can grind without grind. Or you can sprinkle grind on your grind with a side of grind, next to a heaping pile of grind while sipping on grind on ice.
gmike92;-;This is a game that has changed a lot since closed beta started. It's still in open beta and under heavy development, They are adding new content quite often, and usually have events go along with the major updates. Unless you are a founder they won't listen to players very much. So its a game filled with crazy content, sleek coding, and bugs. Overall its fun and fast paced game to play with friends or strangers. Just take it for what it is and not much more.
zRych;-;I first started playing this during the anniversrary and didn't really get into it that much. My friends and I didn't know how to play and I got bored fast. Then I picked it back up a month or 2 ago and now have almost 200 hours logged. Yea it's a grindfest, but it's a fun grindfest. Playing with random people or your friends, this game is fun no matter what
Patinaz;-;Basicaly: It's extremely fun. Only problem is that it's hard to find a squad of players to help you out on a lot of missions. Otherwise, the best 3rd person shooters I've ever played.
{MKG} Yoshi278 (      );-;420 out of 9.11 Would Farm Again
Death_Note;-;no have eye and nose but still good :D
Mii;-;To the new players in this game: Keep with it. It's a hard grind until you reach a certain point, then it'll pay off.
FPS Afofo;-;This is by far one of the most fun and addicting games ive ever played. The mission layout is fantastic and the warframe seem to develop personalities even though they dont speak, Warframe is very well maintained with its awesome staff team making the game fun for everyone. This isnt a "Pay to Win" free to play game at all its the opposite, everything you can buy can be crafted or found. i highly recomend this game to anyone wanting a fun free game to play with friends.
Wobbz;-;Fantastic f2p game everything can be earned ingame minus things such as extra equipment slots and warframe slots. Ahem think of it as a 3rd person space diablo esque type game and thats Warframe in a nutshell! Plenty of customisation is available for weapons via the Mod system for both weapons and warframe with each mod being upgradeable. The Dojo acts as your clans (guilds in Warframe) home base which YOU decide how it's laid out and whats being built and/or researched at any given time. PvP does exist but at the moment being in beta still it's not quite there yet but overall the Game is always improving every patch, the void is challenging, Survival can be extreme fun pushing yourself for those risky extra 5 minutes for another chance at that oh so rare mod and with the recent addition of the trading system this game will always be something I go back to!
RosalinaSama (birthday);-;the guy in the picture looks like pepsi man but it isn't so 2/10 (haven't even played it)
Zakora(RVN 651);-;you may stop playing it for a while but when you get bored and want to play something you get draged in to the gameplay and it gets even more fun than it already was :D i really recommend this amazing game to every one. You dont have to be a P2w (pay to win) because the DEVs make it easy to get every thing with out paying real life money you may get mad a bit from farming things to get stuff you want but its better than having to pay real money just to get stuff you can just farn for and its not that hard :D I really recommend this game to many gammers that loves FPS or TPS games and ninjas :D Now go have fun being a ninja :3
MIB;-;Been playing this game for a long time (The hours in my steam didn't sync with my warframe account idk why), and it's so much fun along with the community itself. Well this game is a "grinding" game which forces you to play missions over and over and over again, but it's so addictive. The most fun part is building your warframe/weapons until it Overpowered (or OP), putting the right mods and stuffs. There's so much memories in this game even i can't remember them all lol. Game score? for a co-op f2p i give it 7 out of 10.
erection;-;the game where everything 1 hits you and it takes 500 clips of a rocket launcher to kill a gorilla thing
JamieBhoy;-;This game is a must! My PC isn't the greatest at graphics capability but i can actually play this on high without and fps troubles! Basically what i'm saying is the game is beautiful for a free to play, And i can't stress this enough this game is not and i mean NOT pay to win, Of course you can buy things to help you progress a little faster but it doesn't effect us players so who cares? After all id rather grind for items, That's the whole point of playing a game.. Survival is probably the best game mode, So much fun and truely addictive.. I can totally see myself racking up a ton of gameplay hours on this!
T:Bones;-;Maybe you bother to read, maybe you dont. maybe this review will get top rated, maybe it wont. maybe you'll never see this, maybe you will. if you've seen this the last maybe-maybe doesnt count for you :D. i'm writing this review at 21/08/14, but i've stopped playing warframe because i was trying out some other games and got lured in by grinding, so some stuff might be outdated when you are reading this. i'm trying my best on english, grammar and typing but it might contain some grammar/ spelling-errors. plz no hate for those but i will try to fix asap if you say it in a post. CaPiTaLs have never been my thing, so you wont see many I's and. Capitals after . ... ... (dots). One of the most un-P2W games I've ever played. besides that, you are able to get nearly anything from the store. and you are gonna need additional weapon/ inventory slots. which can all be bought by.... .... .... platinum(premium, tradable currency)! there aren't any real boosters but there are "potatoes"/ catalysators which'll give your weapon/ warframe twice as much mod capacity. these catalysators are also availble through "lotus gift", an random alert which'll give you one of those. for some weapons/ frames you'll need to increase your mastery rank, which will increase by leveling up any gear. every weapon/ warframe has to be crafted if you choose to grind all its components and not pay for it. the blueprints can be bought from the store or can be found. its gonna cost you from one minute to 3 days for stuff to finish, weapons starting at 12h and the frames themselves high and lonely at the top. all can ve rushed for..... guess what? platinum! when its finished you'll have to go through the regular path of claiming it, and than leveling, to a max of lvl 30. why do i have to lvl it? because itll get you mod capacity! allowing to omptimize your gear and fine-tune it according to your playstyle. there are, starter weapons (MK-1 mostly) regular weapons, expansive regular weapons, clan tech and grindy prime stuff (prime components/ blueprints are tradable). for clan tech you'll obviously need a clan which has build a room, allowing you to build research rooms (a total of 4). in every research room you can ... research stuff! good guessing. researching will require credits (non premium currency, not tradable. but required to trade!) and a lot of time/ platinum. once researching is done you can get the blueprint. there are sentinels and kubrows to help you in your mission. a sentinel is a floating thing which can be customized and modded. there are multiple sentinels with multiple guns. once you've made a sentinel you'll also get its gun. you'll have to craft the sentinel for the gun but you can equip nearly any gun on any sentinel. every sentinel will also come with its own special abilities. same goes for kubrows, but these are melee and look more like a dog. they'll help you and have some awesome mods to be equipped. for guns you have a primary and a secondary. including bows, crossbows, shotguns, rifles, sniper rifles, throwable knives and special stuff. you can get 30 to 60 mod capacity on these. melee! you have long swords, short swords, dual sword, daggers, a glaive, axe, dual axe, whips, some hammers and more. these also have 30-60 mod capacity which can be upgraded by stance mods. allowing you to perform combo's and increasing the stamina cost. warframes. all have their unique powers (though some powers closely resemble eachother), speed, hp, shield, armor, stamina and energy. warframes are equippable with aura mods which'll give a team-wide bonus. they also give additional mod capacity. you have tanky frames to stealth frames. engineer frames and "medic" frames. and more. you cannot chance a frame's gender. frames will also get a little energy/ hp/ shield bonus with every lvl they gain. mods. as said you have a mod capacity. you'll gain one to two mod capacity for every level your weapon/ frame/ whatever gains. melee and frames have stance/ polarity slots which'll increase the mod capacity even more. whats that? i have added so many mods and i want to max them all but i cant because i've reached the max! no worries, forma is here to save the day. forma..? yeah, it resembles some golden puzzle piece and is able to change that little icon you can see in the upper right corner of every mod-slot. but! forma doesnt save the day for free, it wants maxed gear! so it can eat every precious level away until its unranked! you'll do that for you dearest weapon wont you? forma isnt that hard to get, it will sometimes be availble through alerts and can be found in OD missions. :o what is OD? its orokin derelict. fight infested on an infested orokin ship. BPs can be bought in the store and will require a nav coordinate and ANY void key. dont was your T3 and T4 here, just use T1 or T2 if you want. this game will get you grinding pretty fast. STOP! when you start grinding the fun is gone (for me). look for some friends, invite them to the game, maybe start up your own clan with them? get together in a (4 players max) squad, and have fun! if you care, my favourite weapons and frames are: valkyr/ zephyr. ogris/ ignis. none/ yet. jat kittag. Beware: everything except valkyr is clan tech, and zephyr requires tons of oxium (i bought it .-.)
Greg;-;By far the most fun you can have in Co-op, with gorram space ninjas and crazy guns. Endless fun, with a great community and ongoing updates that constantly expand the scope of the game. And if you're a tight- free2play type, Digital Extremes have the most fair monetization system I've seen in any f2p game.
BigFatGiant;-;This game is awesome
Teakiyari;-;Cool game space ninja wars FTP. like the box said :) Make your your way trough the missions modes exterminate, sabotage, defense, capture, interception, excavation and planet boss fights all while building new frames/weapons. U get mod cards to power it along the way. Build your self a sentinels robot to cover your back and join u on your quests as of update 14 We got kubrows (wolf bat cat dogs XD) as a battle pet as your companion option. Most things (all if u trade items for platinum near end game) in the game are able to be obtained for free though it can be a lot of work. The Platinum is priced kind of high but then again the devs need to make a living somehow so get it if u like to support the devs :) and u can always wait on a steam sale or login reward discount. War is a grind but im having a blast while doing it ^^
Demynx;-;this is a great shooting sci-fi game.really i think most players who love space games then this is 1 to play like anyother.
L.;-;[POSITIVE ASPECTS OF THE GAME] + No real "Pay 2 Win" scheme (more like "Pay 4 Convenience") + Almost everything can be acquired without having to pay (except for cosmetics/skins) + Graphics are topnotch, even at lowest resolution/details + Hell-a-lot fun with friends/comrades-in-arms + Many weapons + frames to choose from + Passionate developers (you can really see that they love to work on Warframe) [NEGATIVE ASPECTS OF THE GAME] - Entire game is about grinding - you want a new weapon? Grind the resources. New frame? Same story. - Massive grindwalls in some scenarios ("grind to grind") - Balancing Issues (somewhat remedied with Damage 2.0, still needs tweaks) - 83% of the community are entitled and dense motherf****** - Some issues which are persisting for months now still haven't been addressed (as minor as they may be) - RNG everywhere Would I recommend it? To be honest, I love this game, despite its flaws. I'm not a collector, nor do I feel like a perfectionist with a mild case of OCD (Obsessive-Compulsive Disorder, though many people tend to use this anxiety disorder in the wrong context). One of the main reasons, however, why I keep playing is the Co-Op aspect of this game - you can solo the entire content, but it's more fun with a bunch of friends. Even the grinding becomes less of a pain. If you are in tight-knit community or have friends you play with on a regular basis, I urge you to try this game out. Don't expect an epic story/lore, though - this game has anything but lore (only bits and pieces of what one could call a story).
Ori0n;-;The best 3rd person shooter online co-op i`ve played .. and a true free to play game thanks to in-game trading system, that allows you trade for platinum ( a currency gained by real money) . Also it can be repetitive, the new events compensate it. Still is in Beta. All you have to do is playing it and you can unlock all the content .
JU-JU;-;Just play it I guess... I played it, got stuck. What am I doing with my life? ._.
Bet;-;So let me get this straight: you took UT2K4's Invasion mode, added RPG elements, then set that simple, neat package arunnin' in a completely frenetic Assault mode, put it in the current UT engine... and then released it for free? Wow.
Rizsparky;-;Awesome game, runs very well and reasonable microtransactions.
[UT] aleco247;-;It's a game were you play as a space ninja with powers who has their own ship and travels the galaxy with their pet dog kicking a** at every planet. What more could I say. The best part is that it's all free.
Leo Leviathan;-;Great game. its pretty unique and lots of fun.
[B]lind Pilot;-;Just AWESOME. This game will make you want to be in completely. You will go to bed with a dream of a future world where fights for justice never stop (like superhero movies) :')
Nirack;-;One of the best F2P that I have ever played. Highly recommended.
DoctorrNick;-;This game is pretty cool, and it's free! Ok heres the run-down: You are known as Tenno, which look like space ninjas, and your job is to save the galaxy, I believe, its multiplayer still in beta so don't get too angry with the game. But overall it's fun and I will be playing it!
Goodmen;-;1.) You're a ninja...in space. 2.) You have access to potential overkill weapons and abilities that you can upgrade any way you want. 3.) You basically become an "unknown hero" by saving the galaxy without a soul truly knowing. 4.) Nothing is ever truly the same time, going though the same area multiple times will show different maps and enemy layouts, so each time in a mission you have to think on your toes. 5.) Why are you still reading this and not in-game right now?
El Wango;-;Even though I don't understand this game fully yet, It's super fun with a friend or two......but this game gets to me because you have to pay for these in-game currency "silvers" to get some of the weapons and stuff. I could be wrong, but ovoerall good game!
Hideyoshi Kinoshita;-;Applause is in order for the developers for creating such a truly amazing game. It may be quite repetitive, but compared to a game like Call of Duty or Counter Strike, Warframe is not that repettitive. The game may be a grindfest, but all shooters are in some way a grindfest, and most have minimal customization. Call of Duty is nowhere near the customizational level, and counter strike is static uncustomizable to the max. And who wouldn't want to be a freaking space ninja? However this game is highly... well... Beta... glitchy... and all out hillarious or annoying when it does. I'm in love with this game. When you look in the platinum store and you see a weapon that is 150+ platinum, it's simply the developer's way of saying, "Here, be lazy if you want, but it'll cost you buddy!" There is no way that I can express the fun I've had on this game because the game itself is ever changing and ever updating, and best of all... FOREVER FREE. This game without a doubt has my seal of approval. I the Leader of Boxes everywhere am proud to give this game a 10/10! (and a 50/10 in Betaness)
ckks;-;Fair F2P where skill is rewarded
akarapat;-;great game with lots of variety :) defenitely cannot miss it!!!
josef hotpocket;-;This is one of the best free games you're gonna find on the market right now. The game has tons of levels, diverse enemies, and more weapons than you can shake 12 loosely bundled sticks at. The only minor complaint I had about the game was the need to buy more "backpack" slots using real money, but this has now been solved, with the recently added ability to trade in-game items for platinum. You have no reason to avoid this game. Try it, or suffer a less delightful life.
0|\|3;-;For all jaded gamers, this is quick to get into, games are short and fun, and you can have an awesome time with friends. Afterall who doesn't love space ninjas.
Mr. Majestic;-;You sir! Yes you! Do you enjoy 3rd person games? Do you enjoy shooting games? How about games with swords? And what about games with wall running, sliding, flipping, air kicks and all other ninja moves, you enjoy those aswell? Do you like your games with a easy multiplayer setup and amazing clan function with a working meeting hall (dojo) and everything? Well then, my good sir, this game is for you! There is, however, a heavy P2W factor involved that will have you easily spending a couple of bucks a few hours into the game if you're the kinda guy that doesn't like working for his stuff. There is a supreme lack in any story in this game but the devs seem to be trying to patch that up with many new quest releases. Speaking of devs, here we have a development crew that are actually in touch with their community actually listen to them. Which is refreshing in the modern society of false promises and poor delivery in gaming today. All in all, great game, I haven't paid for a single thing yet and I'm having a blast so the P2W doesn't bother me that much. It's got solid game play and is seriously pretty. Did I mention they added moustaches?
RalphRoberts;-;This game is fun to play, alone or with others, and you can get the whole experience without spending a nickel!
Ninjavitus;-;One of the best F2P games I have ever played. If you like 3rd person action shooters with a lot of mobility, this is the game for you.
Skya #floppy;-;Awesome game though me glitches tho
Forevener;-;Smooth shooter/action experience. It's a good game for everyone who fond of farming. And actually, there is more farming than in Farming Simulator.
Shanodin;-;Ninjas play free and you too.
{GaS} SpAcE;-;Awesome Game. Nice Graphics and a user friendly Interface. Highly Recomended
DreX #DopeB HYPE;-;An AWESOME F2P game, there were so many bugs when I started playing this, but developers working on this game so hard. It's not Pay 2 Play game like the other f2p games, nearly anything except colors (which u can get from events) can be obtained in game by playing. It's combinated FPS Coop shooting game where you can do climbing, wallrunning, jumping, sliding and much more. There are so many weapons like swords, katanas, scythe, polearms, rifles, bows, crossbow, pistols, grenadelaunchers etc. I recommend to gather some friend and play together because it's really nice game with very long gameplay. +Gameplay +Graphics +It's free +Great Guidance +Long Gameplay +Creativity +Great Community (not like blaming ppl in DotA2, LoL, HoN etc.) -Bugs (Of course it's still Beta) -Problems with connection to a friend
IWantFree;-;Definitely worth checking! Large variety of weapons and equipment...... I do no regret all the time put in this game.
The_Rihard;-;Great game for friends to play together. it's a bit of a grind to collect enough materials to build new weapons and warframes but it's well worth the effort once you build them. Overall all a great game to play.
XDM.Pope Nope;-;BEST GAME EVER PLAYED BY HUMANS lol
Hydeon;-;The best co-op shooter I've played in awhile. Everyone should check this one out
epicface54321;-;unless you have a good laptop, I would say that you should not play this game unless you are okay with the lowest qualtity setting or graphic setting.
Alavadia;-;As host of Warframe Overview, I would recomend this game to people whom like the following games.. -Mass Effect -Deadspace -Ninja Gaiden -Dark Sector -Metal Gear Solid: Revengeance or if you like games that are like.. -Dungeon Crawlers -Co-Op -Ninjas -Samurais -Sci-Fi Games You would LOVE Warframe. It's heavily based around Co-Op and Team work, although you can play solo, but you should bring a team along for later levels! It may not have a lot of customization as far as your character looks. ( Besides that of, Different Helmets, colours, and Different Warframes ) But it makes up for it in it's Mod System which is quite unique and allows you to Make your Warframe how YOU want it. ( Provided you can find the mods in game that is~! ) This game also has a VERY Friendly and Helpful community. This game is unique in a lot of aspects as far as the controls, style, graphics and just overall gameplay. Everything in the game is actually OBTAINABLE in game, provided you stick to it for a few hours, you can get anything in the Marketplace in game. Except for a few things like Extra Slots for weapons and Warframes, Which is being looked into! The game does force you to be P2P ( Peer to Peer, Not Pay to play ) when playing multiplayer, and can be a pain, if you're not set in the correct region. ( I'm talking to you Australians. Whom can't seem to pick the correct Region, causing us to lag terribly! We love you guys, but c'mon! ) The game can be challenging at times, but the difficulty curve can be conquered if you stick with the game a bit! There is also a little bit of a learning curve to it, but you'll get the hang of it! ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~ [PROS] + Gorgeous Graphics ( Even on low! ) + Excellent Optimization ( Can run on almost any Machine ) + Awesome Co-Op game + Loads of Mods, Items, Warframes AND PETS! + Everything is able to be obtained in game! + Great community + Devs are friendly, supportive, and love to put ideas of the community in game! + Challenging Bosses, Most are unique! + Ninjas ( WALL RUNNING! ) + Customer Support is fast and friendly ( And Human! ) + Lots of Language support! + Tons of fun [CONS] - Peer to Peer connections, No servers ( YET ) - Weapon Slots and Warframe Slots are only obtained with Platinum ( But Devs have said they will work on changing it! ) - Some bosses are not so unique, and seem to be more of Bullet Sponges - Difficulty/Learning Curve might not be for everyone ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~ But that's all I have to say, if you are looking for information on Warframe, or just want to learn more about the game.. Make sure you head on over to.. www.warframe.com or you can check out the Warframe Overview Channel, where we talk about everything Warframe. www.youtube.com/arrucard1
Giant Swan;-;Mass effect 3 multiplayer but your a ing space ninja.
Kloaked;-;This parkour-based shooter has more to offer than what most review websites will lead you to think about the game. IGN for example have given this amazing game an 'average' score, but both reviews were only based on a few hours of gaming. This is not a game you can play for four hours and judge if you are new to this type of game (which many gamers will be). I will tell you they missed out on so much because the game is more than "run and gun" and "kill that enemy" and "complete that objective". Many, including IGN say this game is repetitive (which in a sense it is), but so is Call of Duty and that seems to always recieve high scores. If you are a fan of the game Star Wars Jedi Knight: Jedi Academy, you will fall in love with this game. The parkour-style from Jedi Academy was something special to me, allowing for many different ways of killing my foes. You can wall-run vertically and horizontally, opening up dramatic ways of killing your foes with a steady aimed headshot, or dive-bomb with your preferred melee weapon to cut some aliens and robots in half. Yes, this game has aliens and robots. The Tenno, the Warframes you can play as, are speculated to be trained by Jason Tenno, the character you play as in the game Dark Sector. If you have played the game or watched videos, at the end of the game, Jason Tenno looks strikingly similar to the Excalibur Warframe in the game. Warframe was originally going to be Dark Sector 2, but the concept and idea behind it went dark. Later, the idea for Warframe surfaced and Digital Extremes saught a publisher to help fund the game, which they were unsuccessful. DE took it upon themselves to make Warframe, and now we are able to play their vision of Warframe - not a game that could have been locked down to deadlines that would ruin the vision. Warframe has a Diablo grind, so lets get that out of the way. In the game you will do many missions to gain experience separately for your Warframe armor, weapons and overall account rank. Your account rank determines which weapons you are able to craft. It gives you a goal. Each planet has different missions: Survival, Exterminate, Defense, Sabotage, Deception, Mobile Defense and Assassination. Each of these missions obviously have different goals, but it's up to you and the squad you are put with to decide how it's accomplished, which is where the fun of the game is. When you have gotten your Warframe armor and weapons strong enough, you will be able to attempt Void and Derelict missions, which are among the hardest missions in the game and require a team, not every man for themselves. The rewards for those missions range from Prime Warframe parts to Prime Weapon parts, and more. Every Warframe has different abilities and stats. Some offer more tanky, some offer straight up damage, some support, but they all kick . These Warframe armors can be customized with various colors and helmets currently in your arsenal. There's quite a variety of weapons in the game which will suit everyone's preferences and style. Everything from shotguns to bows. They are all color customizable to match your Warframe. If you made it this far in the review, then you are likely going to at least try the game. Remember, the game is still in beta and is unfinished. If you give this game more than a day, I guarantee you it will be among your top played games list because you won't be able to stop playing sometimes. The gameplay of this game is among the best in the industry by far. I will not give this game a 'score' like Metracritic because I will not sellout to the lazy people who only look at scores from people who have a bad taste in games and only like Call of Duty. This game deserves more attention than it's getting. It's backed by a development team who are creating something unique, something beautiful, and something addicting. No, this is not some kind of new porn. Just go play the game.
John Motherfucking Cena;-;cant stop playing
Corburger & fries;-;Jump, shoot, spells. A third person romp that is best enjoyed in short bursts, for the grind is insanity. A fairly refreshing adventure when it comes to killing vast quantities of things. I actually find the bizzare melty design of everything appealing, asthetic wise!
enderwarrior;-;love this game my favorite sci-fi game
RandomDudeOP;-;Recommend this game, new interesting stuff comes out every update, so you have that going. But the maps can get a bit repetitive sometimes, and if it does, go to a new planet!
Wsekrakr;-;This is the game of 2013 for me. Cool action with distinctive weapons and swords, beautiful sets to destroy your foes. There's a Dojo where you and your clan can battle in pvp mode, and you can test your own build Warframe with others. There are monthly updates that bulk up the game time after time. If you don't play this yet, just download it for free and start pew pewing your way through the galaxy.
Gallon Would;-;Ran in to a green laser wall and was brutaly shot to death 11/10
Draknus, Scion of Tiamat;-;There are many free-to-play games out there that use their "free" status to constitute shoving a reason to spend money in the player's face. When they don't do that they usually have very little actual gameplay that makes you feel like your progressing anywhere. These are the games that are often labeled as "pay to win" for the need to pay money to progress anywhere. Warframe is the rare example of a free-to-play game done perfectly right. Except for one minor detail, but I'll get to that. Paying money in Warframe gives you the in-game currency platinum, which can buy a multitude of different weapons, warframes (basically armors/classes of this game), and other components used in the game. While these things can all be bought though, they are all achievable through regular gameplay as well. In fact there are many items, especially weapons, that can only be aquired as you progress through the game. All it requires is a little patience, and if you have a group of friends you will probably be flying through the game building awesome new weapons and warframes like no tomarrow. The only thing that could hold a completely new player back is the learning how the game works. The game doesn't have a very well built system intoduction yet (I say yet because the game is still in beta and is constantly getting new content and updates). The game never pushes you to pay anything either, in fact the advertising for the platinum system is almost entirely kept tucked away inside of the in-game shop, which you only ever open if you want to buy something (the shop contains both items that you pay platinum for, or blueprints for those items which are bought using credits earned by playing). The only time this rule is ever broken is when your trying to customize your character or get too many weapons/warframes. The customization of your character's look in the game is relatively small, but it is made even smaller by the fact that only 1 out of the 9 color pallets as well as many of the cosmetic items and skins are locked behind platinum payments. This is a relatively small complaint however, as cosmetics play no role in the gameplay. The bigger concern is the fact that you have a limit of how many warframes and weapons you can store. You can buy more slots with platinum, but if you don't want to spend money then you'll have to give up a weapon when a new one is finished building. So far I've been talking about the payment plan of the game. So you might be wondering: 'What is the gameplay and story like?' Well here is the answer, the gameplay is amazing. On the outside it looks basically like any other 3rd person shooter (although the graphics are exceptionally good), this game is far more complex than it looks though, and has far more to give you in terms of action than a simple shooting experience. Before I go into the little details though let me explain some of the backround story. You are a Tenno, basically a space ninja, and you must fight a multitude of enemy factions fighting for control of the solar system along-side your fellow Tenno in order to mantain balance. That's the back-story and as for regular stoeyline within the game, their is very little. In fact the game's storyline reminds me of Dark Souls in the way the storyline was made to be purposfully miniscule in order to get the player to fill in the gaps themselves and create their own personal story. The real question after learning the story though is: if your a ninja wouldn't this have far more gameplay to it than just a simple shooter experiance? The answer is yes, and this game provides that in the form of parkor, melee weapons, and best of all, ninja super powers. The parkor can be a lot of fun, the melee is a bit lacking (as of the time of this writing an update will soon be coming out that will be improving melee usage), and the super-powers are amazing. These powers are unique to each warframe you use (each one has four powers) and can range from something as simple and destuctive as throwing fireballs at enemies (used by a warframe called Ember) to something team based and useful like Healing the health of your allies (Trinity/Oberon). While the powers of each warframe could decide your play style, they don't have to. Every warframe and weapon is highly customizable with different upgrades called "Artifact Modules", more commonly called "Mods". These are gained from fallen enemies or the completion of mission objective and adds a huge amount of depth to the game. There are nearly 300 different mods in the game, and more get created all the time. There is a limit to modifications you can put on your weapons and warframes though, so choices must be made. The level up system is rather interesting and goes in a sort of imaginary pyramid. On the top is the player level. This unlockes the use of certain weapons and warframes. In order to gain XP for yourself you must level up your weapons and warframes, which go up to level 30. The higher level the item, the more mods you can apply to it and the mods themselves can be leveled up by fusing mods together, maximizing at different points depending on the mod. The one problem I have with this entire game is map design. The maps (especially during the first few planets) are boring and repetative to look at. While the later maps get more interesting the first few hours can look really bland. This could be a major problem if the game was fully released, but it is, as I said before, still in beta, and this is a problem that has been adressed and is being worked on as I right this. The fact that it is in beta and is still being upgraded and added to is why I look forward to the future of this game so much. It's in open beta, and the developers are always taking advice from the players themselves. Everything from weapons, warframes, and even story ideas are taken from the players and used to help create more for the game. In this way the players and developers are working together to make this game the best that it can be. While this game still could get better or worse, I can only see it getting better with the kind of devotion and teamwork shown by both the players and the creators of the game. So in the end, after my current 200 hours of playtime in this game, do I recommend it? YES. I do.
Gotghou;-;Really, Really, Really fun game to play. Just make sure you have people to play with..
kQkQrQ;-;"Perfect World Entertainment buys Digital Extremes, the developer of Warframe." PERFECT WORLD ENTERTAINMENT. Please do not kill Warframe. Warframe is an amazing game just the way it is. Do not change it. Do not do anything to it. Let Digital Extremes stay in charge. Do not do to Warframe what you've done to countless other games. Please PWE, I beg of you. Let Warframe live.
[NbY]HOTAMETANEO'O.;-;not to reviewing just to says that steam suck balls that it
Jozhxy;-;similar to dead space type. Much awesome Such graphics So addicted  wow
ThOdOr1s;-;What happens when you combine the Parkour from Mirrors Edge, with Bullet Physics, Moba-like Power-ups and Melee? An unplayable pulp... And yes, thats what Warframe was for a while Unplayable, confusing, straight up bad... But this game has seen in its one and a half year of existence, more attention than any other game I have ever played, and it was attention from the Devs, and Players alike. Its step by step evolution from unplayable to epic was a long journey, one that I was a part of. Warframe is now closer to the final draft than ever before, and in my opinion is one of the few fun and original shooters out there The current mechanics offer a great spice up to the genre and the co-op focused nature of the game makes it feel like an epic RPG rather than a generic VS shooter The amazing character designs and settings, the concept and the lore of the game are delivered in an amazing way. They make this game pleasant without much unnecessary dialogue and cutscenes, and the ran-gen nature of the map and enemies, is a powerful tool, than ensures differentiation in weapons and tactics, even if you are to play the same level again, you will never find the same enemies at the same place, using the same gun Dont let the Free to play scare you away! Warframe is a no-Paywall game You can craft everything in there through normal gameplay, get the materials and build all the things! Or you can buy them with platinum to support the game! (You need Platinum to buy weapons slots and cosmetics) Yes, Warframe is not a perfect game, and its not a finished game It can be really frustrating at times and it lacks many things. But its finally on the right path. Seeing a game get from unplayable to amazing doesnt happen often. But what I always saw, is that Warframe has this, sort of retrieving quality Maybe its the community, maybe its the huge flow of quality content, maybe its just the stunning way this game looks, maybe its the sheer fun this game exhales, maybe it's the people that I met in the game, the tenno in my clan, or maybe its just me I could never stop playing this game Its only clear that we have a gem in our hands, and that it gets brighter every day Warframe, you won! Tenno on guys! ^^
TFKO;-;Great Gun/Blade FPS game.. once you get used to it... you will be hooked.
Gosts;-;gameplay: pretty good but a little poopy. DE sometimes changes the poopy things but not very fast. still enjoyable progression: very snappy compared to most MMOs, you can get new things very easily. maxing stuff out in every possible way takes a long time but that's good because you need something to do if you do everything else graphics: very nice, pretty effects, etc. story: you are a space ninja robot man so 10/10 dumb : crafting important things like new warframes (characters) takes days IRL, but you can still do other stuff in the mean time and you don't need to be logged in or anything. End game content is pretty poopy. Some tilesets get used a bit too much (but they add new ones sometimes, and they're still much better than going through the exact same dungeon constantly) Sometimes the game bugs out but fortunately it won't ruin your session very often and if it does you can just kill yourself and let your team finish the mission for you.
Curtis Kobainis;-;this isnt a very good representation of astronauts. you cant even go to the moon
False Prophet;-;When it comes to discussing Warframe, I can say a lot of stuff. I can mention a refined game system, which updates even further over time. I can praise the developers, who obviously love the game they create and are fast to bring us the new stuff. I can say that Warframe is the first game that attracted me with its unique style. But the thing that I love the most is the setting lore - well, its scattered parts, which are brought with every new update. The lore is by far the most original thing in the game: how about a well mixed coctail made of space adventures, roman and japanese culture? Don't forget the feeling of waking up in a cryocapsule and realising that there are very few left of your nation, if any, and everyone else in the universe hates you.
BeesKneesMan;-;Great developers who listen to the community and are not afraid to give us goodies. VERY fun combat and huge variety of weapons and frames, I enjoy every minute in Warframe.
Ben The I.T. Guy;-;Looks Good, Runs well on my machine, and is co-op. #Freetoplay, #Installthis, #Playwithfriends ////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////////// This was my Review when I had pumped almost 6 hours into this game, blinded by the depth of the crafting table, resource gathering and exploring the solar system. 240 hours in I can say this game is nothing but a glorified farming simulator, you spend hours grinding for gear you think you need, 15 min for one little resource that you need out of 5 to build your little potato so you can make your warframe more powerfull, oh big whoop! but imagine grinding 15 min for reasources 5x for each of your weapons? and I have about 8 weapons, 6 warframes and a  tonne of blue prints. Okay so you level up and grind untill you have such an over powerd warframe that you can take on the later levels with ease, but guess what? now you have access to the void on wow! this game is soo indepth I never saw this coming new levels and everything. The enemies get a new skin, do more damage and its all pretty much the same but in these levels staying alive 20 minutes or more only gets you the good resources, so you gotta keep grinding. Just keep swimming for the ultimate goal right? what goal? you allready have all you want, oh but what about that one warframe that you dont have Vulban, who can only be unlocked by spending all your waking hours on the game to catch the 3 alert missions you need to grab all his parts, they come and go randomly in the game and sometimes only last an hour, without all 3 parts you cant build  and are left with no way of gaining the others untill you find and play the next super rare alert mission. It took me 240 hours before I could build Vulban, I played with him for 4 hours, yea hes pretty ing sweet. but not worth it in my opinion. Now there is nothign more I wish to do. Nohting more I wish to see. I have finaly escaped the grind for resources and see little else in this game. 7/10
Hooplah;-;This game is amazing and has alot of key elements which will want you coming back for more. Although confusing at first, if you have a friend who knows the game and can help you learn about it, this game is a fantastic Game for all who enjoy hash n' slash shooters.
Itou Sora;-;I really wish there was a inbetween instead of just yes or no for recommendations. This game is pretty fun but it's gated fun. Like the game forces new players to grind an amount so large I simply cannot believe anyone can put up with said grind without the game strong arming them into throwing some dollars at it. It would be so much fun if it was more accessible.
Draven;-;It's ok I guess.
sharkle;-;Warframe is a really beautiful game with interesting gameplay, but after time gets very repetitive. Lots of grinding for the items/gear/frames you want, but can be truly rewarding. I love this game, but I wish there was more incentive to complete worlds. I also wish there was a larger variety in mission type, because its basically either assassinate a special dude, kill all the enemies, or defend a cryopod. Variety would make this game 10/10. At this point I would still give it a 8/10. Again, its ing GORGEOUS on highest graphic settings. Would fap to.
MivwTaupos;-;is free but fun:)
Rashja;-;Absolutely fantastic 3rd person shooter.. allowing you to build n mod your characters & weapons to your suit style! Of course this takes time, but that's half the fun! great graphics, awesome teamplay and just plain addictive fun!
PreX' Ash;-;you could slice people up 10/10
Steve Winwood;-;Deja Vu Simulator 2014. The amount of identical corridors gives a sense of mystery and the decision to keep playing or not. Definitely recommended for mental patients of a kind as they can relate to the repetetive and intuitive design.
Sniper No Sniping;-;Its a great game for what it is worth... the idea of space ninjas seemed idiotic at the time.... until I started playing..... it is worth the time to play..... Parkour, guns, rocket launchers.... who wouldn't love that.
I ate the waffles;-;I enjoy playing this game.
The Incredible Pebble;-;This game is definately a good reccomend for anyone who has the time and the paitience (or money) to progress in it. This game is being constantly updated with new content every week, some small, some game changing, but always progressing, chances are if you played this game earlier in its beta that it is a completely new beast from whatever you lasted tasted - everything has been up for change: the damage system, the melee system, the upgrade system, the UI, the hud, the parkour, individual warframe abilites have all been successful candidates for overhaul and have improved the game. The only major gripe is that the level of content and lack of support can currently make things daunting for newer players to learn. But again, this is something the devs are currently working on to improve. The only issue with how well you'll do will depend on how quickly you join and the sooner the better. It's a beta, you'll run into glitches and hitches, it's just how it works, you'd be hard pressed to find even fully released titles that don't have bugs, but it'd be harder to find a dev team more dedicated to pushing this game forward than the team behind Warframe. This game is going places and you should definately consider joining the ride now while you have the chance to get the upper hand as soon as possible. To top it all off, it's a game about space ninjas with superpowers, honestly I don't see what else you want.
Clonus;-;I very well done and original thought game. 9/10 The graphics and scenery are beautiful although they are repetative even when you switch planets. A little work could go into variety. I started playing when it was still in beta release and up to now I still find it an enjoyable game to eat the time away. The game modes and the missions draw you in with the somewhat interesting storyline. There are zombies in this game and what is not to like about a space sword wielding hero slicing everything up in his/her path. The third person aspect is what makes this game amazing for free-to-play. I recommend this game for anyone who wants to be the exterminator of the Dead Space Plague. :P
Jewbacca;-;Mothufudgin space ninjas. Game is really well coded and there a very few things (only cosmetic) you can't earn in game. Also Punchy.
Nihonica;-;The Good: - Good Graphics and Gameplay - Cooperative Mode at its best - Last updates made the interface more friendly - Most items can be crafted without the help of real money (even Warframes! *takes some time to do, but its worthy) - Can sell items in the Market (finally) The Bad: - Empty servers - Money takes you very far (the difference between a free-player and a cash-player is pretty evident) - Still in Open Beta (some updates kind of f*** your character, your upgrades sometimes don't make much sense anymore) Every game has a bad side (Cashers are a real problem in MMO's), but Warframe can provide a good time with your friends, lots of things to do AND with the new Steam inventory integration, now is possible to sell items in the Market (item crafting now will be more fast and less frustrating). I totally recommend this. Sorry for the bad english <3
indestructable;-;Excellent game, Excellent game play. Loads of fun to play with friends or randoms. The huge amount of grinding in this game can get tedious, but the different weapons and "frames" are loads of fun to collect. The developers are very dedicated to the community and over the course of the game have made improvements of insaine scale. With new things coming out every few weeks, this game will always bring a fresh face to an awesome gameplay style.
Hucca;-;Beatifully fluent game for those who love space cyborg ninjas.
St0l3n_ID;-;Third Person Shooter with wallrunning and totally playable without spending money. My favorite game on Steam, and if that isnt enough... The game has tripled its contents since i started playing and is still expanding to get more variety. The UPS: Action packed, good graphics, good multiplayer experience. Constant flow of new weapons, balance patches and huge additions. Dedicated developers. Suprisingly fair business model, you dont have to pay a thing, ever, if you dont care about keeping every single weapon (you totally dont have to). A good amount of the guns haver their own firing mechanics, and the new mod system allows for weapons to be buffed against certain enemies and purposes. The DOWNS: Can get grindy, very very CPU intense. Some of you might be put off by constant changes to the balance that the game is undergoing in the last half year. But thats why its a beta, and it wont go on for long. Another prolbem at the moment is that two of the tilesets are somewhat overused, but those get slowly replaced as new tilesets come along. I can only recommend it, its a ton of fun, and its free. What can you loose by trying it at least once? 'nuff said.
TigazZz*;-;Warframe was a very good surprise, i used to play on the earlier stages of the game and it was a very good concept with great graphics but there wasnt much content at that time, so i took a break from it, but when i return i found a great f2p game with a lot of content and replayablity. The graphics are awesome, the looting, the teaming up with your clan/friends, you will get hooked once you understand the basics and then you want more and better. The only negative is the connection problems related to the Strict NAT issue, but im sure they will fix that and add even more content to the game. 4,6/5.
{GaS} SpAcE;-;Awesome Game. Nice Graphics and a user friendly Interface. Highly Recomended
Palacinak;-;I love the game and it is very fun to play. Good job.
IWantFree;-;Definitely worth checking! Large variety of weapons and equipment...... I do no regret all the time put in this game.
The_Rihard;-;Great game for friends to play together. it's a bit of a grind to collect enough materials to build new weapons and warframes but it's well worth the effort once you build them. Overall all a great game to play.
XDM.Pope Nope;-;BEST GAME EVER PLAYED BY HUMANS lol
[UT] Max Kulik;-;A very cool game indeed. I did not want to play this game at first thinking that it would not be very fun because the game is a free-to-play game. However the gameplay is great and very action-packed. I really wish this game had more of a storyline, because there is allot that the creators of this game could do with a single player or co-op campaign. Other than very little story line, if you like game with allot of action and killing hoards after hoards of monsters while you play as a Tenno in the field to save the Universe!
Draven;-;It's ok I guess.
sharkle;-;Warframe is a really beautiful game with interesting gameplay, but after time gets very repetitive. Lots of grinding for the items/gear/frames you want, but can be truly rewarding. I love this game, but I wish there was more incentive to complete worlds. I also wish there was a larger variety in mission type, because its basically either assassinate a special dude, kill all the enemies, or defend a cryopod. Variety would make this game 10/10. At this point I would still give it a 8/10. Again, its ing GORGEOUS on highest graphic settings. Would fap to.
MivwTaupos;-;is free but fun:)
Rashja;-;Absolutely fantastic 3rd person shooter.. allowing you to build n mod your characters & weapons to your suit style! Of course this takes time, but that's half the fun! great graphics, awesome teamplay and just plain addictive fun!
Aniqiewan | Absolutely Haram;-;An impressive f2p game that includes squad coop (Left4Dead, Payday: The Heist), a set of combat moves and wallrunning (FEAR, but better), a fun and not so grindy progression system (blueprints, materials, mod-cards - customisable 'builds'), and once you get good enough It's pure sex watching your team demolish a room full of enemies, all without even touching the ground :D
PennyWise;-;its funny becuase ive been playing this since jan highly reccomend it #spaceninjasftw
Commander_Oddball;-;Great looking game gota give them props for it to be f2p with this kinda graphics and all my hours i played i had a great time and i hope many hours to come to myself and rest of you players out there
[UT] Max Kulik;-;A very cool game indeed. I did not want to play this game at first thinking that it would not be very fun because the game is a free-to-play game. However the gameplay is great and very action-packed. I really wish this game had more of a storyline, because there is allot that the creators of this game could do with a single player or co-op campaign. Other than very little story line, if you like game with allot of action and killing hoards after hoards of monsters while you play as a Tenno in the field to save the Universe!
lobrown1219;-;I've been playing this game since beta about half a year ago and i cant begin to explain how aweosme this game is! Its a challenge and a ton of fun. you have to choice to do so much. Creating and customizing your warframe has to be the best part just waiting for it to be done is suspenseful. The game says you can be a ninja but in in my view your a god with awesome abliilties depeding on your warframe. Each warframe has different abilities it on depends on which one you pick or any warframe bluepring you pick up. This game has changed a ton honestly so much to do you can upgrade your warframe to be more BADASS and your weapons too. You can even have this little sential that will follow you around kill, heal or hack for you. There really isnt much of story line that i can remember but its a ton of fun! Its an online game you can switch the settings so you play with others or just rock out by yourself. No one can kill you but its a ton of fun at times to play with others whp actually know what their doing. This game is worth it all at the end short download and alot of detail and action! DOWNLOAD IT NOW you wont regret a thing once you try it and get use to it.
KR_SpEcTEr;-;Really great game for free. It has amazing graphics and controls with parkour and is multiplayer. One of the top free to play's on my list.
Brain;-;Love this game.
Kompybutt;-;Latex wearing ninjas.
Carlist Rieekan;-;Fast paced sci-fi third person shooter focused on cooperative multiplayer. You could like character and weaponry customization and Star Wars-like (or Mass Effect-like) visuals. Though the game is still in Beta, it is relatively stable and population is growing quickly.
P-13| Erudius Nacht;-;If you can look past the grind mechanic of the game when you reach higher ranks, Warframe delivers innovative action gameplay set in a futuristic era where gun and blade are deadlier than before. Set in place where your character is part of an endangered group of warriors, you must fight to keep the balance of power in the system; this opens up opportunities to team up with old enemies against new threats. Characters, or Warframes, can be swapped anytime and are constantly re-balanced and added upon. Each has its unique sets of stats and abilities that can offer varied sorts of gameplay that would suit any player. The arsenal lineup is impressive. Many weapons have their unique abilities as well. The true heart of gaining power is not in ranking up, since it is mostly decorative and does not affect player progression, but in modifying your Warframe and arsenal. With the numerous unique characteristics of your items combined with thousands of modifications, gameplay can be tailor-fitted to your needs.
Wallarus;-;Best multiplayer F2P I know of on steam. Great for groups of 4, especially when you're relatively close in level.
Lizzard;-;Dispite what the masses say of the amount of grind this game holds (and the lackluster Metascore it has [Like anyone goes of that these days!]), Warframe has been quite the experience for my friends and I. The game is awesome, with the seventeen billion weapons, a wide range of warframes to play for (NO, not "pay" for), and various gametyps to play in. The crafting system implemented is unique, as it takes actual time to craft such weapons, keys, frames, gear, etc. And if this isnt enough for you to try a "Free to Play" game out, the game is still developing! thats right, more warframes, weapons, planets, missions, and all of the sorts are to come in the future. The developers are very good with the community, updating on a regular basis and fixing patches on the spot! and when I say pathces, I mean game breaking bugs. the balance issues come after good thinking and a discussion with there design council. In other words, TRY THE GAME OUT! (and if I were a metacritic rater, Id seriously consider revising that score up there, this game is more than grind if you've got the will and the friends). Did I mention Custom Clan Bases? :D
Windows 7 32bit;-;This game is really good. The new update make it looks really cool! I will DEFINATLY play it more!
SaltyShanghaiStevens;-;you play as a fish person that kills people that aren't fish people.....10/10
Lobster Johnson;-;Fun gameplay but absolutely stupid pricing. Grinding is fun if you like that kind of thing and all gameplay-changing things are able to get free with ingame currency.
Circuitkun;-;Warframe brings a variety of classes making each one different from the other making the playing field different for anyone playing. Mechanics are great for a TPS. Wall running, sliding and shooting, energy for specials. These are things I like seeing in games cause it shows that good games can be made like warframe. If more game creators could look at this game they could learn a thing or two. I even run this on all low at 1280x720 and this game still looks amazing. All I hope to see is some vs mode stuff like TDM, and Capture The Flag. These would make the game even better cause then everyone would be fighting people with a different play style due to what warframe they choose. Give this game a try and I garuntee you will like it.
St0l3n_ID;-;Third Person Shooter with wallrunning and totally playable without spending money. My favorite game on Steam, and if that isnt enough... The game has tripled its contents since i started playing and is still expanding to get more variety. The UPS: Action packed, good graphics, good multiplayer experience. Constant flow of new weapons, balance patches and huge additions. Dedicated developers. Suprisingly fair business model, you dont have to pay a thing, ever, if you dont care about keeping every single weapon (you totally dont have to). A good amount of the guns haver their own firing mechanics, and the new mod system allows for weapons to be buffed against certain enemies and purposes. The DOWNS: Can get grindy, very very CPU intense. Some of you might be put off by constant changes to the balance that the game is undergoing in the last half year. But thats why its a beta, and it wont go on for long. Another prolbem at the moment is that two of the tilesets are somewhat overused, but those get slowly replaced as new tilesets come along. I can only recommend it, its a ton of fun, and its free. What can you loose by trying it at least once? 'nuff said.
Curtis Kobainis;-;this isnt a very good representation of astronauts. you cant even go to the moon
False Prophet;-;When it comes to discussing Warframe, I can say a lot of stuff. I can mention a refined game system, which updates even further over time. I can praise the developers, who obviously love the game they create and are fast to bring us the new stuff. I can say that Warframe is the first game that attracted me with its unique style. But the thing that I love the most is the setting lore - well, its scattered parts, which are brought with every new update. The lore is by far the most original thing in the game: how about a well mixed coctail made of space adventures, roman and japanese culture? Don't forget the feeling of waking up in a cryocapsule and realising that there are very few left of your nation, if any, and everyone else in the universe hates you.
indestructable;-;Excellent game, Excellent game play. Loads of fun to play with friends or randoms. The huge amount of grinding in this game can get tedious, but the different weapons and "frames" are loads of fun to collect. The developers are very dedicated to the community and over the course of the game have made improvements of insaine scale. With new things coming out every few weeks, this game will always bring a fresh face to an awesome gameplay style.
Estamel_Tharchon;-;you can see two games in this game war gear and mass effect
Astromaxitis;-;A fun game for those who want to spent some time as a space ninja. (+)Very energetic and exciting co-op multuplayer and some amazing designes on weapons and Tenno. (-)Unfortunately it lost my dedication later on because of the blurred questline
Firstzen;-;Warframe is, as you have probably heard, all about the space ninjas and is a really unique experience, but what really sets this game apart from the other Free To Play games out there is an incredibly invested dev team which is very in tune with what is going on in their community. I have been playing this game for little over a year and in that time it has gone through a transformation I wouldn't have thought possible exept for the fact that I experienced it first hand. When I first downloaded the game I thought that is was the prettiest game I had plaed that was under 1Gb. It started out as a very small and seemed to be just a curiosity to pass a couple of minutes, but as time went on the devs just kept adding and adding until it really doesn't look anything like the same game anymore. Im not really going to go into the finer details of what the game is like, because if you just look at a trailer you can get a feel for what the world is like and if you want to know more about the gameplay, your best course of action is to just download the game and give it a spin. The constant development and community reachout is the defining feature of this game and the best reason to get into the universe of WARFAME.
Blue;-;Ive been on this game for several months now and have found it addicting. There was recently a large update so there are some bugs. But as with any game bugs are part of the landscape. I wouldnt say any of the bugs that remain are a deal breaker with this game. The development team tries to fix bugs as they are reported. They prove that they love and care for the game and the community behind it. To me the graphics and soundscape are wonderful and easy to the eyes. I have gone from a computer that was the bare minimum to run this game to a full fledged beast that can run it all on high. On both ends of the spectrum this game is still gorgeous. No matter what the settings are that you need to run it on. Give it a try and have some patience and you will find a game you will fall in love with.
BRUH;-;If you start you will never stop. just started yesterday..... i have 28hrs
[] Richyda;-;Warframe is a nice Co-Op, third person shooter where you can join with other three players in missions around the Solar System. You get to pick your Warframe or battle suit, each with unique abilities. Some stealthy, other more tactical or plain offensive, and the weaponry varies from Rifles, Shotguns, Bows, swords, pistols sub-machine guns and others. When you start, you'll be able to pick a Warframe. Either the Excalibur, Volt or Mag. Here's their abilities and the equipment you can pick right up in the start of the game https://warframe.com/quick-start-guide Over all, if you like fighting, meleeing and having the chance to shoot down your targets with your friends along side you, give this game a try!
DizzyWascal;-;Bloody addictive and fun co op game to play with friends. I just can't stop trying to unlock all the warframes I can and max out all my guns. But honestly the game is repetitive and there isn't really a story. However I like this game.
A43;-;best free to play game after dota 2
UmbraFuris;-;This is my first review so please give me some constructive criticism :) Pros: + extremely fun with friends + over 175 different weapons currently available + levels are mostly randomly generated so every mission will be at least little different + 20 warframes currently to choose from + all the warframes have unique abilities and feel to them + awesome community and developers Cons: - the game is at its core very repetive, so you might get bored easily - some weapons and mods are not available anymore (they were limited time items or rewards in events) - building anything takes ridiculously long (weapons take 12-24 hours and warframes take 3 days and 12 hours to build+ farming for resources) - some items are imo overpriced ( a color palette is 5 ) But to be totally honest the game is alot of fun. To me warframe is nowadays a junk food game, meaning that i play it always when there is a new update but i cant play a whole lot before i get bored again. This is a game that everyone should atleast give a try. it's a free game what could you lose?
( );-;Great for training Soviet soldiers.
Ronaldo;-;Probably one of the best free to play games I've played, great developers keep the game fresh with new Frames and tilesets etc etc. Give it a go xD
Trooper11499;-;Let's start off with the good: Space Ninja Wizards that fight robots Bad: Your face may melt off. 10/10
NemesisLeon;-;I simply refuse to waste my life grinding for meaningless stuff with such basic melee and ranged combat. I'll stick to competitive multiplayer shooters and fighting games. Without the grind. Grind is evil. Warframe is quality though.
Star Monkey;-;Space Ninjas. Yes.
Cymboll;-;I snuck up on a guy while I was rolling around the floor, being stealthy (obnoxiously loud). He doesn't notice, so I break his legs and then smash his head in. 10/10 Would smush heads again.
Lord Marick Coldblood;-;Space ninjas... that is all.
Ghost;-;Shiitty Game, Shiitty Graphiks, Shiitty gunz, Shiitty errything. JUST KIDDING WASTE ALL YOUR MONEY ON IT NOW ITS AMAZE VERY WOWEWEWEWEWWEWW
420 (   );-;If you dont like playing farming simulator 2015 then  OFF YA LIL WANK STAIN! Space! Ninjas!  YEAH!
Benblu: No Commies At All;-;10/10 simulation of the average space ninja, also good if you like grinding, potatoes and petty squabbles between space jews and clones.
DuckyCon(Selling Evrythng in BP);-;WarFrame is a fun interactive game where you control your character, its not open world ( boo ) but you can choose to be a frontal fighter or a support gunner
Inquisitioner;-;Just when you're done farming over and over again... THEY PULL YOU BACK IN through constant new updates.
Alpaca Appreciator;-;Warframe in a nutshell: How do i play? - oh i want that.. - grind grind grind grind grind grind grind grind - get blueprints - realize you don't have enough materials or credits - grind grind grind grind grind grind grind - make item - 36 hour wait - wait and grind wait and grind wait and grind wait and grind wait and grind wait and grind - get cool new item - equip new item - grind level on item - grind grind grind grind grind grind grind grind - find next cool blurprint - repeat grind process it feels so good to play grindframe though
Gomer420Pyle;-;It's fun.
Ted Bear;-;Really stunning gameplay, although instructions were unclear. I ended up with my  in a blender, HELP ME. Other than that, amazing game. 10/10 would play again and again and again
CalBlizzardxxx;-;its so good now u can have your pet dog!!
Warngger;-;Effects - the video
Ghostfreax #COLLEGE BEGINS;-;Awesome Co-Op !! Easy to kill enemies !! :P
VinceBlood;-;You are a Tenno. You sprint, you leap, you wallrun, you climb, you fight, you dash. You have so many weapons it could be considered a war crime. Your arsenal of melee weapons would make the Spartans blush. Your suit empowers you in ways that causes the bowels of your enemies to involuntarily empty themselves into space. The only criticism I have for this game is the high price of in-game currency, Platinum. But that's it. if you like 3rd person over-shoulder shooters with team co-op, superpowers, ridiculous guns and near-limitless ways to modify your weapons and stats, download and play. There's something coming for you. It's the Grineer.
TurboSnakeGTRS;-;One of the BEST F2P Online Coop Gane, COOL NINJA STUFFS, AWESOME GRAPHICS, GREAT FUN to play with friends !!!
Mister Jadey;-;Warframe, a Third Person Shooter set in a futuristic style. Join me and hop into a "Warframe", its time to explore. From an ancient slumber you awaken, a slumber that would only be undone by a threat wich plagues the planets and solar systems. The Grineer have come to take you, it is time to do what you are supposed to do, save everything. Warframe is (again) a Third Person Shooter set in a futuristic style, you are able to control these solid and strong husks known as "Warframes", they range from Tanks who take a lot of damage to the more stealthy types, allowing you to complete missions without being seen. Warframe has you take on allot of farming at all times as to create Weapons, Sentinels who act as your companion and fight allongside you or even new Warframes. Weapons vary greatly, from low magazine count Twin Vipers with a fast fire rate and reload speed to Bows and Assault Rifles. There is always a weapon that will interest you, be it a sniper to fire from afar or a bow to get those silent kills. Sentinels are a great addition to the game, each equipped with their own Weapon. From poison darts to a fully automatic assault rifle. They also add a more in depth part of Warframe, each they come with various abilities, for example : Carrier has the ability to pickup loot within a specific radius of you. Whereas Deathcube will Vaporize enemies. Warframes are ofcourse the husks you control, ranging from Tanks like Rhino who has massive amounts of stomping power to the more silent Warframe like Ash. There is a Warframe for each style of play, so you'll be sure to find a Warframe to your liking. The enemies : - Grineer - Corpus - Infested The Grineer : The Grineer are an advanced race using weapons like Assault Rifles, Machine Guns, Cleavers and anything that would use normal bullets or slash through flesh. The Corpus : The Corpus are an even more advanced race that use weapons which work on energy like the Flux Rifle and their Electrified Batons. The Infested : The Infested as the name says are infected beings whom are mutated, they range from exploding enemies (Kamikazes), Ancient whom can heal their allies and infested dogs whom are fast with a strong attack. Each enemy has their own weakness leading to some interesting encounters, with "Boss" enemies that have been put into the game whom have the ability to shield themselves with ice to a fire blast knocking you back. The Farming : Warframe imo seems to be the game which you'd love to play if you enjoy some fun sessions in farming for resources. Each planet comes with its own resources, one better then the other. All in all, Warframe is a great game. Its something you won't find everyday and is defenitly worth it to take a look at and playing it. Warframe will be the game for you if you enjoy the joys of farming wich come with interesting missions, special bosses for each faction and the joy of brutally murdering enemies in various ways with the different Warframes abilities.
Navlock;-;Among the best Free to Play games ever. Best grinding-game since Diablo 2, imo. ^^
The Waffle Bandit;-;it is fun but i do not recommend purchasing the initiate, starter, or tenno pack. The ingame deals for platinum have a possibility of a percent reduction coupon.
Maeka;-;Yeah, love this game. Been playing it since closed beta started and they have come a long way! The game is a lot of fun and DE is a great company. They're always fixing and adding new stuff to the game.
[TTPN] Iron "Catman" Mercenary;-;This pleases me greatly.
Piratebear;-;While it lacks in being an actual game, it's a great piece of distraction. I recommend to look past the bugs and  balancing and note the combination of swords and space mercenaries satisfying my inner child. Atmosphere: 7/10 Addiction: 9/10 Difficulty: No. For cost, 15 should be enough if you can get a 75% platinum discount. This will cover all basic expenses.
Garmhamir;-;Mother F***ing Space Ninjas with Magic
Etern1ty;-;AMAZING GAME DA BEST 3RD PERSON SHOOTER OUT THERE..AWESOME BLEND OF CRYSIS 3 AND UNCHARTED 3 MULTIPLIED BY A MILLION TIMES..I HAVE NEVER LOVED GRIDING MORE THAN THIS 20/10
Craig1287;-;First off, this game is free, so you should just check it out right now. Okay, with that out of the way, I love this game so much. If you are here for some of the best 3rd person combat (shooting & melee), solid co-op multiplayer, a fantastic leveling/upgrading system that really allows for some personal custimaztion based on your playstyle, and very (VERY) pretty graphics in an engine that runs incredibly well, then you are here for the right reasons. My biggest issue with the game used to be the lack of variety in environments, but that is no longer a problem. From when I started playing the game in closed beta, there are now 3-4 times as many areas. With the different mods in each area (now twice as many modes) and the randomly generated maps (as in the style of Diablo II & III), environments are very varied. Of course, with it a F2P game, you're likely skeptical about whether or not it is Pay2Win or not. While it isn't as fair of a model as Loadout or Path of Exile, it is probably the best model out there. I logged around 200 hours before ever spending money and I only used that money to buy weapon slots and visual upgrades seeing as how it's so much fun to actually earn weapons and frames in this game. I would say this game is 1 part Mass Effect 3's multiplayer, 1 part Left4Dead, and 1 part Prince of Persia/Mirrors Edge. If that sounds like a great time to you (I hope it does), then start downloading. Again, it is free and also the game is a pretty darn small file size. 5/5
jetta;-;Been playing this for quite some time now and I keep coming back. An excellent game in small doses. Updated rather frequently as well as very frequent events. Would highly recommend this as a fantastic time waster, albeit a bit grindy if you are the type that wants everything. Feel free to sign up with my referral link and get a 7 day XP boost to help you get started: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=50d384ab1a4d80b922000000. Also feel free to message me if you want some co-op :) Quality graphics, fun/quick/addicting gameplay, varied arsenal, and constantly growing. It is definitely well worth the download. As for the free to play nature. Everything in the game can be earned with the exception of weapon and warframe slots, and the cosmetics. So for being a free to play game, unless you want to only use a limited amount of warframes/weapons, there is going to be some level of investment for you. However, with a quality title like this, they do deserve the support.
SupaSlaya;-;Great visuals and combat especially good to play with some friends 10/10
NewExodus;-;It's Ninjas In SPACE. With NINJA SPACE DOGS
70RD HITLAR 5W4G M4ST3R;-;i faped this dis....
Priest_Sorrow;-;This game made me forsake the ease of use console style gaming and return to PC gaming. Between the massive variety of things you can do, modify, and customize to suit your exact style of play DE made happen. Just about everything you could ever hope to get in a premium game, and it's absolutely free.
Palacinak;-;I love the game and it is very fun to play. Good job.
Torsten;-;Cyberninjas in Space. 10/10 would buy again - if it wasn't for free.
Saint;-;The game has a steep learning curve, if you have played other TPS it will be easier to understand, it took me a while to get acquainted with it and often I still learn as new things are introduced, but with the variety of Frames (Characters) with all their own abilities there is a lot to discover, craft, mod, battle pets as Kubrows (Dog-like companion pets) "Drones" like the Sentinel, Deathcube.. and they are all with their own mods and customizations. Frames are divided in the "regular" Frames and the "Prime" Frames, the differences arent that big, mostly estetic with a big "bling" factor and some extra modded slot(s) this also applies to some weapons, from giant mallets to throwing stars and double swords and many , many other weapons to try out to increase your mastery rank. Mastery Rank is your "level"; levelling up your weapons and frames, doing missions, defeating bosses, discovering new planets will earn you experience towards your masterry rank, ones your XP bar is full you will able to take a test to advance to the next rank. Note here, that failing a test will put it on a long cooldown, and you will be able to take another try the next day, so be prepared because some tests will be tricky. The key in this game is having patience, patience is a golden virtue in gaming especially in this title. The game uses an optional payment system: almost all weaponry and Warframes can be earned in game (everything other than Founder-exclusive items and event, retired, or prime items). However, with platinum, the grind to obtain weapon and Warframe blueprints and their resources is circumvented. A player can purchase weaponry from the market for credits, although some weapons and all Warframes require the schematic to be purchased, and then crafted. . You can virtually buy everything with Platinum. I personally advice to starting in an existing clan, there are many with a lot of options. Also, starting a clan may appear easy, but there is a lot of time to be put into creating a good, big, working and active clan. Big investments are made to make those big Dojos (Your clan-house) to a beatiful place to learn new things and its also home for your trades, trades can ONLY be done in Dojo's. There is a big community that is willing to answer your questions in the right channels, I say the right channel because if you are on the wrong channel doing your thing you get banned from chat. There are GM's around most of the time that keep an eye on things. The people behind the game are very active in bringing Hotfixes that often end in another Fix to Fix the Hotfix... but things get fixed in the end. There is a good vibe and sometimes a joke is made from DE. Events are made to offer players some festival fun and items, like bunny ears, event color pallets, moustache and more. Also, every day you get a login reward that can be a discount, xp, weapons, Prints and more. Free to play at its finest, worth playing!
t4nabe;-;Once you get passed the first couple of weeks learning how to grasp this game, you'll still spend the next month or two trying to master it. and even then you'll just be a scratching the tip of this iceberg. Its an awesome game if your pc can handle it. Very in-depth in almost every aspect. Great community to play with. Very much recommend. 10/10
m'xX'Phobia;-;Extremely fair business model... ( if you pay in when you have 75% discount ) countless hours of grind and repetitive mission but man... its fun and cool.... ( go read about the viable mods/weapons/warframe and buy plats to trade for those things would save you lots and lots of hours into the game. I really recommend you to pay... I mean seriously with 50$ I was able to geared up 5 warframes to the max!! on two accounts!! ) ps. I was playing the game as a 2 player co-op with my girlfriend who also enjoy the game immensely :D ps.2 This is the real game with really balanced sex representative... and ABSOLUTELY no sexism overtone... no battle bikinis no muscle bulk than question if you even lift every time you look at your character. They got different body shapes for each of the warframe. Take Nova for an example, that's as realistic and close at it gets to real world body shape. cons. quite steep learning curve and the depth of character customisation... which is paramount in this game. ( My girlfriend and I wasted 24~hours of game time... spread over many days getting stuck in many missions -_- before we knew that.... the mods that really matter to the game are serration and elemental damage.
Knightzoid;-;This game is awesome
McSalty;-;Cons: Sometimes I forget if I'm playing Warframe or Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 4 Pros: Just about everything else. Plus, all the grinding experience will make me a pro in the clubs 11/10 would recommend
Windy Wind;-;over 1200 hours. That's all I ahve to say Oh and metacritic scorce is always et anyway
Regain;-;I like suited things with nice asses, so it's a good game.
Dark Shun-Taro;-;Warframe is a fun game. It has some mystery to it at soem points and also your a ninja. Ninja's are always fun to play as.
TheSouthern;-;Ninjas, blades, bows, superhuman abilities... what else do you want?!
Agent Smith;-;It's a really good game visually and mechanically. Even though there seams to be P2W features you can earn everything through gameplay, but expect a lot of grinding. And pay attention when it says you are leveling up.....cuase not only do you level up....but your equipment does as well all on seperate occassions rather then just your main character....it gets confusing thinking my character finally reached lv 10 and notice that its still at lv 3 >,> Even though I can't get into this game cause i can't afford to waste little of my time everyday to grind, I highly approve getting it. If it helps then buy one of the starter patches cause everything aint easy peasy. Its a very competitive game.
Kaizerlan|nalreziaK;-;Good Game, definitely recommended. Love the varience in warframes abilities and the vast amount of weapons.
Rabbit;-;One Of The Best PC Games I Have Played, As Long As You Know What Your Doing.
NinjaNultrix;-;Pretty fun game to play with friends!
kresa;-;One of the must fair f2p games out there with pve content.
Skunk_McSmelly;-;Warframe is a game that is free to play, but no payment is ever really nessicary. I've actually only played the game for 100 hours, and I'm in end game tier equipment. The game is always open, and though uninteresesting at first, once you get some friends to play with, and talk to the game is a blast. Don't get me wrong, the game is a blast without your friends, but in a co-op game, friends is always the best way to go. The game has missions, about 20 per planet/moons. There are about 20 of these moons, along with random levels called "alerts", and "invaisons". There are 6 or 7 mission types. The levels are randomly generated, but the type will always be the same for the mission you selected. I've never seen the same level twice, though they will pretty much always have the same aethetic. These mission types really make each mission unique. Extermination is where you need to kill all the enemies in a level. Defense is like horde mode, but you're defending a certain artifact. You have the option to extract every 5 waves, with loot getting better, but enemies getting harder every wave and the potential to lose everything you're already earned. Moble defense is kind of like defense, but rather than wave based, it's time based with you having to take a core around to different static posts. This is the worst type of mission. Survival is a time based mission where you must survive (duh) as long as possible. The enemy will cut your life support at the start of the mission, so you must get life support dropped from Lotus. Extration is where you must mine cyotic, a special ore ice thing, used to freeze luxury Marsian Jellyfish (I wish I was joking). The game is always intense action, there's always something to do, and that's why it's so fun. Though Earth, and eventually Mercury are kind of boring, but once you get out of there, the game gets so good, it's unimagible. A great experiance, deserved to be played by everyone, with frequent patches, and constant attention. PLAY THIS GAME!!!
Cdn Nomad;-;Love It
Pound.Boner Jams;-;this game has come a long way since the begining
Jonathan;-;It's like Peter Pan, but it's different
|GA|HSMagnet;-;how can it get better than interchangeable synth bodies that you parkour through dispatching various hostiles? join in and see if you can wallrun with this old man...
BlueWizard;-;Ninjas in space flying around doing crazy tricks with a plethora of weapons to blast and slice your enemies. What's not to love?
mckamz;-;A must try free to play FPS. Recommended for all gamers.
seth;-;ok so, imagine brink, but actually good
Pornogandalf;-;Laser Simulator 2014 :) Best coop massacre Shooter!
YuukiOnna;-;Balls deep. Like it. -In asian voice- If you be Space Ninja, you play this or you not my son!
SquidTheSid;-;It's been almost two years since I first played Warframe, andI thought I'd update my review considering how much the game has changed (mostly for the better). The core philosophy of being a magic space ninja and juggling melee attacks, ranged combat, and special abilities still makes up the core of the game. While none of these aspects are particularly brilliant on their own, combined, they greate some seriously entertaining emergent gameplay. Switching between these forms of combat adds in a lot of variety and helps keep things fresh even hundreds of hours in game. More advanced players can perform manuvers like zorencoptering (while sprinting, jump, then crouch, and use a melee attack) to gain extra mobility. The game's arsenal has also become much more interesting as Digital Extremes has rounded out the arsenal by continously adding in exotic weapons. We have unique guns including: a tentacle shotgun,a freeze ray,a flak cannon, a wrist-mounted laser beam, and more. Messing around with all of the weapons and discovering which ones you enjoy playing with is always fun. The game now has over 20 different warframes (classes), allowing you to play pretty much any role you want from a melee berserker to a stealthy assassin. Thanks to some great visual design, pretty much all of the warframes are fun to play as, and discovering which one suits your playstyle best is a great experience (<3 Rhino). The overall aesthetic of the game is quite striking as well. All of the frames have their own unique visual flair (the paladin Oberon has a long slender body with very natural deer-like look) combined with some nice Japanese and Sci-Fi flair. Even 500 hours in, the game is still incredible to look at. The soundtrack and audio design are great, especially if you're into "pew-pew" Sci-Fi sound effects, although many of the abilities sound quite powerful. That being said, you will probably want to play your own music after a couple of dozen hours into the game, since the soundtrack does tend to repeat itself. Now, let's talk about one of the game's biggest strengths and weaknesses: the grind. Like Diablo or Destiny, Warframe is a game all about grind. You grind resources to craft weapons, grind resources to level up mods, grind planets to obtain frame/weapon drops, etc. For the most part, the grind is reasonable and rather enjoyable due to the strength of the game's combat. Even hundreds of hours into the game, I still had a blast zipping around the maps and picking off enemies with my insanely specced out weapons and warframes. However, at times, the grind can be overwhelming as you try to unlock that one specific part that you need to complete a warframe or a gun, only to get something completely useless instead. Also, ranking up level 10 mods can be an extreme chore. To this day, I do not have any rank 10 mods on me. That being said, the grind never feels too overwhelming like in other F2P games I've played before, and paying to circumvent the grind really isn't necessary in Warframe. Another one of my complaints concerns the massive power creep in Warframe. Since DE churns out so much content in such a quick amount of time, many of the warframes weapons will be either extremely weak or extremely powerful, to the point where several hotfixes are needed to get them to a decent shape (assuming they are patched). For example, Sniper Rifles are worse than bows in most cases, shotguns suffer from heavy damage falloff and long reloads, and frames that don't offer utility (such as crowd control, healing, buffs, etc) and focus on dealing raw ability damage suffer greatly. The game definitely needs a large balance patch to work out these issues. My third complaint is that Warframe doesn't seem to be going towards one direction. DE is focused so much on adding new content haphazardly, that it's difficult to see where the game is going. To this day, there is no campaign, only a handful of small quests. There is no real endgame, as it mostly consists of endless mission types. I have to wonder if we're ever going to get more meaningful content as the current mission types feel all the same: (kill a bunch of enemies but with specific conditions, such as capturing a target, rescuing a hostage, etc.). Plus, mission objectives rarely vary, so if you've played one extermination mission, you've played them all, and the same with the other mission types. Finally, the game does an awful job of explaining itself. Even with the new tutorial, the game does not explain all of its mechanics properly and throws new players into the open with little advice. Consulting the game's wiki or recruiting/region chat will make the experience for new players a much more enjoyable one. So despite all of my complaining, I enjoy Warframe quite a bit. At the end of the day, it's a fun game that has a great variety in content and allows players to pretty much choose how they play and set their own pace. It's a very fair F2P game, so there's little reason to not give it a shot. tl;dr + good aesthetic + fun combat + weapon and class diversity + mostly fun grinding + very generous F2P model - grind can be overwhelming at times - power creep - lack of story content and end game. - mission types feel very similar. - poorly explains itself
01ZERO10;-;~*~TO ANYONE WHO HAS PLAYED MASS EFFECT 3's MULTIPLAYER MODE IN THE PAST ~*~ I have to say this is what I wish Mass effect's Multiplayer mode would've been like. In Mass Effect you had your specific races, in Waframe you kinda play as one race the whole time -BUT- each "Tenno" has their own specific abilities and perks to help you get the edge over countless enemies thrown at you, and really helps make you feel like a total badass. You can even further enhance your Warframes with the "Mods" that are dropped from enemies as you complete missions from planet-to-planet. These mods can help with consuming less energy so you can use powers helluva lot more frequently, or make the effects last longer, more powerful, and add so many ways to change your preffered playstyles offering so much replayability, ESPECIALLY WITH FRIENDS! Remember all those times when you weren't able to jump in Mass Effect and instead only givng the option to jump down a certain ledge while getting chased by hordes of Banshees, Phantoms, & Collectors? Well in Warframe you can go all Parkour! Wall running across huge gaps to evade enemy fire, wall jumping to reach higher/secret rooms, the amount of places to use parkour is astounding if you use your imagination and experiment. I could go on & on about the added features and content they've added over the course of its life (Which is still considered in BETA by the way!), but overall I think this was the game I've been longing for and I really enjoyed my time with the ME3's Multiplayer experience myself which definitely left me feeling hungy for a more enjoyable Co-op game like Warframe has provided for me. Did I forget to mention this thing is Free-to-play? Give it a spin and you might just find yourself spending TOO much of your time in this game. XD
Tank Buster;-;good game played for about 3 hours without stopping O.O
That Deer;-;Let's go ahead and describe Warframe's plot in the most simplest form: You're a ninja. In space. Ok, review's over go home. Wait, you're still reading this? Alright, fine, let's keep it going. Frames at War is a third-person action shooter space ninja simulator where you and up to three other players test your mettle against three woefully unprepared factions: The Space Merchants, Heavy Metal Russians and the Zerg. You battle through waves upon waves of commuters on their way to work/home to provide for/see their families and slice/blast/shoot them to little pieces in your magical superman/woman body suit with your crazy monofilamentvibrobladeanthrax dispensers, which you can purchase blueprints for OR you can find parts in Goldfinger's space palaces to create blinged out versions of them. Speaking of blinged out things, this game is Free to Play, but actually done well. You can almost get ANYTHING in this game without spending ANY money at all and not feel jaded at the massive time you've wasted doing so. That is, until you want to feel special and buy a buttload of cosmetics. At that point, you can either blow money on Platinum or have some other dumb sucker do the same to buy junk from you in the trade channel. What I take away from the whole experience is that you're a monster who hurts people for fun and profit. I really like this game.
The Magician Grandpa;-;That is good
Villager;-;holy supercalifragilisticexpialidoshus, this game is so fricking fun!!!!!!!!!!!!
winterbraid;-;I came for the ninjas, I stayed for the grind.
CaptainSpitFire;-;WAIT!? THIS ISNT DESTINY?! 69/69 L33t PLey Doodues
Tenkenno;-;Its a 3rd person action/shooter with a fair emphasis on the grind. A lot of ppl will be put off by the rng nature of some of the items that you have to farm but at the same time if you go into this with a few friends the game can be extremely fun. Keep in mind I'm also a huge fan of monster hunter so my opinion is a tad bias in that regards. The cash shop isnt game breaking and it gives ppl without a lot of time on their hands a chance to keep up with those that play this game too much. All in all if you enjoy 3rd person action games I would recommend that you look into this one, just keep in mind that to get to a lot of the "end game" stuff you're either going to pay for it or invest a fair amt of time into it.
I fking hate this game;-;Ruined my life 10/10
B1g0d0n;-;Lots of shooting(bullet, laser,...). Great action!
Mr.MonocleMadness;-;I can highly recommend this game to people who like third person shooters. It is a freerun (very good movement to get quickly around the maps), cop ninja space hack'n slash shooter. It has many different area's and in each area it generates a new order of chambers to make the completion run slightly different every time. Also it's free to play so why wouldn't you try it out? the PvP isn't really great, but it is mostly a cop PvE game anyway. This game is much about farming resources and bleuprints for new equipment, weapons and suits/characters. There is a trading system in game to make getting the prime bleu prints easier. You can ofcourse spend money on additional stuff (it isn't a pay to win game). That isn't necesarry to do so, by using trading you can get even those items anyway but it'll take way longer ofc. I played this game for more then 1120 hours and i never spend any real money on it. If you become really good in playing and speeding trough missions, it can become kind of a bore and annoyance to drag noob players across the map, if I play a non t4 mission with players that are not on my friend list, 99% of the games I play will result in me having done more 90% of all damage and me waiting at a door that needs 2 players to open.... Also there is not really much of an end game and if you want to play this game for melee mostly then don't, it's a shooter, at the point of writing this review melee is obsolete even for characters that are based around melee. Conlusion: It's good and free, by far my most played game on steam.
Chronically Spooked Skeleton;-;I figured I ought to review this dynasty space ninjas of hellgate london. It's pretty good! For what you get at any rate. I've spent about twenty dollars into this game by now and I can honestly say I don't feel like it's been wasted time! It's a pretty grand game all things considered, it's simple, easy to get into, and the controls don't usually make me feel like a blind man groping for spilled change. At any rate, it's grindy, boring at times, but it's worth the occasional jump into for a purely cooperative experience. Don't you miss that? When games were purely Co-Op, or had a Co-Op focus? I miss that. What a shame.
Joe;-;An amazing Free mainly multiplayer game featuring: *Trading! *Awesome Graphics! *Clans! *A brief But good storyline!
far4EZ$$;-;You are a space ninja. Why aren't you downloading this yet?
TimeSpice;-;Enjoyed this game so much and spent a ton of hours on it.
Raiyne;-;Great game! Tons of replay value, huge assortment of weapons, warframes, and things to do! The DEVS really put a lot of time into this game
NuclearVision;-;Being one of over 20 space ninjas is the thing.
Gadgez;-;RECIEVING TRANSMISSION FROM DAVID BOWIE'S NIPPLE ANTENNAE Transmission reads: WARFRAME MORE LIKE WARFARM HAHAHAHAHA oh god I have too much  in this game.
Sir Butters;-;SWEET SPACE NINJA MADNESS FOR ALL!
Gourmet;-;Great f2p that u can be better than another just playing , without barriers like another games that if u use cash u could be a God. Great Graphics and sounds , fast commands , nice customization , great variety of weapons . I've played since the beta and the bugs almost don't exist anymore , each update with news and fix for the game that make it fantastic. The most perfect F2P ever .
Venomos;-;Warframe's concept, when presented to the normal person, would seem unusual or unappealing. This can be forgiven since the concept is space ninjas on a solar mission of fighting giant brutes and strange merchantmen whilst holding back the invading forces of a mysterious infestation. Yet this game has proven to be hundreds of hours of fun for myself and my friends who would play it. The ability to go through a procedurally generated map while shooting Grineer platoons in a Defense or slashing apart an Infested swarm in a survival mission has produced unlimited amounts of fun. The game gives the player an ultimate suit of armor which grants them unimaginable power as they run, jump, slide, kick, shoot, grapple, punch, stab, and slash at enemies who give the player an actual challenge. The content is even more extrordinary as it is updated very often and is largely influenced by the community. Thus every player has a direct voice in what they want the developers to put in next. Thus for a game overflowing with action, adventure, community, and a sheer uniqueness not commonly found in the typical selection of modern games, Warframe should definitely be on the consumer's list! Did I also mention that it is free?
Holden Toledo;-;Really good game worth the time for the beginners I enjoyed this game for around three weeks before getting bored of it
The Black Reaper;-;I have well over 700 hours of gameplay and rising, this game is very fun and can be very addicting. It has its ups and downs, but first I'll go over the ups. An obvious up is that its free to play, so you can try it out and if it doesnt fit you're gaming style then just uninstall. With it being free to play theres obviously going to be microtransactions, but let me asure you that there is nothing in warframe you cant get (including nearlly all cosmetics), even if you dont put a dime into the game. I havnt payed any money at all and I have some of the best gear, and a hand full of the cosmetic items. This is due to the fact you can trade in game items for microtransaction currency (for warframe its called "platnium"). As far as game graphics, they are amazing, not far cry 4 graphics, but definitely one of the best free to play game graphics I'v seen. Dont let that discourage you if you dont have a high end gaming computer, the game is suprising very optimized, and the devs work to improve it even more. The gunplay is as great, with a third person run and gun parkour style. Aside from guns there are also tons of melee weapons that are just as strong, not just a last resort if you run out of ammo. The depth of melee combat is amazing, collect different melee stances as you progress to match you're play style. Perform combos with the different stances, to cut down you're enemies. And one of the best things about warframe is the devs. The devs are super active and constantly pumping out content as well as streaming on a weekly bases. Their passion for the game is like none other. Ok, so the bad things about warframe. Repetition, this has been a problem for the game for quite some time, and the devs are doing alot to fix this. After playing for as long as someone like me or even far less, warframe will feel like a chore. This can obviously be prevented by playing with freinds or doing unconventional mission play styles, but can still get kind of dull. This is something the devs are taking alot more seriously and they have talked about various ways to improve this. I personally think that the devs can acomplish something to ease or fix this. The second thing bad about warframe is timed events. So what I mean by this is events that offer special prizes like guns, melee weapons, or mods (mods are items that you put into you're character to give them better stats or abilites, each mod has a unique buff), will only come once, and if not will come much later in the year. Meaning if there is a gun, melee or mod that you really want, but wasnt there during the event, you can't get it, unless its tradable, in which case you can trade for with other players. Over all I love this game and I love the devs, they work hard to deliver a great game and it is definitely one of my favorite free to plays. If you're still sceptical then just give it a try and see for yourself.
Atlas Fontaine;-;Do you like a light stealth element and awesome grouping capabilities? Do you enjoy assassinating your target and vanishing without a trace? Do you revel in using awesome built in stealth routes and abilities? Then watch as this game gives you ALL of those things and your teammates throw it away to instead die multiple times and warn the entire galaxy you're going to kill a boss! 10/10 would play again
Desamos;-;Ever play Global Agenda? It's similar, but a lot better. The graphics are incredible. The adventure is unspeakable. Most importantly you're a ninja fighting in space and planets with pets, bows, guns, pistols, and most imporantly melee weapons. I love the Glaive for example.. I feel like captain america, throwing his glaive at an enemy and exploding it, killing multiple enemys, then grabbing my glaive back to throw again. It comes with stance mods, and these stance mods let me do different combos with the melee weapons. Warframe uses a mod system that lets you customize your warframe and weapons in unique and different way that help you against different factions. The game has Lisets (player ships) which you can walk around in, setup your arsenal before navigating to a planet to fight some Grineer or Corpus. Did I mention you can fight in space now? I think I did.. Anyway, my and my buddy Kubrow (a cute feriocious beat that you have to take care of) explore planets all aroudn the galaxy and I most of the time just sit back while Jubu (my awesome kubrow) rips off Grineer heads, and limbs and tosses them aside. He's very nice if you get know him.. Now lets move on to my favortie part of the game. The dojo. The clan. I have my own dojo, 100 rooms (I kinda maxed out, I cant build any more rooms haha), filled with labs which let you make custom weapons you can't get from anywhere else. I have Dueling rooms which lets me and my clan members duel each other. I have my main room which we spawn in, and an observatory attached to it. I occasionally do my homework while sitting there and looking at the beautiful galaxy (there are spots you can meditate on in the observatory room). I believe they're even gonna bring a shooting range eventually for dojo's so you can test out your weapons and see which one you like the most. I think I've talked enough.. Time to play Warframe and join my clan! 1916 Rangers! I hope you found this review helpful. I love this game, and I would love it if you joined and played it with me. Cheers.
Assmuncher McGg;-;Do you like Ninjas? Do you like Space? Do you like Jedi's? Or would you like Space Ninja Jedi's? Cuz if you think that sounds kickass, you'll love this game. It is amazing how similar gameplay is portayed in trailers once you get in and get a grip on the movement and battle controls. Lots to be done, and lots to see, this is definetly the game for those looking for some slice'n'dice fun!
Shaky Shane;-;This game was so fun i farted
Spriggs;-;Has space dogs.
Konrad Curze;-;When i started playing this game i didn't think it was any good, But now almost 100 hours in i think it is great, I would place it as the best FPS MMO curently out there.
Jony-;-;PRO: + Two primary weapons + You could unleash fiery maelstroms, turn invisible, create a decoy, use teleportation to switch places with an enemy, or manipulate your foes to fight against their allies. + You can run Warframe missions with up to three other players + The inventory management includes tools for crafting items out of materials that can be bought or dropped during gameplay + Social + Character models and animations are very impressive + Progresses through the solar system + Great audio feedback + Free to play + Update after update + Over 100 Achievements CONTRA: - Space ninja suit - Repetitive Maps and Missions CONCLUSION: Understandably its important to provide motivation to keep running the levels, but the fun of loot drop systems comes from finding something new and shiny that makes your avatar look cool; instead Warframe gives you another crafting component.
Jalepers[Mexican];-;This game is so awesome, it gave me 3 erections in a row. The gameplay is AWESOME, the graphics (of wich i care less than a ) are good. This game is one of my top 3.
Cadash;-;All you need to know about this game is that the combat is AMAZING. There are a few glitches overall but the fluidity of the combat is something to behold. This is really the reason to play this game. The leveling system and ability to modify and customize your weaponry and warframes is also quite addictive. I'd also mention that playing with two person teams is ideal for MOST missions and more fun. Generally playing with four people turns into complete chaos and at least imo makes the game much less fun. The main gripe against this game is that its repetitive and the grind for certains mods/parts/etc can be kind of daunting and boring. After the shock and amazement of the combat wears off (will take a LONG time) you realize you aren't really accomplishing much -- just like other MMO's outside of WoW (which does a good job of constantly giving you a new story to unfold). The issue could be resolved with more oddball events, maybe even massive invasion missions with thousands to slaughter, etc. I find that the game shines the brightest when you face wave after wave of enemy that you can cut up into tiny pieces or (as an Ember) ignite the world on fire and melt their faces (its really satisfying trust me). But when you get stuck doing really drawn out missions like mobile defense the game gets kind of tedious. I also find that while most of the warframes are incredibly fun to play - they are not well balanced. Like Nova for example is WAY too powerful and frames like Frost, Zephyr, or Excalibur are not really effective (fun but not effective for moving along in the game). Often, if playing with friends, one or two people will kill like 70% of the stuff and run around doing so while the two others will spend time collecting loot and hoping they arent shot in the face by heavy Grineer, Infected, or Corpus units. With all of that said I do recommend the game because its a lot of fun to build new weapons/frames/research abilities and get out there and kick some butt. Just beware of the horrible team gameplay due to imbalance and the repetitive nature of the missions. Perhaps in the future they will create missions that require more cohesive gameplay but until then just have fun slicing things into tiny bloody bits or shooting holes through their torsos with shotguns because it will make you grineer to ear. (done intentionally) Also I should mention that this game is NOT P2W at all but it doesnt hurt to buy some platinum from time to time if you want to proceed faster than the game otherwise allows. Clearly the system is rigged in favor of profits but if you know that going in... you'll be better able to handle it.
jlyfisher;-;Amazing game. Very addicting if you don't mind waiting a bit for good items.
1shot2thehead;-;good . that is all.
Windy Wind;-;over 1200 hours. That's all I ahve to say Oh and metacritic scorce is always et anyway
Regain;-;I like suited things with nice asses, so it's a good game.
Dark Shun-Taro;-;Warframe is a fun game. It has some mystery to it at soem points and also your a ninja. Ninja's are always fun to play as.
TheSouthern;-;Ninjas, blades, bows, superhuman abilities... what else do you want?!
The Lone Wanderer;-;Two words: Space Ninjas
-=CG=- Blitz;-;You're a space ninja, with a space dog/cat/bat thingy or a floaty shooty robot thingy. You farm potatoes and make sure your stealthy ninja is brightly and vibrantly colored. 100/10
Sniper Pan;-;Okay, where to start. To all the people looking at my hours? Yeah I know... I played this game on the website Client alot more before steam. Onto a dead honest review. I have been playing this game from before open beta (Almost a year and a half) and I have seen all of its ups and downs. This will be honest. Back in the day, you would start off with a choice of 3 warframes, either Excalibur (Mr. Coverboy) Volt (An electric Wizard) or Loki (The trickster who loves being invisible) Back at this time, the game was simple. You shoot stuff, you get xp and mods, and you get better right? Well, now, there are 20+ warframes (Or so I think) and their "Prime" versions (Superpowered versions) Certain things avalible in the game back then are not avalible now, such as the Snipetron (Sniper rifle) and Excalibur prime (Shiny Coverboy) These items are now no longer avalible. Ever. Great news huh? There are too many weapons to count, and I own almost every one, and have playtested every one. I own every Warframe (Class) except one. I could harp for days, but lets move to the present. Classes +Non-linear, you can play any Warframe with a sniper rifle. +Each Warframe has its own unique abilities, with some Warframes more suited to tasks than others. +Modability, meaning you can build your Warframe for anything you want, even if it is not reccomended. +Customisation, meaning you can re-color your Warframe to your own wants, even if its Pink. -Very few different skins -Color packs are pay to play -Different skins and helmets are pay to play -There is an unobtainable Warframe (Excalibur Prime) Weapons +Tons of choices, legitly a thousand plus different combinations. +There is a tentacle gun... +Different classes of weapons (Shotguns, Pistols, Sniper rifles, Melee, FRIKIN BOWS) +Customisable, yeah, pink guns mofo. +Modability, modding your guns for different stuffs, yeah! +Most model designs look amazing! -Very few guns have alt-fire -Some guns are unavaible to obtain, like, ever... (Snipetron, ect.) Companions +Puppies! Fuggin' Puppies! +Compainions, such as little robots or mutants (Djinn) to follow you around and shoot stuff -Very few varients (4 dog classes, and 7 companions) -Most are useless in combat, unless putting work into it (Not including dogs) -Dog companions take an amazing ammout of time and effort to obtain Controls +Fluent, non choppy controls +Combo keys for different reactions in-game (Ie wallrun/sliding melee attack) +No input lag even for lower-end computers (You press w and you walk forward god darn it!) +Easy to get used to -Control setup is slightly unorthodox. Level design +Each level is randomly generated from a selection and tileset of rooms. +Each type of faction has its own level designs. +No level is the same. (Unless you have played like, 10,000 levels like I have, and you got one damn one that was the same) -The Tileset of rooms gets repetive -Some areas bug out the map Graphics +Ambient atmosphere when needed. +Physics can be hilarious (I have 10 hrs of playtime just pinning people to the wall...) +Enemy design is intresting (Especially the zombies) +Weapon design is amazing -Low end computers will have to down the graphics... Alot... Economy This is where a checklist is redundant, as I may have to rant. I will start out by saying that "This game is completely free to play, and any item in the game is obtainable by putting work into it, including the pay to pay items" This will hold true throughout my rant, although I will probably complain alot. In essence, this game is run by crafting. You craft weapons, Warframes, companions, ect. There are three kinds of people who play Warframe. There are the legit, F2P players, who get everything legitly, and obtaining P2P items through trading. The second kind of people, (Myself included) are the people who have put money into it, but not extravagant ammounts. Usually $10 to around a top of $300. (This goes out to you, TF2 people.) And then finally, the Wallet-Warriors. Yes, you. You know who you are. You are those people who have put insane ammounts of money into this game in order to have everything you want then and now. (I have a friend who has put well over $1000.00 USD into this game...) Those are the different types of Warframe players. As stated before, this game can be completely F2P, but as in almost every F2P, spending money makes things faster, and gives you an unfair edge. For example, a F2P gets 30 spaces on a maxed out Weapon, while a P2P can purchase an item that gives them 60 spaces on the exact same weapon. This item can be obtained through trading, but can be time consuming. There is one thing that all players do, and that is grind. Hollllllyyyy , 7/8 of your hours on this game will be just repeating the same damn mission over and over to get materials. Yeah... Grinding... Other +Space missions, yeah your in space. +Your base is in a spaceship +The staff of the game are very understanding and focus more on community wants first than their own wants +FRICKIN SPACE NINJAS :D Overall Yes, this is an amazing game overall. The only fallout point is that after playing for a long time, it gets very, very boring. For me? I only play this anymore when I'm asked to by a friend, or if a new major update comes out. (Volt Prime plz? <3) This game is amazing, and I still enjoy it, but not as much as I used to, due to overplaying. 10/10 P.S. If any reader has questions, feel free to add me. I love a good discussion!
sjhgema;-;The graphic is very magnificent. The gameplay is not bad too. For those looking for actions, this is the game for you!
Torsten;-;Cyberninjas in Space. 10/10 would buy again - if it wasn't for free.
Saint;-;The game has a steep learning curve, if you have played other TPS it will be easier to understand, it took me a while to get acquainted with it and often I still learn as new things are introduced, but with the variety of Frames (Characters) with all their own abilities there is a lot to discover, craft, mod, battle pets as Kubrows (Dog-like companion pets) "Drones" like the Sentinel, Deathcube.. and they are all with their own mods and customizations. Frames are divided in the "regular" Frames and the "Prime" Frames, the differences arent that big, mostly estetic with a big "bling" factor and some extra modded slot(s) this also applies to some weapons, from giant mallets to throwing stars and double swords and many , many other weapons to try out to increase your mastery rank. Mastery Rank is your "level"; levelling up your weapons and frames, doing missions, defeating bosses, discovering new planets will earn you experience towards your masterry rank, ones your XP bar is full you will able to take a test to advance to the next rank. Note here, that failing a test will put it on a long cooldown, and you will be able to take another try the next day, so be prepared because some tests will be tricky. The key in this game is having patience, patience is a golden virtue in gaming especially in this title. The game uses an optional payment system: almost all weaponry and Warframes can be earned in game (everything other than Founder-exclusive items and event, retired, or prime items). However, with platinum, the grind to obtain weapon and Warframe blueprints and their resources is circumvented. A player can purchase weaponry from the market for credits, although some weapons and all Warframes require the schematic to be purchased, and then crafted. . You can virtually buy everything with Platinum. I personally advice to starting in an existing clan, there are many with a lot of options. Also, starting a clan may appear easy, but there is a lot of time to be put into creating a good, big, working and active clan. Big investments are made to make those big Dojos (Your clan-house) to a beatiful place to learn new things and its also home for your trades, trades can ONLY be done in Dojo's. There is a big community that is willing to answer your questions in the right channels, I say the right channel because if you are on the wrong channel doing your thing you get banned from chat. There are GM's around most of the time that keep an eye on things. The people behind the game are very active in bringing Hotfixes that often end in another Fix to Fix the Hotfix... but things get fixed in the end. There is a good vibe and sometimes a joke is made from DE. Events are made to offer players some festival fun and items, like bunny ears, event color pallets, moustache and more. Also, every day you get a login reward that can be a discount, xp, weapons, Prints and more. Free to play at its finest, worth playing!
t4nabe;-;Once you get passed the first couple of weeks learning how to grasp this game, you'll still spend the next month or two trying to master it. and even then you'll just be a scratching the tip of this iceberg. Its an awesome game if your pc can handle it. Very in-depth in almost every aspect. Great community to play with. Very much recommend. 10/10
m'xX'Phobia;-;Extremely fair business model... ( if you pay in when you have 75% discount ) countless hours of grind and repetitive mission but man... its fun and cool.... ( go read about the viable mods/weapons/warframe and buy plats to trade for those things would save you lots and lots of hours into the game. I really recommend you to pay... I mean seriously with 50$ I was able to geared up 5 warframes to the max!! on two accounts!! ) ps. I was playing the game as a 2 player co-op with my girlfriend who also enjoy the game immensely :D ps.2 This is the real game with really balanced sex representative... and ABSOLUTELY no sexism overtone... no battle bikinis no muscle bulk than question if you even lift every time you look at your character. They got different body shapes for each of the warframe. Take Nova for an example, that's as realistic and close at it gets to real world body shape. cons. quite steep learning curve and the depth of character customisation... which is paramount in this game. ( My girlfriend and I wasted 24~hours of game time... spread over many days getting stuck in many missions -_- before we knew that.... the mods that really matter to the game are serration and elemental damage.
Knightzoid;-;This game is awesome
McSalty;-;Cons: Sometimes I forget if I'm playing Warframe or Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 4 Pros: Just about everything else. Plus, all the grinding experience will make me a pro in the clubs 11/10 would recommend
Rouraine;-;Hmm well, where do I start? How to get rid of your real life in 2 steps. Step 1: Download Warframe! Step 2: Play Warframe! Congratulation! You've now lost your real life.
adarazrad;-;( First, dont look on my steam hours, i downloaded warframe to steam just now. i have about 585 hours on the in-game profile) warframe is free to play game, still in beta but already a decent game that worth a try. plot : there is still many question marks, not all of the lore revealed, so i will tell some of the known story : you are, a tenno, twisted race who can control a warframe, a special suit that gains special powers to the wearer, you was awakend from cyro sleep by the lotus, we dont know much about her yet, she guides you and help you, you was awakend in a time of chaos, the grineer, a cloned race is taking over the system, you have to stop them, more is explained through the tutorial mission. alot of this game is about fun, while some players grinding the mastery ranks ( a level in typical mmo ) i found myself not doing this at all ( compare my 580+ hours to rank 11, some are already at 16 on this time ) this game have large varity of weapons and warframes, im taking the weapons that im enjoying to play, and playing with them, there are alot of unique weapons into this game, and there are typical rifles and pistols. this game is TPS ( third person shooter ) but combine some ninja elements ( wallrunning, sneaking even tho it still need rework, and as well, melee weapons - there are dozens of melee weapons in this game ) and that whats make it unique when comparing to other games. also about P2P : Trading system! never paid a single cent, now i got 10 warframes, all with reactors and dozens of weapon slots, just get stuff in void and trade for other players platinum so you want to enjoy? find things that fit your playstyle? ( and there is a huge varity of weapons, from lightning gun to rocket launcher, from dagger to jet powered hammer ) download this game, and start to enjoy!
ThePotatoGamer100;-;epic assasin... that's what it's about
Nyte;-;The best way to describe warframe, would be "Space-gun-fighting-ninjas" With over 20+ Playable chericters, Hundreds of weapons, and countless coustomizatations for both. Warframe is a perfect alternative to the standard Gungame. Not to mentation all the team baised play that takes place in the game.
Killerwarior;-;This game has hours and hours of gameplay, if you don't mind the grinding it will keep entertained for atleast a few month.
they call me toaster;-;I've been playing since Update 10 and Warframe is nothing short of amazing. Warframe has evolved from your ordinary somewhat story-driven third person shooter, to one of the best F2P games and can possibly rival most games you buy. The Tenno, descendants of an ancient warrior civilization awake from a long slumber to find themselves at war with a horde of cloned humans, a proto-corporation of humans known for their robot proxies, the Infested, victims of the 'Technocyte" plague and the Corrupted guardians of the Void and only seen in the Void. Warframe is the name of the suit that the Tenno wear, each suit bears 4 special powers that can change the battlefield in different ways. Varying from powers that make you invisible for a limited amount of time to stomping the ground with great force tumbling enemies into stasis. Warframe has a large variety of exotic weapons, 'goofy' but exotic designs. The maps you consider classic (for me the Corpus Ship and the Grineer Asteroid) can get tiring and repetitive. To suppress the repetition, updates are released or you make your own fun. Even though Warframe is in beta and still has a few bugs crawling around the system, I still consider this as a complete game adding new features like most game developers do when releasing sequels. I highly recommend you to download this game and explore the bizarre worlds that Warframe has to offer.
Crimonus;-;An amazing game to play with youir friends
Galdeira;-;900 hours plaing this game in 4 months......WTF HOW
Captain Peanut;-;Space Ninjas. Free-to-Play. Weapon crafting. Weapon mods. So many different things. It's fun, and I keep coming back to play more. The only downside is that seeing as how it's free, in order to intice you to keep playing, you must GRIND the ever-loving  out of the game to get anywhere. Whether it's gathering resources for new guns or Warframes, or just leveling up already owned items to make them stronger. It's not a bad system, just a bit tedious. I still enjoy the game though.
L /I;-;Teleport to an enemy and punch him in the face. 10/10 best punching simulator and most accurate trailer ever made.
iwocat;-;Coolest Sci-fi shooter I ever played.
notsocoolranch;-;Honestly, this is one of the best game s I've played a LONG TIME! On any normal day I probably wouldn't like this game, because it looks confusing and complicated. But! This game does a good job describing it and you will get used to thew controls in a heartbeat. All around it is a verry good game!
bugolara<G2A.com>;-;DIs is 4 nu plaiers. ok if u think dat de game is boring bicus its 2 slow bui plat.:)
Scout;-;10/10 PC Can't even Handle it. And I can't login.
OTAK MICIN;-;space ninja , space pirates , space kung fu , space mercenary ,space pest terminator want more? wait for cool updates
Daendric_Valyatz;-;nice game and awesome graphic
Very Lone Doge;-;Man, compared to a while ago, this game grew with leaps and bounds. I'd also recommend "Prepare to Grind" as a subtitle.
Iota;-;There is one arguement that will be put up to this game; Pay2Win. I will say right now that it is not. While there are microntransactions, everything that contributes to actual gameplay can be acquired through playing the game. THERE IS GRIND IN THIS GAME. Putting that out there now because there are people who absolutely despise it. I for one do not have a problem with it. To be perfectly honest, there is ALOT of grind. The good thing is that the gameplay is just so much fun that it is actually enjoyable to play missions and its not just dull shooting ground after dull shooting ground. Looking at you Call of Duty. One kinda big problem i have with it is the inventory. To get more inventory slots you have to pay with Platinum, the microtransaction currency. This causes problems with having weapons and Warframes that you like and not having enough room to store them. The trading system slightly fixes that problem with being able to trade players for weapon parts, mods, and Warframe parts, as well as Platinum. If you are playing the game and find a really valuable mod, you can go to the trading tab and trade with players for it by putting up offers and looking if anyone wants something you might have. In summary this is a slightly flawed, but really enjoyable game if you don't mind grind and some waiting for things to happen. (To be honest what game isnt somewhat flawed?)
Col. BacoN;-;It's a Great Game i have to say, the atmosphere reminds me of Mass Effect and the Multiplayer of Mass Effect 3 with grindfest. It's a Hack and Slash Third Person Shooter Game that it's polished and responsive. Fast paced combat, strong tactical elements and good graphics. To be perfectly honest, this game is really quite addicting that you have to grind items, mods, etc. The best part is that, once you reach higher levels. This is the part where you do cooperation and strategy to execute the plan, the Developers are actively adding content to the game which is quite awesome! make sure you play this game with your friends since players in the public game are always racing to the extraction point which includes leaving teammates behind, doesn't communicate and so on. Graphics are great and the level of combat is sweet! Downside is that, there is still few bugs left in this game so expect that to happened. Game is also F2P, you can get most of the items in this game by just getting Blueprints and so on. I recommended this game especially if you're playing with your friends. Rated: 10/10
KurtyTooBusy;-;I find Warframe very fun and even though you can buy weapons and tennos with the use of real cash, you can still play the game using default weapons but I hate the limit of colours for customizing your character. Past that I do find the game very enjoyable and if your PC can handle high graphical settings then switch it to high its a beautiful looking game
MajorWreck;-;I love this game, it is the one that I keep going back too, however I recently went back and looked at the new user experience, it was not as joyous as I remembered, the steps taken to introduce you with the tutorials were better than when I joined, but still I understand why so many people feel it is just too bewildering. Hopefully with the new user experience finally getting some major TLC this is going to make the whole process much more intuitive. The most striking thing to me, was how little damage the initial set of weapons do, and how few useful mods drop early on, I got through the opening missions on Mercury with others, my experience on these levels aided that, but the step up to Venus was horrendous, the osprey shields made trying to kill anything a chore. I was forced to go back and repeatedly run missions to rank up the mods I had managed to collect. However once you break through and get to Earth, this is when the game truly shines, better mods drop which made the whole game seem more palatable. The graceful movement within game is beautiful, the addition of melee 2.0 has added a whole new dimension to the game, making melee both viable and more importantly fun. It is worth the effort to perservere and to get fully acquainted with the mechanics of the game, it opens up a world of possibilities, the continual development is widening the scope of gameplay with each update. Definitely recommend accruing major game time.
NS.KuruNinji;-;Good Grimy Game, Great for Grindy players Also, Good with friends - make a clan, settle down, and Destroy all the Grineer/Corpus/Infested/Corrupted! 9/10 will kill again
Leororn;-;Really cool game :D
Kinetic;-;Ninjas, Potatoes, and Stylepoints. If you have patience, everything's free. Only a little? Close enough, still free. If you don't, well... I don't blame you for wanting the badass looking weapons and items in the game, I mean, who wouldn't? FLAMING CAPES (Syndannas) AWWW YEAH
twitch.tv/DaWolv;-;One of the best and most fair Free-2-Play games out there. Playing by yourself can be a bit grindy, however playing with friends or joining a Clan will amplify your enjoyment. And it's not even officially out of Beta yet!
TexBM;-;Pretty Cool And Awesome
Gunstar;-;Absolutely fantastic. The game plays smoothly, and the combat dynamics are flawless. The customisation options, which I should note are practically limitless, give you a really personal feel. Your avatar is, well, you. This game is free, and though I don't really want any of the DLC I'm gonna get one anyway just to support the devs, simply because such a brilliant games deserves to have some coin thrown at it. This game's a real hidden gem.
TAG;-;Best third person shooter I have ever played! Great Free To Play Game!
i might be a butt;-;this game got a jet powered hammer that can literally send a heavily armored enemy so far away that you lost track of it while laughing like an idiot 10/10
(incursio);-;for a free to play game, this game is absolutely worth it. The graphics are amazing, the gameplay is superb, and it is down-right fun to play. There are some down-sides though. For one, you really are gonna have to spend alot of time grinding for new frames, etc. Trust me, when I mean alot, I mean ALOT. If you are gonna download this game, you are gonna have to dedicate some of your time into this. Still, for a free to play game, its absolutely superb :]
Filthy Dave;-;Warframe is a great co-operative game. With many gamemodes, difficulties, customization, warframes and weapons, it doesn't bore me at all. However, it is very grindy and repetitive, and so it may bore some players. *Cough* Casuals *Cough*. Overall the game looks great, runs smoothly and is a ton of fun. Get it. It's free!
Kasegawa-chan;-;This is now my life.
[AE]MediaCard;-;About 90% of my playtime is probably just me walking around in my ship and nothing else. 10/10
Shadyha;-;Ninjas in space, 10/10 download now.
[DD]AlmightyT0T;-;Warframe : Ninja's play for free especially since update 13 Press x to Ninja You might not like the game, but that's just because you don't like 3rd person, ninja's, melee combat, magics and sci-fi. If you didn't quit for that reason, PLAY AGAIN or come back every update to see what's brought to the game
Videoloser;-;Warframe a really great third person shooter game. Developers are always providing with new content and regular updates. The community of this game can be said to be very large compared to other free to play games that are availabe through steam. Can be enjpyed Solo but of course playing with friends and messing around is always a lot of fun. This is not a pay to win kinda free to play game. Purcahsable Currency is an option, everything in the game is obtainable by all players with the in game currency. However, grinding would be a thing in the game. If you enjoy a hack and slash game this would be one of it.
OrangeLightning;-;Yes I do own Warframe and I am ASHAMED to admit it!
SnowTheory;-;it may have repitive gameplay elements its still fun to play especially with friends. It may have pay to win elements, but you can still be the very best with out paying though it may take longer. overall its a game to give it a try if you got no other mmo shooter to play. Another thing YOU ARE A NINJA. 10/10
1-X 4r! =);-;WOW that just a cool game :D I am recommned to all play that fun game play like aline and kill other alines Cool and Epic Do mission upgrade your rank,trade,change warframe, duel whit firends and change spaceship skin :3 WarFrame had a good update so download it and play it whit your firneds its becomes to be more fun then the past. and what more i can to say just PLAY ON IT XD
NaZzGuLL;-;It's a nice game but not for along time, gettin' borred pretty fast becuase of similar content everywhere, nothing new on the field..
Aziz;-;A really nice action game and the best free game ! Recommended to play it ;D
Ryan Shi;-;Awesome image,with future-tech weapens and warframes,I love it.
TYRONE "Bryant" BIGGUMS;-;I have been a GrandMaster Founder and playing Warframe since the beginning of Open Beta (April 2013) and still loving this game. I'm a huge fan of games that use the Unreal Engine like Dead Space, so this game struck me as a winner. I highly recommend this game to hardcore gamers that love to grind for with friends.
Kozak;-;Valkyr has the best .
Zquarda;-;This game brings many new ideas and exciting, co-op play extremely interesting,
Vandole;-;Nice game.
Jocool1231;-;IT'S BUTIFUL-LY AMAZING
Luthor;-;Love this game to bits.
Tyl3r;-;One of the best F2P games on steam
bigchese63;-;Cant Stop playing this game as the fact is not even complete yet blows my mind cant wait for U14 gona BE F'in office
Beast Wolf;-;Warframe gets mixed opinions. the most common thing is "It's too grindy." While yes, sometimes the grind is real, it is not all bad. In Warframe, everything is unlocked. the only thing keeping you back is your mastery level, which is basically a level on your profile that gives you access to higher weapons. You gain this by using more variety, using and leveling the different weapons and frames that are availible to maximum and leveling up! After all, you can get every resource in the game for free. Every resource needed is in the game, you just have to play through some missions and find it! There are only a couple items you don't find, but with the active development team of Digital Extremes "DE" They livestream and host a developer stream where they showcase up and coming features, and after these they put up a mission to where you can get one for free. Fancy! All in all, the game runs well, looks amazing, the gameplay is fun, super responsive, not too difficult to understand. The only con I have about this game is that there are no cosmetic choices for free players really (But you do get all the game for free gameplay and value wise) And the fact that some of the tutorials for inner sections of the game are a bit under-detailed and somewhat confusing. Other than that I say you pick up the game and see how you like it! In the words of a favorite youtuber of mine "If you're even somewhat interested in Warframe, go check it out! ... It's f-free...whaddya got to lose?"
Blue;-;This game is addicting and the DE's are always coming out with new content: frames, maps, weapons etc., and they actually listen to their players...also it's free to play NOT pay to win like some free games...
Markutsk;-;Oh. You wanted a regular MMO FPS? No, sorry, you came to the wrong place. This isn't a regular MMO. Let us say. You Have absolutely no character costumisation! No, not the traditional kind, like: Hairstyle, and other boring  like that. No. In this game, you wear an armor. A stymulating armor, which you may repaint, add things to it, take things away from it. Oh, and, there isn't only one armor type. This game is still in Beta, so await more armors, or... let us call it how it is, Warframes; Within every new patch. "Oh so it's an FPS with armor costumization?" -And Weapon costumization -And ship costumization -And skill costumization Basically, you can costumize the whole ing game how your puny little mind desires. Four skills per Warframe. Three regulars, one Ultimate. "LEAGE OF LEGENDS RIPOFF!" Oh, bugger off. At least this game makes it right, and doesn't make you mash buttons like a five yearold. It takes skill, creativity, and planning. This game is. Well. I r8 gr8, 8/8, m8. No seriously, the game is worth more than a try.
Pikemonogatari!;-;*Warfarm also, Parkour. EDIT: After 500+ hrs, I can safely say my favorite things in Warframe are when the lights flicker and redtext. also, Shoujo frame [yuikami-da.deviantart.com]
bombastico930;-;You can rush you can stealth you can get glitched and then you are stuck but IT'S FREE!!
Satan for a Month;-;Lunchbox memelords, bubbly-armored butterfaces, silver potatoes, mushroom dogs, and grinding like NEPTUNE's early days.
Luffy;-;This game is better than most of the payed games that have come out over the past 2 years. This game is to simply put it, FUN. You will always find yourself coming back to it. The Graphics are amazing and they are not demanding so people with potatoes like mine can run it and make it look beautiful. Pros: - Large Variety of Weapons - Very Large Variety of Mods -Addictive shooting mechanics - Great Crafting system - FUN - Great to play alone or with friends - NOT P2W AT ALL(THIS GAME IS THE BEST EXAMPLE OF A FAIR F2P GAME) -All weapons that can be bought with special currency can be crafted. - Can get special currency through in game trade(No need to spend money) Cons: - Mechanics can get repetetive(Even then they are still fun) - Can't think of many other things to put down here TL:DR This game is FUN. Solid 9.75/10
vzSnow |;-;addictive game .. love it
Dookas;-;I really couldn't be any happier with a Free to Play game.Note this is usually a bad genre full of boring MMOs or bad FPSs that are full of micro transactions.However Warframe is a different story while it has micro transactions they don't ruin the game,I'll admit they make it easier but that is boring.I like this game alot but i do prefer the PS4 version which really shocked me.All in all if you like ninjas,space,parkour, and FREE stuff get this game now
Swaggin Dragon;-;This is my all-time favorite game, it has almost everything I dreamed for in an MMOTPS. DEFINETLY RECOMMENDED
Peace Of Mind;-;NO PAY BARRIERS AT ALL - Every single item in the game can be obtained through gameplay. This is one of the best and quite possible the best free to play game on steam. Absolutely excellent. Great gameplay. Looks fantastic. Awesome combat and weapons. Excellent FX, music and sound. Lots of uber cool characters to choose from. How they fitted all this into under 2GB is pretty damn amazing. Highly recommended and awesome good fun to play with friends, solo or online with random squad members. Why it got a metacritic rate of 67% I just have no idea. My favourite game for quite some time.
AVX;-;Warframe is a Space ninja with guns kind of game. Overall, it has a nice movement and combat system. However the Grinding can get pretty repetitive. The gameplay makes up for it though.
Ezard;-;For those of you who remember Gunz: The Duel, it's a more awesome version of that For those of you who don't it's just an awesome game :)
ixAlexHD;-;The beauty of this game... It's free to play, no catches, no "pay-to-win", and it's mostly a four player co-op.The experience is best optimized to play with friends or meet friendly strangers that become your friend to play with. Sure there is micro-transactions,but you can get everything in the game via-trading or farming FOR FREE. The game is co-op, so no one's experience is ruined during a massive online PvP game by someone else saying "wow, that is such a OP weapon that just killed me for the 40th time i bet you bought that using your mom's credit card". The game is beautiful with tons of planets to explore and complete with friends. Various weapon options to quench your thirst of variety and upgrades. I've only bought $5 worth of microtransactions, due to a 50% off coupon i've recieved in-game and I wanted to support the game and keep in mind I was already 270 hours into the game already. I've traded my way to get platinum from farming items. ( The micro-transaction currency ) - 9.5/10 Would reccomend because of the vast community and lovely free-to-play.
toyou1995;-;Though I now play on PS4, I cannot recommend this game enough!
Connosaur;-;truly brilliant game, the graphics and the feel to it is amazing, a good multiplayer campaign and excellent gameplay, but of course the best part is, IT'S FREE!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Baron Sammers;-;Takes some investment to get into it, but when you do; the ride never ends. Great game.
Squelettique roi;-;This game is somewhat interesting to recommend for a few reasons, but first the positives. The game itself is fun and is also an interesting consept for a F2P game, although rather repetitive after a while. The combat itself is above average, having you equiped with a primary, secondary and melee with a large amount of choice for each catagory. The movement system is what will be most interesting for new players, as i cannot see any reason why Doing a wall run, Gound slaming on a tough enemy then going into a slide and killing another enemy with kunai whist sliding past him wouldn't be entertaining. Now onto the negative aspect of this game, the 10 Km high barrier for new players that is *Drum roll here* Crafting and Farming. Despite the game puts you in a MUCH better position at the start that it did previously, the barrier is still there. A lot of the weapons that are good to begin with either require unknown and unobtainable reasources for a new player or be locked away from you untill you build the weapons that may as well require literal unobtainium for a new player, however, if you can find a group of people to play with you will have a MUCH more enjoyable and easier time playing. The crafting also uses a automated "This will be finished in..." sort of system, and some of the wait times are somewhat crazy, the worst being 3 days for a warframe, which needs you to build all 3 of it's parts first, with a minimum time of 12 hours if all 3 are crafted at once, So be prepared to wait, and brutaly maim someone with an axe while you wait. Over all the game does a good job of what it does, and that is to provide hours of play time to build and upgrade a set of weapons so they become powerful enough to kill the entire population of a country in a few minuites, but remember, if you get this game, you will learn to farm. Or get eaten by crazy rabid space dogs, your choice really.
NinjaNultrix;-;Pretty fun game to play with friends!
kresa;-;One of the must fair f2p games out there with pve content.
Skunk_McSmelly;-;Warframe is a game that is free to play, but no payment is ever really nessicary. I've actually only played the game for 100 hours, and I'm in end game tier equipment. The game is always open, and though uninteresesting at first, once you get some friends to play with, and talk to the game is a blast. Don't get me wrong, the game is a blast without your friends, but in a co-op game, friends is always the best way to go. The game has missions, about 20 per planet/moons. There are about 20 of these moons, along with random levels called "alerts", and "invaisons". There are 6 or 7 mission types. The levels are randomly generated, but the type will always be the same for the mission you selected. I've never seen the same level twice, though they will pretty much always have the same aethetic. These mission types really make each mission unique. Extermination is where you need to kill all the enemies in a level. Defense is like horde mode, but you're defending a certain artifact. You have the option to extract every 5 waves, with loot getting better, but enemies getting harder every wave and the potential to lose everything you're already earned. Moble defense is kind of like defense, but rather than wave based, it's time based with you having to take a core around to different static posts. This is the worst type of mission. Survival is a time based mission where you must survive (duh) as long as possible. The enemy will cut your life support at the start of the mission, so you must get life support dropped from Lotus. Extration is where you must mine cyotic, a special ore ice thing, used to freeze luxury Marsian Jellyfish (I wish I was joking). The game is always intense action, there's always something to do, and that's why it's so fun. Though Earth, and eventually Mercury are kind of boring, but once you get out of there, the game gets so good, it's unimagible. A great experiance, deserved to be played by everyone, with frequent patches, and constant attention. PLAY THIS GAME!!!
Sorimachi;-;While I recommend this game, because it is a fun experience... I can easily see how the fun factor will die very quickly. There are a lot of weapon choices and different classes to play, but if you don't know what you already like you'll either spend a ton of time or money trying to find out. By default, you are limited to 2 classes and 8 weapons. Your starting class will take 1 of these slots. You (typically) have 3 weapons at all times. 1 primary, 1 sidearm, 1 melee weapon. During the learning process of what you like, you will most probably be deleting several weapons and frames to test out new ones. (or you can pay for more slots) Weapons and frames are crafted (or bought) They also level up. Leveling up items is how you level up your overall character level. That means, you must try new weapons and frames in order to advance further. I do not recommend spending money on anything that can be obtained by playing the game. The purpose of playing is to obtain resources and unlock new areas... to obtain more resources. If you buy your way to end-game, you will not have a reason to play. For me, I joined with a friend, who has some friends that have been playing for some time. My sister also joined up. What I've noticed is this... When I play with the veteran players (or with the public) there is a heavy rush factor. You will feel very underpowered, and will not really kill anything. It's like acceptable leeching. When I play with my friends that are just as weak as I am, I feel like we can have fun and explore the levels a bit more. The game is heavily co-op. The veterans that I know don't seem to have any trouble soloing some missions, but overall the missions are unforgiving. You will need to go in with a team. Lacking a central hub to meet people (future content) you will have to either have friends that play, or join in public games and take your chances. Recommended, but not long term.
ll Rugged ll;-;-I was a gamer -I started to play warframe -I am no-lifer now thank you warframe 11/10
Zoddo;-;11/10 a F2P version of destinty which also offers a lot more than destiny.
Deso[187];-;This is a great game if you have lots of time to put in, because it needs lots of time for grinding for weapons and XP to level up.
SkyHunter1234;-;It is a cool game i say like you can kill guys and Cool tricks like slide and shoot thats cool.
Steesaye;-;Warframe is a free to play online shooter with the theme Sci-Fi, and is very great to play with friends in. If you are willing to pay, like in other free to play games, you can buy the in-game currency called Platinum, which can be used for buying things from the in-game shop, or trading with other people for rare parts etc. This game has got a trade system (as mentioned before) in which you can trade certain rare parts, mods etc. for platinum and other goods, this is a way you can get platinum aswell, by selling the rare items you find in missions like the Void for instance. This game is free to play like I mentioned before, and you are eligable to craft most, if not all, items in the game after playing for some time (This is because you need items to craft items, which you can find in missions, so you have to do missions to get the crafting requirements). There may be some things that I have missed in this review, but you at least get the point of the game. This game is, like mentioned, a shooter game, which can be played online and solo, or just with friends. So, you will have to love shooter games in order to love this game, otherwise it just won't work.
Astromaxitis;-;A fun game for those who want to spent some time as a space ninja. (+)Very energetic and exciting co-op multuplayer and some amazing designes on weapons and Tenno. (-)Unfortunately it lost my dedication later on because of the blurred questline
Krayne (Splitting Headache);-;Two words. Space ninjas. In all sincerity though, Warframe is an excellent title, it has great gameplay, smooth visuals, and works well even on somewhat older computers. Being a free to play game, you'd figure there would be "pay to win" items using micro-transactions. While micro-transactions do play a part in this game, it is entirely co-op, not competetive, so you aren't going to get wiped on the floor by someone because they shelled out some cash for goodies, because they will always be on YOUR team. And every equipable item in the marketplace that can be bought with premium cash can be crafted using blueprints, which you can buy in the marketplace for in-game credits. There are even some items only available through finding the blueprints for them in missions. All in all, Warframe is an amazing co-op experience, and while the game is technically still in beta and has a few bugs and glitches here and there, the developers are always on top of the situation, and regularly converse with members on the forums to weed them out. I would definitely reccomend a quick download of this game right away. After all, NINJAS PLAY FREE!!! :D
GG@Clicks'tation;-;I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS GAME! But ofc it has it's problems........ [ to avoid a long wall of text ill just write the pros and cons ] NOTE: DONT BELIEVE THOSE PEOPLE WHO SAY THIS GAME IS "PAY TO WIN" ......... This game ISNT...... Slots and cosmetics are the only things that you can't farm........ but can only bought with plat which something that has to be bought for real life currency but as you know, you can get plat through the power of TRADING....... The devs deserve money though so throw in money if you want to and if you want to buy plat....... just wait for a 75% discount from log-in rewards unless you're impatient........ PROS: - Ninjas in space [ u gotta admit thats friggin cool ] - FREE TO PLAY -GETS CONSTANT UPDATES -LOTS OF CONTENT -Rewarding -FUN AND ADDICTING COMBAT -LOTS OF VARIETY TO WEAPONS AND CUSTOMIZATION -Not "Pay to win" -PARKOUR -THE REALLY REALLY AWESOME COMMUNITY -Clans -Trading -Awesome lore -It's FUN -Lots and lots of enemies -Good graphics -PVP -TRADING -COMPANIONS [ SENTINELS AND KUBROWS ] -Challenging [ you'll know the feeling ] Cons: -NOT THE BEST SERVER -Buggy sometimes -complicating and confusing start -Takes time and determination [ not really that much of a con but its what u must pay ] -Waiting times for your weapons -Repetitive missions -Although it has an awesome lore, its confusing sometimes and complicated and most of all, unfinished -Not for the impatient -the games detects what you need and pretty much makes things harder for you and will try to throw random useless stuff at you [ jk, iz juz RNG ] -Casuals will pull you down, BADLY Ok this game is FUN okay.... but its buggy servers will pretty much annoy you and i understand the pain as a first time player because i quitted this game last time but i got back when i understanded it a bit more and put in more effort, it became fun and thats when I got hooked into the game....... Yes it has repetitive missions but the combat makes up for that and the variety of weapons you can get.... but then again it takes time.......... Overall this game is better than most F2P's out there and even paid MMO games..... I'd rate 8.5 out of 10 but it's server connection problems will annoy you, you'll feel the full force of this problem when you're doing endless defense mission waves then you're at high waves like 40 and above and all of you get disconnected and you have to fight all of the enemies by yourself.........
NO | Player;-;Would play again / 10
Blue;-;This game is addicting and the DE's are always coming out with new content: frames, maps, weapons etc., and they actually listen to their players...also it's free to play NOT pay to win like some free games...
Markutsk;-;Oh. You wanted a regular MMO FPS? No, sorry, you came to the wrong place. This isn't a regular MMO. Let us say. You Have absolutely no character costumisation! No, not the traditional kind, like: Hairstyle, and other boring  like that. No. In this game, you wear an armor. A stymulating armor, which you may repaint, add things to it, take things away from it. Oh, and, there isn't only one armor type. This game is still in Beta, so await more armors, or... let us call it how it is, Warframes; Within every new patch. "Oh so it's an FPS with armor costumization?" -And Weapon costumization -And ship costumization -And skill costumization Basically, you can costumize the whole ing game how your puny little mind desires. Four skills per Warframe. Three regulars, one Ultimate. "LEAGE OF LEGENDS RIPOFF!" Oh, bugger off. At least this game makes it right, and doesn't make you mash buttons like a five yearold. It takes skill, creativity, and planning. This game is. Well. I r8 gr8, 8/8, m8. No seriously, the game is worth more than a try.
Pikemonogatari!;-;*Warfarm also, Parkour. EDIT: After 500+ hrs, I can safely say my favorite things in Warframe are when the lights flicker and redtext. also, Shoujo frame [yuikami-da.deviantart.com]
bombastico930;-;You can rush you can stealth you can get glitched and then you are stuck but IT'S FREE!!
NonaSaido;-;This game won the world record for having the largest gathering of people wearing false mustaches simultaneously in a videogame. Nuff' said.
jac08028;-;I luv it. Mass Effect and Halo had a Co-op Ninja baby.
Consona;-;Good standing game in comparicing for other games in the same niche. +Looks like devs push their Evolution Engine pretty good; +Smooth gameplay; +Good matchmaking; +Nice weaponry and deal damage system; +Game become much better over time with new features, modes and fixed old ones; +Finally some AI improvement is going on; +Music improvements, now is pleased to hear; +Pretty responsible dev team to community; +Okay clan system. -Sadly low level of overall design (but have some tact) and palette and FX planning; pretty influencing, f.e. sometimes you find enemy or ally much faster at radar instead of just looking in front of you! in the middle of a battle. -Different diffuse and normal maps resolution in game assets; seriously? Devs haven't sense of object's scale? -Few quests, poor story; grinding feelings. -Some overload CPU performance; actually You not "feel" it ingame, but! if you monitor your Hardware or have any tasks in BG that using CP during game running you'll find out... -Some breaking logic elements in crafting and gameplay. -Minor not much gamebreaking bugs, some of them you don't even see if you're not so pedantic; things like slightly different damage dealt on host and client side of the game even with good network and data bandwidth and so on...
Danucchi;-;Great game with a great concept, i thought this is another p2w space game, but you don't really need to buy stuff with your real money, you can sell your in game item to all rich  people and buy an item from poor  people, trading is everthing, and buy every premium item on game with your own enterprise 9/10, This game ruin my life
Zekail;-;been playin this game for a couple months now got into the closed beta and grabbed a masters founders package, probably the best co-op shooter/hack n slash ive played in years
poudis;-;no star war
Restartmind111;-;What can i say...awesome game, very addictive, cool gameplay, nice graphics, acceptable lore, weekly updates, the grind is real, space ninjas, hype trains with no breaks til it stops, "ok" UI, and so more...go go DE!
B-LiTzE-R;-;One of the best F2P games i have played in a very long time! 10/10
Smail Smydra;-;Excillent graphics and sound effects. I'm downloading this game now. Can't wait to play (i apoligize for my spelling, i have wrote this at 2:00 am)
Stranded;-;This game is absolutely horrid when nobody wants to play with you.
Billy M.T.;-;Play this game for long enough, and you too will be able to be a space ninja with enough skill to kill the whole crew of a battleship, completely stealthy, with nothing but a broadaxe in your hands. I'm not even exaggerating this.
FlamingArrow;-;One of the best free games there is. Many people call it a pay to win game, but all that paying really does for you is speed up the process of gaining weapons and warframes. Great game over all, i would give it a 9/10 simply due to glitches in the beginning of every single update
Potatoz;-;A third person shooter with overall amazing graphics and a gameplay that doesn't get old. If you want action then this is the game for you. The fact that warframe is free to play makes it way more awesome than it already is. The classes are great and all of them has their own little features and weapons. Overall i think its a great game but i would't recommend it for players under 12 years old. Well anyhow i will give warframe 7/10 because of the great gameplay behind it. And if you are a fan of third person shooters then you're at the right place. I have thought picked up some small glitches here and there thought i don't blame it since every game has it. But i would totally recommend this to most gamers out there.
Janzer;-;One of the best games out there on the market...and it's free!
satanic fighter;-;I love this game, I play with my friend and we're both addicted to the game
Dovahtiim tim;-;one word amazing the xbox 360 controler comp could use some work but its still amazing i absolutly love the co-op
Rosenbaum;-;i don't think there's any other game that makes you feel so ridiculously overpowered
RB;-;Ever wanted to be a magical space ninja with a pet koala dog? Then Warframe is the game for you!
Surreal;-;ITS GRIND TIME BOYS
AoG StreetG0rilla;-;Highly addictive with great gameplay, leveling system, and item crafting!
Saint of Grey;-;Please send help, I want to live life again.
Senpai Doge;-;Very fun game but it needs a little more content... it's basicly a farming sim but in space and with ninjas who have powers and shoot guns I give it a 8.5/10
moonchild;-;chesticulicious
Miish;-;It's ok.
Emilia Clarke;-;this is game is very good recomment it to players who look shooters.
Uhhninjeesword/Megaminer;-;fun as hell little grindy but get past that and its fun
Saint of Grey;-;Please send help, I want to live life again.
Dodge Charger;-;A game that is not Pay-2-Win at least. And it's better than Call of Duty. 17/10 would play again.
AoG StreetG0rilla;-;Highly addictive with great gameplay, leveling system, and item crafting!
Senpai Doge;-;Very fun game but it needs a little more content... it's basicly a farming sim but in space and with ninjas who have powers and shoot guns I give it a 8.5/10
FE I T_;-;I likey the game!!! Look at my play time.
SANTA;-;This game is just amazing. content + space + ninjas + kickass weapons + zombies + aliens + robots = a ing brilliant game = WARFRAME
Nenji;-;This game is a wonderful time consuming game with great fighting. I recommend this game because it is fun and there is lots of jolly co-operation. Its also free!!!!
Lynix200;-;Lots of alien nijas chopping arms and legs off, all for free and co-op too!
huntra1291;-;Warframe is the frequently updated, lovingly supported, free-to-play outing from Digital Extremes, the team that brought you 2008s mutagen-filled Dark Sector. In fact, Warframe is the not-so-direct sequel to Dark Sector in that it takes place a good handful of millennia after the conclusion of its predecessor. But dont worry about plot, because Warframes story is thinner than water. Youre a Tenno, a humanoid being descended from the protagonist of Dark Sector. Revived by the Lotus, a mysterious entity who seeks to bring balance to the Milky Way, youre sent out to do battle with space marines, space zombies, and space corporates (seriously) with your space ninja superpowers, provided (in part) by your Warframe, a bio-organic suit of armor created by a virus that has begun to infest the entire star system. Warframe is an oddball of a game to classify. Its part MMO, part Monster Hunter, part Mass Effect 3 co-op, part Vanquish, and then some. The game is so hard to describe, in fact, that Ive coined a new genre for it: space-ninja simulator (okay, its a third-person action shooter MMO, but shut up). When you first begin, youll be dropped into a tutorial that teaches you simple movement tricks like jogging and sprinting, firing your weapons, and hacking things apart with your sword. Immediately following this, youre dropped into the general UI and shown a big galaxy map (think Mass Effects galaxy map), an inventory screen, a foundry (where youll craft things), a store, and some other options. Here is where Warframes biggest folly lies: not once are you ever told how these work. Some of these elements are pretty easy to pick up on (click a planet on the map to bring up nodes; these represent missions, which unlock branching paths when you play them), but others are more complicated (How do I make weapons? How do I get more Warframes? Whats an Orokin Catalyst?), and will require alternative methods to learn about and utilize. Thankfully, Warframe has a big community, so its not hard to pull up a Google search and find a half-dozen listings for why Excalibur is the best starting frame and why all the gear youre given to start with isnt going to hold up. If youve ever played Vanquish for any length of time, then you already have a fairly good grasp on how Warframe works. While you wont be slowing time down, virtually anything you can pull off in Platinum Games underrated 2011 shooter can be done here. However, there isnt a single bit of hand-holding, which, as previously mentioned, is the biggest issue with the game. Tricks like sliding on your knees to move rapidly while unloading rounds on your foes, running up a wall to reach a better vantage point, and zipping through the air with your feet outstretched to kick enemies to the ground are all things you must find out through experimentation or word of mouth. While its a cool idea to keep these as things to find out on your own, the acrobatics of Warframe are a huge portion of what makes it unique. Theres nothing quite like running along a wall while laying down a hail of gunfire on unfortunately located foes below. Warframes unique blend of gunplay and melee is an unconventional approach to the shooting genre. While melee is almost always an option, its rarely given the same level of importance as the firearms you wield. Not so here  youre actively encouraged to take advantage of the many stunts your melee weapon of choice grants you. While straight up punching at the faces of your foes isnt the most viable option, leaping into the air and slamming a massive blade into the air to trip over your foes, giving some poor sod on the floor a flurry of punches to the face from a pair of gauntlets, or bisecting a mob of degenerating clones with an electric whip are just a few of the choices youre given when it comes to hacking enemies apart. Not all weapons are the same, however, so while the Obex fisticuffs look cool (they taze and they punch!), theyre not going to be nearly as practical as the Scindo battleaxe. Thankfully, theres a lot of gear to choose from, and the frequency of updates from Digital Extremes will see to it that you never run out of options. Warframe I saw this in Kill la Kill! There is no overworld in Warframe to speak of. The entire game consists of instances (organized by nodes on a web map), with missions that vary in faction, objective, potential loot, and tile set. Each faction is a completely different force to compete against, as the Grineer utilize overwhelming numbers and heavy armor, while the Corpus defend themselves with shields and robots that act as cannon fodder. Lastly, the Infested are a race that does what the name implies: over time, planets containing nodes that denote specific missions will become infested, and you will temporarily ally with that nodes faction to repel the infestation. Once the infestation meter for that planet is reduced to zero, the original faction will move back in, and the conflict resumes once again. An interesting feature of Warframe is the previously mentioned tile set. Tile sets are different, grid-based chunks of a level that are randomly selected before every mission begins to make a completely unique level to explore and do battle in (much like TimeSplitters, though youre not the one making the maps). The open-ended nature of tile sets means that you can end up in an expansive or linear map, making some missions lengthy and full of loot to find and use for crafting new gear, or others short and sweet to make boss runs that much shorter. While some may be irked by the idea of layouts not set in stone, the idea of never running into the exact same map twice is a refreshing take on the co-op shooter. Weapons can be modded for improved stats and the ability to generate elemental effects, like fire, ice, and even radiation. Weapons can be modded for improved stats and the ability to generate elements reactions, like ice and fire. One of Warframes biggest draws is the flashy, non-competitive gameplay you can enjoy with friends for the low price of free. However, the label of free is all too obvious, with all weapons, Warframes, and other gear being objects you can purchase right out of the box (albeit at inflated prices easily circumvented by farming for the parts needed to make these frames). While many items (such as the coveted, raid-exclusive Prime equipment) require that players achieve them instead of pulling out the wallet, the idea of being able to buy the newest gun the moment its released is quite odd. However, not one item that affects your ability to perform the game is behind a pay wall; all non-cosmetic items (and even then, some cosmetics) can be obtained with the simple concept of invested time. This is where the Monster Hunter comparisons come into play: if you want to get a new Latron rifle, youll have to purchase the blueprint with credits (earned through regular play) and construct it in the foundry using materials found during different missions. Once youve begun construction, timers come into play. This is another aspect of Wareframes free-to-play status. If youre patient, your new gun will be ready within the next 12-24 hours. If you want your fancy new rifle now, however, youll need to drop a small amount of money to rush the build to completion. While its not going to impede your ability to participate normally, it wouldnt be a surprise if this turned many away from the idea of playing the game. However, the nature of the game is the grind. You can always be better, and thus, youll almost always be looking for the next big thing to find, as there are no real goals set for you (outside of big events) besides the ones you want to achieve. Thus, you may love Warframe, or you may actively despise it. 8/10
[Psn]Shadowbeast147;-;This game.. i must. i can't stop playing this, its just so amazing i mean o.O it's just too good to be f2p, i heavily recommend it, the community is great, and it's fun to play with friends !
Poyoarvolk;-;it's ok
DatSkinnyGuy;-;One of the best F2P experience I had
The Greatest Arbroath Hero [TBS];-;Warframe is a very well made free to play 3rd person PVE co-op action game, set in a futuristic version of our solar system. Currently in beta and it has been for more than a year but do not let that put you off, this game deserves at least a moment of your time. You take control of a Tenno, a member of a mysterious race of long forgotten warriors. The name Warframe refers to the suits of exo-armour used by the Tenno in battle. The idea for Warframe grew from a 2008 game by Digital Extremes, Dark Sector. The two games share the same universe and there is some evidence to support the theory that Dark Sector's protagonist is still alive in some form in Warframe's far future. Missions in Warframe come in several flavours; extermination, survival, defence and boss battles are just a few of the challenges you can expect to face. The levels are procedural generated from tile sets so even if the same level is played repeatedly there will be map variations every time. Although PVP does exist in the game (conclave and a duelling room) the main focus is PVE, 4 player squads versus all this grim future has to throw at them. There is so much content in this game, I'm only going to scratch the surface. Customisation is vast and varied with new content added frequently. All the standard guns you would expect are here, assault rifles, pistols, shotguns, sniper rifles and much more. Bows, bizarre energy weapons, flame throwers and a huge amount of melee choices. Weapons and frames can be modded too, need more health and shields? No problem, apply the mods to your frame and then level them up for more health and shields. There are hundreds of mod cards to boost or add stats, elemental damage mods can be mixed to create different effects and a refined melee combat system has been added recently. There is no shortage of customisation in the looks department either, colour palettes, alternate helmets, badges, skins and a tonne of accessories. Looking good in Warframe does come with a real world cost, most of the cosmetic upgrades will require you to buy platinum. Of course Warframes are different beyond their appearance, each frame has 4 special powers bound to it, these range from direct attacks to team heals, mind control to invisibility, team buffs and enemy de-buffs. The list goes on and on. Each Warframe has different base stats. All frames can run, slide, jump and wall-run. There are plenty of hidden areas and shortcuts that can only be accessed by chaining together jumps and wall-runs. The graphics look great and really come alive during combat. Environments range from murky swamps to the divine radiance of the Void. The soundtrack and sound effects are also of a high standard, weapons sound like they look and feel. The drum heavy ost helps to keep the action pounding along and that first 10 seconds of music on the login screen will always make me think of the Terminator theme, another plus for WF. Character animations are fluid, character physics are a bit floaty. I have seen the handling of Warframes compared to "steering a boat" but personally I've never had a problem with it and the at times Wile E Coyote like momentum. There are downsides too, this game is a time sink and the only way to avoid those long hours spent grinding is your money, buy some plat and get that stuff instantly. Loads of my friends have quit playing when they find out about the 12hr wait on the parts needed to build a new Warframe then the 3 day build time on the actual Warframe. Again this has never been a big issue for me. I could easily keep going for another 700 words, more pros and cons, explain more about the game and expand on those points I've mentioned but this is the bottom line. Warframe is a fantastic game that has done nothing but improve in the time I've played it.
Ewatashi;-;10/10 ign would masturbate again
StarGazorXz;-;Warframe was the best game I ever played. Thank you <3
Shine;-;It's Free. Just try it, you lose nothing but time you'd use to do something else that's probably stupid. Probably one of the better "Free to play" games. Unlike most free to play games which restrict your experience without you paying them, Warframe pretty much offers nearly all of it's content for free, with the exception of purely cosmetic items, and 'item slots' which only serve you if you plan to collect a lot of items/characters. The weapons and characters themselves can be earned without paying money, and the BEST equipment is usually not available for real money anyway.
AgentBlue234;-;much ninja,very shoots,so tenno, wow
Flunphyguy;-;RNG Simulator 10/10 will continue to farm for one specific item for 1000+ hours
utheraptor;-;One could easily say that WarFrame is a lacking game, sporting limited amounts of story, heavy grinding and being in Beta for two years... However, the game feels incredibly good to play and has a great developer team, which actually looks to players' needs and wishes. Everything in the game which is not purely cosmetic (or isn't an equipment slot) can be farmed for for free, and in addition to that, you can trade for Platinum (the in-game currency you buy with real money) in the Trade chat, allowing you to get even the things you need to pay for for free, if you wish. The customization in the game is great and the amounts of different and interesting weapons is very wide, making it assured that everyone will have something to choose from. The game isn't very hard, but when you get to the very late game content, it actually becomes quite challenging and increasingly difficult to the point of being close to impossible around the two-hours-mark of the Orokin Void Tower IV Survival. The game becomes better and better with every update and is becoming closer and closer to being complete, with all the old, placeholder stuff being reworked into something entirely awesome as the time goes. So yes, I do recommend this game, it is a great time-eater, but it is worth the play. Also, now you can fly around with angel wings while wearing a suit with a tuxedo and banishing enemies to a different dimension. If that is not cool, nothing is.
[EG:L] Dash;-;450 hours on this game it is EPIC honestly get it and dont dismiss it at the start get a braton with a decent serration you will love it (add me ign sonicv6)
[_]RPY yU;-;Great game, too many people mistake it for a grindfest, but they just dont know how to play the game.
The Doctor;-;THIS GAME IS: 10% luck 20% SKILL 15% CONCENTRATED POWER OF WILL 5% PLEASURE 50% PAIN AND 100% REASON TO GO PURCHASE THE GAME.
Raymond Saint;-;Gameplay style = Borderlands+Mass Effect Visual style = Dead Space+E.Y.E.+Blame!
marble soda!;-;Fun, enjoyable and time craving. Just what I like about a game, you actually have to put time in it.
The Hooded Man;-;Warframe has been developing into a truly "Free 2 Play" Title and Third Person Shooter genre, I've seen the game changing and it's only getting better and better in each patch and the developer in Digital Extreme has been working hard for this game everyday, So if your a fan of sci-fi type of genre then you're on the right track. Warframe is going to make you worth your time and recommend if you play with friends, Lotus: Come my fellow tenno, you must join the war.
Miish;-;It's ok.
Tonys best boy;-;Picked up game with friends Eventually friends stop playing Haven't played with friends in ages Lotus is my only friend now 11/10
Ewatashi;-;10/10 ign would masturbate again
The Greatest Arbroath Hero [TBS];-;Warframe is a very well made free to play 3rd person PVE co-op action game, set in a futuristic version of our solar system. Currently in beta and it has been for more than a year but do not let that put you off, this game deserves at least a moment of your time. You take control of a Tenno, a member of a mysterious race of long forgotten warriors. The name Warframe refers to the suits of exo-armour used by the Tenno in battle. The idea for Warframe grew from a 2008 game by Digital Extremes, Dark Sector. The two games share the same universe and there is some evidence to support the theory that Dark Sector's protagonist is still alive in some form in Warframe's far future. Missions in Warframe come in several flavours; extermination, survival, defence and boss battles are just a few of the challenges you can expect to face. The levels are procedural generated from tile sets so even if the same level is played repeatedly there will be map variations every time. Although PVP does exist in the game (conclave and a duelling room) the main focus is PVE, 4 player squads versus all this grim future has to throw at them. There is so much content in this game, I'm only going to scratch the surface. Customisation is vast and varied with new content added frequently. All the standard guns you would expect are here, assault rifles, pistols, shotguns, sniper rifles and much more. Bows, bizarre energy weapons, flame throwers and a huge amount of melee choices. Weapons and frames can be modded too, need more health and shields? No problem, apply the mods to your frame and then level them up for more health and shields. There are hundreds of mod cards to boost or add stats, elemental damage mods can be mixed to create different effects and a refined melee combat system has been added recently. There is no shortage of customisation in the looks department either, colour palettes, alternate helmets, badges, skins and a tonne of accessories. Looking good in Warframe does come with a real world cost, most of the cosmetic upgrades will require you to buy platinum. Of course Warframes are different beyond their appearance, each frame has 4 special powers bound to it, these range from direct attacks to team heals, mind control to invisibility, team buffs and enemy de-buffs. The list goes on and on. Each Warframe has different base stats. All frames can run, slide, jump and wall-run. There are plenty of hidden areas and shortcuts that can only be accessed by chaining together jumps and wall-runs. The graphics look great and really come alive during combat. Environments range from murky swamps to the divine radiance of the Void. The soundtrack and sound effects are also of a high standard, weapons sound like they look and feel. The drum heavy ost helps to keep the action pounding along and that first 10 seconds of music on the login screen will always make me think of the Terminator theme, another plus for WF. Character animations are fluid, character physics are a bit floaty. I have seen the handling of Warframes compared to "steering a boat" but personally I've never had a problem with it and the at times Wile E Coyote like momentum. There are downsides too, this game is a time sink and the only way to avoid those long hours spent grinding is your money, buy some plat and get that stuff instantly. Loads of my friends have quit playing when they find out about the 12hr wait on the parts needed to build a new Warframe then the 3 day build time on the actual Warframe. Again this has never been a big issue for me. I could easily keep going for another 700 words, more pros and cons, explain more about the game and expand on those points I've mentioned but this is the bottom line. Warframe is a fantastic game that has done nothing but improve in the time I've played it.
Shine;-;It's Free. Just try it, you lose nothing but time you'd use to do something else that's probably stupid. Probably one of the better "Free to play" games. Unlike most free to play games which restrict your experience without you paying them, Warframe pretty much offers nearly all of it's content for free, with the exception of purely cosmetic items, and 'item slots' which only serve you if you plan to collect a lot of items/characters. The weapons and characters themselves can be earned without paying money, and the BEST equipment is usually not available for real money anyway.
StarGazorXz;-;Warframe was the best game I ever played. Thank you <3
AgentBlue234;-;much ninja,very shoots,so tenno, wow
Dangerously Safe;-;A decently fun game that you can play with friends, though playing solo may be overly difficult and the rank up missions are kinda a bit..... out of place, in terms of difficulty.
Flunphyguy;-;RNG Simulator 10/10 will continue to farm for one specific item for 1000+ hours
utheraptor;-;One could easily say that WarFrame is a lacking game, sporting limited amounts of story, heavy grinding and being in Beta for two years... However, the game feels incredibly good to play and has a great developer team, which actually looks to players' needs and wishes. Everything in the game which is not purely cosmetic (or isn't an equipment slot) can be farmed for for free, and in addition to that, you can trade for Platinum (the in-game currency you buy with real money) in the Trade chat, allowing you to get even the things you need to pay for for free, if you wish. The customization in the game is great and the amounts of different and interesting weapons is very wide, making it assured that everyone will have something to choose from. The game isn't very hard, but when you get to the very late game content, it actually becomes quite challenging and increasingly difficult to the point of being close to impossible around the two-hours-mark of the Orokin Void Tower IV Survival. The game becomes better and better with every update and is becoming closer and closer to being complete, with all the old, placeholder stuff being reworked into something entirely awesome as the time goes. So yes, I do recommend this game, it is a great time-eater, but it is worth the play. Also, now you can fly around with angel wings while wearing a suit with a tuxedo and banishing enemies to a different dimension. If that is not cool, nothing is.
[EG:L] Dash;-;450 hours on this game it is EPIC honestly get it and dont dismiss it at the start get a braton with a decent serration you will love it (add me ign sonicv6)
The Hooded Man;-;Warframe has been developing into a truly "Free 2 Play" Title and Third Person Shooter genre, I've seen the game changing and it's only getting better and better in each patch and the developer in Digital Extreme has been working hard for this game everyday, So if your a fan of sci-fi type of genre then you're on the right track. Warframe is going to make you worth your time and recommend if you play with friends, Lotus: Come my fellow tenno, you must join the war.
GuRPHS;-;Yeah it's pretty decent, kinda hard to get into at first. Can be a little grindy; Nothing compared to Runescape though. Very fun with friends. My favourite aspect of this game would be the Art Direction and Digital Extremes actually listening to their players, which makes for a very healthy and friendly community. Give it a go if you haven't already.
Cowedition;-;Fill bars the game
thank mr. skeltal;-;I haven't played it much, but it's alright. Gets a little repetitive though.
ZeroHQ;-;(Edited For Update Reasons) Alright So I Have Decided To Change My Review Since I Realised That It Became Very Old And People Need To Know More About This Game Rather Then Just Knowing That You Are A Ninja In Space Alright So Lets Begin Warframe Is A Free To Play Game ,Now It Does Have A Secondary Currency Named Platinum Which Is Used To Either Purchase Weapons ,Speed up Building Process,Purchase Warframes,And Cosmetic Items Now just HOLD On For A Second And Listen ,This Game Manages To Make This Currency Obatinable Using Trading And Those Warframes And Weapons That You Can Purchase Using The Currency Can Be Obtained Without Having To Use The Currency And This Is When the Foundry Which is Basically Where You Craft Comes Into Use ,Now The Primary Currency Is Called Credits And That Currency is Used to Purchase Blueprints For The Weapon Or The Warframe that You Wish to have ,Now as You Guessed You Have To Wait ,Now Some Can Argue That This Forces You To Buy ,But Actually It Doesnt It Encourages You To Level Up Your Stuff And Get Credits And XP While Its Done The Timing For Weapons Ranges From 12-24 Hours While Warframes Take 3 Days , Now The Trading System is Excellent But The Trading Community Are Just Full Of s And s , But Its Better To Join A Clan Because They Can Help You In Trading Alot And Now This Gets Us To The Co-op Part And To Me This Is The Most Important Part In Warframe Since First It Claims It Is A Co-op Game Therefore I Should Judge It Based On That And To Be Honest The Co-op System is Fantastic Now That Doesnt Mean You Cant Play Solo They Actually Give You The Option To Play Solo ,But The Co-op is So Nice Since The Community Excluding The Trading Section Is Very Friendly And You Will Find Tons Of People Who Are Willing To Assist You And You Have To Try And Socialaize In Warframe Since having A Team Of 4 Organized People ,Each One Knows His Role And Follows It Is Better Then 65 Player Clan Running And Gunning This Makes The Game Perfect For Playing With Friends But The Biggest Thing That Makes You Want To Purchase Platinum Is Slots For Your Frames And Weapons ,Now I Know This Isnt A Good Thing But Comparing To How Much They have Given Us For Free Its kind Of Something They Require To Get Their Funding And As I Said The Secondary Currency Is Obttainable In The Game ,Cosmetics Used To Be With Platinum Only But With The Introduction Of This New Trader Who I Forgot His Name XD You Can Buy Cosmetic Stuff For Credits And A Third Currency That Is Easily Obtained In The Game ,Now This Brings Us To The Last Thing Which Is Color Palettes Which From My Info Are Only Obbtainable Using Platinum But In Alot Of Occasions Developers Just Hand Out Free Color Palettes And The Developers Are Amazing They Listen To The Community And Will never Hesitate To Put Their Ideas Into Prespective And Are Very Active Using Livestreams And All Kinds Of Communication On The Forums. Nevertheless Warframe Is One Of The Greatest F2P Titles Out There And This Review Definitley Didnt Cover Even 30% Of The Game So I really Encourage You To Try It Out And Explore It For Yourself :) 10/10 Would Break Fingers Again
Am Jek;-;Great Game!
[GL] Tricky;-;Gotta say Ninjas and space are Pretty good together
Gangsta Kitten;-;I've never been that much of a fan for coop fast intense games, but this one is fantastic! It runs with a smooth pace at high qualities and has nice players on!
H2'O;-;Warframe in it's simplest parts is a amalgamation of Mass Effect 3 shooting.
CaffeinatedSMUG;-;It's a real shame this game doesn't receive more attention. It's a hidden gem on all platforms. Remember Unreal Tournament? These guys made it. Warframe is 4-player co-op, guns and swords, on speed. Or on coffee. Drink some coffee and play Warframe!
Am Jek;-;Great Game!
thank mr. skeltal;-;I haven't played it much, but it's alright. Gets a little repetitive though.
ZeroHQ;-;(Edited For Update Reasons) Alright So I Have Decided To Change My Review Since I Realised That It Became Very Old And People Need To Know More About This Game Rather Then Just Knowing That You Are A Ninja In Space Alright So Lets Begin Warframe Is A Free To Play Game ,Now It Does Have A Secondary Currency Named Platinum Which Is Used To Either Purchase Weapons ,Speed up Building Process,Purchase Warframes,And Cosmetic Items Now just HOLD On For A Second And Listen ,This Game Manages To Make This Currency Obatinable Using Trading And Those Warframes And Weapons That You Can Purchase Using The Currency Can Be Obtained Without Having To Use The Currency And This Is When the Foundry Which is Basically Where You Craft Comes Into Use ,Now The Primary Currency Is Called Credits And That Currency is Used to Purchase Blueprints For The Weapon Or The Warframe that You Wish to have ,Now as You Guessed You Have To Wait ,Now Some Can Argue That This Forces You To Buy ,But Actually It Doesnt It Encourages You To Level Up Your Stuff And Get Credits And XP While Its Done The Timing For Weapons Ranges From 12-24 Hours While Warframes Take 3 Days , Now The Trading System is Excellent But The Trading Community Are Just Full Of s And s , But Its Better To Join A Clan Because They Can Help You In Trading Alot And Now This Gets Us To The Co-op Part And To Me This Is The Most Important Part In Warframe Since First It Claims It Is A Co-op Game Therefore I Should Judge It Based On That And To Be Honest The Co-op System is Fantastic Now That Doesnt Mean You Cant Play Solo They Actually Give You The Option To Play Solo ,But The Co-op is So Nice Since The Community Excluding The Trading Section Is Very Friendly And You Will Find Tons Of People Who Are Willing To Assist You And You Have To Try And Socialaize In Warframe Since having A Team Of 4 Organized People ,Each One Knows His Role And Follows It Is Better Then 65 Player Clan Running And Gunning This Makes The Game Perfect For Playing With Friends But The Biggest Thing That Makes You Want To Purchase Platinum Is Slots For Your Frames And Weapons ,Now I Know This Isnt A Good Thing But Comparing To How Much They have Given Us For Free Its kind Of Something They Require To Get Their Funding And As I Said The Secondary Currency Is Obttainable In The Game ,Cosmetics Used To Be With Platinum Only But With The Introduction Of This New Trader Who I Forgot His Name XD You Can Buy Cosmetic Stuff For Credits And A Third Currency That Is Easily Obtained In The Game ,Now This Brings Us To The Last Thing Which Is Color Palettes Which From My Info Are Only Obbtainable Using Platinum But In Alot Of Occasions Developers Just Hand Out Free Color Palettes And The Developers Are Amazing They Listen To The Community And Will never Hesitate To Put Their Ideas Into Prespective And Are Very Active Using Livestreams And All Kinds Of Communication On The Forums. Nevertheless Warframe Is One Of The Greatest F2P Titles Out There And This Review Definitley Didnt Cover Even 30% Of The Game So I really Encourage You To Try It Out And Explore It For Yourself :) 10/10 Would Break Fingers Again
Dark Wolf Senpai;-;Tenno.... wake up.... you will fight for your life, in this amazing TPS (Third Person Shooter) epic game.... but where you fight? Actually... in SPACE with a gun, pistols, melle weapons and everything! So build your arsenal, choose your character and don't stop fighting until the end!
ShadowPotato;-;Meh. It's OK
AlabayWong;-;Hi there! I want to share my impressions with you. Warframe by Digital Extremes is a cooperative third-person shooter with elements of slasher. Here you can find many interesting things suck as Different weapons. Many exoskeleton(Warframes)with own set of skills and characteristics. And of course quests. Gameplay is on the high level.Here you can jump, run , slide and roll , and combine methods to quickly move through the level and avoid enemy fire.(This is that i like so much). For the crafting you need some special resources that can be found on the certain planets.(This thing add to the game more interest). So if you are full of your doubts . forgor all ! It is cool game! It get from me 8\10.
Stan Lee;-;Game about space ninjas, and ugly weridos, very fun
MountainJew;-;MountainJew like. Therfore if you do not like. You are hitler. Check mate.
Zen;-;It's an okay game. . . I don't see my self spending too much time on it though. . .
BOT Keith;-;It's basically a farming simulator and I think that's pretty neat.
kenny;-;epic game, i know you will love it. its free anyways so you don`t have anything to lose. unlike most of these criminal game developers that makes free to play games and you then find out that you have to pay money in order to use the best features. warframe devs don`t do that to you. they always try to listen and interact with their user via twitch every week. you don`t have to spend any extra money to enjoy the game. so what the hell are you waiting for. get your space ninja on right now !!
AlabayWong;-;Hi there! I want to share my impressions with you. Warframe by Digital Extremes is a cooperative third-person shooter with elements of slasher. Here you can find many interesting things suck as Different weapons. Many exoskeleton(Warframes)with own set of skills and characteristics. And of course quests. Gameplay is on the high level.Here you can jump, run , slide and roll , and combine methods to quickly move through the level and avoid enemy fire.(This is that i like so much). For the crafting you need some special resources that can be found on the certain planets.(This thing add to the game more interest). So if you are full of your doubts . forgor all ! It is cool game! It get from me 8\10.
Stan Lee;-;Game about space ninjas, and ugly weridos, very fun
Darkcake99;-;Over 400 hours played and an amazing collection of weapons which include: A double headed halberd, Dual infected cleavers, A katana, A laser cannon, A sawn off sniper pistol, Throwing stars, A assualt rifle with a 100 clip, A long range rifle and much, much more. In order to fully enjoy this game you may have to spend a bit although EVERYTHING is obtainable troughout time and farming. A warframe for everything, and an arsenal that compliments every warframe in different ways, I can't see why not? 10/10
BlackRaven666;-;Good game but takes a bit of getting use too but fun
Nylhistik;-;Really fun game <3 -Squee All hail the TURTLE KING!!
Nooby;-;Even though you are doing basically the same thing over and over again, something keeps bringing me back. Maybe it is the fact you get to unlock cool weapons or characters if you keep playing. Maybe I am losing my mind but either way I like it! You can't go wrong for a free to play game.
ShadowClaw;-;Alrighty. So, where to begin... You're a cryogenically frozen and now reawakened space ninja with the ability to manipulate many properties of space and time? at will, who's supposed goal is to maintain the balance of the Solar System which has fallen into chaos. The year isn't given, but it's sometime in the far distant future. Let's get down to business. The game itself is a Third person shooter, with you having a Primary (Something that generally requires two hands like a rifle or a bow & arrow), a secondary (One-handed or dual wielded pistols or throwing stars) and a melee weapon. Positives Creative variety of playable classes (Warframes) Massive variety of weapon types (Total of three weapon slots; Primary, Secondary, Melee) Evolving lore (The devs are constantly adding in more and more content, and as they do so they add in more backstory to the game and it's factions.) Variety of mission types (Exterminate, Capture, Survival, etc...) A nice amount of customization (Primary in coloring) is present in the game. Free to play, pay to look good* Fairly easy to trade with other players to get the "real-money" currency. Negatives MASSIVE grindwall (It's earned the nickname Warfarm because of it) Inverted difficulty curve. (Game starts difficult, then gets easier as you get more gear) (Devs are working on correcting this) Platinum, the real-money currency is required for warframe and weapon slots (which new players start out with very few of) I'm thoroughly addicted to this game, and I'll always come back to it. It's possible to get all of the in-game currencies for free, but I'll confess to having $70 spent on my account. But these guys work hard (They have weekly Livestreams to update players on their progress) and deserve every penny.
Venohan;-;This is a F2P, third person shooter which has a descent F2P model. There's blueprints you can collect which are for free (Credits) and require resources, and credits to make, which can be rushed for the P2P currency (Platinum). Pretty much everything you see in the store yuo can get for free (Aside from the color packs, and a couple other completely cosmetic options) through Alerts, the Orokin Void, Clan tech research, bosses (Warframe part blueprints), and the Market (Blueprints section).
Robicism;-;For a free to play, this is very good. It is good that they offer the ability to make a warframe instead of purchasing it. It makes you appreciate what you have in a game. 11/10
Meat Jesus;-;This game. I played it when I had no idea what I was doing, got frustrated, and left for a month or two. But then, I took some time to think about it, and I've played almost every day since that month or two ended. The controls are amazingly fluid; nothing is more satisfying than dashing through a room full of Grineer and slicing them to shreds. Not only that, but all the weapons, sentinels, and non-cosmetic gear is all free, and incredibly worthwhile to earn. I was the little level 12 loki staring in awe of the rhino prime with a shiny boltor prime and carrier sentinel sucking up all the useful items. I'm currently working on getting Loki Prime, and I've built a sentinel all on my own. The grind to get all the rare materials was worth it in the end. All in all, this is a game to keep an eye on (not even out of beta yet!) and play for a bit. Who doesn't love space ninjas?
EragonX;-;This game is just amazing. The graphics are amazing and the game mechanics are superb. I have been playing for a year and im still hungry for what this game has left to put out.
Feex;-;This game is beyond fun. People say it's a grind, and it is to some extent, but if this doesn't have the more unique, fun, entertaining combat. You wont regret playing this game at all.
Soldier1312;-;After over 3300h of playing I've finally decided to write review. It may be little fanboy-like, but I play it so long for a reason. Let's start with developement. 2 years ago, when I've started playing game was really poor. There were two-three rooms connected in different combination to make it look bigger, almost the same type of enemies, grinding with almost the same weapons all the time. But that was two years ago. Thanks to regullary released updates game is now HUGE and I really mean it and it just keeps getting bigger. And constant updates make you wait impatiently for next ones, preventing boredom, Secondly, game is build not only by devs but also by players, that have huge impact on Digital Extremes' (developer's) decisions about "what to do next". It's like community is part of the studio. Third thing: nice community. I've played a lot of games and this one has really good community, compared to other games. Of course, there are some morons, that will try to ruin your experience, but there always has to be few of them, right? Next thing is huge variety of equipment. You play your way. There's no such thing as "best equipment" there. There are plenty of choices, to match your playstyle. Lastly, it's true F2P model. There are no things that are neccessary for good equipment, that are only availible through real money. Well, slots for your Warframes (characters) and weapons are limited at first, but you can always sell few things to players to get enough money (platinum) to get slots. Or simply just buy platinum once, when you'll receive 75% discount (it's really cheap then) and I guarantee you won't regret it. Otherwise, platinum is only needed for cosmetic items. The only disadvantage I can think of, as veteran Warframe player is lack of things that you can do at some point. But to reach that point, you'll have to play for at least few hudred hours, so I guess there's not much to worry about. To sum up: great game, great people, great developers that care about us, players. There are bugs, but they are getting fixed as fast as possible. If you want to know more, PM me on steam or in-game, where I have the same nickname as here (Soldier1312).
chibidonut;-;Play it already. I know I did -w-
Mr x MoonZ;-;You are space ninjas.... What more would you want! :D Warframe is an amazing game and I would recommend it, but the game can get a bit grindy, but if RNG is on your side... IT'S AMAZING!
{Pk} Smokin' Hot Sai;-;Yes. This game is totally awesome. Everything you see in that trailer is what you see in-game (minus the big guy ( Let. Kril ) at the end getting cut in half- you cant cut him half in-game.) But from warframes that are more on the ninja-y side, can sneak around while other warframes can be powerhouses and have immense crowd control. Also, Rhino. Get him. Not even trying to hype him up or anything. He's the tank of the warframes and can stop time. I think that's good enough for anyone. Anyway, as for this game, without spoiling anything, this game has little to no replayablity. DE is still working on making the game more balenced with Lore and a replay aspect (I hope). As for the game, you are Tenno, a race of ninjas(?) that offer balence to the solar system. As you unlock the solar system nodes, you will find harder enemies and it can get... really fun at the end. However, you start out with the worst weapons and it may take quite a long time for you used to the game. These weapons do almost nothing to even the weakest enemies, and since you are so new, you can't just go do one mission and gain credits (in-game earned currency) to purchase better weapons. Sadly to say, it doesn't stop there. Good Mods (Modules that can be used to upgrade Warframes and weapons) may be really, and I mean REALLY, hard to get. So you know what that means. You have to farm for them. Killing the same type of enemy over and over, in the hopes that they will drop a mod. You must keep this in mind when playing. Then there is the no-replayabilty aspect. Many maps repeat themselves, and you can see this ALOT. By the time you do get the best weapons, you will already played 5/8 of the maps in the game. (The 5 maps are Grinner Ships, Corpus Ships, Corpus Outposts, Earth, and Jupiter. The other 3 maps are Void, Derelict, and the new {to the time of this review} Hive missions ) Because of this, most players just give up on this game. Some parts about the game that are good is that it is free. You get top notch quailty gaming bliss for free. Another good part is a learning company, that listens to you. DE (Digital Extremes) is learning how to be a great company, and has a staff that loves people that play this game. Need something from a staff? Asking does work! And finally, no one is forcing you to do anything. You don't have to farm for the mod you need. You don't need to play online. You may, however, get into a clan as soon as possible xD. And one more thing before I end this. This game is great. Ok? It does have its flaws. Some things from their Star Stek game is in here. The double door thing is here. AI runs in circles sometimes. AI is not... smart. But it is a great game over all. Even, to me, if it has lost a little bit of that Sci-Fi feel by having bosses speak in english, while troops still speak their... language. In the end, just try it out. You don't like it? Don't play it. Play Team Fortress 2 instead. You like it? Keep playing. You love it? Get other people to play. Write reviews. Be honest. And have fun. Thank you, and good night/morning/ sexy day.
Marko Polio;-;I lost my virginity to this game.
Supernatural3 (New Mouse);-;Awesome F2P, Anyone looking to play as ninjas in space and the distant future, This is your game. Edit. Help....ME!
Meepearor;-;I started playing this game earlier this afternoon. It's 2 in the morning now. I haven't taken any breaks. I have just now found the will to put this game down for a few hours, then wake up and play it more after a 7-hour session that has left my neck and left pinky terribly sore. My only regret is that I put butter on the poptart I ate when I got up to use the bathroom about 3 hours ago. It was awful. I couldn't stomach the first bite. But yes, you should play this game. As soon as you do, you will not stop doing so. Except for bathroom breaks. But my one word of advice- do not put butter on a poptart. please. despite what Peter Griffin and Glenn Quagmire said, it is not good.
[D3RP] Lilliannette;-;Despite peoples claims for it being a "Pay2Win" game you'd be terribly mistaken. All frames are obtainable through regular play. You can choose to invest real money if you so wish to get the frames you wish or you may choose to get it as you would with any other game. It's not a mmo, more of a 4-player Co-op Third Person action game. Allowing you to take control of a Warframe. Refered too as "Tenno" the race controlling it. (Basically you're a space ninja.) You get to zip line, Run along walls, back flip walls, slash a big  sword and generally kick . There are three factions: Corpus, Grineer and Infested. Infested: The Infested are mostly melee based. With strange alien/corrupted creatures that can inflict deadly poisons or maul you to death. Corpus: The Corpus are like the evil science type guys. These have Moa robots. (Practically guns with legs.) They mostly use lazer weapons. Not only that there are melee corpus who make use of electric prods. (nasty) As well as the annoying shield spray robots which can repair the shields of foes around it, Grineer: The Grineer unlike the corpus have more "standard*" type weapons. Less futuristic. They also have melee uses who try to slice you. You'll find them doing a lot of damage if they successfully land a hit. Originally this game had started off as something so very small. With only a few frames: Loki, Excalibur, Volt, Rhino and Mag it slowly started growing and becoming so much more. Really basic levels and basic movement and have strongly benefitted from constant player feedback improving the game with every update. The game is extremely responsive however be prepared to get a hand ache after hours of play with how much you need to keep moving to avoid enemies and help allies. One minor issue for me is that this game lacks any cover mechanic. (enemies can cover but you are unable to.) Blocking is in the game but it also feels rather pointless since I've found myself in little to no situations where it was actually neccesary or helpful. It is also assigned by default to mouse button 4. If you're old fashioned like me and have a mouse with only 3 buttons you may need to assign it to a spot on your keyboard. The game is simple, the graphics amazing. It works on my really sub-standard PC with a graphics card as basic as an ASUS EAH6450 with a simple (God-awful) AMD Athlon 64 Processor 3200+ 1.99 Ghz and 3.00GB of RAM running Win-XP SP3. (Yes this pc is about as old as the hills.) You may not be able to play with friends with a PC like this but you sure as hell can play the game at well over 30fps and as far as I'm concerned that is absolutely astonishing. Considering many other games with worse graphics than this run about as fast as a snale on salt. Do I recommend this game? Hell yes, I would recommend it to everyone. Even if you wouldn't like it. Try it anyway since it's free to play and you really just can't complain. (I've had more hours out of this beauty than I have out of any AAA $60.00 piece of over hyped trash.)
Bushy Riven Main 69;-;The game is terrible, here is my reason. So im playing ton's of missions and after a hard days work im very tired (you know with all the wall running and sword fighting etc) and I just want to sit down, well my ING space ship can travel faster than a space shuttle but atleast a space shuttle has some EN SEATS! Then If I want to sleep all ive got is my floor which isnt exactly comfortable. I deal with alot on a daily basis and they couldnt throw in these basic things? Yet they give me some  AI called R2-Weatley9000 who just tries to kill and is annoying, I'd trade it in if I could just for one seat, like I'll give you this broken AI for a broken trade k? The worst problem though is without a doubt the lack of a bathroom. I've been using Earth as my personal toilet since the  Tenno wont give me one I've been forced to. They think the grineer have been trying to poison the planet well actually its just my "Garbage". I give this game 5 simcity 2000's out of MLP FIM episode 2 season 55 revenge of the muted deaf kids. Top Comments/ Reviewers opinions. "First" - Bush Wookie "10/10 review, sir." - DatGuyST34M "Call of duty brings back the same multiplayer fun!, also this bush wookie guy's review is kinda cool too." - IGN *Change Log Ver 1.0 Given to public Ver 1.1 Deleted word would from a sentence Ver 1.2 Added a capital letter to the word "Change" in the title of Change log Cer 1.3 Added in Top Comments/ Reviewers opinions.
:3;-;It is like riding a lowrider and shooting infidels with your homies. Try it, before devs kill the game for sure.
Not A Snarky Commie;-;One of the best games I've ever played. It flows well, the third person camera may be hard for some people to adjust to, but this game would be very hard to play in first person. While it is a bit tough to get started, you gain momentum pretty quickly. There is almost always something new to get or unlock. This game might sound like it is trying too hard with ninja-cyborgs-in-space, but it makes it good. Extremely good 10/10
ParkourEDM;-;Ever feel like being a space ninja? Well this is basically it. Ninjas flying through space, saving the solar system from the Grineer, Corpus and Infested. It has boss fights on almost every planet. Modding systems gives players a chance to mod their weapons and warframe according to their play style. Vaious mission types that are actually fun to play. Developer support is great. Constantly fixing bugs while releasing big updates. I love the fact that you can grind for "prime" items to be sold for "platinum" which is the in-game currency that is obtained by paying with real money. Allows people with basically no money to spend a chance to get those items that have to be purchased with platinums. Speaking of platinums, there's many customization. Syandana (capes), colour packs, skins, armor parts and helmets actually gives players the ability to customize their warframes to suit their own taste. TL;DR: Simply the best free game I've played before and I 100% recommend it
Sensenbob;-;Fast Paced 3rd Person Action with elements of Parkour. Includes different mission types or Game modes like Defense, Survival, Domination, Extinction etc. Lots of items to craft and earn, whilst you can play it completely free or pay to progress faster Very fun game if you like to be a Space Ninja!
NuggetWubsYou;-;It's a very nice RPG a bit organic with the idea of missions rather than quests I get very strange feelings of other games with this Such as "Borderlands" "Mass Effect" "Prototype" I really like it even when I get bored Because as soon as I pick it up It'll be hard to put down
nutcracker;-;The best F2P game i ever played
LSAngel;-;Well what i can say about this game in 1st time when i played i didint like it that much and i left at some point (Maybe because 1 friend of mine witch we no longer friends are over annoyed me..) but like few mounths later i returned this game again and give it another shot and over all this Game is Really Cool talking about choises use Guns and Swords but i basicly stick with Swords most of the time anyways Warframe become better and better by over time sure it have some issues were game can freeze if youre in party and can disconnect you from it but still i recoment this game to people who Likes Shooting ,Killing stuff , Ninjas , Flying in Space and farming alot
swimaway27;-;This game is very fun! I enjoy the concept of ninjas in space almost as much as i enjoy zombie games. I have played this for about a year now and still have things to do as this game continues to expand! It keeps me busy on days i have nothing to do, and it offers cooperative gameplay so i are meeting new people every game!
vaderjjd;-;so far i have really like this game. the game play and the customizabilty are awesome. As of right now, the only constructive critizism i have is that when you are in front of an enemy, plainly in thier line of site, they dont see you if you are outside of a 5 meter radius roughly. so the only thing i would change to make it more realistic would change that enemys will engage once you are in thier line of site within a reasonable distance.
Heavy Doge;-;Warframe is a fast paced F2P game that rewards long time players over buying in-game items. Warframe may seem hard at first to play but the game only gets more easy the longer you stick with it even offering some of the best in-game weapons for free during events (that are more often than you think) and special dates like christmas,easter etc. Warframe has a massive amount of content to explore including frames,weapons and even pets. The way to aquire these items is through collecting materials throughout the solar system and at first glance it would give the impression of too much grinding but it encurages you to explore and seek out new planets and rewards. Warframe does have a paid for currency that allows you to buy nearly anything in the game BUT, what warframe has that others games dont is that you can trade for that currency with rewards you have earned by playing the game. Warframe does have problems though with some of the best content being far to hard to get even for long time players and, balancing on weapons and frames is a very rocky path with some of the best content being reduced to mastery fodder. Overall warframe is not for everyone but is lots of fun to play and is updated every wensday with new content and provides lots of enterainment, its a must play F2P game.
[FAT] Mangaga2168;-;Its pretty good.
Nickbi;-;i really enjoyed this game because every mission can be approached in many different ways
Urie Kuki;-;One of the BEST Free to Play! Great gaming experience, best graphic quality for a free to play genre till now, Smooth gameplay. It's a MUST try game for a free to play. Great Coop hack and slash game.
K0balt;-;The gameplay is solid, the game is fun... at first. Depending on your tolerance for grinding, it can either stay that way forever, or get boring really fast. There will be a point where all you can do is grind and try to have fun shooting the same AI monsters over and over again for unlikely minor upgrades. I recommend trying it, it's free; but don't expect to be entertained forever.
Stealth Killz;-;ninjas in space that kick a$# ...tha $h!t!
AKspedster24;-;Awesome game combines Ninjas, Space and Guns but the best part is your katana which looks epic as you power it up
BottomFeeder;-;In my opinion the greatest game release in the past two years. In one years time the game size has grown from 1 gig to 6. The game population has grown from 100k to 10 million. The core of the game has snowballed and grown without sacrafice. It is legitimately playable for free; you can beat the game with the starting gear; you can obtain any gear in the game without paying. It looks amazing, has low requirements, is played as coop or competative based on how you want to play. It brings no new concepts that i am able to observe, however it brings concepts together that have never been combined in mass or on this scale. It combines these pieces with a precision and dependability I have never befor encountered. I would go into description of these details but they are to numerous to name, and are best observed by playing the game. If you don't like warframe now, you should check back in one year. As it will have likely doubled the types of human experiences available in that time period. The most impressive game of a age.
MLGViper;-;An AMAZING 'Third Person Shooter' game! I dont like the time that you have to wait for blueprints to finish (12 Hours, some 24), but overall, the game is hell of an addicting game!
Miku;-;It's amazing game! Here is team play, guns, super suits, game is new and developers improve it. And you can help them. Enjoy!
x7 P.S.Y.C.O;-;great game for all skills upgrade system is hard to learn but once u do its very helpfull wide veriety of weps and skins evrything is able to be found in the game but thats the hard part
KAOS JOKER;-;A great game, good points: Great movement system Can get 99% of the stuff with out paying real money Really fun to play with freinds Can be played solo No two games will be the same Bad points: NONE!! (in my opinion :P )
Captain Crusader;-;Played it, liked it at first, started to fall short after a few hours of game play and now sits there in my game list collecting dust! But still a fun game for free , try it out its worth the download..
Mufasa;-;Often described as a "pay to win" game. I found that not to be the case. Warframe is a third person shooter that is easy to pick up and rewards players who put time and effort into the game. The initial learning curve is set quite high, but can be made easier with help from the rather polite online community. Missions can seem repetitive at times, but the constant addition of new content and game mechanics make Warframe always feel fresh. Being still only in beta, there are a few minor bugs that stop it from being one of the top free to play games around. These issues however, hardly detract from the game itself and are only noticible because the rest of the game feels so polished. Overall, Warframe is a genuinely good game that has a lot of things going for it. I look forward to the developers Live Release and whatever additional changes accompany it.
HydeDentonMC;-;Very Fun game. For a Free 2 PLay game, it is my favourite there is. Basically it is ninjas in space, but it is a good concept. No story, but it does have a rich lore. Why yu no have Warframe huh huh huh? Got Warframe. Do it for the Shibes Doge Translation: Such Wow, Such Space, So Violent, Very Ninja, Such fun.
MEH;-;It's a nice unknown game for lots of people .. there are lots of + things about it which i enjoy and like ... fluent graphics , swords guns style , ninja fighting in outer space..! it is one good weird fun game :) ... but it needs a work of improvement on the story to make it more interesting ..
AgentRaze;-;What are you waiting for!? Don't play this game alone, bring your friends and get the full CO-OP experience!
Varel;-;Too many times I have approached a game and found that the stress on PVP is over done and there is no way to play with the same feel and not have to worry about long term players or bots. Warframe changed all this for me. A shooter game with more than one twist I fell in love almost immediately. The lore is limited (they are building on it as we speak, it's in an exciting phase) and it does look pay to win... on the surface. It is not. The crafting is a secondary feature of this game. It's a something to do with the parts and the materials you gain. I've lost count of the number of frame's I've stumbled over the resources for and the amount of weapons I've crafted because they look like a bit of fun. If you think the focus of the game is to be completionist and own all the things... then you've missed the point. The point is to play, and play you can. Warframe runs you through an ever increasing series of different mission types from the need to stealth missions to succeed, to defense, attack and outright destruction. They listen to their fanbase and the game grows through the love from the fans and the developers. Winner of MMOBOMB's MMO of the Year (2014) something has to be going right here. For those that love the thrill of the fight, to fantasise on their own lore as the game develops and to watch an already fabulous beta blossom into greater things, this is the game for you. Grab your rifle and your sword and get to killing things.
crystalyq;-;This is awesome game for those player who want to play some Space third person shooter by yourself or with friends. Also it is really cool how game is constantly being updated. There are a lot of costumization and playability in Warframe. RECOMMENDED
Redcoat Revolt;-;In the Past, when I first tried this game, it was awful. Each level was long, difficult and had very little variety. It was so mind-numbingly boring that WarFrame became difficult to play. Each level was the same layout with a slightly different skin on it. One would play a level, and the next level would be the exact same thing but with ice! Ohhh! Exciting! except it wasn't at all... Since then, WarFrame has improved a tremendous amount, and is legitimately rather fun to play. finding new areas and little hidden sections while exploring a map is fun, and often results in some (more or less) useful resources. The flow of the game is alot smoother, and enemies do not indefinitely respawn, which made the game much harder before. I've had some pretty great times with WarFrame and it's much better than it once was. Though the "copy and paste" level layouts are still the same, it doesn't feel as empty and dull as it did in the past. Two comments that I must make however, is the amount of time it takes to gather resources needed to advance in strength and level; and playing with a controller. The Controller layout is absolutely horrid, and you must redo it all and test with it before you can find something that works. The sensitivity is way too high, and the button layout is simply difficult and hard to understand. Overall, I give this game a 7/10. It's a good game, but players that don't like alot of grinding, and hate some repentition will quickly get bored of it.
Something Novel;-;Milos, a retired porn star, leads a normal family life with his wife Maria and six-year old son Petar in tumultuous Serbia, trying to make ends meet. A sudden call from his former colleague Layla will change everything. Aware of his financial problems, Layla introduces Milos to Vukmir - a mysterious, menacing and politically powerful figure in the pornographic business. A leading role in Vukmir's production will provide financial support to Milos and his family for the rest of their lives. A contract insists on his absolute unawareness of a script they will shoot. From then on, Milos is drawn into a maelstrom of unbelievable cruelty and mayhem devised by his employer, "the director" of his destiny. Vukmir and his cohorts will stop at nothing to complete his vision. In order to escape the living cinematic hell he's put into, and save his family's life, Milos will have to sacrifice everything - his pride, his morality, his sanity, and maybe even his own life.
Karnatil;-;Very good, but be prepared to GRIND.
Kawa(ii);-;What's an "end game"?
Orokin Drystann;-;Warframe. It is most definately one of the best -free- multiplayer third person shooters I have ever had the honor to play. I would honestly reccomend this game above many triple A titles. The game itself has a decisive and interesting backstory. many playable "Warframes" with unique and interesting mechanics that give your specific choice meaning in a varity of mission settings. Also perhaps one of the most important features. It's a constantly evolving game, new missions and interesting additions are being added in -monthly- giving this amazing game a ever-changing face and the fact you'll be supported by three additional "Tenno" Three other players all working towards the same goal, means the missions the people and the very game itself is ever changing depending on the people you join with! ... It also has some interesting end-game content that relies far more on teamwork and less on pure shooting and running off on your own this can make it it even more complex and interesting later game. So remember folks, Gun or Blade are not a Tenno's best friend, trust in your Warframe. But even more. Trust in your allies.. "I am the lotus, I will guide you but we must hurry. Vor is coming for you. I see the cryo-sleep has taken your memory, It doesn't matter. you are Tenno. I will prepare you..."
WrathCall;-;I would recommend this one, 's little one needs to know. Space, ninjas, space ninjas and massacre action, missions too, it is indeed the best team game of the era in my opinion. Mechanics are quite nice too, what with the wall running for example, plenty of hopping around.
Xzor70;-;Very Good Graphics And Quality. I Really Do Recommend Playing With A Friend Or Other People, But It's Still Fun Playing Solo. I Recommend It To People Who Like Third-Person Shooters And A Very Large And Long Campaign.
Not_DaJangal;-;I have over a 1000 hours in this game. I personally love it.
Vito Scaleta;-;awesome game with amazing futuristic graphics and you dont need any micro transactions to be good at game and is free would recommend to all
Roran;-;Warframe as a free to play game and a mmo you can expect it to be a grindy and time consuming game, with micro transactions that are pay to save time rather than pay to win. It has nothing special to it. Warframe is just an good average game.
AgentRaze;-;What are you waiting for!? Don't play this game alone, bring your friends and get the full CO-OP experience!
Not_DaJangal;-;I have over a 1000 hours in this game. I personally love it.
[CB] Sniper (Gone for 1 month);-;one of da best freegames that u can get cuz it has great graphics and is hands down the most fun in a free game rate- 10/10
[PugLyfe]ChipChip 2;-;it would be the best if there wasent platinum
infernodragon14;-;This game is Great
Dylartri;-;Warframe is an amazing game and I highly reccomend it.
Stealth Killz;-;ninjas in space that kick a$# ...tha $h!t!
Gauna-03;-;Cyber-ninjas + First-person Shooter + Co-op + "PARKOUR!" = WARFRAME
AKspedster24;-;Awesome game combines Ninjas, Space and Guns but the best part is your katana which looks epic as you power it up
[CB] Sniper (Gone for 1 month);-;one of da best freegames that u can get cuz it has great graphics and is hands down the most fun in a free game rate- 10/10
Seanzo;-;ITS AWESOME!!!
thewhovianwhoshoots;-;it is really fun best third person shooter out there in my opinion
[S]hockwave;-;a 10/10 game which is a 'must play'
Redman123130;-;By far and wide one of the greatest and best free games you can get right now, try it out! DO IT! You won't regret it!
Gauna-03;-;Cyber-ninjas + First-person Shooter + Co-op + "PARKOUR!" = WARFRAME
Caboose1325;-;10/10 Would wake up for school late again.
Rexamora;-;Best f2p tps thats not totaly pay 2 win, totaly worth my time and life
Reedfish-kou;-;ninja's in space with swords, gun, rocket launchers, rocket hammers, lazors, zombie mutant things, and crzy  powers what more could you want?
[PugLyfe]ChipChip 2;-;it would be the best if there wasent platinum
infernodragon14;-;This game is Great
blizt1998;-;Ruined my life. Thanks Warframe!
Mothu;-;The best things about this game exist entirely by accident from the developers. Manages to be both the least fun RNG fueled  grindfest i've played and also best relaxing "just destroy hundreds of enemies at once with ridiculously overpowered weaponry for no particular reason" game at the same time. Really grindy and buggy/10.
Dreamkiller;-;This game is really fascinating, the graphics, gore and getting to create your character with upgrades with melee weapons and ranged weapons. It's one of the best free-to-play games I have ever played, and I never stop playing it. As you kill more enemies and completing missions on the solar map, your level progresses and once your bar reaches to the next level you have to prove your skills in a training area to go up the next level. Having abilities for example like: Snow Globe, you create a globe with a snow storm inside and when enemies go inside they slow down making it much easier for you to stay alive and kill as much enemies as you can. Also protects you from enemy projectiles coming towards you. Soul Punch to knock your enemy back with one hit (If they're a low level). Terrify to scare your enemies away so you can slaughter them with pleasure :) Melee weapons like: duel blades, duel daggers, long swords, one handed swords, scythes, duel scythes, axes. all for the best of blood and gore. Ranged weapons like: Shotguns, pistols, duel pistols, rifles, sniper rifles, machiene guns, bow and arrows, throwing knifes. Really good fun for sneaky missions and loud party missions too :) Mission types like: Sabotage, when you go to the base core and destroy it leaving no enemies behind. Eliminate, not leaving one single enemy alive. Spy....when you....spy (not good for explaining that lol). Capture, when you capture the enemy and kill enemies in your way to escape. Rescue, to free a prisoner and protect him as you run back to safety. Assassinate, when you kill the enemy boss and his/her guards. But the whole game is really fun and I suggest you give it a try, thanks for reading ^.^
MiniSmiddy;-;very fun and very addicting extremly fun fo those who like to murder things and are slighly psychotic but anyway 10/10 would recommend for anyone but it does kinda require a fair bit of actuall money to get a good experience!
LevelZGaming;-;best free 2 play game ever i highly recomend if you dont have money
Shantae;-;So this is a game called warframe and you use the suits in warframe called warframes and in warframe with the warframes you use play warframe and with the warframes you slice people up with swords and guns and stuff. You're also a space ninja, Is there anything else needed to be said. Also play as raiden and other Metal Gear characters 10/10 would roleplay again
Redcoat Revolt;-;In the Past, when I first tried this game, it was awful. Each level was long, difficult and had very little variety. It was so mind-numbingly boring that WarFrame became difficult to play. Each level was the same layout with a slightly different skin on it. One would play a level, and the next level would be the exact same thing but with ice! Ohhh! Exciting! except it wasn't at all... Since then, WarFrame has improved a tremendous amount, and is legitimately rather fun to play. finding new areas and little hidden sections while exploring a map is fun, and often results in some (more or less) useful resources. The flow of the game is alot smoother, and enemies do not indefinitely respawn, which made the game much harder before. I've had some pretty great times with WarFrame and it's much better than it once was. Though the "copy and paste" level layouts are still the same, it doesn't feel as empty and dull as it did in the past. Two comments that I must make however, is the amount of time it takes to gather resources needed to advance in strength and level; and playing with a controller. The Controller layout is absolutely horrid, and you must redo it all and test with it before you can find something that works. The sensitivity is way too high, and the button layout is simply difficult and hard to understand. Overall, I give this game a 7/10. It's a good game, but players that don't like alot of grinding, and hate some repentition will quickly get bored of it.
Something Novel;-;Milos, a retired porn star, leads a normal family life with his wife Maria and six-year old son Petar in tumultuous Serbia, trying to make ends meet. A sudden call from his former colleague Layla will change everything. Aware of his financial problems, Layla introduces Milos to Vukmir - a mysterious, menacing and politically powerful figure in the pornographic business. A leading role in Vukmir's production will provide financial support to Milos and his family for the rest of their lives. A contract insists on his absolute unawareness of a script they will shoot. From then on, Milos is drawn into a maelstrom of unbelievable cruelty and mayhem devised by his employer, "the director" of his destiny. Vukmir and his cohorts will stop at nothing to complete his vision. In order to escape the living cinematic hell he's put into, and save his family's life, Milos will have to sacrifice everything - his pride, his morality, his sanity, and maybe even his own life.
Karnatil;-;Very good, but be prepared to GRIND.
Kawa(ii);-;What's an "end game"?
Orokin Drystann;-;Warframe. It is most definately one of the best -free- multiplayer third person shooters I have ever had the honor to play. I would honestly reccomend this game above many triple A titles. The game itself has a decisive and interesting backstory. many playable "Warframes" with unique and interesting mechanics that give your specific choice meaning in a varity of mission settings. Also perhaps one of the most important features. It's a constantly evolving game, new missions and interesting additions are being added in -monthly- giving this amazing game a ever-changing face and the fact you'll be supported by three additional "Tenno" Three other players all working towards the same goal, means the missions the people and the very game itself is ever changing depending on the people you join with! ... It also has some interesting end-game content that relies far more on teamwork and less on pure shooting and running off on your own this can make it it even more complex and interesting later game. So remember folks, Gun or Blade are not a Tenno's best friend, trust in your Warframe. But even more. Trust in your allies.. "I am the lotus, I will guide you but we must hurry. Vor is coming for you. I see the cryo-sleep has taken your memory, It doesn't matter. you are Tenno. I will prepare you..."
WrathCall;-;I would recommend this one, 's little one needs to know. Space, ninjas, space ninjas and massacre action, missions too, it is indeed the best team game of the era in my opinion. Mechanics are quite nice too, what with the wall running for example, plenty of hopping around.
Xzor70;-;Very Good Graphics And Quality. I Really Do Recommend Playing With A Friend Or Other People, But It's Still Fun Playing Solo. I Recommend It To People Who Like Third-Person Shooters And A Very Large And Long Campaign.
Caboose1325;-;10/10 Would wake up for school late again.
Rexamora;-;Best f2p tps thats not totaly pay 2 win, totaly worth my time and life
Luicci;-;This game has very satisfying improvements and events. When playing it drives you to think different. Createful battleground and you can specialize almost anything. n this atmosphere you might be remember starwars but no one knows whats coming on to you, soo you have to prepare yourself for harder battles with researching and improving process like ; Here some info to starters Vor? Lotus? hmm Im tenno lotus right, Vor enemy. What Im gonna do now? weapons, warframes, discovering worlds. to get a weapon gotta go to is drop spots. How Im gonna get there? I cant, Im low mastery, should use market to access some medium weapons I get blueprint, now what? ts still there in foundry, I need components to make it, where can I find these? Hmm in starmap or so called navigation console there is component list on every planet I can use the list to find my component farm spot. But its so far that planet I need to go No problemo, Just write to chat recruit tab LF (looking for) Taxi to ..... (planet name) Then someone takes you to somewhere in the planet u wanted to go. After farming components, make ur weapon and level it up in some defence mission. Now Before u building ur warframe, look far all warframes in codex, youtube, warframe wiki Pick 2-3 warframe differently for different missions. Make them in foundry like making weapons When u need a credit Play void missions or dark sector missions(in low tax spots)
SOCRATES THE BATTLE PHILOSOPHER;-;All I can say about this one is that I am shocked that a game like this one is Free to Play actually; I can really see myself spending money on this game! However, like any Free to Play game, it is packed full of micro transactions, making it so you can buy the things you want. However, this game seems more generous in that aspect, you can either buy it with real money, or you can keep playing and earn credits in the game to aquire the same things that people would buy with their own cash. The graphics in this game are top notch as well as the overall gameplay. The game has been built so you can experience this game alone or with your friends and random people online who would wish to accompany you on your quests. This game is very much worth looking into if you are in anyway intrested in a futuristic cenario which takes place in space. The game on top of looking good also seems like it is willing to offer a lot of gameplay, both through many planets and objectives through the solar system as well as replayability to either find resources to rebuild your character or just replaying a map as a newly built character. It seems you can build your character to either be a spectre in the shadows, taking enemies out without anyone knowing you were even in the area; or a blood lusting banshee, screaming through and leaving death in your wake. However, if this was too long; one word to sum this game up really, Space Ninjas. Go play it.
Mad_Excellence;-;Warframe is an action game in which you control a Warframe, a robot ninja-esque character with a specific set of 4 abilities that are unique to that Warframe. At the time of writing, there are 22 Warframes to choose from, but you have a limited amount of slots to keep these Warframes in. Unfortunately, to unlock more slots, you have to play real world money, but provided you have a job (you DO have a job, right?), you won't go bankrupt from this. There are multiple types of missions, ranging from assassinations to exterminations to mobile defense. You can play solo or with up to 3 other people, and you can drop in or drop out at any time. Playing Warframe with a group of friends is seriously some of the most fun you will have in a free to play game, but playing solo isn't that great. Luckily, if you have no friends, you can join random people online, so you never have to worry about going solo (unless you want to. But why would you?). Everything in Warframe requires resources, which can be obtained from different planets. If you want one resource in particular, you'll have to go to a planet that contains that resource, because they differ from planet to planet. In order to get parts to get a new Warframe, however, you'll have to farm the boss of the planet, and while it can be a chore, it is alleviated a little bit if you're farming with friends, or at least with other people. For a free to play game, Warframe has a lot of content and a pretty fair market system. The only thing you HAVE to pay money for are cosmetics, and have no effect on the game whatsoever. Everything else can be obtained for free. In conclusion, Warframe is a very fun free to play game that increases exponentially in value if you have some friends with you. While it can be a grind sometimes, and a little repetitive, this game is definitely worth your time, and if you can grab some friends, you'll probably lose some sleep playing this game. And hey, it's free, so what do you have to lose? Download Warframe and try it out. You won't be dissapointed. Gameplay: 4.5/5 Graphics: 4/5 Story: 3/5 Replayability: 4.5/5 Sound: 4/5 Value: 5/5 Overall: A very strong recommendation. This might just be the best free to play game out there.
Chizu;-;Warfarm, a game where you farm in space to get nice props to use on your e-sci-fy waifu Sanic/420, would farm again.
Dzajareee;-;Warframe is not just a game, it's a way of life...
Sir Fudgecakes;-;Yesh. Play it. Noaw.
FR|Leviathan;-;WHAT THE  THIS GAME IS SO ACTION PLAY THIS NOW !!!!!!!
Wint;-;really gord
STYX;-;Its one of the most awesome games ever! Even if you dont spent any real money on if you can still get tons of weapons! If your interested in FPS you just definatly check this out, its free!
Waf Waf;-;Fun to play if you have friends with you. That is why this is the most boring game in existence 0/10 go  yourself
Defex;-;This game is awesome, get it. 'Nuff said.
Shimakaze;-;You Got Lustful Friends that Loves Co-op MMO'ish ThirdPersonShooter games and Loves spending Hours lustfully grinding/farming items N Stuff?! This game is perfect for you and your friends baby!! I mean its pretty much a hack and slash Space Ninja third person packED co-op MMO'ish TPS series game but it ain't just some mainstream MMO'ish TPS.Its Packed with uniqueness in it,its like a Left4dead in space similar in some ways but with more kinds of enemies,stories,quest as well as you can buy/craft weapons ,colour,skins,customization,modding(In-game weapon/warframe Modifications) and ironmansuits(so called "warframes" which you as a player in an ironmansuits fighting against enemies from different factions around the solar system),etc. Along with amazing combat animations,warframe abilities,parkour,weapon/melee skill combinations and highly detailed graphics,etc.There's also PvP in it which is okay in my opinion it still needs a bit of improvement tho.Aside from that This game is a masterpiece to those who favours Co-operative based games. With that said this game Overall 9.8/10,you should play this game although it might have a bit of bugs in an early stage but still,i truly admire the work of the game developers to create such an amazing game!! Therefore they are TRULY working their 'a''ss off with the next upcoming update ''The Archwing'' which makes it look like gundam later on. So yeah!! have some friends and start playing!!!! what ARE You Waiting For huh!? Gooooooooo!!!! Play!!!!!! Pros- Maneuver Capabilities Fun Graphics Gameplay Weapon/Warframe "Extreme Modification capabilities" Many Combinations A sense of Creative capabilities For players Cons- Bugs(will soon be fixed)~~constant game updates Connection Lag (depending on which player hosts)~~solves by being a host yourself but others might lag if their latancy is crap or your internet. You can also prefer soloing if you're having connection troubles for the time being End-Game Cons: Drop Rates(some are impossible to obtain) Takes time to grind Fixed body shapes for warframes (cant make body shape modifications/adjustments) except colours,Skins,Helmets and warframe accessories Skins only changes the patterns on your warframe which sucks,they should make it like a new body or something(Wished if you can Create your own character inside your warframes Like those in mmorpg's or perhaps able to modify your warframes from head to toe)
Ry in the House;-;pay 2 win because they gave me a 90% coupon discount on platinum and i bought the highest pack
[MM] WMan22;-;Space Ninjas doing Space Ninja things. Very addictive, if a bit repetitive and grindy. But the game is very agile, just the way I like it; And the gunplay is very rewarding once you move from starting gear. If there's one gripe I have with the game it's that I wish that there were more flat walls in some of the levels to take advantage of the highly agile moveset that includes things like Review is now building in the foundry. 23:59:50 remains. Rush for 25 plat? walljump and wallrun. But aesthetically most are like what an alien ship would probably look like on the interior so I can't really complain much. Yes, you should play it.* *Must have lots of patience and dedication.
How Many Watermelons?;-;it's alright
Drill Sgt. Dornan;-;Grind. Just Grind. And then even more grind.
[Membar] Hundikarv;-;Warframe, and the negative and positive things about it. Gameplay The Gameplay of Warframe, well it's alright, not that bad if I am to say. The gameplay can be fun, because there are several ways to play it in. You can do the missions ingame quickly, by rushing it with team-mates, or go slowly throughout your missions. There are various places to explore within the game, with missions and neutral areas. You can travel throughout the entire universe, visit every planet there is, and even it's neutral social base 'The Tenno platform' There is a variability within designing things, although they cost most of the time. Color packs will cost you Platinum, which is an ingame credit gotten by buying it. Color packs, forms, and design. You can design an entire guild base, with it developing slowly by having everyone of your guild working together to finish everything. The base of the guild is quite huge, and grand. It will keep you occupied. The color packs can be bought later on, but the starter pack of colors will give you a bit to work with for the time, and design your warframe, weapons, banners, and added customisations. Multiplayer gameplay In Warframe, there is a multiplayer platform, in which you can actually go from 4, towards 7 team-mates in total, you can rush a lot of missions, or have more difficult fights within other missions. There are several survival missions, or control missions. There is also the defense system, in which you and your team-mates will have to defend something in the mission. All in all, the gameplay might have it's bugs sometimes with disconnecting, and re-connecting every now and then, but it's worth the while. Weaponry In this game, there is a huge variability of weapons to choose from. There is the primary weapon, that can be a rifle, sniper, shotgun, or bow. The secondary weapon, that can be a pistol, two pistols, or more forms of smaller guns. Then, there is the meele weapon. The weapon that will help you in a lot of situations, and is one of the few most Overpowered weapons in the game. There is a variability of what kind of weapon you can get, but there is also the negative side of it where you have to buy a lot of them with platinum credits, or by farming and creating. Which will also keep you occupied. Note: Customisation will still be there Warframes Warframes are the characters that you will be using within the game, and will be able to design, and customise. You can add several colors, or mods to your warframe. Sadly, warframe spots need to be bought. But, you'll get a few to use from playing the game for a long time. The start of the game will give you a good choice of three warframes that you can pick to start with, in which you'll have to take the best choice for yourself. A normal warframe can be upgraded from normal, to prime. After doing some challenging missions, you can upgrade it with new parts. All in all, the warframe system will keep you occupied enough to play it for a long time until you grow sick of it all. Mods Mods, are addons in the game that will keep you occupied to customise what you want your weapons to do, and/or your warframes to do. You can add damage, elemental effects, or more within the game with Mods. You can also level mods, by adding and comparing mods to each of them. So they become more powerful, and make the gameplay more fun for you. All in all Rating. All in all, the game has some negative and positive things. Positive: -Gameplay -Graphics -Variability of weapons -Creativity -Exploration ingame -Customisation -Occupation throughout the gameplay -Variability of warframes Negative: -Requires platinum in a lot of situations -Will be taking a lot of time for constructions -Might get on your nerves from time to time Vote: 9/10 Would get anytime.
JC-ZERO;-;I hate this game
brainmelter247;-;8/8 gr8 m8 would play again
Effect Veiler;-;I'm almost certain that this is the best F2P game out there and completely free. You can argue that League of Legends is better but it's really not. Everything is free as far as gameplay is concerned, similar to league, skins cost money but is not required. Just download it and throw money at your screen please.
ChiOokami;-;Its ok
African Warrior Queen;-;Right so let's start this out with a negative, after a big update, avoid this like the plague for a week while they iron out the bugs. Now then for the review: Of all the MMO's i've played both big and small, new and old, Warframe is the most addicting. With all it's constantly updating and increasing features it still remains the most player friendly, fun, and the cheapest "free" to play game on the market, I have spent over a year now playing it, met nice people and joined a terrific clan when it was just created and small, now it's one of the top clans in the game and I enjoy the company of everyone in it. I've fought all the bosses done all the events and even found that my "gotta' catch'em all" mentaulity can easily be achieved with little or no money spent on my part since outside of most cosmetic's EVERYTHING can be gained by just playing the game, and with a good friend or clan, you can get it all in no time and have a blast the whole way through it all from start to finish. So to sum my review up, it has bugs and the storyline is still being made as we all go, and it's an mmo so you'll feel small and lost at the start, but this game is worth playing.
Shadowmartin;-;good game and a few gliches
Mr.Toilet;-;I recommend this game to be played with your family, friends and Jesus Christ , or you can solo, but be careful at stalker.
w1;-;one of the best f2p mmorpg i ever played pros: 1. it's free and not pay to win, all warframes and weapons can be crafted except excalibur prime because it's for founder only. 2. the platinum is not expensive you can easily get 75% discount from daily login (in my case if im not login in 1-2 weeks i'll get 75% discount, need to be tested tho) and you won't be forced to buy it since it's easy to get from trading with another player. 3. you'll never get left behind even you not playing in one or two month, you always can keep up with your friends. 4. tons of fun if you play with your friends, and still fun even you play it solo cause it's will be harder and you'll need to be more careful 5. fast-paced combat and parkour, ofc you're a ninja. 6. badass simulator cons: 1. might ruin you life 2. never get enough time for this game
Konno Yuuki;-;Perfect!
[MM] WMan22;-;Space Ninjas doing Space Ninja things. Very addictive, if a bit repetitive and grindy. But the game is very agile, just the way I like it; And the gunplay is very rewarding once you move from starting gear. If there's one gripe I have with the game it's that I wish that there were more flat walls in some of the levels to take advantage of the highly agile moveset that includes things like Review is now building in the foundry. 23:59:50 remains. Rush for 25 plat? walljump and wallrun. But aesthetically most are like what an alien ship would probably look like on the interior so I can't really complain much. Yes, you should play it.* *Must have lots of patience and dedication.
w1;-;one of the best f2p mmorpg i ever played pros: 1. it's free and not pay to win, all warframes and weapons can be crafted except excalibur prime because it's for founder only. 2. the platinum is not expensive you can easily get 75% discount from daily login (in my case if im not login in 1-2 weeks i'll get 75% discount, need to be tested tho) and you won't be forced to buy it since it's easy to get from trading with another player. 3. you'll never get left behind even you not playing in one or two month, you always can keep up with your friends. 4. tons of fun if you play with your friends, and still fun even you play it solo cause it's will be harder and you'll need to be more careful 5. fast-paced combat and parkour, ofc you're a ninja. 6. badass simulator cons: 1. might ruin you life 2. never get enough time for this game
Defex;-;This game is awesome, get it. 'Nuff said.
Shimakaze;-;You Got Lustful Friends that Loves Co-op MMO'ish ThirdPersonShooter games and Loves spending Hours lustfully grinding/farming items N Stuff?! This game is perfect for you and your friends baby!! I mean its pretty much a hack and slash Space Ninja third person packED co-op MMO'ish TPS series game but it ain't just some mainstream MMO'ish TPS.Its Packed with uniqueness in it,its like a Left4dead in space similar in some ways but with more kinds of enemies,stories,quest as well as you can buy/craft weapons ,colour,skins,customization,modding(In-game weapon/warframe Modifications) and ironmansuits(so called "warframes" which you as a player in an ironmansuits fighting against enemies from different factions around the solar system),etc. Along with amazing combat animations,warframe abilities,parkour,weapon/melee skill combinations and highly detailed graphics,etc.There's also PvP in it which is okay in my opinion it still needs a bit of improvement tho.Aside from that This game is a masterpiece to those who favours Co-operative based games. With that said this game Overall 9.8/10,you should play this game although it might have a bit of bugs in an early stage but still,i truly admire the work of the game developers to create such an amazing game!! Therefore they are TRULY working their 'a''ss off with the next upcoming update ''The Archwing'' which makes it look like gundam later on. So yeah!! have some friends and start playing!!!! what ARE You Waiting For huh!? Gooooooooo!!!! Play!!!!!! Pros- Maneuver Capabilities Fun Graphics Gameplay Weapon/Warframe "Extreme Modification capabilities" Many Combinations A sense of Creative capabilities For players Cons- Bugs(will soon be fixed)~~constant game updates Connection Lag (depending on which player hosts)~~solves by being a host yourself but others might lag if their latancy is crap or your internet. You can also prefer soloing if you're having connection troubles for the time being End-Game Cons: Drop Rates(some are impossible to obtain) Takes time to grind Fixed body shapes for warframes (cant make body shape modifications/adjustments) except colours,Skins,Helmets and warframe accessories Skins only changes the patterns on your warframe which sucks,they should make it like a new body or something(Wished if you can Create your own character inside your warframes Like those in mmorpg's or perhaps able to modify your warframes from head to toe)
Ry in the House;-;pay 2 win because they gave me a 90% coupon discount on platinum and i bought the highest pack
Konno Yuuki;-;Perfect!
AnimeDude;-;One of the best Free2Play's i have ever tried out. You can practically get everything or every weapon, warframe in the game just by playing the game. Graphics wise, its a gorgeous game. Music is a heat pumping rhythm, that will make you just want to kill everything at sight. Sometimes the lobbies tend to mess up, like joining someone's game tells me the objective is done... but its not. It kinda feels like Mass Effect 3's multiplayer mode. Having these alert missions is good and rewarding. Plus an active community, gonna love an active community. There were a lot of big changes from Closed beta to open beta, but overall this is an amazing game. Oh i forgot about the story, it has a story and bosses to beat :D Amazing game, Play now Tenno!
[Membar] Hundikarv;-;Warframe, and the negative and positive things about it. Gameplay The Gameplay of Warframe, well it's alright, not that bad if I am to say. The gameplay can be fun, because there are several ways to play it in. You can do the missions ingame quickly, by rushing it with team-mates, or go slowly throughout your missions. There are various places to explore within the game, with missions and neutral areas. You can travel throughout the entire universe, visit every planet there is, and even it's neutral social base 'The Tenno platform' There is a variability within designing things, although they cost most of the time. Color packs will cost you Platinum, which is an ingame credit gotten by buying it. Color packs, forms, and design. You can design an entire guild base, with it developing slowly by having everyone of your guild working together to finish everything. The base of the guild is quite huge, and grand. It will keep you occupied. The color packs can be bought later on, but the starter pack of colors will give you a bit to work with for the time, and design your warframe, weapons, banners, and added customisations. Multiplayer gameplay In Warframe, there is a multiplayer platform, in which you can actually go from 4, towards 7 team-mates in total, you can rush a lot of missions, or have more difficult fights within other missions. There are several survival missions, or control missions. There is also the defense system, in which you and your team-mates will have to defend something in the mission. All in all, the gameplay might have it's bugs sometimes with disconnecting, and re-connecting every now and then, but it's worth the while. Weaponry In this game, there is a huge variability of weapons to choose from. There is the primary weapon, that can be a rifle, sniper, shotgun, or bow. The secondary weapon, that can be a pistol, two pistols, or more forms of smaller guns. Then, there is the meele weapon. The weapon that will help you in a lot of situations, and is one of the few most Overpowered weapons in the game. There is a variability of what kind of weapon you can get, but there is also the negative side of it where you have to buy a lot of them with platinum credits, or by farming and creating. Which will also keep you occupied. Note: Customisation will still be there Warframes Warframes are the characters that you will be using within the game, and will be able to design, and customise. You can add several colors, or mods to your warframe. Sadly, warframe spots need to be bought. But, you'll get a few to use from playing the game for a long time. The start of the game will give you a good choice of three warframes that you can pick to start with, in which you'll have to take the best choice for yourself. A normal warframe can be upgraded from normal, to prime. After doing some challenging missions, you can upgrade it with new parts. All in all, the warframe system will keep you occupied enough to play it for a long time until you grow sick of it all. Mods Mods, are addons in the game that will keep you occupied to customise what you want your weapons to do, and/or your warframes to do. You can add damage, elemental effects, or more within the game with Mods. You can also level mods, by adding and comparing mods to each of them. So they become more powerful, and make the gameplay more fun for you. All in all Rating. All in all, the game has some negative and positive things. Positive: -Gameplay -Graphics -Variability of weapons -Creativity -Exploration ingame -Customisation -Occupation throughout the gameplay -Variability of warframes Negative: -Requires platinum in a lot of situations -Will be taking a lot of time for constructions -Might get on your nerves from time to time Vote: 9/10 Would get anytime.
in non-Stoom game;-;10/10 would potato again
ZQIYGYXZ;-;This game allows me to shoot the gun and go fast all while being a ninja in space.
Batman;-;I wall ran up and ended up under the map of the game I was in and found a giant ball of reality. 13/10
quasioma;-;Warframe is a free online RPG on a miniature scale that is played in a browser like Internet Explorer or Firefox. The graphics have not evolved or look like they have been upgraded since 1996. It does not have the saving grace of being an E type of game for little kids either, even though the graphics are kiddy type. At first look you might think that Warframe is merely stupid, and childish. But the underlying deceptiveness of this chat based experience is not apparent right away. This is a game that looks like it is for 7 year olds, in reality its far from it. It does not carry a warning to parents or have a date of birth filter on it. By being free to play the game circumvents the requirements that supposedly protect kids from adult content. Even though one shouldnt judge game developers by what the players have done with their online game, at some point the developers do have to acknowledge what is being done with the user created content and deal with it in a responsible fashion. Players chat freely about real life, and more adult content, unsuitable for minors takes place. That needs to be addressed with this game.
Yithend21;-;Great game, really love it.
StrikeR;-;Really cool game :DDDD
Vallinek;-;Warframe is a free to play TPS / hack 'n slash co-op game with stealth and parkour elements. In it the player becomes one of the Tenno, space ninjas awakened from a long slumber, who control powerful suits known as Warframes which provide different abilities and allow them to tackle on dangerous jobs from Lotus. The graphics are just incredible. Each location has their own design style, the environments are shiny and rich in details, while the special effects are just plain beautiful. The only downside might be the fact that the last one can be a little bit too distracting at times and hard to see through during a fight. In the sound department, the music is appriopriate to the situation (speeds up when in a fight, for example) and whatever plays in the background is usually the theme of the faction you're fighting against (though it can get overriden by the boss' theme if someone like that appears). The sound effects aren't anything special, but they are appriopriate. In the sound department, the each faction and most locations get their unique music tunes, which also change according to the situations (intensifies when you're in a fight, calms down when you weren't detected yet). The voice acting is also really good, even if a bit scarce. The gameplay consists of you and up to three other players deploying on a mission and completing a specific objective (like killing all enemies or capturing important targets) while moving through randomly-generated rooms. You get to use between three weapons - primary, secondary and melee (which can be of many different types, like shotguns, rifles, pistols, shurikens, swords, axes...) - as well as an assortment of movement options, including, but not limited to sprinting, sliding, wall-running etc. You can also attack enemies while performing any of those maneuvers, giving you a large degree of freedom as to how and when to move in and strike. As far as stealth elements go, you can obviously use cover to keep yourself out of sight of enemies. You can also use silent weapons like bows and shurikens to take them out from a distance, or sneak up behind them and perform an insta-kill stealth execution. The mechanics are very solid and it's fun slicing stuff down. There is also the Archwing and its own missions, where you move in no-gravity using the eponymous mechanical wings, shooting down foes akin to a space shooter. While it isn't as diverse as the standard gamemode, it is a good change of pace from time to time. Not to mention, even more awesome. The amount of equipment, types of environments, and missions you can encounter is staggering. The diversity is what keeps it from getting too stale. Another good thing is that the multiplayer functions pretty well - even with high ping, you will notice an obvious delay, but it won't impact your experience or general gameplay that much. I think this is it for the pros, so let's start counting out the cons. The game is still, quite obviously, a glorified grind to get better stuff. Fortunately, most of the time it's somewhat fun to play. Speaking about multiplayer, if the host's computer lags horribly due to all the stuff going on in the game, you can expect your gameplay to be similarly laggy, with everything "flash stepping" all over the place. Another bad thing is the fact that enemies are horrendously stupid. Performing a "stealth" execution together with screams of pain does not itch the rest of the guards five meters ahead to look behind themselves. You can snipe someone with a bow and no one will find anything particularly weird in a ragdolling corpse going halfway across the room. They also tend to take cover at not exactly the best spots, or forget that you just sped right past them and still sit there waiting in cover, just being covered from the wrong direction. Harder missions only strengthen the enemies' stats together with spawning elites more often, and sometimes new types of enemies. Also another thing is that the game requires a LOT of grinding to even get moderately powerful. At the beginning you're going to struggle to complete the missions that aren't the absolute simplest of all, since you don't have much resources to manufacture new stuff, and the starting equipment is very weak. And even if you do get strong weapons, they're not going to be powerful enough with a good assortment of high-rank mods for them to customize their damage output. Of course, if you have a friend who's been playing the game for quite some time and is willing to help you out in getting started, this becomes a bit less of an issue. The amount of slots you get for equipment is also very limited. While it isn't so bad with weapon and sentinel slots, you get only two Warframe slots for starters, kind of limiting your options as to how many roles you can fill in a team. You really need more slots to be able to do something besides one or two things. The last thing is the fact that the game is pretty glitchy. Objects can spawn at wrong places due to random generator just messing up, or you can land outside the map, fall into the Void and be forced to revive due to a collision detection glitch or a lag spike. And this isn't an uncommon occurence, it happened to me three times . Overall, this is a grindy and harsh at the beginning, but very fun game once you get far enough. You should check it out if you don't mind a sluggish beginning, especially if you've got more experienced friends who can help you get running.
Trusted Middleman;-;Dowloaded 6GB at low network speed because brother watching youtube and whoring all of the bandwidth. Finished download Opened game, "Downloading additional content" Downloads another 6GB while sister downloading mods for minecraft Realised what is lyfe Friend tells me already played 4 hours of the game while downloading from launcher Finally Finished again Game Crashed Validated steam files "9654 files failed to validate and will be reaqquired" Downloaded another 6GB Opened game again "Downloading Additional Content" Spent another 4 hours of life downloading while other people in house whoring bandwidth Finally finished again Opened game again Realised already 2AM Very tired Left game downloading overnight Computer Shutdown because of time limit setting Turned on computer "Downloading Windows Updates 0/126" 8/10 IGN Would download again, But too much salt
Sexy Bad Boy;-;A guy with deadly cancer fights with space AIDS 10/10
Krone;-;This Game is awesome !!!!
Spyralmask;-;Very fun and addicting.. you want to get the best items in the game. One down side is that you can pay for items.. so people with tons of money can easily get items some people will work hard for.
frog;-;this game is alright i guess
Koolaid;-;C'mon it's free.
Pixle;-;This is basically a game about alien cyborg space ninjas to put it basically it's really fun too! only downside is the platinum system.
BlaZingJoJo;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME ! GET IT
LoneSurvivorV;-;This is my favorite game! One of the best FTP games I have ever played. When you start off you get the choice between three starter characters (warframes) depending on your play style, and from there you can get more frames and weapons to further expand your arsenal. Everything in this game can be obtained without putting real money into it (just saying). It's definitely worth your time. Trust me it will be well worth the journey to get your desired equipment. Good Luck, Fellow Tenno :D P.S. If you need help, feel free to add me: lonesurvivor05
T.H.I.E.F;-;This Game Destroyed My Life :D
You'dNeverGrazz;-;Want dual pistols? : ^) 1. Buy a blueprint for a pistol -> 12 hours 2. Buy a blueprint for that same pistol -> 12 hours 3. Buy a blueprint to put these 2 pistols together -> 12 hours -----> 36 hours of pure bliss I r8 this game 8/8
Override;-;This game is Awesome really like it.
nemoJoe;-;This is a fun game, especially with friends. The business model is fair, and while I haven't paid a penny up until now, I can see myself buying some platinum down the line in order to support the developer. There is a steep learning curve, but if you persevere and start learning, it is quite rewarding.
Spobbles;-;It's free. Play it. Can be grindy or repetitive for new players, but once you find your place in the game and have others around you to play with, it'll keep you interested for a good while. Updates all the time, a devteam players actually like and enjoyable gameplay await. This game is free to play and has its premium currency like any other, but you don't have to pay anything to get the premium content if you work for it thanks to the game's trading system. That premium content is largely limited to cosmetic items anyway, so you won't be at a great disadvantage either way. It's still free. You should try it.
CLYDE FROG;-;I'm heated right now, I love the game but I just stayed up late as hell on a work night doing a defense mission. I had a good team and got to the 25th level. I figured it was time to go since I was tired and didn't want to lose everything I had, so I pressed extract, and 100% did not press continue. BOOM Everyone else extracted and it kept me there alone so I obviously got  on the 26th wave and had to quit and I didnt get ANYTHING!!!! I mean what better way to stay up late on a work night? Seriously this game is fun and this is just me venting because I'm furious, but seriously wtf. Why did everyone else get to extract but I had to stay alone only to die and lose ing everything? I have so much anger right now and nowhere to put it. Now I'm going to lie awake wishing I could smash a developers head into a curb because clyde frog is upset. 9/10 on the game though, just hope you don't ever get ed like I just did.
MC RIDE;-;game save your life while you can
[];-;This game is pure awesomeness. Sure, it gets grindy, but EVERYTHING (non aesthetics) can be achieved just by playing the game. Longest farming run I've had was only a few days with my truly fun casual clan. There are pretty much 0 paywalls in the entire game aside from frame and weapon slots which are extremely cheap! (This free to play has to make money somehow). The nearly weekly updates also shows the dev team's determination to keep the game fresh and their dedication to the game and its community.
BlackSupremacy;-;You better have a high spec PC!!!
Drithique;-;Well, everyone seems to be playing this now. Took a long at this long ago and have to admit I did not think a whole lot of it. Started playing again early February 2014 after a few friends asked me to and it was fun to dip into again. The initial grind to get anywhere else past your initial warframe and weapon loadout is a little much but hey, it's a free to play game and they have to see if you'd be willing to drop money on it at least some way. After that though, lots of fun. Reminds me of Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer a lot with more looting and actually gathering the stuff you find and crafting it into things you like rather than spend the credits you receive on boxes which contain random items in them. So, this now fulfills my needs to be a futuristic ninja slashing / gunning down things. Fun stuff.
Ice Souless;-;I hope this game will sell millions of copy even though it is free. XD
Drithique;-;Well, everyone seems to be playing this now. Took a long at this long ago and have to admit I did not think a whole lot of it. Started playing again early February 2014 after a few friends asked me to and it was fun to dip into again. The initial grind to get anywhere else past your initial warframe and weapon loadout is a little much but hey, it's a free to play game and they have to see if you'd be willing to drop money on it at least some way. After that though, lots of fun. Reminds me of Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer a lot with more looting and actually gathering the stuff you find and crafting it into things you like rather than spend the credits you receive on boxes which contain random items in them. So, this now fulfills my needs to be a futuristic ninja slashing / gunning down things. Fun stuff.
Little Blue Devil;-;Free, updated all the time and fun with friends.
Kaneki Ken;-;Similar in some ways to the multiplayer experience seen in Mass Effect 3, Warframe wastes no time in telling stories particularly elaborate. The background narrative, in fact, will give us an excuse to put ourselves in the shoes of ninja called to fight a futuristic alien faction. Home menu you can choose between different worlds to visit where we await missions to complete possibly in the company of three other players. Challenge between intergalactic ninja! The objectives vary enough, but the main flaw of the title Digital Extremes is out soon given the limited variety of levels. You will be prompted to save the hostages, locate a reactor to destroy or find an object, but whatever the delivery, in Warframe you'll almost always eliminate waves of enemies, chasing the various waypoint marked on the map. The gameplay, fortunately, fairly obvious problems of repetition of the title. With the view placed behind our Tenno (the name of the metal ninja who impersonate), we will have firearms and trusts katana. Come into play the Warframe champions representing the different possible configurations of the armor. These identify the different classes of ninja, with unique features useful to customize the game experience. Challenge between intergalactic ninja! Initially there are three, while the other can be purchased with real money or get through the crafting system included in the title. The Warframe not only change the appearance of your character, but activate specific skill such as enabling stealth attacks, rather than providing armor thicker than usual and so on. The user then accesses to further customizations to buy with credits earned in each mission completed successfully. These enhance the efficiency of its Warframe but not only. There are in fact many consumable items to carry around for the later missions, useful to address the weaknesses of its configuration and style of play.
AGC | Neg;-;This game is awesome. Play it. Or I will find you. And force you to play.
The Real Dick Cheney;-;Sometimes this game makes my peepee become the big peepee 420/69
Hambutter;-;Be a space pirate kill,steal,hijack 10/10
TIPTOP SECURITY;-;Best farming simulator with guns and katanas.
DarkfireSavior;-;How can I put this into words... If you took the multiplayer co-op from Mass Effect 3, then gave them three extra years to produce and tune it into a full-fledged multiplayer experience; then, you take that game and force feed it piles of amphetamine and hallucenogenic substances. In it's drunken, ball-tripping state, you then force breed said game with Ninja Gaiden. The resulting spawn from this unholy union of games is: WARFRAME. Tripped-out, beautiful, intense, challenging, strategic, with incredibly well-developed depth, and... fun. Really one of the greatest all-around co-op experiences I've found. Can't recommend this one enough to anyone I've ever gamed with. If I had to balance this review with one caveat, it would be that the game is only marginally "free-to-play". New players are going to be at a severe disadvantage if they're unwilling to drop a bit of cash on it. This doesn't bother me in the least; I'm of the generation that doesn't mind paying someone for their efforts. Especially when the final product is this great. Let me put it this way: I've put a lot more money into much less deserving titles, with much less value to show for it. That's all for now. Do yourselves a favor and check this one out. TL;DR download Warfame
Rhys;-;Warframe is a form of FPS shooter/close-quarters combat game that is intensly immersive and very well designed between the way combat works and the amazing graphics, there are quite a few classes and you can do many different things from assainations to all out kill everything that moves, you can play with meele or charge around with your guns n stuff SIngle player: Playing alone means less mobs and easier missions all around very fun to do, and sometimes better to play as for certain things Multiplayer: massively amusing and you can play with freinds and just cut down hoards with help Overall i would give this game a 8/10 and would recomend you download it esp since it's free and for a free game this is astounding
LK;-;A bit grindy for RNG drops, but otherwise really cool. Space ninjas in space! What's not to like?
Dno;-;Bugframe: Gringfest 10/10 would grind my a** of .. again.
Kastlas;-;This game is one of those, which blended tons of good games into one, OP as level 69 Stalker (who mostly rapes you in solo Uranus missions), grinding game. Being a dude who overplayed Warframe and walking around the city might be quite dangerous. Stalker Cop , Harvester Chichuachua or three CoD players who sleep with your mother might get you. I said this game mixed tons of good games? Well, here they are : -Like in DotA 2, on most of Europeans servers you will see "" in chatlog when they die and you don't have time to revive them... -Imagine Crack and Civilization series have sex with each other. Well, this is the result... -Mirror's Edge was one of those parkour games that everyone enjoyed.Faith was able to carry and run with weapons those weighed grams.In Warframe you can also run fast with Gram... which weighs about 100 kg... -This game ain't racist at all, you are just a black, skinny guy, which often steals stuff from dead bodies... -You can see that Earth Planet is occupied by Russians. Why? Because in Soviet Warframe, Earth missions rapes you... To sum up, OP game, never give up if you just can't get Cronus blueprint. 10/10 , would collect 7 dragon balls to play this game without often DDOS attacks.
Roysmith;-;I love this game! I'll play every day 6-7 hours!
Nawashi;-;Very fun game, endlessly customizable!
Sigorian Knight;-;This is my favorite waste of time and couldn't see my self enjoying any other free to play out there anymore than what this game gives! The creator's add in stuff all the time, giving to the community and talks with the community! What other company could you honestly think of that makes a mmo free to play shooter that listen's to you! A company that cares about it's players I can't. Try it! You will love it! P.S. SPAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAACCCCCCCCCCCCCCCEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE <3
TheRapperBoy;-;To awesome this game!...i recomand this game for all who whant's to play with his friends and have fun.. ^-^
Foempatrol;-;If you are into third person shooters, wallrunning, shooting the crap out of aliens with your friends - or by yourself -, upgrading all of your weaponry, killing enemies with stealth or a direct attack, slicing them in half with your blade, look no more! This game has a bunch of different levels and objectives, altough it can get a little repetitive, it is awesome! But to be honest, you have to play it with friends, it's amazing fun and i'll guarantee you that you will play more!
MindEmpty^;-;This game is very addicting, its fun, exciting, yet a bit clunky. They nerfed the guns and damage with the release of the ps4 version. You do not have to pay-to-win all you have to do is fight endless waves on defense mode to get you inventory filled with valuable mods, then wait a couple days to build new weapons. To upgrade your weapons (I have played without paying a dollar and still hold up in deathmatches) you either have to PAY, or you have to sign in for 7+ consecutive days and hope to HECK you get the random item you need to upgrade your gun/melee for additional mods=additional damage. I was very upset with the Nerfing of the mods with the release of the ps4 version, my pistol was one shot on any enemy at any level, with the new updates my guns have been completely nerfed and do less than half of the damage they did before, was a real dissapointment since i spent alot of time upgrading my pistol specifically for instant damage. All in all i recommend this game BUT its seeming to become more and more pay to win with each coming update. lets hope the devs release some additional features and weapons for broke  players like myself.
MACACO;-;Really good looking , a lot of lights and special effects for a free-game. Real money don`t really change anything , just make the game faster for making itens and etc...Good in the theory , but after some time it`s get boring. They make some really nice events , but even with some friends I don`t have pacience to play.
3x + const;-;Pros: +Multiplayer +Good graphics which supports PhysX, directX 11 and x64 bit processing +More then 10 heroes with specific skills +Character customization with upgrades and cosmetic items +Cyberpunk with ninjas Cons: -So many things are not completed yet -Bad melee combat Gameplay - 7/10 Graphics - 8/10 Game interface - 6/10 Game options - 8/10
TIPTOP SECURITY;-;Best farming simulator with guns and katanas.
Roysmith;-;I love this game! I'll play every day 6-7 hours!
thewind_;-;Game takes is a bit of a grind to get going but its a fun mob shooter. End game is lacking but the devs are constantly updating the game. Game keeps getting better and better every other month.
Rhys;-;Warframe is a form of FPS shooter/close-quarters combat game that is intensly immersive and very well designed between the way combat works and the amazing graphics, there are quite a few classes and you can do many different things from assainations to all out kill everything that moves, you can play with meele or charge around with your guns n stuff SIngle player: Playing alone means less mobs and easier missions all around very fun to do, and sometimes better to play as for certain things Multiplayer: massively amusing and you can play with freinds and just cut down hoards with help Overall i would give this game a 8/10 and would recomend you download it esp since it's free and for a free game this is astounding
[Faboost];-;Sadly, this game was at its best on closed beta, it just went downhill from there. It started focusing on the wrong things, and changing things that worked fine just for the sake of it, instead of building upon some of the most satisfying mechanics on an online game, and then the balance just went down the drain. It's still a good game, and one that everyone should try, it's just not as good as it could have been. 7/10
Guts;-;Much pewpew, very space ninja, so gud. 10/10
thoma5nator[ENG];-;Warframe's QA in a nutshell: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wAYrXgGAsXc
Yung Ebola (feat. Pitbull);-;Best Pay to Win game ever 10/10
PHOBIE;-;WARFRAME is a fast-paced space-shooter, combining elements of MOBA, Parcours, third-person combat and Co-op into a shiny Ninja-Adventure. Although it can be quite a grind if the player chooses to compete for the very best equipment, it is the best bang for your buck if you want the best of all worlds and look for a game where both casual and dedicated gamers can have fun. With some of the best coders in the world (Unreal series, Bioshock, Dark Sector) Digital Extremes has managed to provide stability and constant progress, and delivering high-quality content based on the Evolution Engine. WARFRAME in its current state is quite capable of challenging and competing with the current AAA titles of all major game-companies.
Linna;-;Eh, it's alright.
AureasAetas;-;Bugframe is a game about finding all the bugs within. You'll sure to get a lot of playtime, bugs are everywhere ! There is so much fun discovering new bugs after new bugs, spending hours farming them and finally getting them. Play it, you'll enjoy it !
tuomio tulee;-;more grinding than in tony hawk's pro skater
A mooing dragon;-;pleasehelpme this game is sucking my life away by the minute and i cant do anything about it
neoadvaita;-;As i have played more than 1800 hours (800 on steam and 1000 otherwise ) and i can say that this game limits my social life i dont go out much now ,i bailout my friends to play this , i only go outside when i have to work and sometimes days are like that i took day off or half day from work just to play this beacuse any event or any new update is going on ,so overall i have really good experience with this game plus this game is my first coop mutiplayer so i m gonna always love this game no matter what
codelly;-;pretty chill game, lots of upgrades and grinding, but its all in good fun. can be very fast action-packed.
Megakoresh;-;This is collected from opinions of more than 10 people with whom I have played the game extensively. Don't believe the hour count. Game's well-optimized and stable (for me), so I leave it running in background very often. I have around 100 hours of gameplay in it so far. Maybe little less. 3rd try... Jesus this game is hard to review... It's not a shooter, so don't expect that. This is a Diablo-style game. A world of RNG, loot showers, grind, lots of content and in-depth character and equipment customization. It's pros include: - Lots of content. Like a huge amount. Hundreds of mods for equipment, 150+ weapons, 20 warframes each with unique and interesting style and abilities (and almost all ugly as ), hundreds of missions, unlocks, a bunch of bosses, 4 enemy factions, story quests and a  dog. Yes there is even a pet system for some reason. WTF? I don't know... - Pretty lights! Well-optimized (especially for Nvidia) and extra-pretty graphics, HD textures, lots of options, PhysX particles that are wholly misused and spam the screen, while having no gameplay enhancing purpose... But hey! All this looks really colourful and pretty. - Good developer. Constant updates all the time, responsive to feedback, professional and passionate. Those guys know what they are doing and can be trusted to keep improving the game. It is getting better overall with updates, though they made a few mistakes along the way. But when they set out to improve a particular area, they usually succeed and deliver what the players ask for. - Great lore. Unique and mysterious lore set this game apart. Unfortunately there isn't much of it. Maybe they are saving it up for the new story quest system they added in U14. - Enormous equipment customization. This is the main skill of the game - making a good build. There are hundreds, maybe already over a thousand different mods and you can put 8 on a piece of equipment. This system is very good, but is unfortnately plaigued by F2P curse, I will mention it in cons. - LOOT! It's like Torchlight, but with an over-the-shoulder perspective! Tons of loot and rewards, all showering you in a spectacular fireworks of colours and sparkles. If you like loot, you will like Warframe. It's cons are: - It's not a shooter. It requires no skill whatsoever. Success is determined entirely by RNG, it's all in levels, equipment and %. Unless you count aiming as a criteria for "skill-based gameplay", this game 's only skill is making a roll at the right time to negate knockdown. Everything else is RNG. - Technically same as above, but it's so big that it deserves a point of it's own: Abilities are RNG as well. They are the second major combat tool after guns and they require energy to use that does not renegerate, but drops from enemies randomly. It's incredibly infuriating for people like me, who are very very unlucky in games, I am pretty much either forced to use just guns or the efficiency build, which is very restrictive for some warframes. This is a terrible decision and I am baffled that they still haven't even put a mod in that disables the energy orb pickups, but gives you a potent energy recharge instead. - F2P curse: up until you have a potato (a paid item, that is incredibly difficult to get for free) you don't have a choice with equipment customization: every equipment item has the "non-potato build" that you must use and can't deviate from. - There is a polarity system that requires you to re-level items to make them able to have more mods. Leveling items in Warframe is a giant chore and really frustrating and not fun. The first time you get Mastery from them, so it helps a but. But later, you are just using the thing for ages, despite being sick of it, just to get to rank 30. Re-leveling should happen at 2-3 times the current rate for it to be an enjoyable mechanic, but now it's awful and it's one of the major downsides of the game. - RNG. EVERYTHING in Warframe is controlled by RNG. Roll the Dice is the second name for this game. Consequently if you aren't lucky you will have a bad time. Unless you manage to get some good friends who are lucky and can help you out, which is what I did. When I need to farm something really rare, I just go with some friends who are lucky and I usually get it. But never with randoms or alone, no matter how much I try. This is RNG, and welcome to Jackass. - Enemy scaling is MMORPG-style. They scale with damage and health and they scale hard. Not special abilities, new AI rules and such, but just enormous HP and 1HKs. Needless to say this does nothing for the appetite. - Enemies are game's biggest gameplay issue. They have different attacks, sure, but they are mostly non-interactive and completely non-reactive. If an enemy can pull you, it will pull you, regardless of you being immune or behind cover. Further the spawn compositions are static and not reactive either. And there's no significant differences between both enemy looks and their stats. All in all: the enemies are completely non-interactive. All you can do with them is ragdoll them and kill them, that's it. Neither their AI responds to player actions, nor their spawns, nor their states. - Level design. Levels are comprised of randomly arranged rooms, each of which don't benefit the level in any way. Like Forevener here told me, and he is very much correct in that regard, the game suffers from levels being completely linear. There's no reason to consider the room ahead cuz you have to go through it anyway. Furthermore, there's no reason to explore rooms and use the parkour. It is not a good combat strategy and chests outside of Void do not give good enough rewards for exploring each room thoroughly. Levels do not affect flow of combat and gameplay. Ok that covers all? This game is really difficult to review. There's a lot there and it is being constantly updated. Take a look. The start might be rough, but stick around, play with some nice veterans, they'll help you out and you can find your fun. The gameplay may suffer from RNG and enemy design, resulting in lack of skill, but it makes up for it with content and the variety in which the damage may be pumped out, even if there is never thought required for it or nothing to make you think before shooting. If nothing else, where else can you grow a ing space dog?
Rapxtor;-;Well, what can I say, I never had so much fun alone or with friends for while with game, and even with so many changes since I started playing Warframe at closed Beta, I still have some enjoyment after so many hours. For a F2P title, have a quality above what most players expect, it is a hardcore grind game, but it can also be rewarding, it all depend the way you aproach the game, and it is also important to prevent the "burnout" phase we achieve in Grind games. Warframe have very diferent modes, like Exterminate, Capture, Mobile Defense and the new Intermission, the other modes are endless, you can play until you cant stand anymore, that is Survival & Defense modes, they can be very challenging, even when we max all our mods and weapons, I would avoid trading, at least at start, bc if you dont have anything to do, you will become bored and reach burnout sooner missing some good experience that warframe have to offer.
Kurizaki;-;It's a grind, that much is certain. I recommend new players use the platinum given to you to buy warframe slots. That way you have access to 4 warframes in the future. The allure of overpowered weapons and frames is present for sure. But getting more slots gives you more playstyle choices later on. 300+ hours and I keep coming back for more.
Rusdhy;-;I LOVE[/b] EVERYTHING ABOUT THIS GAME You can use any warframe you like with money. You can customize your warframe color and style with money. But... do you want to be a GODLIKE[/b] ??? Then... you must earn it by PLAY REAL HARD for FREE! And by PLAY REAL HARD i mean PLAY REAL HARD[/b] ! WHAT A WONDERFUL[/b] GAME P.S You need time and luck on this one...
ZeroFOX;-;Do you enjoy slicing and dicing bad guys while doing a 360 on a unicycle off the back of a spaceship in the middle of space during free taco tuesdays??? THEN GET THIS GAME!!!
Bigdog488;-;Beast ing Game Get this  ;D
ExplosiveExplosion;-;If you have ever seen the movie Pitch Black or any of the other Riddick media you may have thought "Why do these guys keep going after Riddick? He kills everyone and blows up all their homes and businesses. Why are they still going after him? Why?". WARFRAME is a game where you play as a Tenno. Tenno are a race of people that are just so flippin nasty that it makes no sense why you would ever pursue them. These crazyasses wont hesitate to wipe you the funk out at the drop of a hat. There are these three space armies that just never learn. The Grineer, The Corpus and The Infested. These fools just never learn, they spot a Tenno and they just think "Maybe I could kill that Tenno! YEAH! I`ll be the one to succeed where ever single other has failed.". NOPE.
CryptPhD;-;Where to start with Warframe? Well, the whole "Space Ninja" promotions are very well deserved, the lore is cool, It looks beautiful for a F2P game, and the gameplay is solid and very satisfying. However, there are some things that can irk and even push away new players if they aren't prepared for it. First, the Good Stuff +The first major thing is that it's "Free to Play", meaning no purchase to play this thing. No need to explain that. +This game is gorgeous. Seriously one of the best looking F2P games out there. The designs of all the enemies, weapons, and player characters are also extremely cool looking. +For those who are into it, the game has a pretty good upgrade system. You can specialize your character and weapons with a variety of different upgrades for maximum efficency. +There are a whole bunch of missions to do, so you won't have a lack in content for some time. Also, the dev team is really good with updates, getting them out very quickly. +The gameplay is most likely the best part. Parkouring around the area, fighting with 'gunkata'(mixture of guns and melee weapons), and having 4 different abilities for each character at your disposal. The co-op is also very good, a great game to play with friends. Now there might be more, but overall, it's a very good game. But I would hurt myself if I didn't mention the Bad Stuff -This game acts a lot like raiding in MMOs at endgame. If you play with strangers, most will expect you to be fully decked out with the right mods and weapons. This can get frustrating as I've had instances where people would leave because I didn't have the right mod setup.(More of a personal gripe, but something good to know.) -If you plan on going completely F2P with this game, expect a  ton of grinding. You basically have to build everything, so that means farming for resources and waiting for the item to be built. To put this into perspective, building a weapon takes about 24 hours(maybe 12, I can't seem to remember) and building a character takes about 3 days. -This game can be very daunting when first getting in. The tutorial helps with gameplay, but navigating the map and understanding what does what is left out. My suggestion is to go onto Youtube and look up some user-made tutorials. Two Youtubers I'd recommend are "Mike B" for his Crash Course in Warframe videos, which mainly help with better understanding your characters, and Mogamu, who does the same thing, though he takes closer looks at the weapons and whether or not they're worth your time. Both are great for getting a headstart in how you want to play. All in all, this is a fantastic game. The main problems I have with it can be easily solved with patience and research before you jump right in. You should at least try this out, since you won't be losing money in the process.
AudibleSilence7;-;This game is a fantastic MMOTPS/RPG. You take the role of a Tenno, a being who has been in stasis for a very long time and attempt to bring balance back to the solar system. Guided by a mysterious entity known as the Lotus, you seek to survive and thrive in this instance-based, Co-op MMO. Graphics: (running max graphics + PhysX) The in game graphics engine is absolutely gorgeous. From high bloom and glorius PhysX particles, to the animations of the movements of all beings, Sci-Fi seems extremely realistic, without setting a ridiculous bar for what's necessary to play the game. All of the Warframe abilities have satisfying amounts of graphical work done, and with the newest update, NPC voices also have 3-D moving portraits in a very Starcraft-esque manner. Other than some minor graphical bugs, such as a vent grate floating a couple inches off the floor, everything looks very well polished. Some people may feel that the bloom is just too much for them and luckily, there is an option to turn it off if so desired. Gameplay: Moving around in a Warframe feels very fluid and natural, and as a member of the design council, I can vouch for DE's continued efforts at making this even more natural where possible. Wall running, scaling, jumping, sliding, rolling all seem very well mo-capped and only at very few points in the game does movement become an issue, such as getting stuck behind a pipe or such. Combat feels just as natural as well. While there is no snap to cover system, being able to switch shoulders makes for easy adjusting. Guns feel adequate in their power and recoil, with some weapons like revolvers kicking much more than a light assault rifle as they should. Ammo is never truly a problem if played well, but can become a concern for those that prefer to use bows or snipers as their ammo drops are fairly low, understandably. Bullet based weapons are hitscan, while energy and heavy projectile weapons will exhibit travel times, but will not have drop associated with them. Melee weapons feel realtively fluid, but seem somewhat weak. This aspect however, is getting a major overhaul soon, and from what I've seen, will be vastly improved. Warframe abilities are what bring a third dimension, sometimes literally, to combat in Warframe. No one frame is terrible compared to the others, and those that feel underpowered are being looked at constantly for more reworking and balancing. Each frame is specialized to fulfill a certain role. As such, they wil cater to different mission types. The highly mobile and damaging Volt is much better at sabotage missions, compared to the tanky, CC based Frost, who is much better at defending than attacking. This being said, through the mod system (Warframe's take on progression), there's no reason that Volt can't be defensive, and Frost the frontline attacker. Early on, it won't matter too much which frames come into a game, but down the road in the harder levels, teams must be equipped to handle the right kinds of scenarios and enemies, lest they face a constant uphill, and sometimes impossible, objective. Playing with others comes relatively easily in the game, through either simply setting the game mode to "online" which makes it public, or through asking around on the chat tab dedicated for such use. For the most part, the community in game is positive and helping towards its players, although there will always be the occaisional sour apple in the bunch. While there is an in-game comm system for voice chat in a squad, I have never been a big fan of it, opting instead for a thihrd party system due to voice clarity issues. Clans are a major part of the game, and have, over the past 5 patches, been steadily improving. These hubs serve not only just as a group of people, but also as a home zone, known as the dojo, where players can practice fighting each other, along with their freerunning skills, and can unlock advanced weapons/frames through clan research. This is also the place in which trade is conducted. Trading is still in its infancy for Warframe. having been released only a couple major updates ago, the only items that can be traded currently are mods, keys (which are used for higher-difficulty content), and platinum (the microtransaction currency). Sound Design: The weapons and frames all sound very nice, with a very mechanical gun sound on bullets, with some cool sci-fi sounds on the energy weapons. Bows have a unique sound to them, both realistic, yet futuristic. The game has very little in the way of a soundtrack, relying more on drum rolls, and simple beat patterns. There are a couple points in the game that have music, but there are only a couple tracks. I would really like to see this part of the game grow, as music is a huge part in the sell factor of a game, and adds much needed depth to the missions and main screens. Player vs. Player This is still a relatively new facet of gaming for Warframe. The vast majority of gameplay centers around Co-Op, but there are currently two modes of PvP in the game. The first, and most accessible mode is known as Conclave. This features a map with obstacles and wall strewn about and is a 2v2 deathmatch. As frames and weapons are ranked up and modded out, they gain more conclave rating points. The sum of your frame and weapons' ratings creating your total conclave rating. When searching for opposing players, you will compete in a conclave tier with your rating or higher, to ensure that newer players won't be completely facerolled. The second mode is known as dueling. This is a 1v1 cage match that is found in clan dojos and is used more for practice than actual combat, although some clans like to use this as a method of judging ranks for players in their clans. Conclave, being the main PvP mode, is what I use for my overall PvP experience here in the review. Overall, I found this game type to be very fun, and exhilirating, offering continually refreshing matches. Closing Thoughts: Warframe is a solid and enjoyable game that doesn't require much money at all (there is no pay-to-win content). Money definitely is a convenience, especially when starting out, but as a player progresses, new items are easier to unlock and put less burden for money. It should be noted that a player can only store 2 warframes and 8 weapons without paying platinum for extra slots, but platinum can be earned in game by trading upgraded or rare mods to other players who want them. Platinum itself is relatively cheap, requiring a modest amount of money that is often up for discount simply by logging into the game. Getting 20% coupons are really common, with 50% and 75% coupons less so, but still present. DE puts out an enormous amount of content for this game, with a new weapon or two coming out every couple weeks, and a new frame every month or two, along with harder to find prime variants that have boosted stats (these are more for bragging rights and late/end game than anything else). They are taking this game on the right track and it continues to grow and evolve with a company that takes careful feedback from its player base. Early game play can get repetitive, but trust me when I say that sticking through the early grind blossoms into a fantastic mid to late game, and more content being released all the time. Players that have questions will find that getting answers is really easy, as the community is easy to talk to, and the game has a rich wiki (warframe.wikia.com) that has a crew that works all the time to keep it up to date with a rapidly evolving game. Overall score (as of Update 12.0.1): 8.5/10 +Stunning visuals +refreshing take on shooters +unique progression system/specializations +amazing community +amazing dev team -almost non-existent soundtrack -early game can get quite repetitive -lore needs more development (this is becoming less of an issue with each successive patch)
CROSS-COUNTAH;-;It's like Halo with good things.
#stalinlife;-;this game made me stab my eyeballs out and then shove them down my throat as i slowly tore my limbs off and stored them inside of my ribcage
Vaxi Yoko;-;What is Warframe?... Well, to put it bluntly? It's a game about Space Ninjas...That's really it. A bunch of traumatized space ninjas were forcibly put in some other dimension which is about as close to hell as reality gets. Most of them died, and those who didn't, became some of the most twisted, dangerous creatures ever made. To contain their power, and their deformed bodies, they're encased in War Frames, which also help boost their powers. ...So...Super Hero space ninjas...That's Warframe. The silly concept aside, the game is actually pretty good! I cannot imagine starting this game completely on my own. The learning curve is pretty darned steep, and I luckily had an experienced player(Cronxyx) help me out, and get started! Now, in terms of graphics, and computer stress, this game does require a lot of it. Even at half resolution, my computer's not too happy about it, and I'm playing on the lowest possible settings. If you have an under-par computer which has trouble running games like CS:GO? I'd not bother with this one, it'll be unplayable for you. In terms of controls, and mechanics, the game 'can' be fun, but also very, very annoying, and it'll most likely make your wrists hurt if you don't sit 'just' right. This applies mostly to melee combat though, which is my chosen favorite(Why make a game about space ninjas if they can just pull out a space rifle and shoot things!? I have a samurai sword that sparks lightning at my hip, DAMNED RIGHT I'LL USE IT!!!) For example, when going into melee mode, your left mouse button is no longer attack, but is held down to provide an energy draining power boost to your swings, increasing damage(And making you look SUPER cool! Glowy and stuff!), while the E key becomes the new attack button. Meanwhile, Stamina and fatigue is incredibly scarce in this game granted how much movement you need to be doing, thus many people have taken to the art of floor skating...you sprint by holding down shift, and in order to slide along the floor doing sparks and stuff, you have to hold down Ctrl at the same time, and for an added boost, you push E, to make a forward dash slice attack to cover even more ground...If done right, you can cross an entire map instantly(And probably kill yourself as you fall into a pit) When you do this over and over and over and over, for hours, you'll find your left wrist is burning and slightly swollen, so my advice is to 'tilt' your keyboard slightly to the left, since the arrow keys are useless here. You'll only be using the left side of your keyboard, and your mouse. However, despite the hand breaking controls, the demanding graphics, and the kinda silly concept(SPACE NINJAS! HUA! HIAH!!!), the game is 'tremendously' fun, and quite addicting. The satisfying hack and slash and realistic ragdolling and the steep learning curve makes becoming good at this game a legitimate achievement...I mean...I'm still rank 0 and I've failed my rank-up test 3 times now!(PS: Once you get ready to take the test, make sure you are in the right Warframe...Once you have the option to take the test, if you click no? It'll give you the cooldown anyway :\ ) These 'rank up tests' can only be attempted once a day(24 hours), so best be prepared before doing them! My advice? Considering this game's free? Yes, I'd definitely give it a try. I've played it for 2 days, and am quite hooked. (Thanks to Cronxyx for introducing me to this game. You're the best horsie a kitty could ask for <3 )
Legacy;-;Space ninjas, in space. Blast away space marines, space jump suit guys, and infested aliens. Grind up your weapons and warframes, and have jolly cooperation.
Coffee;-;Warframe is like going through a Favela. Every level is the same , but with more people. 10/5
Bailzerz111;-;Grinded more than a South american hooker and still havent got enough shark heads. 8/8 M8-IGN
(Cam'aQ)Ace Azarias;-;goodgame lots of fun
D34TH11;-;Badass space ninjas with guns
1-800-LICHDOM;-;PROS: be a lumpy parkour cyborg for hundreds of hours, spend real money on color swatches, fight the same three enemy types forever, grind credits, grind crafting materials, grind blueprints, grind weapon pieces, grind warframe pieces, grind credits again CONS: ????? ? ? ?
AnaLoGMunKy;-;To play for free, you need to grind like a boss.  that. Awesome game tho.
BurnBabyBurn;-;I managed to get my whole team killed because I was scanning barrels instead of helping. ing amazing/10
Jihaadi*;-;Well I guess its one of the best Co-op games out there!!
SaturnStasis;-;I have been playing this game since the begining and this game is fantastic. Visuals are spectactular, animations simply beautiful. With the game ever so changing as time goes on, you have can witness its developement. With the game focusing on the mainly PvE aspect this is a great game to play with your friends. Up to 4 player Co-op in an intense 3rd person PvE action game. And its all free!
NightmareAI;-;As a veteran with 1100 hours of playing this game, I simply don't recommend this. This is nothing but a grindfest and the devs have repeatedly acknowledged about this but nothing has changed to lessen the grind. Every time they say that they are working on reducing grind, they put in another grindwall which always bigger than the previous one. Here is a quote from a veteran who had already quited the game just like me: "I fully regret spending $250+ on this game. I fully regret providing you feedback. I fully regret sinking 500+ hours into this mess of a game. But, most of all, I regret telling myself that it'll get better. I've had enough. Time for me to move on to better games. Games with a dev team willing to provide updates that are fulfilling. Games with a direction. Games with a clear vision."
Get In The Van;-;Pro tip from someone that plays these game for a year.. USE THE LIFE SUPPORT WHEN IT'S LOWER 30%.. Thank you new players
Wintermute;-;One of the better free to play games. Recommend it to people who liked Diablo or Borderlands.
Psycho;-;my personal favorite and its free!
Rafe;-;RUBBISH GAME ! Warframe should pay me to play this nonsense ! DONT ACCEPT INVITES TO PLAY THIS GAME ! they trying to get free stuff from recruiting you !
Cheeki Breeki;-;This game is basically about grinding for new ''cool'' stuff. There is not much motivation to make you complete missions other than to level up, and grind your gears. The events are pretty fun, since then there is stuff to do, like... a quest or a good mission. Other than that, this game falls flat. Not because of the bugs or glitches, but because of the lack of entertaintment, unless you liek grinding alot for stuff and look cool.
NEON-POTATO;-;the best thing since sliced bread... BECAUSE NOW YOU CAN FREAKIN SLICE THE LOAF INTO TINY LITTLE BITE SIZE PIECES WITH YOUR MAGICAL ENERGY KATANA YYYYYYYYYEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Lord Ryan;-;I gotta say when i saw this game, at first i was hesitant. But now that i have tried it out, oh my god i was missing out. This game is really fun. But to me, its one of those games that is fun in short sessions. Playing this too long will make this get boring really quick. But in short sessions with friends is alot of fun especially with thor :3 I am a noob at this game for now. But i will get better :3 10/10
Psycho29388;-;The Update 6 and 7 era is when I played this the most. I loved playing every minute of that era. Now though, with all the new stuff they added and various things, such as the UI, mechanics, and sounds being replaced/edited, It's not the same. I may have stopped playing because of what they did to it, but if you haven't played it before there is a slight possibility you might enjoy it.
Kill-Cam Celebrity;-;I once was a Loki warframe. I had come in on Mercury, fighting across the planet and completing various assignments. Then one day, I killed Captain Vor. I was so excited to get some new loot. I moved on to Venus, and killed the Jackal. One day, I made it to a Defense mission. I cleared through the Corpus with ease, slicing them down with my Lv 18 Skana. I got to Wave 10, and was offered a mod... then I realized I could keep fighting, to earn even better mods along with the North Wind for my sword! I kept fighting, but they overtook me and killed the Tenno inside the cryopod on Wave 14. They took away all the mods they were going to give me. I got nothing for my hard work trying to protect the cryo pod. I cried for hours. I sat next to my navigation console, praying to the Lotus that I could get the mods back. Then the lights flickered, and the Stalker jumped through my ship's window. He said to me, "Your actions have consequences," and then tackled me. When I woke up, I was completely naked, but I had the north wind mod and a new pair of Dual Heat Swords. I smiled at him, and he winked back and jumped through the window. Stalker is love, Stalker is life.
fifth 'hangover' july;-;i can't really get into this because all of my friends have good
Hala;-;With a combat system a blend of Mass Effect and Resistance and graphics a generation ahead of most other free to play titles, you'd expect this game to be good. And yes, for a free to play game, it is. But it's not as good as the games it steals, sometimes shamelessly, from. It's everywhere in the game, from the sliver of a storyline that exists, to the weapons, to the combat mechanics. It's unoriginal and not as good as the sources Warframe takes 'inspiration' from. Now I'm all for taking a great concept from another game and making it even better, but it's never been better. The combat system is directly comparative to Mass Effect, and while Warframe has tried to move away from it, even the UI used to be a dead steal from Mass Effect. But again, not as good. Excellent for a free title perhaps, but the developer of Warframe does not exactly lack the funding to make original content. And that's my main issue with Warframe; They can't. It's like making a WW2 game called "Medal of Duty" or "Call of Honor" and branding it as something unique. When Digital Entertainment, the developer, release a patch, it tends to break the game. After 2  years and 15 major updates (although an inspiring amount) you would think they would be able to at least check their own code before unleashing it on the main audience, but something always breaks. Usually in spectacular ways. A patch goes live to re-balance a warframe (class) and it breaks the matchmaking system, sending you into a singleplayer game and the online chat into a singleplayer experience as well. How or why the coding for a warframe has anything to do with the ingame chat system, nobody knows. Rebalancing the game usually goes the same way as patches. Usually it fails and often in spectacular ways, no matter if it's your class, your weapons or the enemies you use them on. Of course there is a forum for suggestions, but unless complaints are voiced in the hundreds or more, it goes largely ignored. But I digress. Warframe is at its core a good game. An original idea it never was, and don't let anyone fool you there, but a good game. Especially for a free to play title. It does have a healthy view of what an ingame cash-shop should be like, and you never need to look at it to enjoy any aspect of the game. Sadly it is managed by a team of people who does not understand coding or game designing properly to maintain their original vision of what Warframe should have been. There are flaws in this game that have been flaws since Warframe went live but that have never been solved, to the point where one might wonder if they lost the original sourcecode somewhere along the way. Play this on a casual level if you are into free to play titles, but don't waste your money on it. From a design point of view Warframe was always a mess and 15 updates later it is only worse than where it started.
<> Stillen;-;Great game period. Just a warning.....It can be very addictive, IF you don't like that don't install this f***ing game. But if you do go INSTALL IT! xD
Torrasket;-;It's just a grindfest with repetitive missions. They have literally the worst experience for new players, you literally have no idea of what to do, but yes, they explain controls because that's what the people never gets  . Also the devs are no longer doing the things right, every update gets people to rage and stop playing the game. Don't be fooled by the reputation the game got in the past, it's pay2play since you need loads of slots to properly play the game. If you try to grid your way up you'll need at least 60 h of gameplay to already start playing the things that are worth farming. The game it's repetitive with only like 6 types of missions, and it gets worse later on (void). The frames can be fun sometimes but there are only 5 types: useless trash, fast ones (volt), mages (ember, nova), tanks (trinity-godmode, rhino) and nekros (also called the loot bot because you live to spam 3). So yeah, repetitive gameplay. Conclussion: play this if you can't afford to buy a game AND you are REALLY bored. Otherwise skip.
Frainbreze;-;dis game DIS GAME! make u like pokemon trainer, catch those all weapon/warframe try them 1 by 1, leveling them, make them love sometime u dont have slot for them u sell the part of ur prime for them, that how u love them! new pokemon come every update, u tired catch them all but that ur hobby, UR LIKE! u cant leave this game, u cant gud luck m8 dont forget "CATCH'EM ALL!!"
[Spom] ANTI-TENTACLE BOSS;-;Are you the type of guy that likes to sit on a chair and just stare at your computer screen while you just endlessly grind to only get a  wep that doesn't even get buffed despite how hype it looks in the end? WELL THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU!!! If you are that type of chum who can't be bothered to grind endlessly, well this game has that covered. If you steal your mother's credit card you can buy a fortune of in-game currency which can be used on useless accessories and weapons that will only get nerfed or ignored later on, with this current deal you can also get this PREMIUM ITEMS like that #MLG420SMOKEWEEDEVERYDAYSOMAPRIME and African lady Prime. Also do go to the forums if you like to talk to people that like to spam the word "#PL0XBUFFSOMAANDSOMAPRIMESGEGRTGREG" Alright time to be serious. Don't play this game, the community on the forums are fairly crap, you get to the point where everything gets extremely boring. I took a haitus from it one time and only came back to find the soma to be primed and Nova. The 2 things I actually do hate, they are fairly bland and generic for a game of Hand-laz0rs. Also don't buy plat and if you do buy it, just make sure you use it wisely. But despite if you do read all this and do continue to play it, I don't mind if you do, just keep in mind about the community on the forums and keep an eye out for anymore shifty  from the Devs. *Update post* Well I ain't touching this god awful game ever ing again, after the devs released the ing Soma Weapon set I'm ing done with such a  community and dev team. Think something better than simple "HURR DURR WEPS THAT SHOT NORMAL BULLETS PEW PEW!" DE is literally scooping  from the bottom of the septic tank at weapon ideas and ideas in general.
Sanjuaro;-;I've put so many hours into Warframe, waiting for it to realize it's full potential, but it just never happened. The developers seem so out of touch with what makes their game fun, and don't seem to listen to their community at all. This is depressing.
AxisGuren;-;Love this game :)
BlanC;-;Can't play this game alone.... Feels awesome to become stronger and look back and see how weak u were. Join the teeno! :D
The Wonderful Wizard of AZ;-;This game is fantastic, the devs are extremely active in the community, there is a massive variation in weapons and warframes (characters). The levels are randomly generated with premade tile sets, so levels are hardly ever the same. The only thing i have against the game is the fact that it is a grinding game. Although honestly it's not to much of an issue. The gameplay is smooth and satisfying. The best part is that this game is still in Beta, so it can only get better. Warframe doesn't deserve a 67/100 from metascore.
Monstercade;-;97/100 + Pretty good controls once you get the hang of them. + Very unique abilities for each frame. + Many strategies are usually viable for every encounter. + Frame balance has improved a bit since my last review. + Good F2P system - everything can be obtained, somehow, for free(minus a few cosmetic things). + Unique, diverse enemies, especially the bosses. + Generous difficulty curve. + Very fast gameplay that adequately punishes for inattentiveness. + Receiving constant updates, frequent events and timely developer responses. + Gmod ragdoll physics. + Story and lore content actually exist now, and it's constantly evolving with every update. + Voiceacting is pretty alright. + The music is great. + Astronomical replayability. + Nifty weapon-modding system that actually does allow for a significant degree of customization. ~ The Archwing "space combat sans spacecraft" crap is incredibly disappointing. ~ PvP is b r o k e n. It does exist, though, in case you want to rally some friends and ban the ridiculous weapons. ~ Fairly smart AI... for a multiplayer game. ~ Extremely expensive paid content. ~ Long "crafting" times for items, but you can "rush" them for premium currency. ~ Grinding is a mildly significant part of the game. ~ Hosted client-locally, rarely leading to nasty lag. This also means it will hose your connection if you are the host and you have a terrible ISP. ~ Severe Chronic Power Creep is a recurring theme. ~ No official soundtrack available for purchase... - STILL very buggy. Most bugs don't last too terribly long, but they introduce new ones pretty regularly. - The code that handles the intial connecting to other players is horrible. - Poor weapon balance. - QA basically skips over the text.
Pocketstash;-;This game just keeps getting better. Sometimes you need to farm for resources but even farming is fun! So many classes and weapons I don't know what to do with myself. I totally reccomend this game and can't say enough good about it. It's better then pizza (and pizza is amazing). This game has so many hours worth of gameplay to it and yet it's FREE. My life is so simple and happy now that I have Warframe. :D
Kerguhl The Bulwark of Azzinoth;-;It's a really good game to play with friends. As well with strangers but there lacks a lot of fun. Only downside of the game is that it kinda feels repeatable in way your mission don't really change that much it's straight up go in kill/collect/protect that and that's it.
WhiteRaven;-;Don't read the reviews,play it!
Alex;-;Fun, Co-op game with a nice novelty to keep you comming back (crafting, build times, updates, etc.). Unfortunately the novelty wears off and the game becomes pretty cut and dry.
Bagel;-;I got the game in july 2014, i've had steam since january 2014. Between getting this game and now, i now have more hours in warframe than all my other games combined in the last year. This game has taken the throne of my favorite game ever. Something about it keeps me from burning out on it, but then again, minecraft did that for a while to, and i haven't played it in months, so i may burn out on it, but i don't see it happening in the near future. The game is free to play, and when people hear or see a free to play game they are afraid of it because of pay to win games. The great thing about this game is, some of the best weapons in the game, are only achievable through gameplay alone, while still giving people good incentive to pay. The game Looks and, although it took me a while to get used to, controls great. My computer, not the beefiest in the world, and warframe can still keep a good fps, maybe some lag if alot of things are happening, or i have a bunch of other programs running in the background, but overall, lag free on my average powered computer (I5). another thing that could draw people in is the mostly co-op multiplayer... when i first ran TF2, I got killed over and over by people much much better than me. warframe is a mainly coop multiplayer, meaning, that if a n00b, you may feel like a noob when you see your scores compared to others, but, don't have to worry about the same things as in competitive games... and if you like, there are still conflicts and dueling arenas where pvp is possible. The amount of content is amazing, how this game runs on my computer is amazing, and the awesome devs keep adding more, and keep the community somewhat hyped for new content with livestreams and feeds. I've played 322 hours of this game, and i am still learning more and more. The community is great, I probably wouldn't still be playing if i hadn't played woth or met people that were nice, and helped me get better at the game. all sorts of guides and hepful content exist for this game. Alot of my friends have burned out on this game but, me and one other continue to play it more and more. i believe this is just how you plaw games. One friend of mine plays games as though he is a game reviewer, plays about 5-10 hours, then gets a new game, he spent about 150 in warframe and stopped. I on the other hand, could never do that, if the game allows i can spend months (nearly two years in the case of SSBB) practically only playing one game and not having an urge to play any others. the same happened with awesomenauts, minecraft,TF2, and Other console games. That got a bit rambly, but, how long you remain playing this depends on you, but it is definetly worth picking up and playing atleast 10 hours...
SaLtyDoNe;-;Great Game is EPIC WORTH IT!!!!!!!!!
HouseofBurritos;-;Motherlovin Space Ninjas. If you turn this game off, for even 10 minutes, you WILL miss Rare Cards, updates, new frames, potatoes, and Megans' gigglebox. I apologize for my low playtime, but my GF threatened to kill me if I got to 600 hours. Would play 600 hours again!
Eskimo;-;this game is nice
Hip-Dog-Kill-You;-;This game is fantastic, the graphics are pretty good and the gameplay is good too, full of energy...AND IT'S FREE TO PLAY
[GTID:S.G]Darius;-;this is truly a great online space game I played so far so if you want to slide and kill this is the game for you. I surely thank steam for this game
Mr.Holyroller;-;If you enjoy PvE team games, this is a great one. "What is it like?" is a hard question to answer; its filled with so many different things in the best way possible.
tricky trickster;-;Best hack and slash plus the gunslinger mode.. Best game ever!!!
Pelagial;-;Amazing fast paced action!
KnightKing #KennyIV;-;Funny game, but so much better on Xbox One !
ZMBIE4LIFE;-;This game is amazing~ You should play it. You need to play it. Katanas in spaaaaace with guns and bows awe yiss.
NoSkillzJustPoop;-;Nice game!!
Unknown Unit;-;you get to be a freaking SPACE NINJA
Einzelganger;-;One of the best games I've played in awhile. Very immersive, fast paced sci fi action and KUBROWS! Lots of weapons to choose from, I've looged almost 400 hours into this game and it nevers gets boring. A must play for anyone who likes sci fi shooters mixed with parkour and a large universe to explore.
Magnaomega;-;Beauty and awesome 3D models. A lot of weapons and fun missions. It's so amazing to be as a Space Samurai ninja with machine guns!
shadowkill122;-;i reccomand this game.Its super cool :D
Brian Evol;-;The Metacritic score is way off. Warframe is a great game. Nearly everything in the cash shop can be acquired by simply playing the game. It's a satisfying romp that feels like a mash up of Devil May Cry/Gears of War gameplay with Halo/Mass Effect themes in small parties like Borderlands/Left 4 Dead. Very enjoyable, though the first 10 hours or so may feel a bit slow. Crafting your second Warframe is when the game really opens up.
Chiknuget;-;Warframe is a great game. Playing it by myself for a while made it seem horrible, but then I started playing with friends from school. It became one of the most played games in my library. It's a perfect game to nerd out with. This needs more than an hour to get used to and to start having a lot of fun (Unless you're lucky and someone gives you a ton of gear. It is a definitely a game you have to play over a long period. It may take a while getting used to the odd playstyle.(I just wish there was a bit more lore in the game!). This game is absolutely not Pay to Win, but it is pay to look good. Nearly every weapon that can be bought with platinum has a blueprint version that can be bought with credits. I myself enjoy collecting resources and building the blueprints more anyway. Again, great game 9/10
Ensiferum _;-;Great F2P game with high quality realisation on most aspects. It can get you hooked to it for hours and you'll find new things to do for a good while. One of the few game where grinding here and there isn't a drag. Also (and maybe I should have started with that) it's a game about Space Ninja Wizards with guns. And you play the Space Ninja Wizards.
Qfux;-;17 hours in and I am not even level 2. The grind is hella real in this game but idk, some people like that or maybe I just suck. Anyways, this game is such a cluster . You got some robot  looking protagonists fighting a bunch of stuff and you get a samurai jack blade and the parkour skills of a 13 year old british boy, and you are suppose to just go out it. I also got butt  over and over when I tried to go to the harder levels. I like it a ton ;)) 10/13
Rezri;-;Qualifications for epic game: Space? Check. Ninjas? Check. Ninjas in Space? Check.
Derw;-;Grind?, nah more like. well, grinding i suppose. but never mind that. it's addicting as popping the bubble rap you get your hard ware in. 12/10 would pop that bubble rap again.
Mo'ohrgan;-;WarFrame is a lot of fun whether you like to play Solo or Co-op. It's a Freemium game, so if you don't want to drop some dough on cold, hard Platinum (Paid currency) you will be grinding like crazy. Everything functional can be researched/built/found/won/etc. whereas aesthetics are all Plat-purchased. Game looks great, plays great and is constantly receiving updates and new events happen regularly. Get it, play it. What do you have to lose aside from some time you would have otherwise wasted anyways?
Lutanist of Limbo;-;because space ninjas
Lance;-;The gameplay would be better if it wasn't so good. As for the story? HAH! GAAAAAAAAAAAAY! You know what would make this game better? The possibility of playing it while sleeping. At least we can have dreams...
CadaverDoctor;-;This is just like an anime. A really neato anime.
Alcapwn;-;YOU'RE LIKE A NINJA IN SPACE AND  AND YOU CAN HAVE DUAL WIELDING PISTOLS OR YOU CAN HAVE CYBER SWORDS AND  AND WHEN THE GUYS SHOOT AT YOU THEY'RE LIKE PEW PEW PEW AND WHEN YOU GOT YER SWORD OUT YOU BLOCK IT LIKE A ING JEDI AND YOU'RE LIKE ' YEAH 'MERICA' AND THEN YOU RUN SUPER FAST AND JUMP KICK EM IN THE FACE OR DO A RUNNING-SPLIP-N-SLIDE WHIRLIND SWORD THING AND CHOP THEIR IN KNEECAPS OFF AND WHEN YOU'RE ALL SORROUNDED AND  YOU JUST PRESS 4 AND THEN EVERYTHING AROUND YOU DIES AND YOU'RE LIKE ' YEAH 'MERICA' Pros: + ninjas + in space + dual wielding pistols + running slip-n-slide sword whirlind + psychic ninja powers Cons: - actually made by Canadians 1/0
Epicredeemer;-;WArframe is an excellent game, with a lot of variety and great graphics. I think it could use some more mods, like one to increase clip size, and a few of the enemies could use a nerf, but all in all Warframe is a lot of fun to play, either alone or with friends.
Mattpai;-;Awsome game with lots of content.
vanillaheaven;-;Love this game.
BOSSnian Eagle;-;Warframe is one great third person game.The game has a great variety of weapons i compare the game to like Saints Row.Its a fun multiplayer game to play with youre friends,the game it self has some glitches but that doesnt stop the gameplay.The creators did a great job making the game and i give the game a 9/10 the game has some glitches and thats why i give it this verdic.And i also highly recomend the game its a fun multiplayer game.
Mr.MuscleMaster;-;dont know why i held off on playing this for so long but OMG!! THIS GAME IS AMAZING!! fun to solo and even better with friends. NOT A PAY TO WIN due to the fact its mostly all PVE and you can grind everything with ALOT and i say ALOT of patience. Other than that this game is a blast and i highly recommend it if you like fun games
Shell Deluxe;-;First i hated this game. But once one begins to progress. You find the gameplay pacing something similar to Goldeneye 64. And Goldeneye 64 is a pretty fantastic game if you ask me.
The DarkSwarm;-;Warframe Ninjas play free Warframe, a free to play game with allot of potential of becoming a one of a kind. It is a good looking co-op ment to be game with a high chance of addiction if u want it all. Even though most loot is available without pay, it's a hell allot of time consuming and there for in my opinion a little nearing the pay to play side. Never the less i can honestly say with more than 400 hours of playing Warframe i'm a fan. I like the community of players in game and Warframe has one of the best written Wiki a game can have if not the best, and the dedicated developers who are always working 100% bringing new stuff on a regular base for all players on PC or Console. Get ready Tenno!
Jack Smilyan;-;This game is actually developed by Grinding Gear Games
[TD] Daz;-;It's a mix of Diablo, Mass Effect & Borderlands. Endlessly replayable randomly generated maps you can run, dive and shoot all over for hours :) Been having a blast with this title!
Gamerguypie;-;This game is epic. I highly recommend this game to all.
Nicke!;-;The most awesome game made, my favorite in every aspect! Excelent gamemechanics, beautiful graphics, speed, tactics, carnage, such a good blend of it all. Bringing the future ninja, tipping on the balance between rageing hack and slash and stealthy tactical fps. Great support, awesome community, great coop gameplay (basically on all the time), fantastic customization, intriguing story line. Just saying, TRY IT! If u like it, u will LOVE it the further u go. One of my favorite games of all time!
Nano_Zac;-;This Is A really EPIC Game!!!!
paintitblacklulcakes;-;I have to say, this game is amazing. It's primarily free, but its so good it makes me want to buy one of the packs (which i will be). The gameplay is fun, customization makes combat unique and advancing. Tzhe game constantly provides a challenging experience and the visuals are great If Mass Effect and Metal Gear made love and had a child, Warframe would be that child.
Klumz;-;This is basically a mix of third-person action, ninjas, parkour, advanced tech and awesomeness. Highly recommended!
Rhythm;-;This game has a bit of a grind, other than that its pretty good.
Wordsmith;-;Cut a man with a mushroom-shaped head in half. 11/10
[ILJ] Mr. Crafty;-;AWESOME GAME. FUN FOR THE WHOLE FAMILY :D
The Wandering Nomad;-;Good game. A little light on story for my taste, but that's personal opinion. Fun to play, the fact that maps change every mission is neat, and customization is varied and interesting. Overall; Definitely worth playing.
Gravedigger Tullius;-;I give this game a Ten(no)!
Fawksman;-;Holy  dude. TWO WORDS. SPACE. NINJAS. YEAH DUDE, SPACE NINJAS. FAST ACTION, MASSIVE AMOUNTS OF CUSTOMIZATION, ITS A GOOD GAME. GO GET IT AND HIT ME UP. I'LL BOOST THE  OUT OF YOU.
Femrito | trade.tf;-;Warframe while not being the best f2p games I have played is defiantly one of the better ones. While it is true that you spend alot of time grinding, and that the silver(ingame currency paid with real money) is oddly expensive those do not take away the fun of the game.
NeneroG [VAC];-;Warframe is a cooperative Free-to-Play third person online action game set in an evolving sci-fi world and is currently in open beta. Join your friends in player-vs-enemy raids across the solar system and master the power of the Warframes. Stand alone or fight together against enemies that threaten your world. They were called Tenno.
Teh Dork Knight;-;Holy crap, 5 minutes, 5 minutes into a mission was all I needed to know that I would love this game until the bitter end (Or my ADD kicked in). Wonderful 3rd person gameplay, intensely stylized graphics, and a rewarding and satisfying free-2-play experience. So very often it seems that F2P means Pay-to-Win, but not with this gem. Nope, warframe will never beg a dime from you, and you can live a very happy existence keeping it as free as the breeze. You certainly can spend your monies on this game and buy DLC till you're opening up a second mortgage. but the beauty to this beast is that you get a quality, fun experience, without ever feeling like you HAVE to open up your wallet. You do however owe something, you owe yourself at least one playthrough, I bet you won't entirely hate it. DISCLAIMER: you may need a system that can handle all it's bells and whistles.
Pink;-;<UPDATED REVIEW> >Gets New PC >Plays It >Game Looks Beautiful OK INSTEAD MLG/10 GAME REKT THEM ALL
ripclaw;-;Even after 200+ hours played I still can't wait to try out the next new thing, another warframe or a new weapon. Each one feels sufficiently unique to keep the game fresh, even after playing a lotl The thing people criticize is the farming, and I absolutely agree. I have neither the patience nor ambition to grind my way to whatever goal there is. Which is why I spent actual money on platinum, and I don't regret it one bit. Yes, you can play and achieve almost everything in the game without spending a penny. And some people wear the fact that they never payed as a badge of honour. Personally, I think that if a game gave me literally hundreds of hours of entertainment, spending an amount that equates to the price of a regular game on this game is more than fair. The developers need to live as well, and in Warframe they struck a good balance so that you never really feel pressured to buy platinum if you don't want to. Also, once you have a littel platinum ready, the trade system allows you to buy all kinds of stuff from other players for cheap, so if you are ok with spending a few bucks in total, you can get a good selection of mods and blueprints for very little money, saving you the trouble of grinding.
Zenitix;-;SPACE NINJAS, what els do you need to know.
Frank;-;TENNO SCOOOOOM
drem la ka;-;This is a Great Game for the Die-hard Ninja's that are out there slice and shoot em all
Space Gandalf;-;Life? whats that?
Rodimus Prime;-;This game is one of the best free to play games out there, especially with freinds :)
TheProphet;-;Its an overall good game, but the grinding in the game is just insane. its like Gaben just gave up on the game. Me: Oh allmighty lord Gaben, please give me a blessing Gaben: What kind of blessing? Me: i want that really cool sword Gaben: oh okay, it will take u.. about 132 hours of intense grinding! Me: But Gaben... Gaben: np, i know im to friendly, but u deserve it Me: but... Gaben: now go out and farm! Me: ok... 132 hours later. Me: were is my sword?
Wogboy the Brave;-;Amazing Game, You never run out of things to do.
Nekomaru;-;Warframe is love, Warframe is life. I am addicted. Halp.
Kaelywn;-;One of, if not, the best free to play games where the devs listen to the community and interact with them and cash shop is not game breaking. A game that gets constantly updated and improved. Space Ninjas Play Free
dr.ghostdad;-;had joy seizure while playing 10/10 would seizure again
Snagglepuss;-;Warframe is a fast paced 3rd person futuristic action game that will keep you glued to your computer screen.
Matthew1280;-;This game is the best , get in this game and master your Tenno.
Lawson the Jedi;-;Warframe, while still a bit grindy at times, is a fantastic coop shooter for anyone looking for over the top space-ninja action! The only FTP game I have ever bought cosmetics for, and as long as they are ones you really like, well worth the cost. UPCOMING FEATURE (As of June 2014): For those complaining of the lack of lore, the developers have recently shown off previews of quest missions and also have been adding more and more cohesively-connected story events. This game continues to escalate towards greatness! UPDATE (September 2014): This game is getting better every month, at this point it is really getting polish, less bugs overall, better events more often, cooler abilities, better balance, improved UI, amazing across the board! UPDATE (December 2014): There is now a much more solid story happening, the big event's outcomes are actually swayed by how well the playerbase performs, and we have space-mecha now. That is all.
[FAZE]Ex6tence;-;This game is awesome!I love it :3
Megawats777;-;This third person shooter regardless if it's free or not, is one of the best I have ever played for the following reasons. First, the pricing model is very fair as nearly everything can be obtained for free. The way it works is that as you go out in missions you will obtain resoruces which can be used for building items. Second, the devs are extremly dedicated to thier game. Warframe has gone along way since I played in August of 2013. There has been so many additions made such as the entire reworking of the melee system or being able to control portions of the solar system with your clan/aliance. Upcomming additions include new environments and a reputation system with other factions. Third, is the community of this game. This out of other online games has one of the best communities. Nearly everone is friendly and helpful. The two clans I have joined are laidback and fun. Almost everyone is willing to tag along with you on missions as everyone benefits in some way. Fourth, which is the most important is the core gameplay. What third person shooter allows you wallrun, slide shoot, and pull of destructive powers. The movement is at most part fluid and fast besides some of the parkour. The controls are easy to pick up but can be difficult to master as you can pull of complex moves with proper timing and button combinations. However in no way shape or form is this game tatical it more of a crazy action game that is very quick. This game can also get very difficult like you will be surrounded by over 2 dozen enemies and knocked down at the same time. It is better to tag along with a group but solo play is good if you are looking for a challenge just make sure your weapons are leveled up. Finally, is the overall presentation of the game. The art style is really good and some of the characters and weapons look really cool from an artistic perspective. On the technical side the game is mostly well optimised and at low settings which I am running at and even than it looks great. The use of motion blur has been improved a bit. An option for adaptive v-sync has helped in reducing the tearing and studering. However every game does have it's flaws and warframe is no exception. This game does have quite abit of bugs not bf4 bad but it does have it fair share of bugs. For instance sometimes the limbs of dead enemies would randomly stretch out for a few seconds. Sometimes the difficulty randomly spikes on certain missions. Finally, the game can be pretty unforgiving for new players as the game doesnt hold your hand after the short tutorial. On a side note this is for ps4 users only the updates come much later than the pc version which the devs should work out with sony. Also the game can be abit of a grind at times. Overall warframe is a great game and the fact it is this level of quality at open beta means that the game will get progressivly better as time goes on. Note this is my first review so feel free to give me feedback in the comments section but please keep it constructive and polite.
UnchainedDave;-;Really good game it reminds me of mass effect but warframe is on steriods HAHAHAHAHAHA
Lizzardtong [Ger];-;I enjoy Warframe, i already play it for 2 months and its still fun, while most level have the same look, the bulid of the map changes everytime (with that i mean that, while the same rooms appear, its always random wich room is behind the next door) despite what some people might say, warframe is NOT Pay2Win, the ONLY thing you get with platin (Real Money) is getting weapons & warframes (classes) faster, dekorations,more stuff to customize, and buying slots for more items, and even then, you can buy platin from other players if you have rare items (in most cases, Prime items from the void) as i said, you can get almost everything for free in terms of money, If you try to get Platinum for free prepare to invest alot of time. You want platinum but have no way of buying it OR want to trade with players? even THEN, you still have 2 ways of gaining it, are you creative? check the forums and see if a community event is running, the Winners (not just 1st place) gain some Platin, and the top 3 winner are, depending on the contest, either get thier idea, fanart, or voice added to the game, or are Presented in the Live-Stream you aren't very creative? well then watch the live stream, you can watch a video, right? because you can get 1000 Platinum (around 50 Bucks) just for watching the thier Twitch-stream, that is if you are one of the 3 lucky people (sometimes 4) who get choosen. but hey, free money! buliding weapons and stuff can take up from 12 to 24 hours, and buliding warframes can take up to 3 days. and while the game can get repetitive, the Devs are constantly adding new and fun stuff to the game and include Events where you can win Special weapons and items that you in most cases will only be able to get trough the event. you should give the game a try, it is at least for the first hours alot of fun. Also, The Dev's are F***ing Awesome!
siraniks;-;Been playing this since beta days and discovered it from Polycount forums when they'd announce their project and immediately download and play. If you like FAST PACED, SCIFI, NINJA then this is for you and I recommended it. WARNING: You will get addicted to it and it's a grindfest but not that too much grind like Korean MMOs, newbies can easily pick the gameplay and it has a new tutorial for newbies. They keep updating the game and add new warframe, maps, game modes and weapons. So you'll never be bored.
Monster M;-;the game is in awsome,simple as that!!
AHappySheep;-;What is... Warframe? Introduction Warframe is a free-to-play third person shooter, Sci-Fi game with some sort of an "alien" theme incorporated into it.This game has one of the best variety of content even in comparison to some other games (some that aren't even F2Ps). Well, what do i exactly mean by that?.. Let's find out. LIKES It has a large selection of 'Warframes' to choose from. 'Warframes' are exoskeleton suits that grants the user four different skills to choose from. Each Warframe has it's own unique abilities. However , don't let that fool you, as for the fact that the skill mechanics might seem a little similar. Skills are of course extremely satisfying to play around with. Unique & distinctive weapons options. With a huge arsenal at your disposal, the weapons in this game will definitely provide an endless amount of fun. The Movement mechanic in Warframe is also very special and distinctive. Any player is able to perform acrobatic feats, traveling from room to room in mere seconds. DISLIKES Unfortunately, the developers of Warframe seem to have quite some pricy microtransaction schemes in mind. Though some people might not agree that this is a "Pay To Win" title, an undeniable fact is that Warframe indirectly forces the player to purchase credits (or otherwise known as 'Platinum) in order to have a much enjoyable experience. Based on the fact that a player starts off with 2 Warframe Slots (Out of a total of 24 Warframes?) and a couple of weapon slots. Ridiculous weapon customization options. Weapons and Warframes in the game are enhanced in many different ways with the use of modification "cards", these cards take up "points" and the game only allows up to 60 points to be expendable on a single Warframe/Weapon. (Well, it'll be 30 if you don't have at least 20 Platinum) Missions in Warframes are reptitive and downright distasteful unfortunately. It's either going around killing everyone in the house, saving a hostage or defending a stationary "artifact". CONCLUSION All in all, Warframe is a great co-op game. It will be right up your alley if you are looking for a third person shooter, fast-paced and "adrenaline" style fun. However, if you don't like microtransactions (meaning that you don't wish to spend any money on digital in-game items) & repetitive content, then i'd suggest you steer clear away from this game & don't even think of touching it with a ten foot pole. VERDICT 7/10, a good CO-OP shooter that can be enjoyed by all. A cautious recommendation because of microtransaction features in it.
Witty Smitty;-;Depite this game being a little grindy and p2p if you are into these games it makes it super fun even if you are playing with friends. The thing that makes this game the best f2p shooter is the constsntly online, working devs. they are always giving things out to the public and having devstreams talking about the next updates. and they give this game a major update every month or so. If you are thinking about getting this game then get it you have nothing to lose. (apart from maybe the hours of grinding)
NorthStar;-;Quite possibly the best F2P game to date. There's always a goal within reach in this game, whether it be that next new weapon or warframe, or ranking up old favorites, or events that add cool new content. Sometimes those goals take awhile, but I can't really call it a grind. Is it really grinding if the gameplay is satisfyingly fun even without the reward at the end?
KoG Abyssal;-;Im a Space Ninja, with a shot gun, Dog and a deadly freesbe I can even turn into a Pirate Space Ninja that can summon pepto-bismol tentacles MotherF****ing 100/10
Cryaotic <%;-;Metal gear rising with multiplayer
Sarklor;-;Warframe is really freaking fun. Imagine a good 4-player co-op game like Left 4 Dead. Now make it 3rd person, and add in a whole load more weapons, from magnums to assault rifles to boomerangs with spikes. And give those weapons a levelling option so you can add in extra traits like elemental damage, increased ammor or fire rate, or scenery penetration. Then to finish off instead of redneck hicks or token female college students, make the player a magical cyberninja. In space. Gameplay is fast and slick, and your Warframe is very responsive. The core game is a huge amount of hacky-slashy fun, especially with friends. You can play solo and that's enjoyable enough now and then, but the game adds in more and tougher enemies the more players there are, much like Diablo 2 did. You can choose one of three Warframes at the beginning, but there are another ten to collect, which is mostly a matter of completing assassination missions that reward you with the requisite parts. You can spend real world money if you like, but it's genuinely fun to run the same mission a couple of times because the action is pretty intense, and the levels are randomly generated, so surprises do happen. Play Warframe, it's very enjoyable, and it's free. What more could you want?
shimrin;-;10/10 but why is my thing loading so long for meta update?
Darkcorrsovie;-;WHY NINJA NEEED ELE 999/1000
Blazing Protaganist;-;At many times will it be an absoulute grind-fest, but the community is far from toxic(I.E. Very helpful and positive) and the gameplay is very fun. Weapons range from Bows to Kunai to a Giant Greatsword.** 8/10**
G E T N O I D E D;-;best pay to win ever made, it gets really envolving afther you learn about the lore and it actually gets preety adicting. one bad thing about it it's that the multiplayer has WAY too much problems.... ing strict NAT but, if you solve that problem, you're really good to go
Osama Bin Liftin;-;This is a great game and its free. The only negative thing is that it can get a little bit repetitive and a bit glitchy. The thing i love about this game aswell is that you don't need a good connection to play it in co-op which is great for me. I would recommend playing co-op after the first few mssions as it gets pretty hard after that.
Lunatic Mouse;-;ONE OF THE MOST FUN AND ADDICTIVE GAMES EVER
Rex;-;Fun, fast, free. Great for playing half an hour per day. One-of-a-kind, beautiful character and level design.
Tom[MumsSpaghetti];-;After playing this game for a few hours now, I highly recommend you play it, hours of gameplay which I'm still farming for things, it's not P2W but in some aspects it is only having 2 warframe slots out of the 30. But still 10/10 from me.
Ragez;-;Played this in closed beta, thinking of coming back. The time I spend with this game was a good time, a really good time. Then the inventory system changed alot and I just couldn't understand it so I left. The combat is alot of fun and most of the time pretty easy. The best thing however are the Ninja Skills/Parkour Tricks you can pull of, like wall-running and at the same time shoot someone's head off. Pure awesomeness. I also like the small cinematic scenes at the beginning and the end of a mission :3
Hougan;-;Free to play, pretty interesting at the beginning... But requires a lot of grinding if you don't want to pay for it. I would recommend it - you can spend a couple of evening having fun, but don't expect staying there for too long.
Kirito-kun;-;the game its self is a fine game, to me the combat system is good and it runs smoothly. the only thing that gets me is that you need platinum to get pretty much everything, from wepons to other characters
Life Pilgrim;-;Try this game and stick with it for 1-2 weeks before deciding if you like the game. I really do like this game. The graphics are awesome. The gameplay fast, furious and wrapped in good artistic style (and the gore is.....jolly good). Highly recommended if you like co-op game and or action game. The only gripe is platinums are a bit overpriced though redeemingly you do not need themt to craft anything in game except to buy slots for your weapons and warframes(armored suits).
YourBestButtBuddy;-;Amazing game, tons of replay value, outstanding end game content. The game kinda lacks customization but the story makes up for it 100%
Owner of the worst stream;-;This game is about friendship, you play as a man in a suit made from materials and use your void powers to fight mutated space bunnies, people from Star Trek, and the zerg swarm. 10/10 You can get a bow and pin people to stuff.
Irish;-;The Best free to play on steam get it play it : ))
FrostyHobo47;-;may seem like its a pay to win game at first but when you start to play you relize its not its very good game
Fire Hoes;-;overall a great game. good character choice with plent of upgrades.
Duck__;-;ignore metacritic. this is a fun game if you dont mind a little bit of work to get into it.
Shremp;-;i stick potatoes on my guns
Ed Solo;-;Best free to play game in awhile. Most free to pay are freemium; wear cash can make overly powered. But this not the case with warframe. There is in store cash only items ,but most weapons and warframes can be got with simply time and effort. Combine with combat composed both mele and ranged it makes for a fairly enetetaining MMO
Deathrow;-;good game a bit slow in the lower levels but stick with it . and for all the new players out there i got one word for you "SOMA".
PsycoticHamster;-;Freaking awsome game. 10/10 will lose my life to this game.
Beat_By_A_TaLi;-;First off I would like to say that this game is super adictive and fun. Secondly if you do play this game or want to start playing the game I'd suggest you look at a few tips and tricks to increase your productivity ten fold. For starters I suggest you get Excalibur, because its the most balanced and easiest warframe to learn how to play. TOP TIP: You just have to get rhino, that warframe just wrecks everything in the way. Overall i do enjoy the game and i would highly recommend it to anyone that likes '3rd person shoot and kill everything in you way with 3 other friends' yeah.
Blazensei;-;Look, i'll be honest - at the start i had some doubt about this game. 'oh dude, a 3rd person shooter where you grind for stuff!' But hey, it was free, i had time. Never even looked back. Digital Extremes has crafted one of the best games i've ever played, and everything is free! Can you imagine, a F2P game that isn't P2W? Hard to, yes, but Warframe does it perfectly. Not only that, DE keeps on improving and supporting their game with help from player input. Oh, and did i mention the space ninjas? No? Well, go play Warframe and see em for yourself!
SkyZ;-;i love this it is one of my favorites at the moment
Etherock;-;Nothing like Warframe in the market. Its the best shooter for me. The co-op nature of the game keeps the community friendly and stress free. Keeps me coming back for more.
The Mexican Knight;-;I really enjoy this game, especially when it's played with friends. There is one thing i don't really enjoy, and that's the thousands of hours grinding for materials for a weapon\warframe. Most of the weapons are single blueprints and take about 12 hours to make, but each part of the warframe blueprint has a seperate blueprint. For eg.: Rhino consists of Rhino Helmet, Rhino Systems and Rhino Chassis. Every single part is a different blueprint and takes another 12 hours to make. If you can't afford to buy platinum, it usually takes about 10-15 days of grinding for the materials for every different blueprint. Doing the math, its 240 hours + 36 hours + the extra 72 hours to complete the warframe, it takes simply 348 hours (14 and a half days) to make a single warframe. But i still recommend the game, but if you don't spend a little money on buying platinum, you won't get very far very fast.
The Ricefields;-;It's a pretty fun game apart from the grinding, Everything is makeable with credits, and trading mods for plat is always a way to make some plat. I would rate it 8/10 l0l ya nan
ShaDoW oF DeCepTioN;-;Ok, so you are looking for a new game to play? Maybe you like League of Legends, Mass Effect, Hitman or Halo? Well, this one is not anything like one of these......it is all ! Combine any 3rd person shooter, MMORPG with Sci-Fi magic  you can imagine This is what you get: +Tons and tons of new weapons every patch +New Warframe (Character) in every second patch +New mission and rewards everyday +Alert missions every hour ( missions with rare gear ) +Tons of player ready to help newbies in-game +Huge Trade channels and web sites +And, the best free-to-play game there is........anywhere ! Perslonaly, i played it more than 400h in last year, and since the start, it has changed alot. Community has gone BOOOOM over the internet and .... well just look at all the artwork ! So what are you waiting for?
Xyder;-;Pure awesomeness!
[PG] Havenbrook;-;I quit playing this game back in early beta, it got very grindy. They have changed all of this. Fun game again, super easy to get into with friends, but deep and complicated towards the end, so you have something to work for and not get bored. Really fun co-op shooter and tons of stuff to keep you entertained and busy! :)
Kyzrath, The Bitcher;-;You play as a Space Ninja fighting genetically engineered power armoured warriors, robots and bioweapons in the grim, distant future. WarHammer 40k meets hack and slash ninjas. SO MUCH YES.
Geeske;-;Brilliant game to play with your mates, or in solo! Would reccommend this game to anyone who likes futuristic sword and gun games with a hint of puzzle solving! 10/10!
KelloPudgerro;-;One of the most free to play games with no real P2W, while u can buy every piece of equipment for real money, u can also find and craft them that doesnt take that long. game play smooth as butter as long as u have a good host or play solo , the weapons are varied and characters are mostly well balanced, there is no real pvp(there are duels in dojo's and 2v2s in conclaves that have a gearscore range but no rewards). While the game has a few bugs here and there its pretty damn polished for a beta. And it has bows. Bows are great! 9/10 needs more bows.
REDtheBEAST;-;if you like space+ shooting X Melee % killing allot = a really good game...i know that wasnt that great for recommending this game but you should at least try it.
Xenolva;-;This is the best free to play game ive ever played. it has huge updates almost every month and endless content to keep you entertained. it has great graphics, great gameplay, and great multiplayer it also runs good on any computer. i would buy this game if it where to cost money
Dr. Sparx;-;Overall for a new player this is a very good game, and i recommend getting it. In fact i'd recommend everyone at least tries it once, because it truly is different to any other game out today. Now i did greatly enjoy this game, i've donated quite alot of money during my time playing. However this game suffers what many games still do; Once you have everything you want, or are just satisfied with what you have, the only reason you play the game is to try look better than your peers. [Can also be explained in the endless cycle formula- Grind to get better weapons, to grind with those better weapons, to grind with those better weapons to get more weapons to grind with, to grind to get better weapons (loop here) = Insanity] It basically becomes a great big  contest between the pro's, including endless hours of grinding for weapons that 'the other players don't have' yet the weapon is most likely not even worth the grind. Yes I admit this game is still in developement, however I am just pre-warning, this game is yet to offer a great amount for the good/old players. As for actuall gameplay, i'd give it a 9/10. Fun Factor, 9/10, but decreases overtime. Unless you don't mind grinding. As an added bonus i'd like to praise the Technical Support team, they are the nicest and most helpful support i've ever encountered. <3 you warframe, even if you annoy me.
Le Italiano;-;I want this game to bear my children. It's very loving, gives me stuff for free and supplies me with happiness. Oh, and blood. And Ninja cyborg assassins. And does what I tell it to. What more could you want from a wif- I mean game? Did I mention it contains Ninja cyborg assassins? Because it does, and they're awesome. This game is easily a Tenno of ten.
ZeroNaiXVC;-;Quite the grind, but loads of fun through the end
eNvy #CD7Days;-;a really great third person shooter game.
goldfish;-;Addicting..
Timmaaayy;-;Praise The Lotus!!!
Adoan;-;Space ninja is the best ninja
Alka Seltzer;-;hack and slash and pew at it's best. AND ROBOT WIZARDS
nucleartesuji;-;ninjas in space with guns, not a great game to go super in depth or spend tons of time on, but definitely cool/fun to play with friends as a change of pace or chill out game.
Windyapples;-;Fast pased action game. With good gun play and magnificent melee.
SBCPTKillerDram;-;this game is pretty awsome pretty fast paced and lost of different game senerios to play. with recent updates it has gotten even better
TheLegendaryBurger;-;Don't get me wrong this game is a great f2p with friends and such. But if you are playing this game without microtransactions the game should be renamed Grinding and paywalls: The videogame
Momblano;-;All and All, great game. Cant say its perfect, but it will keep you occupied for a long time. The combat is fun, fast paced (even if some of the enemy mechanics are often a bit cheap) and feels rather rewarding at most times. There is a light grind wall, but all the objects in the game (other than cosmetics) can be obtained without any real money, so with a good time investment anything can be obtained. Even cash shop items. Highly recommend it as the game is constantly improoving and more content is added. Just a small advice, find someone else to play with as that will make the experience much better.
Obtenebris;-;Back in April 2013 when I first played this game upon initial open beta status, this game was absolute garbage. Environments were almost totally dark, textures were crap, AI and physics were VERY subpar, no minimap or objective markers and the list went on. However, it's now July and a friend got me to give the game another shot. There have been MASSIVE improvements and I really think they initially made it open beta too early. They've likely lost a lot of potential players due to bad reviews and bad experiences, but GIVE THIS GAME A SHOT. As long as you have friends to play with, this game will provide hours of group fun even when doing something as mundane as farming materials for crafting items. I think Warframe's devs have made a lot of improvements and more are coming. This game is gong to be around a long time. ADDITIONS 6/21/14: So the game has continually been updated, things like Damage 2.0, Melee 2.0, new weapons and warframes(characters). The game has some issues still and certain changes they've made recently that I don't care for. BUT, and this is a big but(haha), this game has something truly unique: Devs that for the most part listen to their players. Even if they don't actually make changes or additions suggested, they DO read them. When things have been added to the game the community hates, DE(Digital Extremes) will jump up to fix them. They understand we keep them going. They don't take us for granted. They're adding in new enemies and weapons that players have suggested and provided concept art for too. They're even adding in a new player experience in a couple of weeks with Update 14 along with an actual pet system. As in we get a space dog and have to actually take care of it. It's not just an extra piece of equipment, but a companion. All in all, while some mistakes get made or bugs happen, those're bound to happen. We still are lucky enough to have a developer that actually cares what its players think of their game.
BillaBong;-;Swoosh, pew pew pew, Boom! Blaargh! this  be awesome, SPACE NINJAS FOREVER!
|LZ| Franss the Reservoir Dog;-;Used Ash's bladestorm. My victim died before I touched him. Teleported inside a huge box and turned into a Box of doom. 10/10 would run out of oxygen again
The G-Gamer Guy;-;I think this game is good.
AntarcticMantis;-;Pure awesomeness, this is the most enjoyable game I've played because I always come back to it. I think it has to be the most beautiful freetoplay game at the moment and it probably will stll be so for a while...
Moostafa;-;Let me start off by saying this game is addicting!!!! It is not only an exemplary example of a third person action/shooter but of a game utilizing a F2P model!!! Digital Extremes has done a wonderful job, ensuring balance across the board, whether it's between the credits/platinum or between the weapons and Warframes themselves. In addition, they have written a narrative, that is dare I say it relatively fresh and original, while simultaneously tying in Dark Sector, for which this game is a spiritual successor to. I am genuinely excited to see where Warframe's story and Digital Extremes shall take fans of this game next!!!
Astronaut;-;Great graphics, awesome gameplay. A very enjoyable game which is easy to play.
Happy-Mile;-;This game is very worth a play. Not pay to win, which is a nice change for a free to play.
Chronicler;-;One of the best FTP games I've ever played!
Mr.War;-;Using a bow to reck waves and waves of enemy forces,there are not much game in which u have option of using a bow,"BOW ftw"
Huezee;-;A great third-person (Sci-Fi) shooter game. You can play stealthily or just run and gun. If you like shooting games with fast a flashy combat, then this game is for you and it's free so why not give it a try?
Liffaren;-;shot man was fun
Pink Kryptonite;-;I think I play this game too much. Other than the few bugs that obviously need work (the archwing missions mostly) and a few small things this game is amazing. You start out with one of three Warframes which are all great frames and you start playing through the game with a very helpful tutorial, ranking up pretty quickly. You have the option to purchase new frames and weapons with real money, but you really don't need to as all of the bosses drop parts to new frames and weapon blueprints drop like crazy. You have the option to build all of the warframes via blueprints purchased in the games market with game credits (not real money) and the original frames can be researched in the new Clan Dojo's that they introduced into the game. Join a clan or make your own (which is super easy) and decorate it like crazy with stuff that drops throughout the game. When I originally started playing this game it only had three maps and two bad guy races to fight against. They have since added MULTIPLE PLANETS with random and very different maps, a new faction of bad guys that are incredibly creepy, and you can join syndicates for added bonuses for your frames and be attacked during missions by rival syndicates and one creepy guy that's really upset that you keep killing bosses. Oh, and now they added pets that will fight at your side. Overall, this game is intense, beautiful, and best played with friends or random people on the internet.
courier;-;My jugment might be  but I do recomened playing with friends if you want to do muliplayer because they will listin to what you say and the game is kinda about stealth because stealth is the most fun you will have but that dosent mean the action is terrible its just youll have a better time hideing ( well for me anyways) the game is good and i havent went threw most of it but i still recmoned it becuase you can still play without spending a penny and have fun so i say play to your hearts cantent (and if im wrong and the game is actuly  and cheap then tell me im not the brightist when trying to state my opione on a game) click that download butten and have a blast
Gimpy Smurf;-;Space ninja combat! Best I've seen in a LONG time!
ceredamni;-;This a a grinding f2p not a p2w type. Lots of resources to make weapons needed. Only thing one would need to buy would be cosmetics, everything else is obtainable in-game! Some weapons that are among the best are clan-exclusive weapons; which are easy to obtain just go into the recruiting tab and ask for a clan. Best f2p model i have seen so far. Great graphics, 3rd person shooting/slashing and weekly updates that show that the developement team is passionate about this game and see it less as a money maker and more of a personal project. Develpers are active in the community always giving personal feedback to posts made at the warframe website. all in all a 8-9 out of 10
OrBb!TeR;-;one of the best game that i have played so far , it fun and never gets boring whit new stuf and missions to to .i only hate that it lags at the start of some missions but it can be tolerated.i give it a 9/10 .and recomend it to every one
iorek;-;Over 700 hours played uuuh.... guess I like it Best way I can describe this game is "Borderlands 2" mixed with "Hellgate london" In space, with Eve-Online Progression. 4 person Co-op "over the shoulder" shooter, with Ninja jumps, wall running, sliding flip kick hammer attacks, bows, Shotguns, assault rifles.... and each frame has 4 Abilitys, Invisibility/Aoe heal/Aoe disarm/Aoe stun/Charge/Knockdown/Aoe Death!/Melee attack boost/dots/teleports/deployable shields The game exists in the Perma "Open Beta" like dungeon defenders did for 2 years and like every game released now does, so they have the excuse "hey its only beta" for comicall game inballance and garbage skills Its totally Free to play, and you "can" acsess ALL CONTENT.... totally free But it will take you a few months, there are currently 13 warframes to unlock and 31 weapons, you can unlock them by farming the bluprints, Farming materials and spending 3-4 days crafting or spending 10 pounds for each frame and 3-9 pounds for weapons. You start with a choice of 3 frames, A standard frame Excalibur with a Very powerful aoe melee slide attack and decent aoe, Then a Stealth frame Loki that is really good mid and endgame, but will struggle early on And a high shield caster frame, with more utility that damage Mag. There are over 100 Missions to complete and unlock but mostly they are the same type repeated in a different ship, and a couple of them blur into take this here Raid - Rush in steal somthing Spy - steal data from 4 computers around the zone Deception - plant a bomb in the ships engines?? Extermination - Kill x bad guys Defense - Defense a pod/core against waves and waves of baddies can carry on forever if you choose after 5 waves Mobile defense - run about defending multiple points and finally 1 point while a virus is uploaded or a computer is.... Assassination - Murder one of the 10 or so big boss mobs in the game and Void key missions which follow one of the above formulas in a really pretty zone, wth a little puzzle solving. since the last few updates there are about 6 new mission types and more planets There are 3 races each with multiple mob types .... Currently I think the game Is hard to get in to, you need to get new warframes to experiance alot of the fun, your really need to spend at least a little money on a warframe to get you started, alot of the "Fun" weapons require mastery, which needs a few days to get up. Your starting weapons are crap and you need to upgrade them fast or you quickly get bored There is also a log of missing in game information. you get a screen of 30 weapons Wham in the face, and all they say is, Accuracy 10, Fire rate 3, damage 40. What they don't say is Weapon A has armor ignoor and Rapes lines of mobs, Weapon B has 10 shots in its clip and pisses them out meaning you can only use it as a backup, Weapon C has a hidden charge attack stat that does 4x more damage! Wikia helps alot Big online commuity turning into guilds... and.... MMO.... but not needed Fun game, worth trying and its Free, it really is... unless you want a bright pink sword that will cost you 3.99 to unlock bright colour pallet I reccoment steams warframe starter pack, then watch http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9fNLhVpBrBM&list=PLKSzOMQMo9pd5tdbXabivk9O_NGEu1isL
Vaughn;-;Slicing and dicing your way through hordes of enemies never felt more satisfying. I highly recommend this for people who love hack and slash games or people who love strategy and planning, this game's got plenty of both. I think one of the only cons are that if you have an average (Not for gaming, or average Laptop) computer, you might want to go to through the graphics settings and turn off all of the motion blur, flashy lights, and lens flares.
Mike_Wazzowski;-;This game is tons of fun. The devs obiously listen to their players, and the re-playablity is good, and it has to be considering it's kind of a neccesity for the game. I mean we ask for trading, they give us the Trading Stand. You can't trade weapons or warframes, so not exactly what we wanted, but, hey, they're trying. In fact, i actually had a friend who didn't like the game because there was no PVP, and that was the case for most people. They asked for it, and they received. The fact that the game devs actually try to please their players is what makes me recommend this game to anyone who is on the fence about playing. The only reason i can see people not liking this game or not playing it is because of the gore in it, and i would hardly call it gore. I mean, there is definatly worse out there. Also, the gore is brought upon by the player, not by the game. If you don't want gore, then don't use a katana. So, for any parents reading this, i wouldn't be too worried about this game. For more information on what happens in the game itself, look here:http://www.gameskinny.com/lacoq/warframe-review-for-pc
MuffinDotMan;-;This Game Is Amazing i have had some much fun playing this game with my friends i wouldnt really recommend it if your playing it by your self but with friends its a very very fun game :D
Ouendanation;-;This is an indepth review. Scroll down to the "Conclusion" if you're short on time or want the bottom line, but if you are looking at this game I highly recommend reading all of this. Introduction Warframe is a wonderfully unique and constantly evolving, very social Free-to-Play third person shooter, with a focus on cooperative player versus enemy combat. Nearly every mission is procedurally generated each time you load it, and it will be a specified game mode with a set objective. There are 4 factions (plus a neutral "faction" mostly composed of fauna) to fight against with tons of interesting enemies. There many customization options for players. There are player skins, color palettes with 90 colors each, decals, bobbleheads, helmets and more. You can have a hot pink ninja with a moustache (Movember only!) and scarf blowing kisses if you so desire. It is quite grind-centric, but it is excellent at what it does. The grind is a design choice, and not a symptom of not having enough game content, so don't be scared off by that. The business model for microtransactions is very fair. Purchasing weapons will generally not give you a signifcant advantage outside of some time-saving. There is no Pay-to-Win here. What you get for purchasing the premium currency with real money is the ability to skip some of the grind or random elements, cosmetic items, and (likely the most important) are item slots. You only have a tiny number of slots to begin with, and you will need to sell your old gear to acquire new gear, or get platinum to buy slots (possible to sell rare items without paying a penny; you are also given some platinum to start with). You can obtain almost 100% of the gameplay content without paying a dime. But if you get hooked on this game, fair warning, you will probably want to spend some cash. I'm not rich by any means whatsoever, but I've spent a large percentage of my average entertainment budget on this game and I look back with no regrets. To get the same amount of entertainment out of going to the movies, as I have gotten playing this game, I would have to spend around $7,500-10,000 USD. The bottom line in Warframe is that you will be progressing at your desired pace and with your own goal, which may be one of the following: Do I want to complete every mission? Do I want to be the best PvPer? Do I want to acquire every weapon in the game? Do I want to break the weekly record in survival/defense modes? Do I want to piece together the game lore and write my own story? Do I want to find a tight-knit community and help construct an amazing clan hangout, with tech research, obstacle courses, statues displaying clan achievements, literal zen gardens, and more? Do I want to acquire every one of the hundreds of Mods? (more or less lootable trading cards you jam in your gear to change your ability range, gun damage, fire rate, move speed, knockdown resistance, slide distance, wall run cost, and much more) The choice is yours in Warframe. The developers are also extremely involved with the community. If a change goes out that the whole community dislikes, even if the developers still think the revision is correct, they will listen to the players and change it anyway, and roll back the change within 24 hours sometimes. They have contests, Q&A's, devstreams, and more. There are global "Operations" that take place every few weeks that reward players with exclusive items for things such as sabotaging a mobilizing space army or preventing a faction from discovering something that would make them too strong. They really stay in touch with fans on a personal level. The hotfixes are announced in real-time, in-game by the enigmatic and hysterical "redtext" whose dialogue makes you feel like you're a personal friend of the developers. Never have I seen a developer care more about their game and the players. I started playing roughly a year and a half ago, after Update 7. The game had maybe 30 weapons total, all of them being "this weapon shoots more bullets faster than this weapon and has a bigger clip size" on basically one tile set. The game is now on Update 15.2, and has 13 beautiful and varied tilesets, weapons ranging from rocket launchers to poison cloud launchers to chemical acid-throwers to freeze-rays and a massive oversized He-Man sword. Is it for me? If you're a casual Gamer: You don't have to grind much, and you can mostly flow through the missions and play with your buddies and just take it easy if you'd like. There are lots of new-player-friendly tutorials and explanations that have been added that make it easier. If you're a hardcore gamer: There is plenty to offer if you don't mind a self-directed grind. As of this writing, there are 178 weapons, 28 warframes, 11 companions, 253 mission nodes, 428 mods, and more (with content added almost each week). Once you rank an item up to the max level 30, you can use "Forma" to improve your item and reset it to rank 0, to repeat the process. With this system, you can endlessly improve upon your weapons and warframes as much as you wish and do harder and harder content, and do longer survivals and defenses. There is more to do, but I've covered the big goals here. Conclusion Warframe is one of my personal favorite games. I very highly reccomend it if you can tolerate some repetition and you like fun action games. Positive Fresh concepts: space ninjas with an eastern-style code of honor serve the mysterious Lotus. The player is intended to drive their own story. Some decisions can be made to shape this. Fun, fluid gameplay that never gets boring; there are playstyles to suit every player, and many maneuvers such as wall-running, flipping, rolling, blocking, counterattacking, and sliding. Massive amount of warframes, weapons, mods, and missions to keep you busy for hundreds of hours. Incredibly involved developer that addresses community concerns and improves the game weekly Fair microtransactions, no pay-to-win. Cooperative, mostly friendly community (as with every game, there are some jerks/trolls). Well-executed clan system that lets you construct a central hub and hangout for you and your friends. Negative Most items are built through accumulating the same dozen or so materials; after mission progression ends, this process becomes repetetive. Some items require repeating the same mission type over and over to get a certain weapon piece as a reward. A small amount of weapons and one warframe are acquirable only through randomly generated, one-hour "alert" missions. This can be frustrating if an alert you need occurs while you are asleep. Global Operations are time-sensitive, so if you go on vacation, or can't log on for some time, there is a chance you may miss an Operation with an exclusive item for the reward. There are several event-exclusive items that will never be available again. This may bother some perfectionists. Very difficult to acquire cosmetic customizations and item slots without paying money. Many minor bugs, and many bugfixes result in a game of Whack-a-Mole. An incomplete plot makes it so there's no compelling goal yet, but plot is being added in chunks slowly. Multiplayer is Peer-to-Peer and the network code is a bit buggy, which often means slightly-to-moderately laggy games. Endgame for veterans currently , in general, amounts to collecting warframes and weapons and making your gear stronger, this will likely change in the future. Player-aligned factions have recently been added to help with this that provide rewards only available for siding with that "Syndicate" and earning experience while having their Sigil equipped.
Wim;-;Warframe is a refreshing blend of FPS, RPG-like progression, and mmo interactivity. My average Warframe session plays as follows: The game opens up to an overlay of the Solar system. The options from here are fairly analogous to that of diablo III. From here you have access to your equipment, inventory, crafting, market with both ingame and out of game currency items, clan, chat, and friends list. Unique to Warframe is the Solar Map. It features high interactivity, allowing you to drill down two levels of detail. Selecting a planet/planetoid allows you to see all available mission in that system. Upon hovering on a mission, the map shows the mission type, faction and level of difficulty presented in the mission. There are various ways to run missions, but the most commonly used is online. In this mode, you matchmake with other players wanting to run the same mission. Once matchmaking begins, you can either select "play now" to begin the mission after a short countdown or simply wait for at least one other person to join before the countdown begins automatically. If you are running though a mission and it's not yet full(4 players max) and the objective is still incomplete, players will be able to drop in mid-mission. The more players working together, the higher the experience and reward payout. Progression in Warfame is accomplished through a couple different systems. Your account has a rank, it begins at 1 and slowly builds up as you play through the game. Progressing to the next rank requires completing a trial, accessed by clicking on the xp bar on the main menu once it's full and flashing. Certain weapons require a certain account rank or "mastery rank". Your warframe, weapons, and carrier has a level, these cap at 30. As these are raised, your health, shields, stamina, engery, and damage increase. Each level provides the respective equipment an additional amount of capacity for mods. Each new weapon and new warframe that you level helps build your mastery, and is proven to be the quickest way to progress. Each mod drains capacity but gives an upgrade. These are both increased my fusing the mod to higher levels. This offers near limitless upgradeability to your frame and weapons of choice. As you progress though the game's content, you will collect more mods along the way allowing you to further customize your build to your needs. Chasing difficult to find mods and upgrading them to their full potential is a challenge in and of itself.
DingoDaDoggy;-;Mac version plis
Zom;-;It tooks a while to know the knowledge on this game but is fun when playing with friends on skype.
Grimno;-;It's hard to find a middle ground when it comes to "Would you recommend" or "Would you not recommend". The game is good, I'll give it that. Played it for quite a bit (40 hours+) before relizing it was on STEAM and swapped to that for achievements/items. The game looks great, the gameplay is fun and the new content is always nice and I have to say I love the Dojo (Being allowed to build stuff your way in a game is always amazing!!!) but at the same time there are some key flaws. So let's do PROS and CONS. PROS Good Graphics A lot of different Warframes and Weapons to play around with. You are essentially Cyborg Ninja from Metal Gear Solid Fully Customizable and Decoratable Clan Dojo EITHER/OR It takes places in the same Universe as Dark Sector... which is weird. Never did like Dark Sector. CONS Rather then, list the cons by just, simplifying it, I'll explain a few. For starters, you have endgame. All games needs a good endgame but Warframe sadly does what Diablo 2 did. You can become powerful enough to kill the hardest boss in twenty seconds! Now grind/farm so you can kill him in fifteen seconds! Now grind/farm some more so you can kill him in ten seconds! Now grind/farm some more so you can 1-shot the final boss! You'll just be trying to make yourself godly powerful in which case any new content that is released as well as any current mission will lose all challenge and it will begin to feel like a chore doing missions to the point you just run through all enemies, spamming AOE skills just to get to the end. The missions as well are grind-like since on some event missions, you have to replay the same mission FIVE times just to get the reward. The grind does however feel a lot less when you work in a clan all working toward a single goal... like finishing a dojo decoarion! The Warframes, while varied, have some things to be desired. As expected, there are those "Select" Warframes everyone wants or is used for endgame content. The Rhino Warframe can be aquired on the second planet Venus, and you can pretty much go the whole game using that one Warframe without ever choosing another. That's what I did. Stomp + Iron Skin ftw. I ended up getting other Warframes (Nekros, Paladin, Berserker, Excalibur) but I never had the motivation to even play them. Sure I could play the level 4 Nekros there, oooorrr play the lvl 30 fully decked out Rhino and not feel like a third wheel in Invasion modes in comparison to the others. The last big flaw is STORY. To this day, I still have no clue what is going on. Like, I know I'm Tenno, I know the Corpus and Grineer are badguys but not always or something cause you will help them at times. And I know you work for a girl named Lotus who might be a Tenno but might not be who wants you to do stuff for, reasons. Nothing is really explained. Ever. EVER. I've tried looking it up. The Grineer are simply explained as... they live on a rotten Earth... they're clones... they use old tech... their mission... stop the Tenno from awakening. Because.... EEEHHHH???? You know people are fighting but "What are they fighting for?" is never really explained! The most I got was.. the Grineer are trying to conquer everything. Stop them from doing that. The Corpus are trying to do stuff too. Stop them from doing that. There's a guy named STALKER too who comes after you... he might be a Tenno. Stop him from, stopping you stop others? I'm still gonna recommend the game, it's fun to play for a while I would not suggest trying to play this for so long you become supah-awesome numbah one! This kind of game is a space filler, something to play between waiting for other games to come out. Like Titanfall, or Dark Souls 2, or Elder Scrolls Online. That sort of thing. In conclusion. Fun gameplay, good graphics and a heavilly customizable clan DOJO, but a grind with no real story backing it up, wouldn't recommend spending 100+ hours on it. And Stealth becomes quite pointless once you can stomp and kill every enemy in the current room and next couple adjascent rooms die instantly.
FrodoNaggins;-;This is one of the better Free-to_play games out there. It takes a few hours for it to get fun, but once you get into it, it's tough to put down. It isn't as grind-intesive as most F2P games, either, if you don't want buy anything. Highly recommended, especially if you have friends to play with.
Striker98;-;Only 1 thing could make this a game that i would hate... and thats making it cost money. I think this is one of the best free to play games ive found on steam.
ShINe 2nd acc;-;Honestly this is a really awesome game you could have a lots of fun with i defently recommend it and this is not just some shity old crap you gotta pay for getting good items no no they actully made Crafting and blueprints for this Amazing! 8.6/10
sDK;-;This Game's graphics are really cool and the combat system is very cool too. It is co-op or multi-playeable and singleplay. Very cool game.
Kee-Oth;-;This is a really great game. Very unique setting. Cool gunplay, melee combat. Art is amazing. Good RPG elements and character (warframe) optimization. Fair free to play model. i Highly recommend this game :3
THE CHAMPION OF KIRKWALL;-;Guns. Swords. Superpowered mech suits....AND free. WHAT CAN GO WRONG.
FaceBlank;-;Beautiful graphic and effect. With cool weapons and equipments. Also it will be more fun if play with friends.
JIGxJAG;-;Warframe is an amazing game. Its a third person co-op sci-fi shooter space ninja extravaganza! Its a little slow starting out (if you have the money, i recommend getting affinity and credit boosters), but once you get past the first planet or two, you really start to have some great fun. With a good team and communication, this game offers hours of never ending entertainment. Each Warframe (playable character) offers its own unique play and fighting style. With (Currently) 16 Warframes and 3 prime variants (the 4th, excalibur prime is no longer attainable), over 100 primary, secondary, and melee weapons, and 5 sentinels (robotic companions), this game has massive replayability. The very best part is, its free! So why not try it out? P.S. Dont stop after the first couple missions, I promise you'll find its an amazing game!
SinIsteR;-;good for try !;x
RaNGeR.GaV;-;A very enjoyable fast-paced shooter (when played with others). With the option of stealthy slow solo play as well. Some repetitive maps and scenarios but still with enough variation to not feel "grindy" (until you're trying to get something specific to drop). Can be played entirely free but a little cash injection certainly can boost the fun.
Swadian;-;It is a action game with a realistic engine(both graphically and combat-wise),with lots of hack-n'-slash ,resembling Devil-may-cry 4 with more space ninjas.It is perfect but for the lack of stealth,but hell,IT'S PERFECT! Edit:Now with the new GUI and the new stuff from the mad Cephalon onwards the game is IMHO terrible.I just don't know what to do in it anymore.For veterans<--- DON'T COME BACK For new players<----PLAY IT! you might understand something from it...
Audiblecoast8;-;Warframe is a tactical third person shooter set in a vast and continually expanding universe that is very interesting if you look into it's lore. The game is set on your character, an old tenno warrior who is in an massive suit of armour called a warframe. A warframe is a suit of armour that was placed onto a tenno when they are initaited, and has 4 special abilities and a wide array of advantages such as better shields or armour. You, a lone tenno, was put into cyro-sleep after a great war beetween the sentients and the (as i call them) the orokin people. You wake up centuries later to a unverse filled with corruption, greed and violence and it is up to you and your fellow tenno to restore peace once more to the solar system. Gameplay wise, the game is built around you doing acrobatics and maneuvers to outsmart your enemies, such as running across a wall to reach an enemy with your shotgun. As you progress through the game you'll find things called "mods". These mods are used to augment your warframe and weapons to certain advantages. One example of this is to give a rocket launcher a faster fire rate, or a shotgun more accuracy. Whilst the mods do little to improve your items when you first get them, you can upgrade them with fusion cores or with other duplicates of mods. You can say get a damage mod from the basic %20 increase to a phenominal %200 increase on the max rank. This system works beutifully and works well with the whole concept of you being your own unique character. The classes in his game are set in what type of warframe you have. There are over 20 warframes currently in the game (the most recent being mesa) and with each one comes a different experience. Your warframe is unique with the abilities and attributes it has. One example is the warframe "rhino" a beast of a warframe that has high armour, shields and health and a powerful array of abilites that revolve around either taking or dealing damage. Each of your warframes comes with 4 revive tokens which replenish every day to the maximun of 4. This is very useful as solo players will find killing enemies difficult on higher levels. Apart from your warframe, you will have access to a wide array of primary, secondry and melee weapons. Each catagory has a subclass, which include handcannons, staffs, longswords, rifles and many more. Some of these sub-clasess require different types of mods, such as a well modded rifle set will not work on a shotgun as they are two different weapons types. Same as your warframe you can mod your weapons with a wide array of mods that include increasing damage, to mods that inflict elemental damage or "status effects". There is alot of things that i can talk about but there is just too much to fit in a review. This game is FREE and does not force you to pay and it is fairly easy to farm for resouces and build that all important weapon you've been wanting. This feels satisfying and well achieved and one of the many reasons why a have played warframe for over a year (yes i realise it says i have less than an hour of gametime but i have over 1000 hours on the browser version of the game). i give this game a 4.5/5 a very well earned score, keep up the great work D.E :D
Kron;-;This is a game, When downloaded you can play it
The Barrel is a Spy!;-;GUNZ, NINJA, SPACE, BADASS PARKOR. ARE YOU NOT ENTERTAINED?
Gidian;-;OMG this game is fun and adictive the game play is complex but not really hard to pick up and learn to play :)
-G-;-;Awsome Game , Love the new update , they really did great job optimizing the game i used to get 30 fps on 640*480 all of now i get 60 fps at the same options great job digital extreme :D
CrashBuG;-;This is definitely well decorated grinding game that can keep RPG gamers occupied. If you are a player who wants an endgame with good storyline, high-end graphics, 8-40 hrs of playtime, then this game is not for you. If you are looking for an Action RPG with never ending customizations, socially active community, clan events, design council (you vote the future of the game), co-operative space ninjas, then do try this game. P.S: Very Addictive for achievement freaks.
[SCi] Chaz;-;Amazing game. Highly addictive. Lots of weapons and Warframes to obtain and master. You'll being wanting to throw your money at Digital Extreme in no time. :)
Leichenfresser;-;After playing it for 145 hours, I can say that it was really worth my time so far. I don't know why the Metacritic Score is pretty low, but it's probably because the reviews were from back when the game was... well... not so interesting. It's a third person shooter with parkour-elements, filled with missions around defending, assassinating a boss, exterminating a level and so on. There is a gigantic list of weapons, all of them can be further be changed in appearance, while mods will change how they behave. A Flamethrower can turn into a Gasthrower, heavy melee weapons can turn into fast weapons of destruction. There are also different warframes - pretty much classes in other games. Each Warframe has 4 Skills, most of them very useful, others very situational. Weapons and Warframes can either be crafted via ingame money and resources or bought with real money. Crafting will also take real time to complete, from half a day with most weapons to 3 days when finalizing a new warframe. It's clearly a way to get you to buy stuff, but as soon as you have some missions under your belt, the waiting time isn't really that annoying. Just as a warning: The game isn't easy at the beginning. You will die often and hard. But after that initial hurdle, the game gets really good. My only problems so far are the high prices of some things you can buy and that there are only 4 enemy factions so far. You should check it out if you like third person shooters. You should also check it out if you liked Borderlands, as it is somewhat like that with Leveling up and modifying weapons. It is free 2 play, but you won't get slapped with a paywall until you're like 20 hours into the game. And by that you will probably know if you want to play on or not.
Vault Boy;-;Very awesome game, although I play this pretty much on the PS4.
Thanathos;-;The game is awesome and pretty much fun but just one recomendation; they give you 50 platinum (purchasable currency) to use in what you want. Only use it on slots for your warframe or weapons. It is wasted on resources. EDIT Okay I gotta edit this review for plenty of reason: 1) I have sunk way too many hours into this game, I am serious, over 300 hours! 2) This game has become something of a wonder, it's mechanics are good, it looks good and the developers are we tied with the community. 3) The game is just incredible really, annoyingly grindy, bit of a platinum  and they give you way too little warframe slots for 20 plats but if you get beyond that the game just takes over and you both learn to love eachother.
pyro2225;-;very fun game can get very addictive. kinda a pay to win but at the same time anything u can buy with plat you can earn through missions (except some mods ex. primed chamber)
i cri evri taim;-;One of my Best online games. but there is something i have to say about warframe Grind fest: [ Warframe = "i hope you enjoyed the first time as much you will do at the 70th time" ]
SHAVE/SHADE SQUAD;-;It takes a bit to get used to (how to equip various mods, upgrading your armor/weps, etc.) but is absolutely worth it! The graphics are awesome, the levels are friggin' amazing, and it can surely give a challenge to any kind of player! The frames (armor) for each class looks absolutely amazing, and each class has it's personal skill (Ultimate, basically) that's cool!
GD;-;Game is very fun taking ive put so many hours into it love it id reccomend this to people who whould like to be a space ninja
BattleBunnyKai;-;I have been playing this game since it's release, and put it on my Steam account when it was released on steam. I love this game and you should too! The Development team (Digital Extremes) listens to the players or at least the ones within reason. As well as hold bi-weekly DevStreams and other various fun with the community to let them know what is going on. PROS - -Graphics -Sound Design is nice. -Always Evolving. (Each week is new content hardly ever missed) -Business Model is fantastic. (Shortcuts and Skins/Accessories Only) -Tons of content. (Warframes, Enemies. Modes, Quests, Weapons, and Events) -AI is fairly scaled depending on level / Mission Type. -Community is polite and far beyond what many other games have. CONS- -Grinding. (Only to some is that a problem or turnoff.) -Sometimes is buggy due to patches. (Is usually quickly resolved within hours of patch tho) -Semi Learning Curve twards mid levels (20s-30s Ish). SideNote: You can not (as of me writing this) get Warframe or Weapon slots without gaining platinum (or events) by buying their premium currency &/OR selling rare parts to other players for said currency. I highly recommend this game, DigitalExtremes is great and deserves you to at least try it. Warframe is a even better experiance with friends!~ So be sure to bring some.
Momo;-;cool
verticitatem;-;Hooolyyyy crap, where do I begin? This game is incredible. Great developers, who are constantly working on improving the game and addressing problems the community points out, INSANE graphic quality (which is changeable enough to run on low-end PC's), wonderful selection of weapons, playstyles, companions, and modifications -- this game has it all. While there are some bugs (which are often fun to play around with), it's by far my favorite game I've... really ever played (not that that says much). 9001/10 would recommend.
sodko;-;it's so interesting game :D
Dojutrek;-;I wasn't expecting much of Warframe when first graced my desktop, but within the first three weeks I played I was pleasently impressed. I could say that back when the Founder Packs were still available, I could see the potential within the title for something great which got me to buy into the whole game to show my support. How it has evolved over the course of nearly two years of play hasn't always lived up to the expectations I had set, but it was still worth the time and effort I had initially put in. Warframe has always been supurb and seeing how it has evolved from a simple third-person action shooter into something greater is something to behold. I hope the next update continues to improve the game and provide enjoyment for years to come.
oW;-;Look at my play time... ... ... I'm not done yet... The grinding, there's so much grinding but Warframe has something...something that makes the grinding bearable i need...more...now... 30/10
UNSC Marshy;-;The game is basically a constant grind, but the updates have been exciting. It's free so you can see if it's your cup of joe. As for me, I rarely feel like playing this because none of the levels feel truly unique except for their asthetics, the Arch Wing fixed that, and I hope to see more of these game changing updates in the future!
Perverted Fox;-;Good game , Enjoy it very much
Creamy;-;This is an awesome game and its ing FREE! In my opinion this is by far the best free to play experience I've had the pleasure of gracing. Essentially, you can get everything in game without spending a penny of real dosh. The gameplay itself is very free flowing, smooth and lets you do a lot more like climb the environment do parkour crouch or slide around the map. Overall it's a unique and fun game to play that bears resemblance to Mass Effect. This game is still in Beta and has a lot more potential that it can muster up in my opinion. 8/10
CODISBETTER;-;At first I looked at this game and thought "ehh to much alien looking stuff for me" BUT MAN WAS I WRONG this game is amazing and i would recommend it even though ive only got 4 hours on record i can see many more coming!!!
TehRazor;-;Probably the best f2p game along with LoL in my opinion.You have to grind for your stuff and you have to do different missions all the time.Totally recommended.
flzero;-;good graphics and gameplay, plus is a good co op game so with some friends it can become the best game u have eva play XD
GastricBasilisk;-;Very polished game. Pretty much Borderlands meets metal gear rising. Class selection is phenominal. Weapons are great. The 4 player co-op is exeptionally smooth and is very fun.
AndyTheCreator;-;This game is a very very very muthain exiting and thrilling game leaving you on the edge of your goddam seat and the graphics/visual effects are equivalent that of in sex. THESE VISUALS SO GOOD, MAKE YOU WANNA SLAP YO MOMMA *WHACK* (Samuel L. Jackson approves this review)
Twibright;-;For a "free" game, not bad.
kestreler;-;!!! !!! !!! Bullet!!! Craft!!! W a r f r a m e ! ! ! Warframe()Co-op  Co-op   TPS
Gabethebabe;-;Great multiplayer, graphics are exhilarating, but everything is so expensive .-.
SonicWind;-;Ever had a sudden need to play as a bunch of space ninjas who put on powered armor and use blades and guns to restore balance to the solar system? While that is a bit of a specific need, then Warframe is for you. I mean, you're able to pull off all kinds of awesome moves and abilities to defeat hordes of enemies that want to have your head on a platter. Sliding on the ground before swinging your melee weapon and slicing enemies to bits, running on walls while simultaneously firing your guns-- you name it! There are a variety of game modes to keep things fresh. In one sector, you'll be defending something vital to your cause; in the next, you'll be fighting to survive by keeping your life support at a manageable level. Also, the developers listen to the community and regularly put out updates big and small. For example, three of the latest big updates have introduced an overhauled melee system, player ships, and Kubrow companions, and technological wings that allow you to fly through space, shooting at or slashing through anything that stands in your way. Plus, while you can purchase Platinum to get weapons, Warframes, and other things, most of them you can get for absolutely nothing, as long as you're patient and willing to work for them. The game is currently in Open Beta, but it's still got quite a lot of stuff. If you're willing to become a Tenno, then I recommend you pick Warframe up now. If you've considered it, but ultimately decided to avoid it because of certain issues, give it another look anyway-- the game has likely changed a lot, and it'll continue to do so for some time.
suchamoneypit;-;Was expecting something different, but was convinced to get this game and I was very impressed by it, I really enjoy it! Great 3 person shooter, has decent variety in missions. Recent updates significantly improved on many things. It does have its micro-transactions, and getting the resources to build weapons and warframes can feel tedious at times, but its still fun to play, especially with friends.
Otilia;-;Impressive graphics :D
Mattrix;-;You play as an alien ninja samurai parkour robot, with numberous choices in melee, primary and secondary weaponary. Like all F2P games though, you can buy pretty much anything with real money, and if you do you will be heaps better then the other noob that just started playing, who has to grind heaps to actually get something really good. It's still a great game though, and it really is the skill not what weapons someone has that makes a player good at this game. You most likely will enjoy it. And it's free. And it has fairly good graphics. And you are an alian ninja samurai parkour robot.
Awesomeroguer;-;Great third-person, sci-fi, ninja, shooter fun.
Shawn;-;Space ninjas with guns. That is all. 10/10 like Skyrim with space ninjas.
Cloak;-;Great unique third-person shooter experience. I mean c'mon guys SPACE NINJAS. Plus it's free!
Shy Clinnger;-;Warframe: If you'd like to waste a lot of hours, and days passing away almost instantly because you're looting those mods, want to slice those Grineer and Corpus soldiers and make infested into green goo... You might actually like Warframe, probably more than like. It's amazing to play. And I'm not the type to actually play F2P games, but Warframe hits the spot, and you can get over 100% accuracy too!
The Dragon Scrublord;-;Like Destiny, but better and it's free.
XDroptekX;-;THIS GAME IS AWEEEEESOME CANT LIE BUT ITS AWESOME FOR A FREE GAME
Sharpshooter;-;The best co-op game ever played. I am starting stream and upload videos about Warframe soon.
XGeNXX.LV;-;Nice game. Im really enjoy it!
[3.14]Kraftmyself;-;Great example of a game that can be enjoyed without 'paying to play'. The game is dynamic as it offers randomized levels that manage to keep the trek onto new sectors of the map fresh and entertaining. Tile sets are gorgeous, and most of this game offers bountiful eye candy at seemingly every turn. Combat is easy to enjoy and often becomes more enjoyable as the player comes to be comfortable with the abilities and manuevers of his Warframe, often allowing the scaling up of enemy difficulty to feel much more natural than some games. A.I, however is not the greatest, and enemies will often fall right into your guns barrel or give enough seconds pause before melee or performing actions to get a blade between them and their consciousness. As well, this game is very hard to enjoy without friends as online players rarely communicate and either: die (resetting the level), take a majority of the kills (luckily loot is spawned uniquely for each player in the level so there is no worry about ninja looters), or simply just leech xp while possibly introducing horrific lag or other internet issues. Nonetheless, this game makes up for its flaws (such as a seriously incomplete stealth mechanic at the time of even editting this) by revamping the classic 'kill and clear' dungeon co-op (stress the co-op requirement!) experience with a fun item leveling system, enjoyable combat, beautiful outdoor maps (when you get them), well made boss fights and the grinding for their loot, and the thrill of cutting through 6 heavily armor plated soldiers in one swing with your shiny EXCALIBUR Warframe. Play it if you got time to spend, with little to no money to spend, but you want to make sure it's spent having fun running around with your friends in some very memorable thirdperson, high-intensity fps moments.
cheers;-;is fun
eX Eclipzify intel;-;Easily one of my favourite Free-To-Play's, due to the nature of the in-game purchases and how much fun it is to grind levels/gear. I actually can't think of another FTP game that is FUN to GRIND. Runescape was probably only the other fun game going back to its classic days, but even that has basically become pay-to-play, disregarding the fact that they still advertise it as a FTP game. You can aquire anything in the game without real world money, and it isn't ludicriously hard like it is in competitor games. Furthermore, your far better to spend your money on additional Warframe (characters/suits) and weapon slots as initially you are pretty strapped for space. However by the time you reach these limits you will know if your money is worth it. Keep it mind however that the slots are incredibly cheap aswell, for 2 weapon slots sell at at 12p (p is platinum, the ingame premium currency), and 1 warframe slot a tad more expensive at 20p. Definately give this game a try if you haven't already, it won't cost you a cent - literally!
Kommander Shodan;-;Loot of skyrim with the maymays of guns. - b8/10
Valthross;-;the graphics are intense, as well as the gameplay. Also, this game is revolved around a vast universe, where you can switch between characters as well as different traverse planets. I highly recommend this game unless you aren't much of a hardcore-parkour, non-stop revolving action.
ilkhani;-;Warframe is a futuristic dungeon crawler filled with microtransactions. It is free to download and play and offers you and your friends plenty of coop hours before becoming tedious. While the different warframe suits (classes) that you can choose from play differently and feel different enough to provide you with reasons to explore them, the game itself with its monotone design, ends up becoming shallow and repetitive. With that said, you cannot argue against free and coop in the same sentence. Download if you want a free coop game to enjoy with friends. Don't download if third-person shooter coop or microtransactions aren't your cup of tea.
Iza;-;this is awesome, its like a proper retail game for free, it has a mix of gun and sword play, its fast combat doesnt really require much, you can tackle the compaign on single player or co-op
afarina;-;Holy cow! Why didn't I start playing this sooner? I heard about this game when it was still in closed beta and thought it had to be stupid. I started playing it a little over a month ago and all I can say is WOW!! Addicted!
GERstarBROT;-;One of the best, if not even THE BEST Free2Play Game, I have ever played. No pay to win because mostly it's played as a CO-OP Game. You can get pretty much everything with InGameCash and Resources you farm on the different Planets... Buying it with real money is much faster, but pretty much unneccesary. Through daily Login presents you can even get a discount price for Platinium (the Cash you gain through real money). I recomment playing it with friends on Teamspeak, it's easier and much more fun, plus you can talk about how you want to handle the missions (rushing through them, mostly farming every single piece of Sh*t, or going trough stealthy) The Game get's much attention form the gamemarker's, buggfixes can be seen often, ..... In my opinion clearly a 10/10 or ***** :D
WhiteTigerWoods;-;This is now my favorite game on Steam! I don't have the best computer in the world or good internet connection, but this game gives you amazing graphics, smooth action gameplay, and not to mention a great story line! HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!!
DarkXpyder;-;Pretty great and free, although there are some annoying limitations that can't be overcame without speding a few bucks, but even considering that, it's a considerably cheap game, updated weekly and with something that has been missing in games for a long time, Clan Building, you can actually build stuff and design you clan hall the way you want it! Be it an maze like structure with things thrown around like crazy or a perfectly symmetric beauty, its not a fast thing to do, but it can be done, and it can be done for free, with no real money involved! The action is great, there is a good variety of weapons and frames(the characters you play), there is still long way to go and it can only get better, start now and do not risk losing alot of nice prizes in the events that are ran at least once a month or so! Get an invite! https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=5154406d1a4d80276800006c my in-game name is Xpyder
SpecklesTheDilo;-;This is an amazing game. I saw this when i was young and i got that face and that feeling,that goooood feeling.I eventually forgot about it but then a few faithful months ago,during my last days of grade 6, I found this game again. It is free. Who does not like free games? But i did not get it because it was free.... I am very catious with my choosing of games, and a free game? Id probably pass because usually free games are small boring things, or good alphas and betas,and this one happened to be a beta when i got it. Usually, when playing a beta, I say, Oh hey! Look at that! Thats pretty cool! But these things do not look so good, and this needs work, and.... But warframe, but this was different. This was, to me, no way a beta. it had all this and that and those and also these!!!! it had Swords, Lasers, Ninjas, Multiple male AND female characters, Dismemberment of enemy bodies for when you felt down, it had scythes and daggers and hammers and axes, it had maps galore!!!! It had good textures, sentinels, and, I hpe im not getting ahead of myself, but, this game is just so amazing!!!! AND I, RECCOMEND THIS GAME, AND EVERYTHING IT STANDS FOR 100%!!!!
Studmuffin53;-;With the fate of your race in the balance, it is up to you and the few remaining Tenno to push the enemy out of the solar system. 8/10 a lot of fun with friends, gets difficult if you try to take on higher levels alone. The use of schematics to acquire weapons and Warframes makes the feeling of getting new equipment all the more satisfying. Although, if you are not a patient person the ability to purchase the equipment directly through the use of platinum (which is purchased with real money) can help you get the quick advantage over the enemy.
|Shift|;-;This game is just amazing! It gets new updates and hotfixes weekly, adding more content for you to play and explore with friends.
Castiel The Angel Of Holy Memes;-;Ninjas and swords and lasers and !
Pidgeon Lord;-;i flayed this game 4 1 year and i lost my virginity when i stoped playing
Atomicburnout;-;If you are debating wether or not you want to download Warframe, Download it! many of my friends tell me "its to complicated" or "its boring" i will admit i felt a little overwhelmed at the beginnig but i got over it as everything became understandable along with the awesome people you can meet online. I promise you that you will have at LEAST a small bit of fun. Do i recommend this game? YES.
Stanbony;-;Now this game for free is totaly awesome! not sure id spend the hudreds that you could to be invinceable, but, you can progress and rank up with a litttle help from other warframes, the maps and missions are endless! you could probly spend an unimaginable amount of hours on this game alone, I recomend it to anyone who loves the fast pace, shoot em up, coop and deathmatch type of alien crazy i mean forever mods weapons, and customizability type of game, how it got a 68 is beyond me! free is 50 and a game that works good is atleast another 25 in my book, with the anount of updates, i mean like everyday, these dudes got there #$%^& together, I love it for a free game.
Kinasu;-;Warframe has cought me by strom i am not normaly in to games like this but this one has me locked down i hope to see great things to come i give this game currently a 8.5/10
Flicker Connection;-;I WILL NOT FORGET THIS MOMMENT WHEN IM PLAYIN THIS IN GAME 69/10 WOULD PLAY ANYTIME AFTER DOTO!
Crade;-;Space Ninjas? Powers? Guns? FREAKING SWORDS!? The only thing this game is missing is gratuitous nudity... *Crosses fingers* Update: October 28, 2014 So, it's been over a year since I reviewed this game... AND IT'S GOTTEN EVEN BETTER! Where to start... The Dev team is slowly incorporating more story elements, especially for the new players who need guidance as to what they're doing. Part of this new drive was the implementation of the "New Player System" which is a quest to introduce the player to Warframe's basic mechanics while informing you of some of the basic lore. Other quests now added include Howl of the Kubrow to get your very own death-dealing, cuddle-loving furball, Hidden Message to unlock the Warframe known as Mirage, Limbo Theorem to unlock the IMPOSSIBLY fun Warframe Limbo, who can walk on a completely different plane of existence. And, last but DEFINITELY not least, the Archwing. Gundam lover's will just about soil their shorts when they get their hands on this space combat system. Remember the Death Star run from Episode 6? You'll get to experience it yourself. Note for all those interested in the game, if you play for free it CAN be a -very- heavy grind, and wait times on building items can be brutal (3 days for some things). But, if you have some patience, this game's high speed combat mechanics are fantastic. But, if you don't mind a bit of grind, you can even alleviate that some by selling rare mods and Prime parts for Platinum in the player trade system.
Neck-Bearded Viking;-;Honestly an amazing game. Once you get past the kinda crappy starter gear and into things you like more, it becomes really fun. The biggest pushfactor for most players is the crafting time. Once you get over the fact that you can't always get what you want right away and learn to deal with it, it isn't an issue anymore. Overall, a really fun, unique game. I'd reccomend it to anyone into any kind of action game.
Griffwald;-;Excellent game - worth downloading, playing, and becoming addicted to.
Niiyu;-;I absolutely love this game. It is the definition of a amazing free to play experience, although you will need to spend some money to get the full experience. It is very much worth it in my opinion! also supporting indie devs gives you a nice feeling :) But the meat meat of the gameplay is the third person ninja shooter. Being a space ninja ou are very agile and can pull off parkour with ease. the gunplay is satisfying and has a lot of impact with great sound assests make hearing and feeling the pop of a headshot! i cannot reccomend this game enough! but the gripes i have is that the entry level is massive with most of the weapons and frames being very daunting for new player, along with some grind. It could need patience.
Nilm;-;I've put over 110 hours into this game so far, I have paid nothing and gotten almost everything in game, worth getting just for space ninja killings.
Retaliatus;-;Warframe Warframe started as a decent co-op shooter. On early beta it had some game breaking bugs, but it felt like it had a lot of potential, that potential is still there and i doubt it will fade away easily. The level design is pretty amazing, the tilesets have as much quality as a AAA title but they get very repetitive with time, the "endgame" void missions can be described as "kill mobs, loot the room and occasionally look for secrets, rinse and repeat", The Bosses started out as pretty meaningful and provided an actual challenge, nowadays they're a means to earn blueprints of specific frames and are incredibly hard, with the inclusion of a specific set of bosses that have a specific weak spot which only works half of the time. The best boss fight is in my honest opinion Lephantis. Every update they release there are more bugs than additions, though most of which get solved pretty fast. The game has become quite a farm fest, earning the game the term "Warfarm". The Devs are terrible at balancing the game, specificly by overly nerfing frames and weapons and hardly ever buffing others. The grinding involved in farming for frames is extreme and is a great drawback of the game. Crafting weapons take usually 12 hours, companions and rare materials take up to 24 hours. the new Archwing takes 36 hours to build, and frames take 72 hours. Its tedious to wait so long for new gear. This New Archwing update is lame, the new tileset in space is devoid of content, its literally the same map. starts in the same place, ends in the same place but has you go through different pathways to achieve your objective. But to be quite honest, i've went on and on about how terrible this game is, but its still one of my favorite games and i have spent up to 8 hours in it alone, playing with friends. It's got its share of  sure, but they still somehow manage to deliver on a great time which is quite a feat, ive not exacly been easy on the examples of how terrible it is. I'm not gonna rate this game on a scale of any sorts, its a great game to spend some time in, but its below average in key aspects and needs improvement, and a lot of it, then again it's still in "open beta" so we might see some positive changes over the course of development.
BlackAce705;-;This game is so much better since update 14, most people have tryed this game along time ago but give it a 2nd chance because update 14 clears up all of the clutter and confusing interface. It is a great game and you should at least try it
r110platinum;-;This game is the only reason i get up in the mornings
kritterpons;-;Cool game play and customizing weapon and armor bow kicks
Panini Fetuccini Mussolini;-;If you find mindlessly playing through the same levels over and over just to get weapons or armor to all that over again, then this masterful piece of videogame is for you!
hyperturtle;-;You need to really get into grinding for this game to be fun, and it CAN be highly P2W.
vindiction2;-;all the revenue hooks and addiction lures are super obvious but the core gameplay is rather fun. The game is under active development (open beta, technically) and the official forums see plenty of fan submitted content or suggestions reach some stage of in game implementation, which is nice.
Senator Armstrong;-;If you dont have money to burn. you are in for a LOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOT of grinding. also has a form of virtual hats. so theres that. Fo srs version Pros: Space ninjas, concept 10/10 Warframes have good designs and diverse powers so two frames dont feel like they play the same but with a different unicorn hat good fun to play with friends that kill you in the dojo after you find a bug in the sparring place. Enemies are unique and dont feel that much like pallete swaps of the same guy with a gun. Lots and lots of weapons. (its got whips. WHIPS i tell you) Bosses usually require a full party of people. even the first one. (cheap ) WOAH DUD DEM GREEPHIKS (they is k) Cons: Farming Simulator 2013 Warfarme edition. Leveling is really tedious for frames and weapons alike Usually need high level players to help grind money/EXP/Resources ect. Makes you feel slightly like dead weight. Its not pay to win, its pay to get any godamn variety It takes about 3 days to get a new weapon/warframe without spending money Suffers from Payday 2 disease, they have a big update but if you dont have money to spend have fun running around the same missions over and over again to get a small chance to get the parts then farm for the components and then wait days to craft it. GOOD UPDATE HEY KIDS, YOU WANT SOME NANO SPORES (400,000 of them currently too much) Most of the cons can be filtered in to "Farming simulator" complaint. Mercus rating game of ratingness 2/5 Get friends to play it with you, or it gets lonely. also technical sequel to dark sector. and thats cool
Yukkikaze;-;FREE and NEVER ENDING FUN! What more could you ask of in this game. Basically speaking, this is a free to play game where 95% of the in game items can be obtainable, of course excluding limited items (events) and exclusive items (beta tester and founders who supported the game when it first started) and some appearance options like colors and syandanas (capes) for your warframe. THIS IS NOT A PAY2WIN. There are two currencies in game, and one is called credits while the latter is called platinum. Platinum is used to purchase cosmetic items like colors and syandanas. It can also be used to rush wait times (when you build things it takes real time to craft the items, but it actually isn't much of a bother and is a reasonable wait time, you'll see when you play the game). Other than that, platinum does NOT affect performance wise on who is better. Credits on the other hand is earned quite easily (do missions, kill stuff, open lockers/chests), but is needed alot of to craft and mod your warframe. I also want to add that if you get the right mods or prime parts of a warframe, you can actually go to trade chat and sell those items for platinum, which can be used for purchasing those color options and syandanas (I've yet to spend a single penny on this game, which I probably will since the developers of this game are amazing, which I'll get to that later in this review, and I have easily 5 syandanas, color palettes, lots of inventory spaces, and potatoes-which expand one's mod slots on a warframe/weapon ) The sheer variety of customization and the amount of weapons at your disposal is insane. This game has been severly criticized for being repetitive, and what people don't see in this game is the amount of options you can do to have FUN. You are quite literally a ninja who can parkour around all the maps and use from machine guns to pistols to the simple kunais and katanas ninjas use, and thats just a start. You can choose to go in guns blazing, or even take a more stealthier approach by being invisible and performing assassinations. The graphics I have to say are really really top notch. There's nothing I can really say about running it on high graphics, other than to either experience it yourself, or maybe look up a youtube video of how high end the graphics are (but that isn't really the same experience). This recent update even added in more companions in the form of kubrows (dog-like allies) to be at your side, in addition to the sentinels that were floating around helping you in various ways. Not only is the game amazing, but this game offers the most amazing staff of developers and amazing community one can ask. The developers actually listen to their players and read forums to give us what we want to see in a game. For example, Nova (a warframe or powersuit as you might call it) was created by the players. The new sword and shield weapon called the silva and aegis was also created by a player whose design was noticed by the developers, in addition to two more weapons that are currently still in development. The developers even hold streams or prime times in which they interact with the players and talk to us about their upcoming ideas and updates. If you're even curious about how dedicated the developers are to this game, look up on youtube for an update 14 update the night before the update is released, and you can tell how many of them had little to no sleep working on this massive update. TL;DR - FREE game where you can get 95% of all items (excluding founders exclusives and limited edition items that came most likely from events), has good graphics, has an amazing developer staff and community, FUN, NOT A PAY2WIN
xShadowsaur;-;With beautiful graphics, great gameplay, a variety of missions to complete, many scenarios, many bosses, strong RPG elements, good reasons to fight bosses, and great Co-Op gameplay earns this game a huge thumbs up, not even considering the fact it's free. With events, frequent updates, and even more stuff promised it is a great game and I heartily recommend it! The only downside I can think of is the need of 'platinum', money you'll have to purchase with actual money. This should be resolved with rare chances to gain platinum, other than that this game is magnificent. Ignore the metagame score, it deserves much more! Update on this review: Warframe's a gift that just keeps on giving. Currently it has 6 factions of varying sizes, a codex system, a revamped damage system, tons of weapons, 20 warframes to choose from, a variety of missions, a whole starmap to fill, tons of leveling up, frequent updates, frequent events, hidden areas, and at least 8 variations of randomly assembled tile sets. It's an amazing game with a bright future.
DuhAshunGamer;-;Got the game in early may. must say that the game has come a long way since then. content adding has been doen very well and the addition of special events on a monthly basis has made the game a lot less repetetive than what it used to be. the only thing i really dislike about this game is as much as all the essential components in warframe are able to be obtained for free using the crafting feature, there is no possible way to abtain free inventory slots for extra weapons other than the 10 you get from the start. As for controls, they are pretty good, although the vertical wallrunning feature can bug at times. the recoil system is what to expect from a 3rd person shooter but they have made each weapon have it's own recoil trend. Fps gamers will have no trouble adjusting. controls can be changed in game as always but be wary of when you do it as changing in some cinematics will cause a CTD UI has changed several times since the release and the latest one has been the best one yet. the missions are put into a web starting from mercury and spreading to the other planets. the other features in the main menu are placed accross the top of the screen. the UI has several minor and rare problems with locking. Gameplay is really unique. not like any other 3rd person shooters ive every played. there is a good diversity in game types and the leveling system is fair. the game is very forgiving in early stages being a little too easy with an almost extreme bend in difficulty after the first few planets, where it comes to the point where missions may be unplayable solo and will require a team complete, epecially in higher T3 void missions and derelict. Every warframe has its own unique characteristics from health and shields to abilities and appearances, which can be enhanced and/ or altered using mods and apparel customisations found in missions or purchased in store using micro transactions in the game. For a free to play, i must say it has some AAA title qualities in it and can be a fun game to play with friends. you will have to pay a little money down the track if you want to keep all your weapons in the future. Overall, nice experiment. it's coming along nicely, some good features. Content 7/10 Updating 9/10 Gameplay 8/10 Controls 7/10 Graphics 9/10 Compatibility 8/10 Stability 7/10 OVERALL 7.8/10
Alianah;-;Been playing for quite some time now, and I keep coming back for more! Awesome Game!
Skullbit;-;Amazing third person shooter! You get to be ninjas in space! And right when I thought it couldnt get more awesome I found out that this game has the best devs in the world!
ripteed/Awayinothercountryland;-;amazing game, great graphics, and awesome gameplay
xXTweezXx;-;Well i like this game, its a game meant for people that like to adventure, play with friends, fight, you can do all sorts of stuff! You get to duel with members, Do missions, Get pets, make weapons, make your weapons better, and enjoy the game :)
Reed;-;To do list: 1. install this game. 2. Play this game. 3. Look out a window and scream 'Spaaaaaaaaaaaaaceeee!' 4. Enjoy the game. 5. Realise you have to grind a lot of areas and rage. 6. You don't care about how you feel and grind dem items for cool guns/warframes. 7. Wasted all dem hours. 8. Worth it. 9. Only play it because of 3.
Tabriki;-;Update 14 is the greatest thing that has ever happened to this game, the accessibility has skyrocketed. There is no better time to play Warframe.
PhoenixSouls;-;I've been with warframe for a very long time even before it was on steam. I'm just as confident now as I was confident then that this game is potentially good. With the advancing technologies of graphics and rendering, physx and such. This game becomes even more beautiful graphically. From a long time Founder (Grandmaster) of Warframe with the Honour of being a contributor towards thier progress and the times of ups and downs. I still stand firm that warframe is one of the longest games I've ever played in my life. Warframe has outlived my time in many other shooting games. The excitement of the introduction of individual modifications and a vast array of different mods available to the player to be able to accustom towards your won playstyle. To the recent update with our own ships that we can roam in. No longer a soley menu based interface but a slight hybrid of free roam. Even when my internet connection was apalling, I was still able to play seamlessly. The immersion is well above average and their efforts from the developers won't go un-noticed. Frequent updates and events can ensure that this game won't ever leave you bored. Alert missions and Invasions and even now Dark Sectors on top of the Void missions make more variety than the old repeatable dungeon clearing style of the game. Maybe I'm just over-confident with this game but after a good 4-5 years with them. I can tell you this. Before any judgments made, Play the game, Try the game and decide after you've explored all of it's glory.
GnomishLich;-;an FPS/RPG hybrid that brings its own ideas and objectives to the table. Dynamic missions that react and change, vast randomly generated levels, three distinct factions of enemies, and plenty of weapons and warframes to take them down.
PhantomDraco;-;The most engaging MMO I have played to date. Every new weapon, warframe, and update changes things up enough to keep me hooked. The DEVS ARE AMAZING, and pay attention to the community better than any other company I've ever seen. Best of all, YOU DON'T HAVE TO PAY A CENT. Between alerts, drops, and blueprints, you are not required to spend any money. One of my favorite games ever.
Sporeryqwert;-;This is a good game for the first couple of hours but it gets a bit repetitive after that. The combat is satisfying and enemies explode into glorious showers of blood but there are a LOT of repeated assets and enemies, making this a game that you should get if you feel like something fun to play for a couple of hours, and it's for the wonderful price of nilch, so you should probably pick it up.
PBI [TG] Deadsin;-;This game is so fun, I can't get enough of it, all of it is fun. So much things to do in the game, this is one of the best 3rd person games yet! Give it a try, you will like it.
Drakashin;-;A decent F2P 3rd person shooter. I'll start with the positives first. Visuals are excellent. Warframes (classes) are varied and each have a unique look and application Lot's of mods (or items that will change your weapon, sentinel (pet), or warframe) Decent amount of Lore for those that look hard enough (the game is kinda like Dark Souls in that the story isn't presented directly to you, instead it's mentioned in a few conversations, events, and the codex) Fast pace, but easy combat. You can easily hit enemies while running along walls, doing slides, etc. Easy game to hop on and play a couple rounds and hop off when you feel like. Provides challenging levels for both experience players at higher levels, and casual gamers at lower levels with no real need to go to higher levels except for the challenge. Consistently update the game and have DE have devstreams that shows what they are trying to do and what is planned on being implimented next (always good to watch) Now for the negatives: It's grindy...very grindy. You'll spend a while at later levels trying to get a Forma (a high level material that's needed to either let you re-level your warframe/weapon with added benefits or to build good weapons from the dojo, or guild hall) Levels repeat in both layout and mission type (defence, capture, rescue, survival, with a few others). Luckly recent updates have been giving planets their own look so the layout problem is being fixed. You get laggy games more often then some other games as it is P2P. On a 1-10 scale I'd give the game 7.5 in it's current state. Fun gameplay but repetative.
NachoGame;-;Awesome game to be honest. I don't play it much because I find it confusing (especially the menu) the buttons are everywhere. But I guess thats only personal experience. All in all, this is a 9/10
terminator cat;-;The most artistic and extreme scifi action game of all and best of all its freeeeeeeeeee the controls are very easy and every level is big and beutiful.
[OMG]Mighty Villain;-;ninjas in space+super powers+lots of guns=lots of fun and best part is the game is F2P
BabyVelociraptorJesus;-;Best Free-to-play that I have ever had.
General_101;-;Definitely a great game you should try out. Even if you dont like shooters it's still worth a spin since it is free.
IWillHealUrBalls;-;Most epic 3rd person shooter i have ever played
Ashen Rex;-;It's a grind, but fun enough I don't mind. The currency system is outlandish, but you can build or earn most weapons and equipment without buying them. Though, it may take you years to do so.
Exarch;-;Yeah it's an well-made game...definitely recommeded if you have a good pc
[HvB] BrambleWolf;-;Hours of bloody gore soaked fun
Janfox;-;NINJAS SPACE EXPLOSIONS 123Achievments FREE TO PLAY!
iRaul;-;This game is EPIC.Future ninjas and hacking are a great combination.The parkour in this game is AWSOME!!!!!!!!!!
Juanstin;-;You can look at my game time and I've only had this game for about 3 weeks now. I only played a couple of hours the first week then got addicted to this game. It's a very fun, sci-fi based, robot alien killing, fast paced, co-op game. It does have some features that make it seem like you need to pay but you don't. Here's the run down: You can spam/farm void missions to get in game currency e.g. selling prime parts(from void missions) for platnium anywhere from 4p to 250p+. This game is either wait to get it or pay to get it instantly.
IAmJustDandy;-;I love this game so much but I swear to yall i am scared to play by myself. I love the fun with me bow. The most important thing i would have to say is that know your warframes before you play the game. It was kinda difficult when i picked my warframe (hint:I picked Volt). It was kinda hard to understand the controls because I have not played a game amazing as this on a PC. I STRONGLY RECOMMEND THIS FUN THRILL RIDE OF A GAME.
Sage Bell-Curve Caminades;-;+ Extremely good visual + Extremely fun gameplay + Active community(join a clan) + Not pay to win, but pay to look awesome + Free to play ? Extremely time consuming - Bugs, not so bad though
Tavas;-;Really awesome game! Try it! U'll never regret.
[TSP] Spodermen;-;Space Ninjas. Enough said.
hooma;-;It's like star wars but with with no clones.
Sir Doctor o Tardis;-;Hands down best, most balanced F2P I have every played. PvE focused (currently) with no need to buy anything.
kingwithnocrown;-;A fast-paced action-packed third person shooter that will entice you within minutes. The range of available characters and weapons to unlock and build really add to the game's possibilities of ways to play, fight and win. The only "negative" thing I have come to notice is that you can't really unlock other warframes to use until mid to late game (unless you spend real money), but even that just encourages more gameplay and more fun! But a word of caution: This game does not have a running storyline after the first missions, so if you are looking for a plot to get involved in, this is not the game. Needless to say, overall, this game is a great action-filled TPS that will have you hooked for life and the fun will go on without end.
SnugglesMcCunt;-;I'm not a huge fan of FPS. So, having the melee attack & bow option is great. The graphics are amazing as well. I also like that anyone can be recruited into a squad or you can even select solo..as I'm more prone to soloing.
Tuna Kai;-;This game is THE !!! A/10 would rail again! Grustrag Three can suck my boltor :>
MirLeach;-;Amazing game love every moment about it space ninjas ftw
Tacocat;-;look at my hours, need i say more? well.. its pertty good :)
Barrfind&Rarity;-;For me, great game. Many shooting and sword fighting or special skills. Many weapons and missions, really cool.
Thunder&Lightning;-;10/10 Would ninja again P.S. IT'S FREE, FUN, AND ING MAGIC SPACE NINJA WITH PARKOUR.
GenDryfuss;-;Pretty good okay! lmao
La Zerkaa;-;very fun c:
The Soldier With No Name;-;It's a really nice game but there are quite a lot of bugs, i hope it will be fixed (i think it will be fixed).
Charmeleon;-;Alright got a little bored though
SpeedWeed;-;Ninjas in space, they can fire, they can jump and do ninja stuff 11/10
Gemalken;-;Free to play and no pay to win, only pay to expidite time of building the weapons and or frames. Game is great a must try for those that have PC and want gears of war/ mass effect action style gamplay
Mr. Purvanen;-;Ever wanted to be a space ninja? Well then this is the game for you! its a third person shooter featuring co op and pvp in different "sectors" across several worlds.You get to wear a speacial suit that has its own abilities and playstyle. With a variety of primary, secondary and melee weapons, you can customize your playstyle to your hearts content Pros - Tons of parkour - variety of enemies - lots of customization Cons - really no story - lots of micro transactions - hard to get into easily
deepsspeed;-;this one's a sweet deal XD
Demens;-;YOU ING RUN AROUND, SHOOT , IF YOU'RE TAKING TO MUCH DAMAGE RUN AWAY, RUN AROUND SOME MORE, SHOOT MORE , WELL DONE YOU HAVE COMPLETED THE LEVEL. YOU WANT NEW ITEMS? SORRY YOU'LL HAVE TO BUY THEM WITH IRL MONEY OR PLAY THE SAME MISSIONS AND RUN AROUND, SHOOT , IF YOU'RE TAKING TO MUCH DAMAGE RUN AWAY, RUN AROUND SOME MORE, SHOOT MORE  ABOUT 60 TIMES IN ORDER TO EVEN ING DO ANYTHING WORTHWHILE IN THIS . NEVERMIND THE FACT THAT YOU HAVE TO LITERALLY WAIT DAYS TO CRAFT ITEMS, THEY ARE ING EXPENSIVE AS  TOO WHICH JUST ADDS EVEN MORE TO THE ING GRINDING. THE UI IS CLUNKY AND UNINTUITIVE, I'D RATHER ING PLAY SILKROAD ONLINE AND GET SCAMMED BY ING TURKS PURPOSELY IN ORDER TO TRY TO PURGE THE MEMORY OF ING PLAYING THIS BORING ING GAME FROM MY ING BRAIN. play if you're an autist.
kRaZiEGAMER;-;This is one hell of a game.
Doc McStabbins;-;This a Fun Far Future GAme im soo iliterate this is for da comunety bafge
Pandemik;-;It's a really good game considering it's free to play. I would definitly recommend it to people if they asked me, there is alot of action intense gameplay as you progress and lots of great characters to choose from. At first it seems a little slow and grindy but when you work hard for what your aiming for it really makes it seem worth while, where as some games just hand you the best stuff in a day. Definitly a good time killer when you get bored, or you can always play it in between games.
Abyss Raider;-;I love Warframe, and while I don't play the PC version as much as I do the console, it's fun regardless what platform you play it on!
Gnollbard;-;A pretty fun over-the-shoulder shooter/ninja-ing/parkour/sword-swingin' kinda game, you play as a space cyber-ninja in a cruel space-future. Also you can get an ugly lovable space bat-dog. Honestly, a fun game if you're looking for a time-sink, as it is fairly grindy. All weapons need to be levelled up, as do suits, and you have to gather materials to improve stuff or make stuff better. Like I said, grindy, but... still entertaining.
Concrete Surfer;-;Grindy grind! But still cool.
Norton | tipofthehats.org;-;Warframe is truly a wonderful games that ticks all of my boxes. It's god the best Sci-Fi feel, best action and of course the Ninja feeling to it. You can choose what you want to do when it comes to missons, want to go in guns blazing? Go ahead or if you prefer a more stealth approach to it then again, go ahead. The sound has improved dramatically over the years of Warframe and is really been a milestone for the developers to be proud of. They always surprise us with every update whether it be small or big. The music is perfect, it really does add the best theme you can get to battles and of course the music varies from battle to battle. The design is just the key symbol of Warframe, why you ask? See for yourself, it's just perfect. Every little detail Digital Extremes puts into the game always made the game more beautiful. The lighting is very dynamic, it's not too bright and not too dark in missions while keeping the good mix of lights to create the desired atmosphere. Gameplay in my opinion does need a bit of working, I just think Warframe is really hard to get into when you start as it only gets good when you start getting a real challenge. Digital Extremes did a good job when it came to Ninjas, I mean come on, you get to do Parkour. You get to run on walls while shooting and perform attacks with your sword in mid air flight. That's all I can say really, well there is one more thing. Get the game. You'll wish you played this game a long time ago. 10/10.
Steven Bills;-;Robots and Ninjas. Whats more to love? 11/10 Would ninja again
SuplexCityBitch;-;WARFRAME IS LIFE WARFRAME IS LOVE...............
Solovanov;-;Good TPS. Good variety of weapons although some become pretty useless later on in the game. Fairly free to play but getting reactors might take awhile since they only come through alerts which you either get or miss out on. Warframe alerts is good for that but it's still a you're there or you're not.
ComfortableFetus;-;This game is absolutely beautiful, and criminally overlooked. the developers, though very new to the MMO scene, have been constantly and tirelessly listenning to community input and giving out tons of awesome things to the players that have been around forever, not tomention has somehow predicted almost everything i wanted out of a shooter gae back when i was in like 8th grade or something and to top it all off it's 100% free to play, meanng there is no excuse to at leas try it yes it's buggy, but it's still in it's beta test stage. Digital Extremes has put their all into making an extremely diverse, unimaginably expansive and all-encompassing gameplay that brings several core gameplay types together in a way that synergizes like no other game i've seen, and they manage to do it with a sense of dirty humour that lightens the mood before those pesky server updates that make people restart their games i whole-heartedly recommend WARFRAME to anyone interested in a fun, albeit grindy, experience did i mention it's on PC, PS3/4, and XBOne? 9.999999999999999999/10 because the menu hub is really laggy for no reason on any computer i've used to play the game, but it doesn't interfere with the gameplay in any way
RHINOKING3;-;GOOD GAME THIS
Gaming4Dayz;-;Never heard of it? LOOK IT UP
Br3akn3ck;-;This game is epic, with amazing gameplay, amazing graphics, and it is just really fun to go around as these alien ninjas.... 1 tip though... don't forget to use your special moves that you learn before anything else.... EPIC GAME
Stratto;-;Listen, I've been playin this bad boy since the get go and I've watched it grow and prosper so mark my words: When this game releases it will be the best 3rd person shooter ever. Possible catch 22: This game has been in beta for 3 and a half years.
Blueray Darkes;-;Its a rather addictive game, and I like playing with Kubrow genetics. Trying to get an interesting one :O
acfchronicles;-;this is one high graphiced game with a great story line love it
Red T-rex GB;-;Great Game! Very good co-op if you wanted to play something with your friends. However the solo gameplay is just as good. Even though you can buy things in the game with real money it is not a pay to win game, as long as you play regularly you will be able to get the best gear just like everyone else. Highly recommend the game!
PrivateAzib;-;One really enjoyable game, especially with friends. Also you can play it for free without needing to buy anything! Also, space ninjas are cool.
Claritii;-;If you got the time and effort. This game is fun and easy. Paying makes the game boring and short lasting appeal. I mean. Yeah, colors are cool to buy. But the items that you can buy for free? Not cool, bro. I find it funny this games "a beta" and if you have friends or strangers and the good guns. You can have some extreme fun, or just hangout in your clan dojo. Or shoot a random army down. And I played this game 2 months after "beta" release. So I know what I'm doing. This game is phenonmal. I can't imagine whats in the full version. Lost out.
Nigellllllll;-;cool
Gordon Olaf;-;recommended for third person view style lover nothing more to say to this awesomeness wish i played this 1 year earlier :(
SaiyanSquad;-;This game is one of the first games I got when I got Steam. I LOVE this game. This is an amazing game. It's almost hard to believe it's free! LOVE IT!
XoN_TrickzZ;-;Pros + Good Customisation. + Good Combat. + Sound Quality is excellent. Cons - No clear story, your just thrown into the battle with no real reason to kill the enemies apart from your told to and that they're shooting at you. - Repetetive Environments (Jungle, factory, maybe if your lucky..... a bright factory). - Odd Weapon unlock system. Overall i would reccomend this game for the combat and customisation alone however if you look for fun and story telling in a game then this isnt the game for you, the gore may give you some giggles for the first few times you make an enemies torso fly into space team rocket style but once you've seen one decapateted enemy sliced and diced like mince meat, youve seen them all.
wuster11;-;all those of you who like hardcore coop shooters like warframe will be delighted with its content although its reliability of you spending real world money on a free game is kind of unfair
SkyZo;-;Warframe is great. Its lore is fantastic, the setting and artistic designs are excellent and its gameplay and re-playability are quite recommended. I easily found myself wanting to know more about the Tenno, the Lotus, the other factions, the Infestation viruses and mysteries within the solar system (Orokin and the Void, anyone?)... but the game explains very little outside the mini-solo Vors campaign. This game could have easily been my Game of the Year if it wasnt for so many issues regarding its game design. The most infuriating one being -> it's clearly a NOT PLAYER FRIENDLY game. - You're early forced to choose a single warframe and weapon composition at the very beginning of the game and commit to it whether you like it or not. - The Vor campaign feels like a mini tutorial. It's a fantastic way to explain the game mechanics and part of its lore, yet once it's finished, the game feels kinda empty plot wise and very little is explained. -Failing a mission will result into a TotalTimeWaste inc. - Playing stealthy is pointless. I found myself going sneaky bow, bo and kunai fighting when, to my surprise, the matchmaking kept throwing players at my game gun-blasting and speeding throughout levels, therefore ruining the solo experience I had enjoyed so far. - Soloing survival / capture / defense missions is a titanic task. Matchmaking is then mandatory. And it may result into god-like 1000+ grinded hours players or Hi, I just killed Vor and I barely know how to Warframe, bro players, so good luck! -Grinding for crafting materials throughout the solar system in a wide variety of missions is fun. Grinding a concrete annoying boss (Im talking about at you, Alad V and your pesky Zanuka) for a rare material that may or may not drop in order to craft an important part of the game such as Warframes Helmets is not. -80% of the mods you find are just salvage / vendor meat. -Map repetitiveness, predictable AI from the enemies and very little purpose on doing some missions makes you lose eagerness to login daily quite easily. -Learning curve is quite blur, and once you master the sprint + slide + melee attack drill, thats pretty much it, aside from Warframes powers. Dont get me wrong. Most of what Ive played from it is incredible for a F2Play game. Combat is fluid, build options are quite wide (2-handed, shotguns, spamming lightning Warframes, stealth, tanky-melee, etc.) and co-op features (clans and the like) will have you willing for more. STILL The game grabs you in, hooks you up for a while and tries to milk the platinum out of you. At some points, youll feel like playing Dark Souls 3000: some missions are plain *t to go through alone or no money invested. Again, having to wait 3 days for your new hard-earned Warframe to come out of the foundry or not being able to customize it with the colour you like (cosmetics aside) is not cool, yo!. I wouldve definitely paid 40+ bucks for a solid well put together single player campaign and a patchable online mode with 100% of the content reachable by crafting. But since the game offers the chance of not paying, I will continue to login every now and then and grind with no purpose at all (since the real cool stuff like Orokin reactors, Formas and its like are something out of the plebs' reach). At this point, and considering all of the above, Im quite certain to say that Free 2 Play model has screwed Warframe up. See you next patch, Tenno
Luciel;-;It's really worth it to play this
Blobanator;-;This game is really fun i recommend it to other people that haven't got this already, if you do get it you will enjoy it a lot.
Freaka' Nature;-;An awesome futuristic game, based on the competing factions of the Tenno, Grineer, Corpus and the Infested. You can acheive new warframes and modify them to their full extent. Honestly a really fun game when you get good stuff. 7.5/10
Vindicare241;-;I am growing a BAT-DOG on my SPACE SHIP (Did I mention I am a space ninja?)
WAITineed2reload;-;HOOKED. game play is crazy. pulls you in and keeps you there
Afternoon Dilemma;-;ROBOT NINJA FLYING THROUGH THE SkY!
Sky;-;Really great game. It has large updates that are put out each month. It keeps getting better. Very polished gameplay. One of the best free to play games I've played. I would highly recommend experiencing it with your friends as it was meant to be played cooperatively and it's a far more fun than when played solo.
Stefan;-;Amazing! Upgrade, Craft, and buy your way to victory! Addicting, really fun with bows and sword to slice and launch your enemies... Deffinately recommeded to everyone.
Trap Lord Sammy Sam;-;Do not start playing if you wish to have a life.
misfitkat;-;Lots of fun.....
Satans spawn666;-;the good except for in game purchases and how much the platium is
LazyAsHell;-;Space ninjas. with guns. and magic. Seriously, this is one of the best games ever. Has great graphics, easy to learn gameplay, and decapitating enemies! Very easy to mix and match guns, swords, and warframes to create your own class. But since it's still in beta, there's still some bugs. 9/10
() Martin ();-;I dropkicked a man and he survived. 9/10 Will give 10 if it could instantly kill.
Silver Wolfington;-;if you like space and ninjas, DOWNLOAD THIS BEAST
Pandax<3;-;Action packed game get it!
Boybandhair;-;Its a awesome game well almost any game that has space ninja's has to be awesome
MexicanWolf;-;Really fun game
DY;-;You can change... the color of your MOTHERING BLADE WOOOOOOOOAH 45446743567/10
PLLYw0w;-;Bugs make this game
Female_sniper;-;fun game.... at least try it Free to play all the way. You can get everything you need from the game itself without spending any real money on it. If you are picky and want this or that colour on your warframe/weapon, or if you have a save everything mania (such as saving all different warframes and all weapons e.t.c.) then yes you ned to cough up a bit of money. Hey, you get resources easily with some grinding (depending on your level of tolerance, grinding is not so bad) and you get blueprints easily by killing boses - you can afford to sell the weapons and warframes to make room for more without feeling too much of a loss. Yes, totally free and fun game. Repetitive only if you play solo or claim to play with others yet run away from them all the time - yeah, you need to learn teamplay, so if u aren't one then get lost right now. ^^
The Janitor;-;Full of everything that make a free-to-play MMO brilliant. Even runs on computers that aren't as 'beefy' as the current lot. 5 stars mate. Oh yeah, and it's about alien ninjas...
Ooaloly;-;This game combines amazing graphics and fun, fast gameplay into a amazing package. The division between different warframes and modifications available make this game unique. The best part is that there is no pay to play. Yes to get things it gets alittle grindy but its worth it. Well made game with more coming up for it hopefully
SagiCombo y su TTarius;-;good game, nice graphics and a good playability.
[NAGO]VoidKingHD;-;Ive spent some time playing MMOs but this one changed everything -Fast Paced Battles -Awesome Graphics -Crafting -Great Community If you want a good TPS MMO give this one a try
iRaul;-;This game is EPIC.Future ninjas and hacking are a great combination.The parkour in this game is AWSOME!!!!!!!!!!
Juanstin;-;You can look at my game time and I've only had this game for about 3 weeks now. I only played a couple of hours the first week then got addicted to this game. It's a very fun, sci-fi based, robot alien killing, fast paced, co-op game. It does have some features that make it seem like you need to pay but you don't. Here's the run down: You can spam/farm void missions to get in game currency e.g. selling prime parts(from void missions) for platnium anywhere from 4p to 250p+. This game is either wait to get it or pay to get it instantly.
IAmJustDandy;-;I love this game so much but I swear to yall i am scared to play by myself. I love the fun with me bow. The most important thing i would have to say is that know your warframes before you play the game. It was kinda difficult when i picked my warframe (hint:I picked Volt). It was kinda hard to understand the controls because I have not played a game amazing as this on a PC. I STRONGLY RECOMMEND THIS FUN THRILL RIDE OF A GAME.
Gut Head;-;ive played this game for about 1000 hours total. ive made different accounts to start over and found that warframe got better at helping new players in the game learn faster by delivering interactions one step at a time instead of a overload of information all at once. over all the game is great and almost never ending!
Delta_Actual;-;Space Ninja's! With Guns!!! Plus it's free! Download the game already!
Worm.;-;Good and interesting game ! +
john cactus;-;this a realy great game i recommend getting it.
Kirito;-;This is a great game and well worth playing
DJ Breadfish;-;Warframe was fast paced, run through, chop them up and shoot them up.
Lord Destruccion;-;Nice and Addictive game it take 60 hours of my life weekly i recommend it
Wren;-;Sick game for sure Great graphics great gameplay epic fights nothing more to say you like to fight here is your game in 3d baby
4 S3XY V4MP1R3 P1R4T3;-;This game rocks!!!!
Nya~ neko :3 NYYYA!;-;AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME not too to pay to win just a bunch of farming. But its worth it coz while u r farming u r still having fun :D However, it does get repetitive and predictible at times, so i recommend dont play too much a day unless u r farming for forma or potatos
Wario The Scrublord;-;This is a pretty great game, as long as you don't mind alot of waiting and grinding. Its updated pretty frequently with new content which is pretty great. Its a good game but you have to be willing to invest some time into it in order to get any good.
The Outlaw;-;great game, fun to play, overall one of my personal favourites
John Graham Doe;-;This game is like a combination of Star Wars, Star Trek, Halo, Mass Effect and EVERYTHING THAT IS SCI-FI AND AWESOME all in one, while still having a wide arrange of originality. It's an amazing game! The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is fluid and original, the customization is infinite, and best of all, IT'S FREE! GET THIS GAME! 10,000/10
Poww;-;Why havent I picked this game up earlier??
Kkusztekercs;-;One of the most correct F2P shooter. Every one have to try it!
Moony_Dreams;-;Sci-fi online shooter/slasher, oriented on cooperative gameplay. Missions with varied difficulty, assasination/espionage missions, various abilities to improve your character and weaponry (as well as levelling system for both your character and each weapon you use). Free-to-play, though you gonna pay some real money for some classy weaponry and characters, though it's totally okay to level up your starter set of weapons and your first character to a state of a kickass killing machine without no money spent at all! Not to mention crafting system - do missions on specified regions, collect resourses and make these weaponry and chars by yourself for free (and in-game funds). Good luck, have fun!
#1;-;good game & great game developers. I've play this game since there's nothing fishy. and while I played this game for the main game, I see lots of updates! game dev team are so great, more of bugs fixed, many thing updates not only the weapons.
(PG) GeorgeD11;-;such a good game recomend this to everyone. its just such a good game!!!!!!
robbyrider;-;awsome game all i found was my firewall had blocked it so it wouldnt work
(PanBrother) Dima_10000;-;its fun to play
#Hashtag;-;Out of all the games that i have played (probably about 208)this one is my most favourite
blwf_94;-;Every second you spend reading this review , is a second not spent playing this game . So you want a better explanation of this game eh ? Then lets get the biggest negative point out of the way first . This game has grinding like you've never seen before , but if you really can't wait you can always pay to speed things up . Most of the time you'll be doing this for the crafting , and trust me crafting in this game isn't on the level of most RPG games where you gather materials from hunting a lot of the same enemy and finding a crafting table to make it . This game's crafting is on the level of mobile games , everything takes time to complete , most weapons take 12 or 24 hours to complete while a new frame to play takes at least 3 and a half days . But of course you can skip all this by paying . There is one more negative point , but this can be viewed as also positive so I'll explain it in a moment Still with me ? Good , on to the good part . Each frame has their own individual powers ranging from turning invisible to shooting ice or fire to turning every enemy against each other to summoning the dead . And this gives each frame a new way of playing each mission . Leveling in this game isn't like other game either , you don't get stronger by gaining exp and leveling up you frame and weapons . This is where the other negative point comes in , you see this game contains something known as mods , you use these mods to increase damage , range , efficiency or even give your weapons an elemental effect . But in order to futher make you weapon or frame stronger you need to level up those mods , and the only way you can do that is by fusing spare mods with it , because of this some mods can take over 1000 hours before you hit it's maximum level , or Rank as this game calls it . But you don't get to just throw any mod in all you like for there are 2 limits that you need to follow . See every weapon and frame comes with a limit and that is 8 mods maximum with the execption of Frames and melee weapon who have 9 . Plus they all have a Mod capacity ( think of it as a weight limit that you can't go over ) that fills each time you put in a mod , and the stronger the mod the more it fills up . Of course there are ways you can increase this limit such as doubling it ( only once though ) and installing something known as a Forma . The game itself is rather rollercoaster like , Sometimes you'll find youself running and shooting so many enemies you'll happilly say "Holy crap it's only been 2 minutes ?" when you find out very little time has actually passed sometimes and sometimes you'll be so bored because of how slow things are that you'll find your self dismally saying " Holy crap it's only been 2 minutes ?" and for a specific mission known as survival where you need to kill enemies and hope they drop life support for you to pick up so you can replenish you own life support so you can stay longer but they don't drop any life support and you realise your life support getting dangerously low and you Scream " HOLY CRAP IT'S ONLY BEEN 2 MINUTES ?!" If you want to pick up this game i suggest finding at least 3 other friends you can play with cause this is a game thats more fun in a group of people you use skype or the in game mic to talk with . In the end i highly recommend you playing this game . it's a great game now and it's only getting started .
TwiztedDerp;-;Awesome game, fast paced and lots of missions and stuff to do
Willhiem;-;Great graphics, wonderful gameplay, and a caring community.
Parvani;-;I absolutely love this game. Although I'm not the greatest player, I feel like it is a game that is easy to learn. The controls are easy and the gameplay is awesome. I love the graphics and the freedom you have when it comes to customization of your character and weapons.
Iugk;-;Space, ninjas, space ninjas, ????!1/1/11?!!?????!111?? and a ton of grinding and also more grinding. 10/10
Hoezell Cadarn;-;Warframe is a cooperative TPS action game set in an sci-fi universe. Basically magical space ninjas shooting and slicing everyone, and this makes it a pretty addictive game.
Evil;-;If you like ninjas, space, and mass effect 3's mulitplayer this is the game for you Warning highly addctive Another warning you must pay for weapon and warframe slots but honestly you can make money in the trade channel to do that so not a big deal
VestalTempest;-;I give it an about 8/10, good visuals, very fun gameplay, 97% of the stuff you can get for free without paying, alot of grinding however, and there is no story as of yet (still in beta), and there isnt much end game content but however that is most likely to change in due time. Note:Will lag you to hell if you dont have a good computer.
Kennethyerules;-;Great game fun as to play all that choppin up and killing :D would pay $ for this game 10/10
Deluxian_Pride;-;It's scary and a little too high quality for my graphics chip but it's an awesome game for Ninjas
Darkfreack;-;Ninjas in space. What else needs to be said. Great fun, fast paced, intense moments. Best experienced with friends. Can be done solo but expect it to get a lot harder.
TOBYRONE;-;Brilliant game
Similon;-;From a purely objective point of view, this is quite possilby the best game I've played. Graphically, it's on a par with some of the high end games, which for a F2P game is quite impressive. There are a few minor clipping issues, but that's true of everything. The gameplay is fast paced, brutal and highly addictive. The levelling is Simple, it doesn't take long to max out a weapon/frame but there are 120-odd weapons and 20-odd Frames, with more of both being released all of the time. This leads on nicely to the only problem I have with the game: When you first start, you'll probably have Excalibur (you do have the choice of 3 frames, but most people seem to go for him), Lato, Braton & Skana. With no clear signs of how to unlock the others. It then takes a while to gather your resources and start building. This can be a bit off putting, but I urge you to carry on.
Abel272;-;I feel like this game is if Gears of war and Assassins creed had a baby,I do wish that there was more of a need of the parkour,but the combat is fluent and great. This game is a BLAST to play with friends, and I would reccomend it if you want a co-op game.
King of Rootbeer;-;Its fun
Zearus;-;Imagine if a moba and a third person shooter had a child, now add space ninjas. Its a free to play game and its great people. Stop reading the review and download it already. Its great, its not pay to win and if you think it is your probabley insane. Just go download it.....like right now.......stop reading this....... What else do you want? there are ninjas, a great clan system, ninjas, a fun variety of powerful yet intresting weapons, ninjas, parkour and etc. At the time of writing this the game has a update every wensday (not counting hotfixes) adding new weapons and other various changes. Everything is always fairly balanced and the characters all feel unique and different from one another. I could go on for a long time about how much I enjoy this game but to sum this review up, DOWNLOAD IT NOW WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR? If you already downloaded the game i have no clue why your still reading this review, the developers tend to be very active in the community and livestream on twitch every 2 weeks to talk about various things, feel free to watch that and learn about various things like sneak peeks about new weapons and stuff. Its free to play so if you hate it the only thing you really wasted is your time and thats not really so bad now is it? and honestly if it is then you shouldn't of been playing a game to begin with dummy.
DrNightHunter;-;SPACE NINJAS! This game is really good. It has a nice fast pace,interesting story,atmosphere and characters and awesome gameplay. The guns and swords feel so good to use and it provides a nice challange to those looking for one. There are some issues that bother me since i last played (was a while ago) but leveling up and getting money takes FOREVER and i feel that with the third person camera there should be a cover system of sorts. Not to mention the few bugs here and there but that arent gamebreaking 9/10 "It was okay" -IGN
Sinclair;-;Easily the most addictive, visually unique and engaging free-to-play game I have played in a VERY long time.
^2Mr^4Nogi;-;Space Ninjas. Nuff said - 10/10
kennyljs;-;This co-op shooter really gets to you unlike others. The storyline isn't that great, but who cares when you can have weapons and skills that can slaughter enemies by the hundreds. I put it many hours into this game and it is well worth the time and money if you are into the pay to get latest item first kind of people. If not, just normal play is very addictive. So, if you think shooting with style is your thing, then Warframe is for you!
Dragonlord3344;-;Awesome game, full of alot of small glitches, but always getting better.
-CM-Grimm;-;best game i've played in a long time
[229] Lego Player;-;A little repetitive, but the customization, teamwork, and overall fun factor completely make up for it.
Douifer;-;Love it 10/10 will play again
ReeceKrispie;-;Fantastic game, sliced.... then diced all oponents. Doing all sorts of ninja madness... reconnmended
HugeTiger100;-;This is an awesome game... I WOULD pay for this. lucky its free though :P 9/10
twizzm.;-;its free. it has guns. its in space. why not?
sab0t;-;i play this game like i would play quake. 10/10
afarina;-;Holy cow! Why didn't I start playing this sooner? I heard about this game when it was still in closed beta and thought it had to be stupid. I started playing it a little over a month ago and all I can say is WOW!! Addicted!
GERstarBROT;-;One of the best, if not even THE BEST Free2Play Game, I have ever played. No pay to win because mostly it's played as a CO-OP Game. You can get pretty much everything with InGameCash and Resources you farm on the different Planets... Buying it with real money is much faster, but pretty much unneccesary. Through daily Login presents you can even get a discount price for Platinium (the Cash you gain through real money). I recomment playing it with friends on Teamspeak, it's easier and much more fun, plus you can talk about how you want to handle the missions (rushing through them, mostly farming every single piece of Sh*t, or going trough stealthy) The Game get's much attention form the gamemarker's, buggfixes can be seen often, ..... In my opinion clearly a 10/10 or ***** :D
WhiteTigerWoods;-;This is now my favorite game on Steam! I don't have the best computer in the world or good internet connection, but this game gives you amazing graphics, smooth action gameplay, and not to mention a great story line! HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!!
DarkXpyder;-;Pretty great and free, although there are some annoying limitations that can't be overcame without speding a few bucks, but even considering that, it's a considerably cheap game, updated weekly and with something that has been missing in games for a long time, Clan Building, you can actually build stuff and design you clan hall the way you want it! Be it an maze like structure with things thrown around like crazy or a perfectly symmetric beauty, its not a fast thing to do, but it can be done, and it can be done for free, with no real money involved! The action is great, there is a good variety of weapons and frames(the characters you play), there is still long way to go and it can only get better, start now and do not risk losing alot of nice prizes in the events that are ran at least once a month or so! Get an invite! https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=5154406d1a4d80276800006c my in-game name is Xpyder
SpecklesTheDilo;-;This is an amazing game. I saw this when i was young and i got that face and that feeling,that goooood feeling.I eventually forgot about it but then a few faithful months ago,during my last days of grade 6, I found this game again. It is free. Who does not like free games? But i did not get it because it was free.... I am very catious with my choosing of games, and a free game? Id probably pass because usually free games are small boring things, or good alphas and betas,and this one happened to be a beta when i got it. Usually, when playing a beta, I say, Oh hey! Look at that! Thats pretty cool! But these things do not look so good, and this needs work, and.... But warframe, but this was different. This was, to me, no way a beta. it had all this and that and those and also these!!!! it had Swords, Lasers, Ninjas, Multiple male AND female characters, Dismemberment of enemy bodies for when you felt down, it had scythes and daggers and hammers and axes, it had maps galore!!!! It had good textures, sentinels, and, I hpe im not getting ahead of myself, but, this game is just so amazing!!!! AND I, RECCOMEND THIS GAME, AND EVERYTHING IT STANDS FOR 100%!!!!
Studmuffin53;-;With the fate of your race in the balance, it is up to you and the few remaining Tenno to push the enemy out of the solar system. 8/10 a lot of fun with friends, gets difficult if you try to take on higher levels alone. The use of schematics to acquire weapons and Warframes makes the feeling of getting new equipment all the more satisfying. Although, if you are not a patient person the ability to purchase the equipment directly through the use of platinum (which is purchased with real money) can help you get the quick advantage over the enemy.
|Shift|;-;This game is just amazing! It gets new updates and hotfixes weekly, adding more content for you to play and explore with friends.
Castiel The Angel Of Holy Memes;-;Ninjas and swords and lasers and !
Pidgeon Lord;-;i flayed this game 4 1 year and i lost my virginity when i stoped playing
Atomicburnout;-;If you are debating wether or not you want to download Warframe, Download it! many of my friends tell me "its to complicated" or "its boring" i will admit i felt a little overwhelmed at the beginnig but i got over it as everything became understandable along with the awesome people you can meet online. I promise you that you will have at LEAST a small bit of fun. Do i recommend this game? YES.
Stanbony;-;Now this game for free is totaly awesome! not sure id spend the hudreds that you could to be invinceable, but, you can progress and rank up with a litttle help from other warframes, the maps and missions are endless! you could probly spend an unimaginable amount of hours on this game alone, I recomend it to anyone who loves the fast pace, shoot em up, coop and deathmatch type of alien crazy i mean forever mods weapons, and customizability type of game, how it got a 68 is beyond me! free is 50 and a game that works good is atleast another 25 in my book, with the anount of updates, i mean like everyday, these dudes got there #$%^& together, I love it for a free game.
Kinasu;-;Warframe has cought me by strom i am not normaly in to games like this but this one has me locked down i hope to see great things to come i give this game currently a 8.5/10
Flicker Connection;-;I WILL NOT FORGET THIS MOMMENT WHEN IM PLAYIN THIS IN GAME 69/10 WOULD PLAY ANYTIME AFTER DOTO!
Solovanov;-;Good TPS. Good variety of weapons although some become pretty useless later on in the game. Fairly free to play but getting reactors might take awhile since they only come through alerts which you either get or miss out on. Warframe alerts is good for that but it's still a you're there or you're not.
ComfortableFetus;-;This game is absolutely beautiful, and criminally overlooked. the developers, though very new to the MMO scene, have been constantly and tirelessly listenning to community input and giving out tons of awesome things to the players that have been around forever, not tomention has somehow predicted almost everything i wanted out of a shooter gae back when i was in like 8th grade or something and to top it all off it's 100% free to play, meanng there is no excuse to at leas try it yes it's buggy, but it's still in it's beta test stage. Digital Extremes has put their all into making an extremely diverse, unimaginably expansive and all-encompassing gameplay that brings several core gameplay types together in a way that synergizes like no other game i've seen, and they manage to do it with a sense of dirty humour that lightens the mood before those pesky server updates that make people restart their games i whole-heartedly recommend WARFRAME to anyone interested in a fun, albeit grindy, experience did i mention it's on PC, PS3/4, and XBOne? 9.999999999999999999/10 because the menu hub is really laggy for no reason on any computer i've used to play the game, but it doesn't interfere with the gameplay in any way
SHAVE/SHADE SQUAD;-;It takes a bit to get used to (how to equip various mods, upgrading your armor/weps, etc.) but is absolutely worth it! The graphics are awesome, the levels are friggin' amazing, and it can surely give a challenge to any kind of player! The frames (armor) for each class looks absolutely amazing, and each class has it's personal skill (Ultimate, basically) that's cool!
SheepGoMad;-;Way too addictive. Can't stop playing. Must sleep more..
SazerTarious;-;1100+ Hours and still loving it. I will post an honest Review about this Game, Some people might not like the cons section, hey even i don't like it but this is true about this game and you can't or even i can't deny it. Pros: - Developer Interaction with community. - Hotfixes/Updates every Wednesday. - New content almost every month. - (Huge Pro) It's not a pay to win game, you can get every single warframe, weapon, sentinel and even that Prime without spending even a single Benjamin's or i can say those green Notes. (Exception is Customization or i can say those sparkly stuff to make your warframe, weapon or sentinel look nice). - This game rewards you for playing, what i mean is go on missions farm some mods, weapon or warframe parts and then sell them in trading post for in game premium currency. - This game has one of the best clan/dojo system i have ever seen. - Not to forget about future updates that'll include player ships, new tile sets, Hubs, Focus System and much more. - My final thought on pros section is that this game is highly Addicting and no pay to win bs, if something that effects gameplay like weapons, warframe, sentinels then you can get it for free. Cons: - Relies heavily on RNG, which can be a pain in the behind. (Devs know about this issue but still they don't do nothing, instead they use RNG more and more and recently they introduced it in events, yes i am talking about recent Breeding Grounds Event). - Sometimes devs have tendency to listen to new new players and implement changes that are not necessary and useless, (i mean who can give more clear and important feedback, a guy who just started playing and thinks everything in game is OP or the one who's been playing for 100's of hours). - If you don't like grinding for stuff then items that you purchase from market for premium currency (platinums) in this game are way too exepnsive. - Major issue this game has is RNG, My final point in Cons section is that, if you don't have problem with RNG and Grinding then this game is for you, and if you have problem with grinding and RNG then you'll end up buying stuff in market, which is expensive (i mean one weapon can cost you up to 250 platinums or about 15USD), Now it's up to you what and how you want new stuff in this game by grinding or by paying. Overall this game is highly addicting, stuff that effects gameplay is free and sparkly stuff will cost you money (Developers have to make money too right), RNG can be a pain in the behind but with the help of friends and clan mates this issue can be resolved. New stuff that developers have planned for future major updates is extremely awesome, Overall i HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS GAME.
King Slothington;-;In Warframe you can butt-slide up stairs. 10/10
Wven2306;-;Burning players with the specific alert reward which everyone wanted ever since the beginning~ Will burn again! 10/10~
PsychoMantis;-;Pretty exciting and offers many ways to get even the strongest gear. While purchasing platinum is a MUCH faster way to obtain things, almost everything is obtainable without purchasing anything. The frustrating thing about this game is definitely the net code and the irritating amount of customization options that are totally locked unless you purchase them with platinum ( on that note freebies are given away at random holidays ie. christmas and valentine's day. )
ronin.tetsuro;-;You've always wanted to be a badass space ninja. Warframe puts you there. Controls are tight, progression is multifaceted, and there's always improvements being made. Graphically symphonic. It's free, what the frack are you waiting for?
Zero_code_name_Reaper;-;This game is by far one of the best games i have played i dont normally care for shooter games i like racing games and open world games that pretty much have cars in them like NFS games and GTA granted GTA is considered shooter game but basically Warframe is most deffenitly an exception the graphics are great and the animations good and its also addictive AND it's free to play. Their is only one thing that seems to be a problem though and that is not only can you play with other people you can also play solo which is great BUT when your not connected to the internet and you want to play Warfame in solo you cant apparently you have to have the internet in order to play at all which is basically my only complaint but even at that i most deffenitly recommend this game
Glitch*K.O;-;Epic game! amazing with friends and its one of the few free to plays that is not pay to win! you can do every weapon, frame and items without paying a penny! great for ppl that love sci-fi! be aware that the game is always in development but the devs are realy supporting ;D. i give it 9/10 gg pps
Eternal Salvation;-;This game is absoulutly amazing! One of the best F2P game ever! Also great to play with friends, but it is even still a great game with strangers!
|VEX| TangoWithTojo;-;The game is great overall but with just a few little problems... Its extremely repetative. Almost the exact same place everytime with just a slightly different objective. The weapon and character mods are really only what keep it interesting. Also once you run out of platinum you have to pay for more... If it wasn't such a fast paced shooter then I would have stopped playing within the first hour but once you start you just cant stop! So even with the cons I would say get it because it is a pretty decent free game and is great if your just a casual gamer looking for some fun fast paced gameplay.
Jow;-;The best game
CocoCrispSmacker7;-;One of my best F2P game.
Shadowstarthe1st;-;I would Recommend this game to anyone who likes Space ninjas,Swords,Guns,Earning stuff,or just straight up likes beating the holy living crap out of thousands of enemies,or wallrunning,jump attacks,Awesome Developers and Deserving game, My hours say everything
Wukong;-;Are you a space ninja? Do you want te be a space ninja? Have you ever had a weird fantasy involving space, ninjas and maybe a couple of digestive biscuits? If so, look no further than Halo Rea.. I mean Warframe. With advanced sliding phisics, over 2 melee weapons and hundreds of bullets at your disposal, this game is really a revolution in dungeon crawling. I would highly recommend this game, to all players of literally any type of game, because if you dont like space ninjas, you probably dont like life.
Viper6332;-;yes this game is a really example of what can be done with time and dedictaion to your craft, this game is great for its co-op and single player aspects and the fact that its free is amazing if you compare this to some like payday 2 were you have to pay for it and it makes payday look like it was made by a 10 year old
rocl;-;Really fun with a group of friends on voice coms, the co-op is great and synergistic between personal choices once you reach more advanced levels of play.
That Obby gal;-;Free, addictive, ecxelent co-op, and it even has options for rvery play style. 110% reccomended.
MAX;-;this game is unique there isnt any other game like this. if you dont beilive your welcome try to find another game like this.good luck, but even that wont help you
hyve;-;It's good.
JustinCheeseMan;-;This game is One of the best games I have ever played!
[HvB] Cynteara;-;This over all a great game. The cash store system is very well made, i dont feel like its trying to force me into spending money. Everything can be earned in game through playing. The only thing you have to spend platinum ( the ingame cash store currency) on is cosmetics (color pallets, cosmetic attachments fo your warframe). You Still do not have to actually spend money on the game though. You can Earn Items in game, and sell teh m to other players for Platinum. You can Earn all the platinum you need fairly easily this way.
jaw112211;-;Highly Recommened! This game is fast paced, encourages teamwork, and has space ninjas. I mean really space ninjas! The missions will keep you interested as long as you dont spam the same one. The gunplay is great, and the reward system, well to put it simply, it's ACTUALLY rewarding! This game still gets updates as well which is great, and unlike certain games if a player walks over credits, EVERYONE gets the money and it isn't split so if one person walks over 300 dollars you all get 300 dollars. Also the customazation seems to go on forever. The only downside is that some items you have to buy with platinum... Which must be bought with real money, but it isn't nessacary to buy the platinum for a great time in this game. But by buying it, you help support this game and make any needed updates come easier and faster. I rate this game as a 97 out of 100. Just great. Also you can include your friends and start a clan!
Kongou;-;Warframe is.... It's kinda..... You know, I honestly can't describe this game and it's uniqueness, or, atleast, what uniqueness it has, which is a LOT. All in all, this game has everything, it has tight controls, a variety of map structures, for example, if you played first mission once, it will be a different map set-up each and every time, with the exception of the objective room, that will always look the same, HOWEVER, the layout is always different. There's a large variety of weapons, and warframes. Warframes, the games name. Warframes are...odd, I honestly have no idea what they are, they could be robots, or, remotly controlled, or even a person in a suit, no one really seems to know. As for controls, you can do MANY different combat manuvers, here's a few of my favorites: Backflips. Wall run.(Up and side) Front flips. Flying kicks. AND SO MUCH MORE! Not to mention, this is the most well polished free to play game, with the best model of it, you can get everything for the paid currency, OR, you can craft it, for FREE. Simply put: I freakin' love this game to peices. 9.5/10 The crafting takes 12 hours on normal things(Weapons, components) and 3 DAYS on warframes.
contagiousrage;-;This game impressed me so much that i nearly fell of my chair. the first time i saw warframe i thought to my self,how great can this game be. Then i played it,man did i injoy it <-------did?,what am I talking about I still love this game. The graphics is good (by that i mean insane)the gameplay is surprisingly awesome and it has a nice touch of team work. if you die your freind can still help you from getting back into that insane battelfeild. Of course you can play offline but thats.....how do i put this,cinda hard(yep allot).This game is very fun aswell from shocking a Corpus to cutting Greneer in half. This game is all about going mad (insane if thats what you whant to call it). So hack and slash your whay through warframe. Give it a try
picturehead;-;The best free to play game EVER!!
Andry;-;This game has taken away my soul and all my emotions, leaving me a shell of the man I once was. 10/10
Khaos;-;This is by far one of the best Free2PLay games I have ever played. My Windows computer isnt that great. I have to run almost lowest settings. The good thing is I get no lag! The graphics are amazing and the missions are great. The only bad thing is that Platinum(In Game Curremcy) is a little overprices for how much you could buy. Over all i would recommend this game to everyone!
PrivateChekobee;-;By now I have hundreds of hours in Warframe and I can confidently say that it is a great game... If you don't mind grind. Oh My God the grind. It isn't "New Spiral Knights" level grind, but it is not uncommon to run missions for hours for a single rare mod that drops from one type of enemy. But the gameplay is pretty solid, the game looks great, and the devs are more than willing to listen to the community about things that need changing or fixing. Content is regularly being added and DE does its best to keep the community involved and in the loop (including letting the fans compete to design weapons). Overall, 8/10 because it just keeps pulling me back in.
Mugen Is King[MAB];-;I do recommend this game to anyone who doesn't have a crappy computer. It's free to play, so let's keep this in mind as we go along on this wonderful journey. Warframe, in my opinion, has beautiful graphics and scenery. It does lack in the story department just a tad. However, it makes up for it in it's fun style of game play, and etc.. etc. Overall if you spend more than 3+ hours on your computer... This is a game to get~ One thing I might mention though is the new player experience, be cautious... ^-^ Have fun Tenno~ (P.S. This is probably a crappy review seeing as how it is my first game review. It may also be extremely crappy because Im bored. ENJOY DECIPHERING IT!)
seclusion;-;Warframe the better game I have never seen before !!! Very good game, a delicious blend of the finest style of play last years. Awesome, beautiful, style, etc ... A word "Bravo !!!"
AxiumSA4;-;Remember life, now you dont.
grimm reaper;-;its a great multi player free game with a choice of weapons quests pets and money i love the game because its fun to play with your mates and i recommend it
Axel;-;This game is cool, like a coop hack and slash sci-fi game + tps shooter, awesome.
Peppermint (TMFtwelve);-;I feel like this is a game I'm gonna be playing for a while... Pros: - NINJA SPACE SWORDS SHOTGUNS - Co-op elements - Awesome introduction - Multiple guns and a awesome arsenal - Also some RPG elements added Cons: - Kinda lags on lowest settings - I prefer first person - Some P2W elements, but at least they don't scream MONEY at you I recommend this game for the awesome shooting n stuff, and cool storyline.
Naoto Shirogane;-;ive been waiting for this and its here finally
VGCO | ParamountViking;-;Wow... just wow. This game has to be one of the best Free to Play (F2P) video games that I have ever played. As you can expect, there are some micro-transactions; howver, they do not take away from the gameplay aspect of the game. They only thing that money can give you in this game is that it takes away the tons of time you have to spend in this game to get anything good. In conclusion, this game is definitely worth it. I mean for crying out loud, the game is free... FREE! You can spend hundreds of hours in this game and still have something new to keep you going! Rate: 9/10
The Inquisitor;-;This is Free-2-Play done correctly. It offers players the ability to spend a decent amount of time playing the game to unlock weapons and different Warframes organically through gameplay, or you can spend monies to unlock them instantaneously. The requirements to acquire new weapons and Warframes, and even pet drones that help the player in battle are not overly tedious or "grindy", they take a while and the work put into getting anything in the game feels very well worth it. However, there is one F2P practice that I dislike, and if I could, I'd discourage all developers from doing: paying real money for color schemes. So what if I want to paint my Warframe/weapons/drone a different color than their standard colors? Nope, give us some money first. I understand that Digital Extremes is trying to make some money off the game, with the starter packs, buying wepons and Warframes in the game with real money without any wait or work, but paying for color schemes? That's kind of "meh" in my book. Anyways, despite that one business practice, this game is amazing, and easily is my second favorite game of all time. Easily scores a 9/10, and would get a 10/10 if the monetization of colors wasn't in there.
Kirashiro;-;Its game about perfect futuristic life form of space knights defending universe against every form of evil ...
Mr Ultimate Grandpa Sandvich;-;very good game its fun and cool with powers like dash slice and other powers like that its really fun but i mostly pefer it with friends i recomend this ps:for u who dont know this game is connected to dark sector if u dont know what that game is go buy or watch a playthrough on youtube and you'll see how its connected
MrKamikaD;-;Awesome game, through the ninja description may be misleading. You don't get much of stealthy content :P Although, it's fully f2p, you can get all the fancy items totally free in pretty short time, all the items only availble for platinum (cosmetics) aren't overpriced. You can get platinum by trading some wanted items, which are also easy enough to get. And buying platinum is also not so big deal, when you get the 75% discount for daily logging in, which actually drops pretty often too. Taking it back to gameplay itself, we have a really nice world in means of graphics and lore (hard to dig it). Game Is highly optimized, highly customizable. Only downside I noticed so far are bugs. A bunch of them, more or less anoying, still worth a bit of nerves for that fancy game and looking at DE work the game keeps on growing, getting better and getting fix.
clockworksaga;-;+I can play this free? Yeah. +I've spent about 40-50 bucks and I feel ready to play my way! -I'm grinding again, a few more dollars will get me what I want but my video game budget is down. (yeah, I love gaming and they love my $) +Metal Gear Rising with good controls and muti-player and.... -bare-boned story (gamers like to fill in the blanks, but common!!!!) +++I didn't buy this, but spent my money the way I wanted to. Gamers are skeptical about micro-transactions, but I never bought the game in the first place...so I think we all came ahead on WF. (let's hope the dev's keep that in mind and not milk our wallets!)
OTLe |MrNewBorn;-;This game is nice if you have a lot of free time on your hands and this is not a pay to win game. Everything can be made if you have time to do so.
The Face Trainer;-;Fun and fast gameplay with interesting features. Would recommend to play it with friend, or it can get a bit boring after some time. Also a bit grindy , but in all I'd recommend it.
Meltankos;-;Great game!
DeathWatch;-;Yes - That simple
druck91;-;awsome a must play
Kazuno;-;Warframe has really high flashy graphics integrated with nvidia physx technology. All the explosions, bullets have make the gameplay more intense and enjoyable. However, the missions and maps are very repetitive, resulting the game to be dull. In addition to that, the is no really helpful guide in the game. I find it very difficult to understand the game mechanics until i have done my research in warframe wikia and warframe forum.
Shadowpalm;-;Ninjas. With guns. In space. Doing parkour. Plus magic. Just play it, it's free. You have no excuse.
Dr.DoomLittle;-;Warframe, though it may be slow at first, is an outstanding Free to Play game. With a  amount of content and completely new classes and weapons and cosmetic items earned completely free, it is also an excellent deal. I have spent no money at all, and about 60 hours in have constructed dozens of weapons, hundreds of mods and killed thousands of enemies. Give it a try, and add me if you need some help! 85/100
Toxia;-;A very pretty sci-fi shooter with impressive ninja-style gameplay. Levels are randomly generated so if you replay a mission its different every time, this can get a bit repetitive when the same room or corridor is used 4 times in the same level though, but hey, its space, efficiency in ship design is crucial. :P Unfortunently there are no free female warframes by default, you have to pay for one or basically complete half the game to craft them, normally I wouldn't complain about this but Warframe promotes heavy character development and customization, ergo it's difficult for me to get in touch and immersived in such a game while playing a male character. Other than that it's a really nice game... oh and free to play of cause!
Mara;-;This game has two things I normally dislike, Free to Play and a strong multiplayer focus. On top of that it has next to nothing going on in terms of story or characters. However, it is a ton of fun to play. Gradually improving your equipment and facing larger odds and threats is very satisfying and it's easy to find a build that feels unique to you (or be a boring person and follow a guide, I guess). It takes a while to get going, there are some rough edges (it's a Beta, after all) but the combat is very rewarding and generally fair and the monetization mechanics are generally not that annoying.
DarKGameR177;-;Awesome action game to play with friends :D
Logan_Winters;-;This game has changed a-lot (for the better) from when i last played it. it is now in my top 5 favorite games, instead of my top 5 worst games. 12/10 dolphins.
chalthas;-;What more is there to do than recommend this game? First of all, it's free to play. This means you don't have to pay money to play it. It does not mean it will run like those flash-games that represented what was free to play just 5 years ago. (Although free to play used in the manner as it is used in Warframe it means you can play without paying, but paying could make the experience better. Nonetheless, as a non-paying user, I think for myself that it plays just fine for free.) Warframe's looks are equal to or better than most AAA releases and the gameplay is likewise. It might take more than a few hours of playing it to understand how to work it properly, and it doesn't always tell you excactly how to pull off every move, but this also leaves a lot of room for experimentation, which I think is one of the points where this game shines rather brightly. If you like ninjas, sci-fi, shooters, stealth actions or slashers, Warframe is likely to hit you in at least one good spot.
[error];-;I have no idea who and why am I killing all those things that are who and where but I totally enoyoj it... and u can upgrade ur .... definetly worth tryin... :D
Infinity;-;Good game if you like free running and kicking the enemys  only bad thing about this game is the bugs and connection issues but then no one likes that stuff anyway
Surprise BackStab;-;This game might repeat it-self a bit. Butt in the end of the day it is one of the most amazing F2P there is. with Hours of playing, tons of guns, characters and missions to unlock and play, not to mention it is co-op. this game is not one of those "Pay to Play" crap, in this game if you pay you only rush stuff up, everything that costs can be crafted whitch gives even more play time. In other words....DOWNLOAD IT. NOWWW. *Heavy voice*
{TFT}SheeplockHolmes;-;Very good if you have a strong enough computer, awesome graphics and gameplay. Well worth playing.
VivaVoce;-;Very futuristic, good graphics and effects.
Nutegg;-;its a very fun game
NAPSTER;-;Now Warframe is a special type of game: its about you and the so called Teno. The Teno is a high technological grupe thats like assassins and guardians. They are all master of parcur. The nice thing about this game is that nomatter what your into there is usually somthing you will like. Fighting: There are plenty of maps to play and there is wave maps if you get board. Builder: You can get a clan and if you have a clan you can get a clan dojo which is this giant space ship you can build rooms in. Supporter: You can gather recorses to build on your dojo or make wepons and warframes. The downside is that when you have picked your first warframe(playermodle) you cant change it unless you buy a blueprint and make a new one or buy it for platinium. also the level decine is annoying becaus its the same goddame thing your running through the first 4-7 maps. But else then that the game is great and if you got friends you got a epic team.
Drakmannen005;-;This Game Is..... AWESOME
Flamerider901;-;it was fun
owlink23;-;Warframe... MAH GAWD!
Lewis;-;Glory to Warframe. When I first started the game offered a challenging scaling game. With all the updates after it the story progresses and the game gets better. DE tries hard as a developer to listen to it's fan base. Not so much on here but on their own forums. Fast paced gameplay, ninjas, and a great Sci Fi setting are the hallmarks of this game. I still have not yet cleared every map point and the alert missions keep me on my toes as I see chances for good loot and the battles between the Corpus and Grineer. I'd recommend this game to anyone who has an open mind and maybe a buddy or two willing to give it a shot. With U14 a great tutorial launched making the learning curve less of a pain. Good luck if you take the game up! If not best of luck where you end up.
^4 mums spaghetti;-;well uh, this game has good graphics. thats about it. :\
The Deanie;-;This is what happens when you marry the excitement of the Mass Effect Trilogy to the Gears of War Franchise, you would have Warframe. If you enjoy both those games, the visuals of Mass Effect, and all it's Sci-Fi goodies, and just want hords of baddies coming at you. Get this game.
Thug owl;-;i really love warframe butthey need to add more wild on earth, hope that happends!!
[ MAXIMUM OVERKERMIT ];-;I went into Warframe thinking it'd just be another ORION: Dino Horde. ...After about 6 hours of nonstop gameplay, a lack of a need to purchase in-game items with real money, jumping into bulletfest after bulletfest, and an utter addiction to being a proper freakin' gun-and-sword-weilding space ninja, I said otherwise.
Doc Cunado;-;A surprisingly fun game. The combat is fluid and intuitive. The pay shop is essentially unnecessary as the different "frames"(characters) can be unlocked with a little bit of play time. Even so the need to play as a different character doesn't overly change the experience because gear progression is persistent between classes. Ignore the preconceived Free-To-Play stigma and just give the game a decent shot. Teaming up in 4 man missions to defend and objective, exterminate a level, or just survive is reminiscent of the fun had while playing Killing Floor, but in 3rd person, with ninjas, and a bunch of different guns, and powers.... OK its nothing like Killing Floor but its a hell of a lot a fun and it costs nothing to give it a try. Some good quotes from the Goons forum: "What is this game? Warframe is a free-to-play co-op third-person shooter with some melee combat and loot-collection elements set in the far, far future where you play as an eyeless, mute space ninja (here, have some lore). Gameplay comparisons tend to gravitate to Mass Effect 3's multiplayer and Hellgate: London. Major features of the game include procedurally generated levels, fast action with a focus on mobility and looking like the badass space ninja you are, as well as a fairly sane F2P model which generally doesn't make you want to recoil in horror (crazy, I know). The game is currently out on the PC (via the official website and Steam) and PlayStation 4 (via PSN). Warframe's developer is Digital Extremes, previously known for their work co-developing the Unreal series alongside Epic. More recent titles have been somewhat less illustrious, mostly helping with console ports of Unreal-engine titles such as Bioshock and developing multiplayer components of various other titles. Their proprietary Evolution Engine was developed during this time and has been used in Dark Sector, the Darkness II, and now Warframe. ... GAMEPLAY ========================= Warframe is a fast-paced over-the-shoulder 4-player shooter with an added emphasis on melee attacks. Every player is equipped with primary and secondary weapons, as well as a melee weapon. Each class, or Warframe, has up to four useable skills that are unlocked as your character levels up. Your weapons also level up independently of your frame and can be sold for credits or used freely on another frame you own. As you progress with your weapons and frame of choice, you'll gain the ability to customize both for added effectiveness and cosmetic taste. In general, your missions are to invade a ship or outpost to perform a certain task, then escape once that objective is completed. .... ========================= Monetization: No, you don't really need to spend money on the game ========================= Free to play, more like free to pa- oh wait no, never mind. Seriously, though, you don't. Nothing with a direct impact on gameplay (now literally nothing, since you can get plat through the trade system) requires you to spend real money on it, though doing so may prove very convenient. If you end up liking the game and playing for a while you may want to drop a few bucks to get some extra frame and/or weapon slots (you start with 2 slots for frames and 8 for weapons), but aside from that, you can grind out most of the non-cosmetic stuff. If you want to spend money on the game but are on a limited budget, coupons for discounted platinum ranging from 20%, 50%, or 75% off will occasionally show up as a login reward, and promo codes occasionally pop up for sale. If you have spare rare mods/prime parts that are in demand, you can also fleece pubbies of their plat through the trade system. And by spending intelligently, a little platinum can go a long way. Don't be fooled by the prices of weapons and frames in the market, the stuff you'd want to spend money on is actually quite reasonably priced!
Skinny_Walrus;-;This game makes you feel like a ninja, and ninjas do play free...............
Kevin;-;This game makes me want to tuck my  in whilst playing! 10/10
RTSS;-;At first, I have no idea what to do in this game. All I do is keep on dying and using revive. Of course I am better now but still a beginner in Warframe. This game is pretty fun, meaning I quite enjoy this type of hack n slash game. As a newcomer, this game is not friendly-user enough or maybe too complicated to start. Hope the developer will work out on this. Overall rating is 7/10.
[WHof]N.y.K.z.A.k(LV-RU);-;(2013)   5/10 .      . warframe          mass effect  metal gear - rising .                      !             . ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------ (2014)   ,   !    -    -
DarkMellie;-;Forget the review scores, I too thought this was a hopeless, lag-infected game back in the day.. but it's come a LONG way. Silky smooth, frantic gameplay, gorgeous environments and an edgy sci-fi storyline that echoes EYE Divine Cybermancy but plays like Mass Effect. Thrilling stuff, get around it!
Pietro II Orseolo;-;I spawned then died 10/10
Keyman;-;Its fun
Jon Snow;-;Been playing it for few days. Free game but with the usual 'you need to use real money to progress'. However it was balanced. Those who don't want to spend money can opt to grind which is not much of time consuming if done correctly. Good game with need of improvement, particularly on the glitch and the usual complaint of 'Failed to Join Session' when opting to play with others.
ChenHreidel;-;This game is fantastic. can hardly believe this is free to play. the controls are tight, accurate and the theme is overall BADASS.
Jetman123;-;Let's get one thing perfectly clear: The trailer for this game lies. It does not actually represent the gameplay accurately, and this is turning away many who would otherwise greatly enjoy it. Here's what the game is actually about: You, and up to three of your companions, in high-grade military light power armor, insert into a space station or groundside base (that is procedurally generated!) with an objective. You are outnumbered. You are outgunned. You are in unfamiliar terrain. Accomplish your objective by any means neccessary. Good luck.
Reuben;-;Yes, play this game its awesome and dont  about its pay to win, it takes time. good luck! ^_^v
Batmon;-;Best game ever 10 out of 10
Light Zangetsu;-;Space Ninjas. Nuff said. If you want to know more well...This is game is legit because it is constantly evolving. The developers patch it almost every day. New content delivered every Wednesday. Livestreams from the developers every 2 weeks. Tonnes of content in the game. The only thing it is missing is a story line.
ArchSecter;-;I must say, that after a good portion of hours, this game is great with a lot of stuff to do still. I like it particularly for the uniqueness of the individual Warframes and weapons, despite there being a lot of them. I also like the crafting system were you gather (farm) the materials needed, some more difficult/rare than others and then begin crafting usually taking about 12 hours for weapons to 3 days for Warframes. Yeah, it requires a bit of patience, unless of course you choose to use their in-game market were you can get everything immediatly, should you somehow feel a bit on your toes and have a good 'n' fat wallet. (Yeah, I know it's pay2win, but who cares. It's mainly a PvE game, so it's really only an advantage having someone on your team that likes spending money. You also still have to level up everything when you've bought the stuff. It's only a way of skipping the crafting part of the game, which can be tedious). There's also plenty of maps consisting of plenty different game modes (survival, exterminate etc.) spread out on a lot of different planets/moons in our very own solar system. I haven't really found out how many planets/moons there are yet, but I'm getting a feeling that there can't be many left. Overall really enjoying the game, and I recommend everyone to give it a try :) P.S. Did I mention there's a whole PvP mode ... +1
suomifinlandperkele;-;it's ok
NeneroG [VAC];-;Warframe is a cooperative Free-to-Play third person online action game set in an evolving sci-fi world and is currently in open beta. Join your friends in player-vs-enemy raids across the solar system and master the power of the Warframes. Stand alone or fight together against enemies that threaten your world. They were called Tenno.
Teh Dork Knight;-;Holy crap, 5 minutes, 5 minutes into a mission was all I needed to know that I would love this game until the bitter end (Or my ADD kicked in). Wonderful 3rd person gameplay, intensely stylized graphics, and a rewarding and satisfying free-2-play experience. So very often it seems that F2P means Pay-to-Win, but not with this gem. Nope, warframe will never beg a dime from you, and you can live a very happy existence keeping it as free as the breeze. You certainly can spend your monies on this game and buy DLC till you're opening up a second mortgage. but the beauty to this beast is that you get a quality, fun experience, without ever feeling like you HAVE to open up your wallet. You do however owe something, you owe yourself at least one playthrough, I bet you won't entirely hate it. DISCLAIMER: you may need a system that can handle all it's bells and whistles.
Pink;-;<UPDATED REVIEW> >Gets New PC >Plays It >Game Looks Beautiful OK INSTEAD MLG/10 GAME REKT THEM ALL
ripclaw;-;Even after 200+ hours played I still can't wait to try out the next new thing, another warframe or a new weapon. Each one feels sufficiently unique to keep the game fresh, even after playing a lotl The thing people criticize is the farming, and I absolutely agree. I have neither the patience nor ambition to grind my way to whatever goal there is. Which is why I spent actual money on platinum, and I don't regret it one bit. Yes, you can play and achieve almost everything in the game without spending a penny. And some people wear the fact that they never payed as a badge of honour. Personally, I think that if a game gave me literally hundreds of hours of entertainment, spending an amount that equates to the price of a regular game on this game is more than fair. The developers need to live as well, and in Warframe they struck a good balance so that you never really feel pressured to buy platinum if you don't want to. Also, once you have a littel platinum ready, the trade system allows you to buy all kinds of stuff from other players for cheap, so if you are ok with spending a few bucks in total, you can get a good selection of mods and blueprints for very little money, saving you the trouble of grinding.
Zenitix;-;SPACE NINJAS, what els do you need to know.
Joontfish;-;Warframe is a great game you can pick up and put down as you have time to play it. It requires a lot of grinding type play, but the rewards are easily achievable. You are not required to purchase platinum, but it is useful if you have a few dollars to spend. The community is friendly and are usually happy to help new players get into the game.
loupeeh;-;Really good game, there are still some bugs. Runs smooth, even on an older computer. Optimized really great. Sad there isn't any cross-platform.
ScottishBlackWatch;-;This game is amazing. So much content and a company that releases updates constantly, and it's free! Great story and background, team work is a must. The whole presentation is crisp and clear, I would almost consider it out of BETA. MUST TRY THIS GAME, not pay to win at all, :D
TheMotherFuck;-;more like warfarmville straight up facebook game witht the 100 hour build  timer and the daily thing, the fighting ight tho straight space ninja tha  hahah
Morcant;-;Warframe is a third-person shooter, similar in style to Mass Effect 3's multiplayer component. You and a squad of up to three other players take on missions throughout the solar system to acquire loot, in order to take on tougher missions for better loot. A variety of special powers and an almost comically large selection of weapons are available to aid you in your quest, along with cards which modify the properties and abilities of your warframe and weapons. Notably, the game does not have a cover system, with the developers opting for faster gameplay; this choice is further evidenced by the parkour-like elements of wallrunning and vaulting smoothly over ledges and containers. The game is a work in progress, with frequent updates aiming to resolve bugs, refine mechanics, and add content; par for the course as free-to-play games tend to go. I would like to see more context provided for the actions undertaken by players in-game, and some players will be turned off by the grind necessary to craft additional warframes and weapons. A few technical issues such as crashes and networking issues also afflict a minority of users, though thankfully these seem to be isolated problems. These slight criticisms have not stopped me from enjoying the considerable time I've spent with the game, however. Bottom line: Warframe is a concentrated dose of wish fulfillment; if you like the idea of being a space ninja, this game will probably entertain you for at least a couple dozen hours. If you like grinding for item upgrades, it may hold your interest considerably longer. For the entry price of "free," it's easy to recommend at least giving it a spin.
Kenophobia;-;This is seriously one of the best games I have ever played. Simply put, the game takes the best elements of Mass Effect 3's cooperative multiplayer and rolls it together with an extensive dungeon system of Diablo. Could the game be better? Sure. I literally cannot wait to see what sort of masterpiece it becomes when that happens. For now though, easily the best free to play game you could ask for. 9/10.
Uber Deadpool;-;Best Free to Play I have tried. Game has solid graphics and an outstanding CO-OP gameplay.
Santus Dee Lupinus;-;Warframe is excellent for a free to play game. The mission diversity is interesting, and the diversity of weapons that are available keeps the game interesting. However, if you really want to have an enjoyable time, you have to get orokin catylists for your weapons and orokin reactors for your warframes. Everything is balanced to be fightable against with those upgrades- and anyone without them will be hard-pressed to stay alive in the later levels. That being said, the game is fun, and the diversity of playstyles is interesting. The parkour system also adds a lot to the game, and makes it so that if you're really good at it, you do feel like a flippin' ninja. They're constantly adding content. Worth playing.
klayton02;-;i love this game and i have no words at all i just love this game
Pandabear;-;Warframe is a great game for those who enjoy sci-fi action, almost alike ninja gaiden and mass effect and many of the other "Larger" titles. this game is fun and addictive and is also easy to play so you do not have to be some sort of elite gamer to play this. The game will challenge your online social capabilities to work with other players to finish the objectives, and gain that nice reward at the end wether it is a new unlock,currency or a level or even all of the above. If you enjoy playing Ninja games and shooters then i STRONGLY advise this game for those people, it is something new and as i and alot of people have mentioned is still in beta though i can clarify worth the time and perhaps the money for the DLC side.
hammin8r;-;I almost never write reviews, but I've been gaming for over 30 years and few games have engaged me the way that warframe has. This isn't a great free to play game it's a great game period. Gameplay and character development are evrything you could ask for in a 3rd person scifi action rpg. The story could be more fleshed out, but I'm hoping thats something the developers flesh out in future updates. If your wary of free to play like me I'd say this is one game where you should get over it. IAP isn't over bearing hear, though I will say purchasing frames out right can be expensive, but blueprints for evrything can be found or purchased with currency earned in game which I find to be more satisfying than just purchasing or finding the weapos I want. So do yourself a favor and download it.
cberg8866;-;Love this game so addicted probably put 60 bucks into it lol
TheStormborn;-;Warframe has that inevitable MMO feature of draining all your time away. But its awesome.
yourzone;-;Really good game but it gets repetitive a little to fast. +Good graphic +Good control +Good gameplay -the community is a little too small for the game - Gets repetitive fast
iSHOWYA || Lock 'N Load;-;Do you like to grind? If Yes, then this game is the best game ever! 10/10 Would grind again
[VoD] - Angelus Lapsus;-;Currently one of the best F2P (Free to Play) games available right now. Warframe has top of the line Graphics, controls, content, Dev team quality, sound and even unusual lore. This game has got everything going for it right now and no downside what so ever which is almost unheard of. Suffice it to say its doing right what 99% of the current gaming market is doing wrong. It's also in beta but for a beta product its more complete than most high end titles in the past 5 years or so. Also, While the game does sell weapons and equipment in the cash shop it is usually far easier to obtain in game than the cash shop price which actually puts cash shop users at a near disadvantage. How uncommon! If all of this wasn't enough the rate at which updates are cranked out in nearly over polished form is quite amazing. Warframes cranked out more content, updates, changes, balances, new items, armors, maps and AI types than many high end MMO's do in a year and they do it with a much smaller team too. This game is a shinning example of what "should be". Suffice it to say Warframes cutting its own bloody path to true fame and glory among both F2P and P2P games alike. This one is a definite must try for any scifi, hack&slash or shooter fan. Easy 10/10.
Dark Guardian;-;this game is for u if u like action.
ZeLittleHairMan;-;An interesting game i shall say , crafting system, co-op play and many more fun details!!!!!!
Winky Winky;-;Good for Burmese players since it's a free-to-play game with nice co-op shooting gameplay, the drawback is the gameplay's repetitive and you have to pay to reduce wasting your time grinding more warframes, items and weapons. Other than that you can get almost all items. :) EDIT: Gonna play on PS4, still bad that I can't import my character from PC to PS4 :/
Cyen7;-;A must have game
Zer;-;One of the best Free to play games out there!
SoveReignN;-;Awesome game. Lots of grinding but thats the fun of it all, meeting new players or having fun with a group of friends. F2P only charging for cosmetics as everything else is craftable(be patient, it can take up days to craft some items.) Overall, an 8.9/10 in my book. Solid gameplay, plenty of cool weapons and warframes to give a try. JUST DL IT AND PLAY ALREADY! :)
BOT Vitaly;-;Outstanding level of fun and awesomeness on a F2P game (nothing such as P2W exists for this one), what else could you ask for?
Cabbs;-;Basically, you are a homicidal semi-mercenary parkour space ninja, and you murder your way across the solar system. It is also free-to-play. For these reasons it is almost certainly worth some of your time.
MadIrishman;-;This is a fast paced 3rd person shooter. In the short time I have been playing this game, there have been 2 major updates. Both have improved the game play and longevity of the game. I have enjoyed both of the live events I was able to participate in. Generally this is a game where you are going to have to experiment with different Warframes ( classes) and wepon combinations to find your happy place. Once you learn the intricacies of useing and powering up the mods for your warframes and weapons you are sure to have some fun. This is a free to play game with a cash shop, but never fear you can find most everything, other than cosmetic items, through game play.
Proteus;-;AMAZING GAME THAT MAKES ME WET
Pablo;-;A great game overall.
Kikiri;-;Im really liking this game, and its still only on beta :)
NinjaPup12;-;It is good... yummy.
Mr. Bumble Bee;-;This game takes a bit to get used to but with friends it can be alot of fun as well.
T3amL33Ter;-;While it is not without its share of bugs and need for improvement, this game has come a long way and will continue to. Active community in the forums really is helping shape this game to what the players want. The devs listen. While grindy and repetitive I still strongly reccomend this game. Constant updates and content make it possible to always have goals.
Spavioli;-;Amazing space ninja action should be No1 Steam game IMO
dezero19;-;Really nice game.. some bugs need fix btw that game can be 1st 3D FPS:)
Need Back up!!;-;really nice free-to-play game :D
septim21;-;i love this game.......awsome
Stryker;-;Robot space ninjas. More really doesn't need to be said.
-Junie-;-;The first game of its genre that I really enjoy playing. Great co-op, a unique vibe, plenty of new content and great potential!
Cerberus;-;great game lots of fun
icecream;-;this game is awesome
Thaegris;-;The movement system is a bit off, but the rest of the game is pretty fun if you don't mind the grind.
Chaoticreven;-;This is a stellar F2P game. Very fluid looks great, gets you hooked just like a well made game should thanks Digital Extremes this is a great game. My only quarrel is the Market pricing seems a bit off, some things seem to expensive or too cheap for the effort involved in building Vs. buying.
BrightScyde;-;Warframe is a great way of playing some F2P 3rd person shooter action. Warframe is still in beta, and it seems that the devs are happy to take on board advice from the fans, so hopefully a few of the details that could use polish still have a chance to be completed. With the price of entry a flat nothing, it would be a shame to miss out on quite a bit of fun to be had here.
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
takeshi_bui;-;really good game mechanics, great community, lots of grinding
THC.BlueDream;-;I great 3rd person shooter. Great feel and look. However, the fact that it takes a REALLY long time to aquier new gear/weps draged me away from this game. Still enjoyable with friends none the less.
Nightlash;-;Really fun and awesome F2P game
SeRg;-;great game smooth and nice gameplay keep hoping open beta will come one day to final version with no bugs!
BananaMuffin;-;An amazing game with very good content, Storyline may not make sense but the game graphics and how the game works is very interesting. People who love to farm will like this game.
Kyoraku;-;One of the better over the shoulder shooters i've played
-DeathOnWingz-;-;This is an addicting Free to Play RPG/FPS with a deverse weapon selection and great matchmaking with hundreds of new people to play with every day.
Kryptiko;-;Amazing game to play A bit repititive but the game is still young and is going through alot of changes but for the time being,the game keeps itself interesting thanks to the co-op gameplay which emphasizes upon actual team-work,otherwise you'd get ripped apart by the on coming masses. What keeps me addicted to it,is that it remains challenging no matter how much you grind and on a half serious note, You're a ninja with a huge selection of tools from a sword and an assualt rifle to a heavy hammer with a bow and arrow. Peace
Rabbiez;-;Lobster tails
Life Pilgrim;-;Try this game and stick with it for 1-2 weeks before deciding if you like the game. I really do like this game. The graphics are awesome. The gameplay fast, furious and wrapped in good artistic style (and the gore is.....jolly good). Highly recommended if you like co-op game and or action game. The only gripe is platinums are a bit overpriced though redeemingly you do not need themt to craft anything in game except to buy slots for your weapons and warframes(armored suits).
YourBestButtBuddy;-;Amazing game, tons of replay value, outstanding end game content. The game kinda lacks customization but the story makes up for it 100%
DatKidJoshhh;-;One of the #1 FREE games on steam!
PIZZA DELIVERY BOY;-;Well I wouldn't have 300+hrs on record if it wasn't good. Beatifull game, good community, user friendly, NO P2W, and a lot of fun when playing co-op with friends. 10/10
SonOfGuns101;-;I dont know why i like it but i find my self very attracted to this game
Kermit E Frog;-;it ing sucks  so i recomend it
Jazz hands Jim;-;Highly recomend this game to anyone who likes fast paced action, generous F2P games, and a nice upgrade system. The game can get a bit grindy at times though.
MaXed (Jinxtart);-;This game is really awesome !! However it's a "Grind" game so, if you don't like collecting items and re playing maps this is probably not the game for you. It's a 4 player mission co-op game. You find blueprints, craft new weapons/frames and level-up to get stronger so that you can advance to new arias. Anyways, Like it a lot. Heck, it's a Free 2 Play game ! Give it a try ! --- Rating: 7 / 10 "Steves" + Gaming feel - Repetitive gameplay
_-Target-_;-;Great game, unfortunately once your are a top tier (I am level 16, I am not sure with everything fully leveled you can even get to 17 yet), the game loses a lot of zest. The devs have nerfed the unique role based frames into WarSame.. the loadout matters, that's it.. if you have good mods and are a reasonable player, you only need a handfull of guns and melee weapons.. even amongst the Prime weapons they are not all end game weapons.. many of them are just meh (I have a braton prime that has been forma'ed 7 times, it's still  comapred to the soma, or bolter prime). Grinding orokin runs in the void the RNG is complete , running a mission 40 times to get a lex prime part and still not getting is is rediculous.. According to devs working as intended.. I guess if they want me to spend money and time elsewhere, then yeah it's working as intended.. I could go on and on.. it's a good game, but they need to make some reasonable changes, like a loot selector after so many runs, a real functional difference (think old frost, or Ember, in theory Trinity), Frames should matter more than guns, but fact is they just done.. it's a good game.. needs some love.. Welcome to WarSame.
MonotoneHawk;-;Space Ninjas and guns. 10/10
Young God #Silver@HEART;-;Good game really fun
JOOP!;-;This game is some of the most fun I've had in some time! It's got everything you could ever want. Leveling, customization, robots, cool weapons, online play, parkour, and SPAAAAAAACE!!! Seriously addictive and definitely a game I do not feel guilty throwing money at. :D
Minato;-;Free-to-play : 18/20
Apevian;-;Amazing graphics. Interesting plot. Game of the year. 8/10
Joey;-;Amazing, its free why not try it?
Sebastian;-;Fast paced shooter, fun and pretty addictive. The graphics can be boosted to oustanding levels, and it's one of the best free to play games so far. I would reccommend this game to anyone.
Zero4291;-;Fantastic game, hard to get into though because everything revolves around completion rate material drop rate and lots of time to build everything but other than that I highly recommend it!
{NF}Al-Ayyubi;-;Despite of all in-game bugs that sometimes trouble me, I think, this game is a very well-made Free to Play game. I don't really like Third Person Shooter. But this, this game is very challenging. It makes me want to play it again and again. It challenges your brain to really think, which step should you take while you proceed your mission. And I totally recommend this game for any people who likes TPS. For a "Free To Play" game, this is a magnificent TPS Game.
TRAS3N;-;started out good, but is kinda pay to win now which is too bad
Mad Vladimir;-;Great Free2play game!
Silent Siren;-;It's a tear jerking story of how a war picture was framed.
Mr. arren;-;Mass Effect with Ninjas 9.5/10
ZombieSnipe;-;Pros: its free/ very fun/ good graphics/ Cons: waiting two days for a warframe to be built and weapons, common really two days/ feels very repetitive/ no story line to the boss/ colors are not earned Other thoughts: should of had a premuim unlock so when we buy something there is no waiting time for warframes and weapons instead of rushing with platinum / have colors all unlocked and premium should never go away only to be bought once.
ebola;-;Awesome artwork and addictive yet fun gameplay! The story/background is fun and the dynamic events and alerts are unique and interesting. There really isint any paywall after you start to level up your warframes and weapons and explore the games extremely large ecosystem and complex crafting, trading and modding elements. I would recommend throwing a couple bucks towards the game to get a sentinel early (and its a cool indie company!). Have fun with World of Warframe ;)
Exia001;-;This Game is Awesome,you guys should try it.
StarEchoe;-;Great game to play with friends or by yourself!
DayWeMet;-;Great game!
ap[ex];-;Fun with friends, repetitive levels and will get boring
Male Man;-;By any objective measure, it's terrible. But I can't help but have fun doing stupid flips and shooting nameless grunts with ridiculous guns. And then I get stuff to build more ridiculous guns to shoot nameless grunts with. Very much one-note, but it's a note that tickles something deep in my lizard brain. Starting out kinda sucks, though. The upgrade system (your primary way of getting more powerful) is poorly explained, and the essential mods aren't parceled out to new players. Starter gear is almost universally terrible, so it can take a while to get going. By the time you're zipping around with a grappling hook and blasting apart mooks with a rocket launcher that shoots exploding acid, your crappy newbie rifle will be but a distant memory. Buy a Braton (not a Braton MK-1) from the marketplace as soon as you can. It is an upgrade in every way. The storefront is kinda whack. Platinum (the real-money currency) prices are all over the place. Weapons and warframes tend to be extremely overpriced, even if you're only buying platinum at a 50% or greater discount. But Orokin Reactors and Catalysts (very important but limited items) aren't too expensive and with the trading system you can pick up the essential mods for about a quarter each. The rest of your plat will likely go toward buying inventory slots. Fortunately, everything except inventory slots is available without paying real money. The crafting system seems like a huge multipart grindfest, but once you get in the habit of collecting materials while you're doing missions for other reasons you'll end up with a surplus of resources. Warframe is very generous with free content. A small amount of cash ($8 in my case) and a bit of frugality will get you everything you'll ever need. Content comes thick and fast. Major updates hit about every two and a half months, with smaller updates in between dropping new equipment and special events . If you enjoy the basic gameplay, then Warframe will give you no end of goals to achieve by parkouring through hallways and murdering bad guys. If you don't enjoy the basic gameplay, then it's not gonna change drastically. Try it out, pick Mag as your starter, see what the fuss is about.
JonnyBravo;-;ok so lets be honest this game is probably one of the best looking free to play game there is out there with so much new content there is no reason not to download this game so remember ninjas play free LETS DO THIS
Microsoft Word;-;Set in the far reaches of outer space during a new Dark Age, WARFRAME introduces the Tenno, a race on the brink of extinction after being enslaved by the Grineer for centuries. This game is very addicting, play as a space ninja running around throwing energy and running up walls. Defend against a ton of different mobs, grind for hours and craft new weapons and frames. The community is awesome and the gameplay is amazing. I would highly recommend this and we haven't even touched on the graphics. The only problem I can think off is that the DLC is overpriced, just my opinion. Otherwise this game is 10/10!
Felandi;-;One of the most fair free-to-play models around. Pretty much everything can be aquired at an extremely reasonable pace and with only slight effort.
Talscar || Talcom Studio's;-;This game is fun. This game is cool. Id reccommend it to ANYONE WHO WANTS TO KILL IN STYLE! Please note if steam sees this message i am hating how it isnt in my libary... I spent money it isnt their. But anyway LET THE KILLING BEGIN! and note IF you strugle in the game, never fear to ask for help, its more immportaint around the time you are getting Stalked by the Stalker.
razdeadpool;-;Free-to-play that's actually free... It's awesome. 4 Player co-op. Constant Developer updates and new content. Wanna be a space ninja? This is the game for you! Try it now!
xChillOutx;-;One of the best games i'ev ever played. On the other side.. it costs you a lots of time.
multicycle;-;The reason I tried this game is because it's constantly in the top 15 most played steam game list. I was skeptical about its popularity at first, but it was soon dissipated when I started playing. The basics classes are warframes, each frame has three components you can collect from boss drops at the end of the boss level. It's rather fast to collect these components, no need to buy them from the real money market. In which the frames are quite expensive to buy, there is no real need for that. Most weapons can be bought with in-game credits from the market, and built with resources gained in game. Again, no need to buy with real money. There are some end game weapons / frames that can be collected from end game content, you can't buy them in the market. The frames and weapons are augmented with mods, which are dropped in game. They give stat changes, such as increased damage, fire rate, reload speed, health, etc.. Mods can be combined with other mods (such as duplicates to the same mod) to increase their level, which increases their potency and the cost of using the mod. The higher the level of the frame / weapon, the more mods you can augment it with. The only things worth spending money on are frame and weapon inventory slots, which are quite cheap. Then after that, there is an item that can supercharge a frame / weapon, gives you more space for mods. Which can be obtained in game, but is quite rare. Then there are cosmetics items, which are purely optional. I got about 1800 plantinum for $25, after 20+ weapons and 4 frames, and some cosmetics, I only used up 400 plats. The missions are randomly generated, at the end of each mission you collect in-game credits, mods, and resources. You can alternate between your primary (rifle, shotgun, sniper), secondary (pistol, throwing knives), or melee (swords, dual swords, heavy). The movement is fluid, you can wall walk, slide, slide jump, slide spin attack, leap attack, etc. It makes you feel fast and like an assassin. After 70+ hours in game, I'd say this game is ninja with guns/swords in space, a third-person diablo-like item collection game. Although repetitive, when played in co-op, can be quite satisfying mowing down large amount of enemies.
gidoxaros;-;Pretty fun game but it can get monotonous and grindy if you play solo. Overall you should give it a try!
Heraukra;-;Incredible, fast-paced, and addictive. If you're tired of an endless string of near-identical cover-shooters, this is for you. The acrobatics are incredible and the action unrelenting. Try it out today!
Miya;-;This is one of the best games I have ever Played! and its free to play :)
Mcl_BlueMadness;-;This is one of the best Free-To-Play games out in the market, possibly the best, and has a quality level, both in production and gameplay, that rivals and oftentimes surpasses that of AAA games. With the constant updates, the game is ever changing, evolving, and if it ever gets boring, it won't be for long, as an update is soon to come and spice things up again. The gameplay is unrivaled. You won't find anywhere else a Third-Person Shooter with a combat this deep, fast-paced, complex, and with as much mobility as this one. The promise is, and I'm really dumbing it down, playing as "cyber ninjas" in space, and ho boy, does it ever deliver. I can GUARANTEE that 90% of the complaints going around about this game are biased and/or uninformed. I can understand if this game is not your cup of tea, for whatever reason, but if it is, it's definitely a must-play, for it is nothing short of a masterpiece.
Astador;-;Surprisingly addictive game. Fun weapons, the Warframes are unique and interesting to use, and there's quite a bit to do. Downsides? Aggressive pay system. Some resources and items are nearly impossible to get without purchasing them with platinum. RNG is completely whack for certain mods, etc. No real end game content. So, a good game that could become great if the developers put out some real end game content and lighten up on trying to force people into buying platinum.
BAE;-;Supreme Graphics :D Ultra Gameplay :D Its optimized very good for pc so you dont need to worry about the game lagging :)
Ajax6;-;Great game with a really active DEV team. Would recommend to everyone everywhere
Dr. Vory Killinger;-;i gotta say i loved the beta
Caa-grelos;-;One of the best F2P out there. Always growing and improving, based on the community's feedback. A ust have in your library.
William Clark;-;I enjoy this game immensly. The mod strategy is a very interesting concept that allows for some strange combos and with Damage 2.0, it got only better.
ThaWolf;-;I read many Game reviews before i started to play since i was very unsure about it, and most of them were not even close to the reality, this FREEmium Shooter ROCKS! YES you really have to play nothing if you dont want to, and even if you do it, you gain NO advantage over the others, you just can get stuff earlier and faster, or its stuff which is unimprtant to gameplay like colors, skins... IF you choose to invest money, you dont have to invest big amounts (but you still can), the game even provides a "sign in lottery" where you can get up to -75% rewards for ther ingame currency called "Platinum". YOU Get 50 Platinum for free!!! , dont waste them, buy weapon slots with them, since slots for weapons, warframes and sentinels are good to have, so you can own more stuff, and most other things you get from playing. Alerts, for "potatoes"! (actually Orokin Reactors and Catalysts), which double the slots of you warframe, weapons and Sentinels, and much other stuff are verry Important, but you dont have to miss them, since the game provides an App called "Warframe Nexus" which keeps you updated! Events, while still Beta, there are already events which are diffrent and fun and are mostly are yoused to get new stuff into the game, taking part you can get unique stuff! General, at first it takes time to get into it, you can do more with your Warframe then in most FPS so you will need to learn how it works until you master it. IF you just want to turn it on and shoot some NPC in the face, or chop them into pieces, you can easily do it without much preparation, but you can also join up to one of the may clans out there, play 4 man coop with voicecomms to reach higher goals in the gameladders or else. To make it clear, its a BETA, but if you play it, it doesnt feel like it, until they change, nerv, buff...things radically, so dont get angry its still BETA. My 2 Cents are, that it is one of the best and most fair FREEmium games out there. If you liked that, become a "weaponed to the teeth" Space Ninja!
Wayne;-;basically diablo 4 /w bill roper as lead designer. goty every year
Deuyivan;-;T'is a good game with its pros and cons. The pros is painfully obvious, you get to murder fascist griiner, greedy corpus, and numerous soft skinned infested. With many tools at your disposal it become very fun indeed, combining unique weapon and tools to suit your gameplay. But like other games it has its downsides, the most major is connection issue, this game uses listen server which means there is no central hub/ server but more like long range LAN, if you have many friends play this game with you I'm very reccommend it but if you more of a solo player getting random party, expect serious lag issues Verdict: 7.3/10
Wazuzu;-;Let me be clear on this: This game is endless grind. It's also can be pay2win, or at least pay2bestrong. But on the other level it's freaking awesome! Space ninjas! Space weapons! Teamplay! Wall running! Huge bosses! It's still in beta, but it's extremely good for a free game. The balance in this game is averagely good, there are some popular things, but anything (except your starting gun I think) can perform decently if properly modded. Since it's a PvE game (there IS PvP, but there's nothing good I can say about it except that it is there), there's no need in *perfect* balance, and you probably can choose your first warframe based on aesthetics - it will perform good, if you master it, there are *NONE* completely bad waframes. The only con, I think, is that around 60% of all warframe abilities fall off at the endgame, and the said endgame is mostly higher numbers on enemy stats, which is a bit disappointing. And, there's no final "goal" as you see it. But if you aren't going to invest thousands of dollars into this game, you will probably spend more than a thousand hours getting all the stuff supermaxed, or quit trying. Overall: Very good PvE F2P game, 6/10 if you are not going to pay, and 8/10 if you are going to. The most essential things to buy are: weapon and warframe slots for new weapons and warframes respectively, "potatoes" (Orokin Catalysts and Reactors, which improve modding capabilities, they can be farmed for, but they are so rare that it's just better to buy them). All other things (except for aesthetics, of course) cxan be obtained through missions.
xSp1nalT4px;-;Fantastic free to play game that is gorgeous. I have put over 30 hours into this game and have yet to feel the need to put real money into it so it does not seem to be pay to win although it is an option to pay for more powerful weapons and such. Learning curve is a little steeper than other games which may deter new players but if you stick with it you will actually feel like a skilled space ninja.
JayNBD;-;Best game I ever play. Very fun with friend.
GravityFTW;-;This Game is Really Fun and Easy to learn, If any one want some i help just ask me :D
TheSainos;-;Really fun game, really good graphics and gameplay for the game being in beta, would recomend
Mug3r;-;Warframe is a special type of game as compared to other games... There are few games that will make you fell quite as much of a badass at level one before abruptly reminding you that well youre just that level 1. With your little rifle and weak armour. Then as you work your way up from there you begin to fell that badassness from day 1 creeping back up your spine youve finally crafted your own weapon and are slaughtering endless waves of enemies with it while your teammates (in your imagination anyway) Stand there in awe of your awesome power. Warframe is a very interesting experience. It doesnt have any pay to win mechanism but more of a pay to shot theings fast mechanism. The fact that you can most probably (With the right set of friends) Play the game from level 1 till youve finished mnost of the game so far, without spending any money at all is a good sign. the item crafting can get a bit tedious sending oyu off to systems that you quite frankly are affraid of you will find that that sweet joy of finally crafting a weapon to your likeness, or finding out that the weapon you just spent hours crafting if of no use what-so-ever. Can be almost enjoyable. The story and the quests following a sort of Space ninja group known as the tenno is slightly watered out to make way for all the awesome looking graphics and weapons(Pew pew all the way). But that isnt saying that the story is weak not at all. I have found myself at some points almost talking to the lotus(The AI entity that will guide you through the game) and its heavy reliance on co-operative play (I tried single player... Died on every mission) makes you sometimes feel a bit depressed as you sit staring at the mission you want to play while the next wave of players steadily approaches. All in all Warfarme is a very balanced game although the pay-to-shoot-things-faster-mechanic can get quite annoying, no game is perfect right?
Torkemada;-;Awesome game! Pretty sure the most addictive I've played in a long time.
LivedThe_sniper;-;This is a really fun game to play. Like it a lot.
Rikage;-;Grindy, but very fun!
MacFanta;-;FREEDOM!
Killa;-;its awesome to play dota
EVE;-;Sick Game, totally addict to who likes Sci-fi Robotic Humanoid, very acrobatic gameplay, definitely a best choice for those who love 3rd Person Shooting gameplay
<<{BLS}>>Whysper;-;Ive been playing the Beta since forever and all they do is make it better with more interesting weapons, moves and story. Cannot wait to see whats next.
Nano_Zac;-;This Is A really EPIC Game!!!!
paintitblacklulcakes;-;I have to say, this game is amazing. It's primarily free, but its so good it makes me want to buy one of the packs (which i will be). The gameplay is fun, customization makes combat unique and advancing. Tzhe game constantly provides a challenging experience and the visuals are great If Mass Effect and Metal Gear made love and had a child, Warframe would be that child.
Klumz;-;This is basically a mix of third-person action, ninjas, parkour, advanced tech and awesomeness. Highly recommended!
Rhythm;-;This game has a bit of a grind, other than that its pretty good.
Wordsmith;-;Cut a man with a mushroom-shaped head in half. 11/10
<WE^SoulStriker 13;-;it is an awesome 3rd person shooter!!!
NoodleTruff;-;Warframe is love. Warframe is life.
Metronome;-;I spend way more time in this game than I probably should.
Brotaku;-;7/10 if it wasnt for the insainly long patch downloads i would probably play this game more often, really fun if you are into grinding the same missions to get your favorite warframe like i have
HADES;-;This game...I dont know where to start. On update 13 It was a great game. It had its bugs and its flaws but It was fun to play, but with the new update It has improved A LOT, its beautiful. Even though the wait was a pain in the , it was worth it. It almost feels like a brand new game. I dont understand some people that hate this new update so much... I simply cant hate it in any way. The new tutorial is fantastic ( compared with the   tutorial of before, if you can call that a tutorial ). It shows new players how to play properly and gives you diversity in your first guns, depending in your style. Its great to see the implementation of your own ship and how you control everything in a more fluid way. Some may say that its less practical, but theese people are hayterz (JUST KIDDING). Before you could be overwhelmed by all the different stuff that was presented to you all at once ( foundry, Arsenal etc ) and it was tricky for me to get the hand of the game. Now you are showed what you are doing, instead of waching some slides that show you what you do, they make you do missions to get parts for your ship and guide you through lots of things that are a little complicated for a new tenno. Its also good to see that theres an actual quest line instead of complete this planet to go to the other planet and so on. It looks more fun this way and makes a little more sense. There is a lot of work to be done into this game to make it perfect, but this was a BIG step into creating one of the best games that, In my opinion, will ever come across steam.
Senparos;-;Warframe is the best free2play game I have ever played. Not only is it a fun game that is constantly getting new content and features (as it is in open beta right now), but it is the best free2play model I have ever seen in a game. Like most f2p games, it has an in game earned money-type (credits) and a paid for type (platinum). In warframe, every single item can be obtained without spending platinum. The only exception to this is vanity items and room for more warframes and weapons, but you can actually EARN platinum to buy those things through the trading system. if you have something rare, you can trade it to other people in exchange for platinum. The developers also have a very active role in the community, they have livestreams every week and are active on the game's forums. Instead of seeing the developers as more of an ATM for games than anything else (EA for example), you see them as people who actually want to make a great game. Overall, this is a fantastic system, and has actually encouraged me to spend money on the game, not because i have to in order to do well in it, but because I want to support the growth of this fantastic game.
MauriceB;-;Would recommend. A very fun PvE game with lots of costumization options and it gets updates very often. It may get repetitive due to levels being fairly similar, but additions are being made rapidly. Overall a really nice free game to pick up if you've got a few minutes to download it.
DeepbloodEclipse;-;Probably the best online game released to date and ever expanding. Constant new content being added weekly and plenty of fun to go around. It definetly will not disappoint you.
TheGamingHyena;-;Wattle,Wattle,Wattle
[duke]Dusty;-;Great game, it has alot of customization (however it is not in cosmetical changes) and plenty of gameplay. You don't have to pay-to-play as most people think, it just takes awhile.
CYANiE;-;So what can I say? It's free to play. Loads of fun whether it's with random players, friends or just solo. Graphics are pretty good and the missions are extremely fun! I would recommend you getting this game, why not? IT'S F2P!!!!!
Don Yawnful;-;Beware Tenno your ability to be a true space ninja might be greatly hampered! Warframe is a Free to play third person shooter with light RPG elements (that's a whole lot of things) but what it boils down to is this. You are a Tenno, a secret race of space ninjas awakened by the lotus to bring back peace in the galaxy. You do this by operating warframes. Warframes are combat suits and have different combat capabilities, at the start you must choose from three different frames. The missions themself are fairly straight forward, things like exterminate, rescue and defense are your standard fair in these kind of games. The weapons are fun to use and more unlock as you gain higher ranks. This game is an absolute blast with 2 or more friends (4 people per mission) and really soaks up hours without you noticing it. Not everything is right in the land of space ninjas however, questionable DLC and design choices might have you wonder if investing your time is really worth it. Let me begin by saying that pretty much everything you can acquire ingame can also be bought with real life money converted into platinum. This might seem alright on paper, but the prices for these weapons, warframes and other items are questionable. Then again you could also forego this and just grind yourself to a better place in the space ninja ranks. Another thing that hampers the experience is the slew of bugs still present, while the development team has been pretty consistent with bugfixes there are still issues with things and the dev team has a tendency of bringing back old bugs on accident, while they had been fixed a couple of patches ago. Your experiences may vary with others but be prepared. Last but not least is the music, if you like a game with a good soundtrack, this one is not for you. There's only a small amount of tracks and they are all rather dull to listen to. You're better off building your own soundtrack for this game. If all these lowpoints haven't scared you off, I'd suggest you try it out. The game is free to play after all.
dm_;-;A pretty fun, free to play third person shooter taking place in corridors of space stations and planetside colonies. Each suit (Warframe) has different abilities to mix and match, and there's a wide variety of guns and melee weapons to collect and level up. The movement is fun and the wall-running, rolling, dodging, sprinting all feel fun to pull off and look pretty cool to boot. There are fairly regular major updates, and the level layouts - although using a lot of the same assets - are somewhat randomly generated, as to keep the gameplay from getting too stale. However, to obtain the higher level gear takes ages collecting materials and crafting, or for you to pony up some cash to just buy them. It's grindy as all hell if you're going for the end game experience and don't want to shell out for high level gear, but it's still a fun time killer that you don't have to pay for if you don't want to.
TaCHi;-;Great game, especially for a F2P. You don't need spend money to enjoy or advance in this game, everything's pretty much available through plans to assemble items and mats are quite easily farmed in game. Varied missions and goals, mobs, and boss fights. The addictive part is leveling your character and its weapons.
WhyYouTrippinBruh?;-;This Games Worth a shot.
404;-;Solid game and really fun. The only problem I have with this game is that it keeps crashing on me which gets frustrating but never the less it's still really fun ^-^
zyklonterror;-;Play this game
StarScribe;-;Space. Cyborg. Ninjas. This game is so awesome in so many ways, you would be wasting time even reading this. Just play it!
Scarecrow Shinobi;-;So far, this is the best game I've ever played.
((HTP)) POHLY;-;warframe is a fun free to play PvE MMO that is truly addictive game download it's FREE!!!
DC;-;A Great Game
Summer;-;If a game has ninjas like this one, then it's legit.
Devas^3.NO MMR;-;graphic can compare with other high graphic game such as call of duty,and its free to play,so if u wish to,try it out,no bad at all
<TJoL>Cartwheels;-;A cavalcade of co-op-tacular fun! Roam space and kick some grinner butt as you collect and create new suits and weapons with ridiculous abilities, fail at any and all sections that require stealth, pull of crazy tricks with the awesome movemnent/parcour/wallrun mechanics, and shoot lazers that go 'pew pew', oh and it's free!
VENOM;-;,  Mass Effect. Very good reminds The Mass Effec.
FormedHyperion0;-;Its diffrent from most games but its sooo fun. The only problem i had so far is how many warframes and weapon slots you can have. Its annoying cause you have to spend money for more slots. But from that its one of my top games atm.
lexadel The Wallfle Born;-;yes play this game won't stop
CooneyTunes;-;Ballin on le budget
midnight_rose18;-;Its good.
Sokeas;-;Great game! Ninjas in space !
Dj|><|Sgt.War;-;Nice game Farm farm farm farm
yeahgday;-;I didn't think I'd like a 3rd person sooter at firest, but I'm thourougly hooked
The vl Dr. F;-;recommended for: group players. grinders. stealthers. i paid into this game very early on and i was glad to see it find its way to steam. the exciting dynamic of this game is, imo, its main draw. it is exciting and fun to play this game. the number of tactical variances is staggering. aside from the brute force approach, in my experience, most maps can be stealthed (by that i mean goals approached w/ minimal enemy threat drawn). incremental advance seems the most useful but YMMV. a good group of tennos can go very far and i think this a good weekly game for clans/friends/groups. if not daily. also i like the item affinity progression. this game meets my requirements for a viable free-to-play game.
Daheion;-;Amazing game! After hard working and spending hours the game is really cool and fun! I recommend for all people who has patience and love space ninjas :D!
EON;-;One of the best free to play games out there, a third person shooter/hack&slash and an awesome co-op and pvp mode, sponsored by Nvidia with great graphics and 97% of the content you can have it without paying real money, the other 3% is just cosmetic. I would recommend this to anyone, this is how free to play games should be made :D
floyduk;-;I just keep coming back to this one. It's a mainly cooperateive first person shooter with a strong RPG element. It seems simple at first but there's considerable depth to the progression and clan play. Plus the FPS mechanic is fast, solid and fun. Really didn't expect to like it as much as I do. Two thumbs up from me.
SyrToxic;-;One of the best F2P games I've played in a long time. It has it's bad moments but, all games do! Definitely stick with this game, you won't regret it!
WobbleHeadDoll;-;Absolutely fantastic and addicting game! The use of the "mod" system is genious! It allows for multiple different gameplay styles for the same character, "Warframe."
The Skelliest;-;Definitely a fun game for people into third-person action type games :33
llllAmusedAgderllll;-;Probably one of my favourite "Free-to-Play" games.
Heisenberg;-;fun but alot of  to learn
Roof Rack Roamer;-;I started playing the game cause my friend told me to. I started playing it and it was fun. I rate this game a 9 out of 10
TiERDOG_;-;wonderful third-person-shooter based on stelth, and guns. you are a ninja in space. so yea. The End........ NO In warframe running up walls and on the roof are common. being shot? Run up walls then end with a back flip. Or as I like to call it, MATRIX MODE
chrisblair22;-;Great game lots of content frequent updates and free login rewards. has some bugs but what game doesnt. overall its a solid game 230+ hours on ps4 and 40+ on pc and love every minute of it
Pagom;-;This game is amazing there is little a time that i get on a game everyday and see something new going on not to mention the forge where have to work to assemble your gear
Tarak;-;This is a very enjoyable game, but you have to be carefull if your used to making small purchases in games like this. I went from telling myself that I would spend no more than 60 dollars on platinum, to having spent a few hundred dollars on this game over the course of the time I've been playing it.
Meep;-;Cool, cause ninjas, and Space. now all we need is pirate- no we have those too
raghtos;-;update failed some content could not be dowloaded from our servers. Please restart warframe to try again the update will restart shortly... whew thats what it is saying all day... =( plz fix this problem this game looks toooooo cool
Ow Now Brown Cow;-;Amazing movement and combat system unlike any before but does cost money eventually no matter what and will need to have its finishing quality added. The character leveling and custimization is great but once you realize theres not much more to do once you have a couple warframes and a good couple levels up you realize all of the work you put into making a badass godlike superhero ninja is only to continue puting more time and money into each character and there is never any sort of player to player recognition for your time invested in your character. games like world of warcraft have all of the intricate mini parts of the game, like warframe, but no matter what you get tangled up in you always know grand total the game is still alliance vs horde(primarily) and warframe and its creators. needs to finish with its own distinguished main reason to play the game. something that makes you take all the time you spend making your guy just as awsome as you want him and then actually lets you use him for a purpose other then more leveling or material farming. My vote is for hundreds of warframes to eventually meet in head on 360 degree warfare in online servers on the supposed new part of the game. control points, weapons and warframes would be great!
Genesis;-;The game is fun and has a bit of innovation. It's free to play aspect gives players a free way to play and you really don't need to buy anything for it. Is it worth paying? Sure. You can get things you want like in any game. However, this isn't a MMO, many people i talked to say it is. It's a coop game where people have the option of hop in hop out features. The things i don't like about the game is it is linear, you have minimal options on where you can roam. The game play is repeatitive and i know most games are like that but this game really has nothing but the same sword slashing and gun slinging as any other game i ever played. For a free to play it is fun, but even the levels lack creative imagination. They look like they're basically the same level over and over again. Players- well you get good and bad players for all games but the ones on here will leave in the middle of a session and leave you to fight hoardes of enemies by yourself, and they lack the consideration to revive you when you die. I give it a thumbs up for a free to play game... however if it was a pay to play game or even a game to purchase i wouldn't recommend it.
xUnknownDestiny;-;This is a great 3rd person shooter game that is not to be missed out on, especially considering the creators are kind enough to hand out such an awesome game for free!
Fliqqy;-;Very fun and Addiciting.
Kit Kat;-;What to say about a game thats just fun...From the begining i really enjoyed it. The dynamics of this game make it diffrent. it has been more fun than any shooter i have played in the past and i would definatly recommend it to others but with a word of warning to them that it can be adictive and hard to put down lol. the graphics of this game make it seem like your really there and on top of that can be adjusted pretty good for those with slower machines without dropping the quality too much. the game could use a bigger player base and possibly an ingame broker type system but other than that i really have nothing bad to say about this game. the landscapes are quite beautiful and the indoor facilities are quite nice to explore. the weapons on his game are great i wish i had one of each of them and the audio for them are perfect. the audio for the environmental is great too nothing like what i have experianced in the past. the designers of this game have done a fantastic job of making this game and i plan to play it for a really long time :)
AriLou;-;Let's play this awesome!
xTecNicSinX;-;cool game
Boodron;-;Fun to play very addicitve
BIG FAN OF INTERNET JOKES;-;it was the best halo i everplayed
Ashlynn ();-;This is a fun game! :)
Silvestris | OMEGA;-;Great game with a friendly community
gint271;-;Quite the grindfest, but still enjoyable nonetheless. Has a lot of different abilities and items to collect and level, making customization another strong part of the game. The game can be played without spending any money. However, the largest roadblock is the limited number of slots for storing weapons and warfarmes (classes). One needs to spend real money to unlock these slots. However, the slots are reasonably priced, and I am happy to support the developer. The game is continually changing and having new content added. It is still in "beta", so we don't know if the developer will put forth the same effort once the game is released. Overall, I've had a lot of fun with Warframe, even though it does get repetitive.
guntur;-;So epic game ever i play !!! :D
guntur;-;So epic game ever i play !!! :D
OrkSlayer;-;is awsome but beware the bright lights of explosions and death
Petrosz;-;This game is just awesome. A frre to play TPS, with lot of action and great combo system. You can customise your character with different color, armour, and skins, It is the same for weapons. I recommend this game to everyone, it totally worth it :D
1egenDary;-;If you like to play third-person shooter with awesome rpg elements with 3 other people and in a sci-fi setting, this is for you. Seriously give this game a try. IT'S FREE.
Snowfall;-;Great game with loads of playtime. The only problem with it is its highly repetitive. There is no real end game. The whole point is to upgrade to better equipment but after a while you have it all and are left waiting for the next patch to provide something new to farm an possibly never use. Even with that, this thing is amazing for a group of friends, or even solo. Attempting to Stealth every misson can provide months of fun. The graphics (assuming you have the capability to run on hig) ae amazing. Even at LOW rendering.
Inhimilis;-;If you got time this is the best f2p third person shooter/action game out there, market is expensive but almost everything can be obtained by playin the game. Laking real end game content is it's main downside at the moment, you can quickly obtain most end game items by grinding it for a couple of days or buying it off the player market for in game currency (or trade items you have collected). The RNG will make you come back for more or turn you completly off.
Iciko;-;I can easily say this is the best F2P game I've ever played, discounting TF2. The gameplay is fun, it's fast paced and tricky. Your character moves in amazing ways with awesome parkour. Combat can be a little dull at times due to just having lame guns for a while to start but the melee combat is excellent. All in all, it's free, it looks great and it plays great. Rally some friends and give it a shot if you're bored. Oh and you can be like Raiden.
MrFreezy;-;10/10 would play
Lord Of The Memes;-;NINJAS IN SPACE. ING RPG, NADE LAUNCHER, ROCKET PISTOLS, ENERGY BEAMS, MIND CONTROL, AND ROCKET POWERED HAMMERS AND EXPLOSIONS. DAMN THIS GAME IS SO GOOD. Best F2P I have ever played.
Fatigue's Concerned Gaze;-;DIS GAME. Started days after it went into Open Beta, was stable as if it were a Final Version commercial release. Absolutely wonderful to play with friends, although the objective fun in it is in setting your sights on a new Warframe and working towards it. With 13 frames, there's a lot of work ahead for you to keep you busy, and it doesn't require too much money to get you those 11 extra slots!
{-Jackass-} TheCaptain;-;I dont Like the game but there is no reason you shouldn't like it
Ouroboros;-;an epic 3rd person shooter that envolves space ninjas i mean, come on, SPACE NINJAS! You have about 8 warframes to choose from each with a unique play style and abilities. I recommend this game to anyone who likes sci-fi adventures and anyone who likes ninjas...IN SPACE
Allah u Akbar;-;Although this game does get extremely repetitive, I find this to be a brilliant game. Why? Community - Most games that I have played or even heard about has got a bad, annoying community with people raging, whining and trolling, However this game has a freindly community with people that will respond and have a bant ;). I do think that this mught be due to the fact of the game not being PVP and that you are able to be OP. Updates - I love it when a game does recent updates with new items and this game does this precisely. With new Equipment, weapons, warframes and missions; most people will never get bored. Always being Busy - Warframe doesn't really have a objective so you need to make your own which is what I love but some might not. This might be from Farming xp to trying to get a rare mod. What annoys me? Slow - Having to constantly go to the same mission to get new materials or mods is the most annoying thing for me. Grinding to get the things you want can bore you or make you determined to get what you want. I've been trying to go from rank 6 to rank 8 for 2 weeks now and still working on it which is a  but I am determined to get there plus it makes time fly. Repetitive - For the game being slow to start with; the game can get very boring as it will be repetitive. Having the same maps as well get boring as you want every map different for a new experiance which could make the game short for some. Costing - For me I am unable to put money in a game so I want to be cautous of what I buy. However the market of Waframe is very expensive which would put alot of people off. I deffinitly would not call this game "Free to Play" as you would easily spend 40 quid in a short time. Luckily most items can be made with credits and materials can be found in and after missions. Overall I have been playing this game for a long time and I love it. This is definitly a game for people who always want to be busy, determined and who want a nice comminity.
NoInputTaTa;-;The best free co-op game on steam, and this really free!
KiwiZ TV;-;warframe is where cam let your anger out
(SC).lioninjawarloc;-;metacritic score does not represent how good this game is
Arcturis;-;Space Samurai. Do you really need any other reason to play this?
Paladin562;-;This game is amazing, I love the bows.
comet;-;Though not user friendly, this game is a lot of fun after you learn its system.
Teatedpeak;-;Warframe...It's unbelievably amazing. Graphics are great, smooth gameplay, it's very fun and addicting. I'm suprised it's not #1 on free-to-play steam games.
Destyre;-;This game is alot of fun and quite addictive when you get into it. The game is constantly being butchered to death, balance wise, by it's developer though. There are also a ton of bugs and really strange design choices that wonder if the people in charge are mentally handicapped or have actually ever played any video games before. Great game overall though. Just be prepared for bugs bugs and more bugs. Be prepared for things being nerfed when they don't need to be and things that do need to be nerfed being left alone.
Blackring;-;Most F2P's pressure you into becoming an Upgarded member or buying special coins or some sh!t but in this, you can achieve your full goals without paying a single cent 8/8 m8 its gr8 dont h8
Bossmode57;-;I honestly can't critisize a free to play 3rd person shooter that has multi and single player modes when it comes to actual gameplay, however, I have to admit creating a new acount for the first time can sometimes be a real *****.
Specialist;-;A fun, 4 player, co-op game that is relatively easy to understand. Been a favourite amongst my friends and I for a while now, would recommend! The gameplay is wonderful, bringing together elements from third-person-shooters, RPGs and MMOs and combining them into something new. The graphical design is nothing short of beautiful, dazzling the players with a variety of levels and effects! The audio quality is great. There is nothing nicer than hearing the drums of war start to play rhythmically as you enter battle. Finally, the community is large, diverse and friendly.
hoguun22;-;Devs are very focused on their community and adding new content. been playing the game a while now and there's still plenty to do. basically, imagine star wars battlefront+ninjas+lots of gun costomization+lots of live events and mission types.
Zaekal;-;Warframe is an 3rd person shooter + hack n slash. The game is grindy like Monster Hunter since you will have to grind for materials to make stuff. If you log enough hours into it though a lot of materials no longer need to be grinded for. The game also has a bit of a learning curve and can be difficult for newer players due to how weak the starting weapons can be and that new players don't have mods to really help boost their weapons. Another downside for newer players is the wait time on crafting weapons/warframes. Weapons take 12-24 hours to craft and a warframe takes 12 hours per part, and 24 hours for the final product to make. You also only start off with 2 warframe slots and about 10 weapons slots. I know the above statement is very negative, but it is to let readers that are new to the game look at what they are getting involved with. Now besides those negative points, the game is very very good. For new players they give you 50 platinum which is the real life currency. This allows you buy some useful things such as a reactor or catalyst, or a warframe slot, or weapon slots. In the game you also never have to put on actual currency since you can get catalyst, reactors, and helmets can be obtained from alerts. You can also make every warframe and weapon (excluding event and founder's equipment). You can also get the real life currency by trading certain mods and prime parts/blueprints to other players. The game features a lot of weapon types and the endgame weapons are expanding so that there are becoming more weapons that hold up in late game survival/defenses. So it isn't just one weapon to use later, there are becoming many options. This game is in a beta state and is changing, so what is good now good be mediocre a month from now, what is top tier could get overshadowed later, and other things may change.
goodgamer02;-;Amazing graphics that dont kill a computer!!!
Seren;-;Ok so I have played this game for awhile, I have a pretty poor attention span so any game I play for 500+ hours as of time of writing is pretty special. It's is a bit slow at the start to get upgrades but after a couple days of playing you will be able to get multiple weapons and war frames a day if you desire. Netcode is pretty good. Multiplayer co-op is seamless and stress free (unless your trying to play with specific friends it can occasionally give failed to join errors or such) You can certainly enjoy this game without spending any money on it. After playing for 500 hours though I don't mind spending some.
Auramaru;-;It's F2P and loads of fun!
oktavistic;-;Awesome. Excellent customization even when you're not yet ranked. Easy controls. Plenty of missions. Weapon crafting. Gunplay and swordplay hand in hand. VERY optimized for low-end-to-mid-range machines. 10/10 WOULD PLAY.
CSGOBoost.com #1;-;This is a game. Get it. Seriously, YOU WANT SOMETHING BETTER THAN THIS DESCRIPTION!?  YOU! PIECE OF ! RECOMMEND ALREADY! I JUST WANT MY DAMN BADGE!!!
Meh;-;Fun Free-To-Play game that can be more fun with friends. You have to grind a lot for certain things, unless you want to just but them. Plus Space Ninjas that should be enough of a reason to play this game.
MasterPingALot;-;I don't like spreading my opinion too much but seriously, look how long I played this. I can almost asure you that you will enjoy this game! What isn't there to like about it? Third person, ninja's, cool weapons, acrobatics, robots, modified humans, killer fractions and beautiful graphics! (like I said, this is my opinion and shouldn't be taken too seriously! Just try the game first! Its free after all!)
Prima;-;This game is pretty good. Has a lot of potential!
immdev;-;Tons of weapons, bunch of frames (classes) with unique skill sets, clans, alerts, events, rails. This is truly content rich game. You should try it and you'll love it! 10/10 Would become founder again.
Cainiscool[BT];-;A game that a fan of stealth or action can play. Fun and always changing. Definitely worth taking a look at.
MDT.Kyle;-;Very great online/solo game. I recommend this game to anyone who loves playing with friends and parkouring at the same time.
Jake from state farm;-;After playing for a year i can say that this game is amazing! BUT it still needs impovement so expect some things to happen.
TheOnlyQman;-;One of the best free to plays on Steam.
Megacolon;-;Some very very beautiful and fun sci-fi action! It took a bit for me to get used to the 3rd person, but the pace of the action is awesome!!
TuesdayDrugRhino;-;There's really no point in writing anything creative here. Everyone else already covered all the bases. (look at the other reviews) All I can say is, this really is a great game, and you should get some friends together and play it. (it's best when you have friend's or family who play with you, and voicechat via skype or steam chat.) This game can get kinda grindy for some, and it does for me too, but that doesn't stop me from coming back. THE STAFF members are phenomenal, quickly fixing issues from recent updates with a patch within minutes, they don't have that "I'm in this to get every cent out of you that I can, while giving nothing in return." feel either. They encourage players to buy cash with coupons as daily login rewards, (which in my opinion was worth every penny I spent on it.) *** tl:dr *** This is the first and only game in 8 years of playing F2P MMO games I've ever actually spent any money... Yes, it's that good.
277787 [5CAV];-;Pretty Fun and Fun to play with Friends. Nothing can compare to what this game plays like and the setup!
Dudeinyourbackyard;-;9/10 would shoot guns with elbows and be a spess ninja again
Ferne Queenston;-;Do you like Space? Do you like Ninjas? Are you a fan of grinding? Then download this freebie game!~
pittseleh;-;I love this game so much!! i wish it was on other platforms
Tzaar;-;Warframe: Space Ninjas. With parkour and grinding abound, this game does many thing for my inner space ninja. That aside, the story line seems to be a bit lacking. However, I still find the game rather entertaining with good friends.
BoSToL;-;I'll try and keep this short When i started playing Warframe, i never expected it be a truly free-to-play game. It was only after ~40hours of aimlessly grinding the first 4 planets that i figured out how to play this game, progress and become stronger. I realised after becoming bored with my (weak) starter gear and building a ton of new ones to try out for  and giggles, that crafting your first few weapons is what gets you out of the frustration zone. The game was almost instantaneously opened up to me, (especially after upgrading my newly crafted gear) and I now found the gameplay to be quite satisfying and fun. I started to become more skilled at playing and was offered a spot in several clans. I picked one, and found its members to be some of the most helpful people out there, and I quickly learned how to trade some of my stuff, how to find rare and valuable items, and how to properly prepare my equipment for each mission. It wasn't long before i had enough Platinum to purchase my first cosmetic upgrades and extra slots for weapons and warframes. Dropping into a mission next to a friend, and catching their reaction when they see your hard-earned individuality - The alternative helmet, the "Syandana", the new vibrant colour scheme, and the intricately detailed weapons - is a HUGELY satisfying experience i cant describe =) Its even more satisfying to make their day by telling them you haven't spent a SINGLE CENT on the game. There are CONSTANT updates to this game that fix bugs, balance current content and add new content for you to enjoy, and it's not slowing down. It continues to grow and grow, and become more amazing just about every week; giving it a rather "polished" feel for an open Beta. It's going to be huge one day, and there's no reason that you shouldn't play this and be a part of its amazing development. TLDR; Dont listen to people who say this game is pay to win. They are simply stuck in the same place i was in: They want to progress, and Platinum deals are becoming more and more tempting with each passing day, as they struggle to find the answer that is literally staring them right in the face. I could go into detail about how the in-game Trading channel can you make enough Platinum to buy anything you want for absolutely none of your cash at all, but i did promise i would try keep this short =) So give this game a try, get involved in everything it offers and really go for it. I mean, who DOESN'T wanna be a badass space-ninja of untouchable epicness? (that's a huge plus right?) 11/10
AMDestroy117;-;A seriously fun game if you have the patience to repeatedly do missions to gather materials for better weapons.
Bambi;-;Often new awesome updates 10/10
Duck__;-;ignore metacritic. this is a fun game if you dont mind a little bit of work to get into it.
Shremp;-;i stick potatoes on my guns
Ed Solo;-;Best free to play game in awhile. Most free to pay are freemium; wear cash can make overly powered. But this not the case with warframe. There is in store cash only items ,but most weapons and warframes can be got with simply time and effort. Combine with combat composed both mele and ranged it makes for a fairly enetetaining MMO
Deathrow;-;good game a bit slow in the lower levels but stick with it . and for all the new players out there i got one word for you "SOMA".
PsycoticHamster;-;Freaking awsome game. 10/10 will lose my life to this game.
Inuzaki;-;Really, this is one of the best games I have played in a while and its free. Shooters are not normally my thing but this has so much more to do I don't care. They make updates all the time and there is always new content.
Sammun, choosen of the trench;-;bit grindy but enjoyable with friends
tomasialphawolf;-;This is by far one of the best free games I have ever played. The maps can get a little repetative but the missions are different which is a huge plus. You can play with friends and start a clan, and lots of options to upgrade, whether you want to pay or not. Would totally recommend this game.
diarrhea in cosmic orbit;-;i so defiently recommend this one (y)
[T Fur 2] Pizzarugi;-;Become a space ninja with technological, psychological, and magical powers hellbent on bringing peace to a war torn star system using swords and guns. 10/10, would parkour again.
Leroy Jenkins;-;all around good fun
Acey;-;Decent Game, 'nuff said.
Alexkubel;-;Pros: Fun shooter. relaxing. No Rubber ducks. Plenty of Corpus. Plnty of Colour customisation. Cool weapons. Cons: Not enough tanks. Not enough hats. Not enough Bread. not enough Gingers. Not enough black people. Not enough Infested. there is never enough infested. Lotus can't do math. Too many Tenno.
Maroo;-;awesome game , once u got hocked you'll just never stop , So get started ppl Join a clan and get ready to explore the system and take out bosses . Hunt Well TENNO :)
Zephreus;-;Look, I'm not typically one to support F2P games, but if you enjoyed Dark Sector, this will be right up your alley. It is F2P so there are microtransactions (which can be on the expensive side!) but very few non-cosmetic items are purchase-only. Essentially, you can play all of the content of this game without paying a cent. (Minus some color choices and various conveniences like extra weapons or warframe inventories) Its primarily a PVE affair, though there is the ability to go to PvP "conclaves." This game is solid, mindless, space ninja fun with a lot of variety on weapons and warframes.
Big Daddy Mack Magic;-;Best F2P game on the market.
WaMu;-;Great time sink, multiple levels, farming simulator
Azlight;-;A lot of people have varrying views on this game. There have been bugs in the past which have annoyed some. my friends included. But i love this game. So many hours just spent playing it. They're always updating and adding new stuff, whether it be different warframes or weapons and new areas. Community missions are fun to try and rack up some points. The warframes themselves are unique and fun to play around with. My favorite being Saryn. That poison op. Just about anything you can get by just simply playing the game. which cant be said for most free to plays. Run on walls, shoot, jump, slam and explode your way to victory xD
Dr. Doctor;-;Freaking awesome best FTP game ive ever played
Rastafarian Targaryen;-;This game got my pregnant
{}EventfulSumo3;-;BEST GAME EVERY PLAY AS A NINJA AND IT'S FREE
Sunset Superman;-;This is one of the most attractive games that i ever played. It is hard to get inside it, but once you've passed the firsts steps, this game becomes a place for ultimate enjoyment.
legocrazyjedi;-;i think warframe is fun and most peeople would enjoy
maxwelldoggums;-;Warframe is a fantastic free to play game about space ninjas with seemingly endless weapons, and unique character abilities. While some may find the third person combat repetitive, the gunplay is satisfying and solid. Every weapon feels different, and provides unique challenges, for example the Phage fires multiple converging beams of energy, which inflict enemies with a debilitating viral infection, in contrast to the graceful power of the Paris, a bow which magnetically accelerates arrows through your enemies. There are also an astounding number of melee weapons, with equally high variety, with a surprisingly deep combo system, and several acrobatic maneuvers to keep things interesting. Perhaps the most interesting parts of the game are the "Warframes" themselves. Each character has four abilities, much like a traditional MOBA game. These abilities range from a grappling hook which can be used to tear enemies in half and navigate the terrain, to a power which reanimates the enemies you've killed to fight for you. Each frame is vaguely themed around an animal, or element, and fill different roles on a team. Zephyr (a hawk-like fighter) specializes in mobility, and high burst damage, while Rhino (a heavy tank frame) excells at soaking up damage, and crushing enemies that get in his way. The art design in the game is fantastic, and provides a unique "organic armor" feel, with distinct enemies and factions. This is complemented by the solid sound design, which aids in the immersion. Perhaps my favorite thing about this game is the random encounters. As you complete missions, you may find yourself at odds with a specific faction. You'll get a message in your inbox, warning you that further actions will have consequences. Further defiance will result in the appearence of assasins, who will track you down and appear in your missions, creating a sort of mini-boss fight. There are frequently community "events", which feature special rewards, and game modes, requring players to work together to accomplish a larger goal. "Alerts" appear several times a day, providing more of a challenge for a specific award (often special items that normally require premium currency. ) While the game is free to play, it does not suffer from many of the typical problems of the genre. This game is NOT "pay to win". While the weapons given to you at the start are clearly inferior to end-game weapons, they are still relatively viable. Literally ALL non-cosmetic content is avaliable without paying a cent. Daily alerts can sometimes reward players with special rewards which are normally only avaliable through the marketplace. Boss fights will reward players with otherwise locked weapons, etc. The only downside is that this results in a good bit of "farming". Although, depending on your preference, this may not be a bad thing. Sometimes, you may just want to load up an easy mission, and slaughter hundreds of soldiers, other times, you may want more of a challenge, and the game provides the means to do this. Lastly, the developers are incredibly open about their work, providing one of the most transparent development cycles I've ever seen, often taking advice directly from their users into consideration, and providing a livestream about the game's progress EVERY WEEK. Patches are released nearly weekly, and significant content updates almost monthly, adding new missions, bosses, and reworks which address the concerns of the community. I would highly recommend this Warframe. Keep in mind, this game is in open beta, so there are bound to be problems, but being free, I'd say it's worth a shot, even if this isn't your type of thing.
Deez Buns;-;The game is really repetive after playing it for awhile but guessing that's the reason for players to continue to get different weapons in the arsenal.
RE.Stivodivo;-;Pretty fun game I'll admit. It's satisfying to get a kill once you get the hang of all the neat tricks you can do. The only con about this game are the microtransactions. The microtransactions are annoying and limit very much to your gameplay, they keep you from getting better, and cooler items. As a decent game, I give it 7/10, gotta make money somehow right?
Ziwo;-;not a ninja so i cant play this free. cost me alot of money and keyboards that i have bashed in rage!
OT XVI Theatan Unleashed;-;this is the best corridoor simulator ever, i think in my 5hrs of playing i ran down the same corridor at least 1000times!
Urungus;-;Class based combat+Manufacturing+Card collecting\fusing character and weapon enhancement. Many 'theaters' to progress through for xp, materials and cards. Collect credits to purchase most things. Buy chits to get specialty warframes, weapons and other things to build your own. Oh, it's free.
Obtenebris;-;Back in April 2013 when I first played this game upon initial open beta status, this game was absolute garbage. Environments were almost totally dark, textures were crap, AI and physics were VERY subpar, no minimap or objective markers and the list went on. However, it's now July and a friend got me to give the game another shot. There have been MASSIVE improvements and I really think they initially made it open beta too early. They've likely lost a lot of potential players due to bad reviews and bad experiences, but GIVE THIS GAME A SHOT. As long as you have friends to play with, this game will provide hours of group fun even when doing something as mundane as farming materials for crafting items. I think Warframe's devs have made a lot of improvements and more are coming. This game is gong to be around a long time. ADDITIONS 6/21/14: So the game has continually been updated, things like Damage 2.0, Melee 2.0, new weapons and warframes(characters). The game has some issues still and certain changes they've made recently that I don't care for. BUT, and this is a big but(haha), this game has something truly unique: Devs that for the most part listen to their players. Even if they don't actually make changes or additions suggested, they DO read them. When things have been added to the game the community hates, DE(Digital Extremes) will jump up to fix them. They understand we keep them going. They don't take us for granted. They're adding in new enemies and weapons that players have suggested and provided concept art for too. They're even adding in a new player experience in a couple of weeks with Update 14 along with an actual pet system. As in we get a space dog and have to actually take care of it. It's not just an extra piece of equipment, but a companion. All in all, while some mistakes get made or bugs happen, those're bound to happen. We still are lucky enough to have a developer that actually cares what its players think of their game.
BillaBong;-;Swoosh, pew pew pew, Boom! Blaargh! this  be awesome, SPACE NINJAS FOREVER!
|LZ| Franss the Reservoir Dog;-;Used Ash's bladestorm. My victim died before I touched him. Teleported inside a huge box and turned into a Box of doom. 10/10 would run out of oxygen again
The G-Gamer Guy;-;I think this game is good.
AntarcticMantis;-;Pure awesomeness, this is the most enjoyable game I've played because I always come back to it. I think it has to be the most beautiful freetoplay game at the moment and it probably will stll be so for a while...
Moostafa;-;Let me start off by saying this game is addicting!!!! It is not only an exemplary example of a third person action/shooter but of a game utilizing a F2P model!!! Digital Extremes has done a wonderful job, ensuring balance across the board, whether it's between the credits/platinum or between the weapons and Warframes themselves. In addition, they have written a narrative, that is dare I say it relatively fresh and original, while simultaneously tying in Dark Sector, for which this game is a spiritual successor to. I am genuinely excited to see where Warframe's story and Digital Extremes shall take fans of this game next!!!
Astronaut;-;Great graphics, awesome gameplay. A very enjoyable game which is easy to play.
Happy-Mile;-;This game is very worth a play. Not pay to win, which is a nice change for a free to play.
A Zombie King;-;Good game, kinda suprised it's free
Juan Bilzerian;-;Before you play this game ask yourself these questions. *Do I like jumping out of ceiling tiles? *Do I like spending half my day looking for upgrades on pathetic weapons? *Do I enjoy a broken economy where 50 bucks gets me a ratchet  katana? If you said yes to any of those, grab this game...immediately.
Zeus 154;-;Warframe, a Free-to-Play cooperative game, that implies the title of "Free-to-Play." The story of Warframe? Not too much is known, but a basic understanding of it is - it's a spiratual sequel to Dark Sector, which pulls some ties in from said game like the Technocyte Virus etc. You are Tenno, a species of human mutated from the Technocyte Virus. The suit, known as a Warframe is the suit that gives the user increased power. The Lotus, the one who guides the Tenno, asks of you to restore the balance to a universe at war. That is a very broad understanding of the story. There are various bits and pieces of lore in the Codex, but I'll keep the story asset brief. The aesthetics of the game are pretty original, mostly harkening with the Warframes especially. Everything looks sleek and organic. It's charming to say the least. As for the game itself, it is pretty fun. While people start out with a minimal amount of equipment, which can be considered a subtracting point, the player is given fifty starting paid-for currency, enough for a mixture of Warframe slots and weapon slots. These slots allow you to acquire more Warframes and weapons throughout your career as a Tenno. The starter equipment aforementioned which excludes the unique choice of Warframe, is nothing to write home about - a slow-firing automatic rifle, a basic sidearm and sword. But those aren't your only weapons you can acquire; a plethora of weapons can be utilized at the players own discretion. Things like "heavy" automatic rifles, to whips, to lightning-chaining weapons. The only problem being with the weapons, are the same-y aspects of them. Most bullet-based weapons behave like a laserbeam; accurate at all distances, with little felt recoil. As well, most of these weapons aren't "unique." Very few can be considered unique, but that doesn't stop the same aspect as above. The Warframes themselves are unique. Each one respects a different element in themselves. While it may take a few runs to get the components (this will be elaborated further), they are a powerful addition to anyone who can utilize them effectively. Ember can use her flames to scorch the masses, Frost can utilize his abilities to protect hardpoints or teammates alike. Things like these help make the game varied with different ways to play. With weapons and Warframes comes building them. You can buy these from the in-game market, coming in two flavors - the Platinum (paid) edition, or the DIY edition. Buying with paid-for currency, not only yields the weapon/Warframe in question, but it being supercharged (more mod points), and a free weapon/Warframe slot. DIY is where you need the components and resources to build said item. Things like Alloy Plate, Plastids, to a Warframe Chassis, Helmet and Systems, all funnel into the crafting system. The crafting system is not state-of-the-art, as you cannot create multiples of the same item (Ie: I can only build one Health Restore, wait until it is finished building, then craft another one...), but this is where all of the aspects show the Free-to-Play mantra. Everything can be acquired in the game trough the usage of in-game currency and time. If you want to build a Warframe? Do you have at least a few days? You can build him/her. Want that shiny new weapon? Have twelve hours to a day to spare? Build it. To elaborate further, weapons and Warframes can be enhanced even further with the use of mods. They are just basic alterations, that can squeeze out more power out of your weapons. Basic damage upgrades to elemental damages, things like that can help you progress even further. Simple as that. Getting an Orokin Catalyst or Reactor will fuel more mod points into your weapons and Warframes respectively. But that doesn't mean that there are "essential" mods, which make certain mods more useless than others. I won't go into detail into that, but some mods are unquantifiably essential than others. Another part of the game is... Grinding. It is part of every game to increase the longevity of the game. RNG rules all in this department, whether it is to get a component or a mod. This might be a slight turn-off point for many, and is a slight brick wall. You'll have to do a lot of said act to acquire the best gear. It takes a large sum of time to get maximum power. To lessen this is trading. You can trade mods or paid currency to get those mods you can't get, or cheese through the effort of getting one. All in all, Warframe is fun if you can get passed the grinding. Better with a group of friends, as most games are. The only problem is the early-game, grinding and some of the wait-times. Would I recommend it? It is free, so why not? If you get this far, then thanks for reading. Have fun!
oexodia;-;Great game with high potential, just that it must stay Free To Play
Cowctus;-;Ever wanted to be a space samurai with guns? No? Well play it anyway because it's a damn good game. Smooth gameplay and graphics. Some issues but hey, it's in beta.
Mutant. -Thomson-;-;Cool game but this new update is verry buggy and i mean verry buggy , still the game is awesome if you dont have it you should! they will probly fix the buggy stuff soon so.
Silver;-;this is game is almost awesome! Almost cuz it needs less "pay-to-win" pls. You have the blueprints, but for guys that spend money on games thats nothing.
Sergeant Hasta Gazpatcho;-;Free-to-Play: +1 Convoluted micro-transactions: -1 SO MUCH LOOT: +1 Grinding is a chore: -1 Story is nonexistant: -1 Lore-heavy: +1 (for lore-lovers) Lots of weapons and characters to chose from: +1 Lastly, space-ninjas. +9,999 Pretty good game. You should download if you're a big sci-fi fan.
Urska;-;This game, is endless fun with friends :L so play it lol
MHEnrique;-;Excellent game, 5/5 stars. Freedom of movement with immersive parkour elements, a massive variety of weapons, enemies, terrains, playstyles, and customization pair well with an incredibly dedicated development team that not only updates the game on a regular (weekly) basis, but also listens to the community when implementing changes, additions, or removal of game content. New players and veterans alke consistently enjoy Warframe to the fullest possible extent. On top of that, it's absolutely free, with in-game options to obtain the premium currency without monetary purchase if so desired.
$ @;-;Yeah a game where you play as an asian-like race fighting Old dudes in hi-tech armor using a mixture of guns and martial arts yeah sounds like a game good enough to be addicting.
Loganisgood;-;Very fun and the parcore is amazing
Searching...;-;yes, though there are many more games that could compare to this and out do it; this game is very good for it being free.
BigAmmoBob;-;An absolute must-play. Anyone who considers themself a gamer should absolutely try this game at least once.
Patrick L.;-;one of the best free to play game i have ever played
ZorbaBuddha;-;Best online Free-to-play Sci-Fi action Shooter!
The Macaque;-;its a good game and very fun to pplay. love the slidey slidey thing. it DOES however get repetetive after a while.
Opoxrapax;-;I've seen things you people wouldn't believe... Attack ships on fire off the shoulder of Orion. I watched C-Beams glitter in the dark near the Tannhauser Gates.... All those... Moments, will be lost... In time... Like tears, in rain... Time, to die...
Tamagakure;-;An excellent little gem of an MMO, this Free-to-Play has no point that demands you to enter PvP or cough up for some premium currency, though, both are an option. This is only further complimented by the mix of platformer and third-person shooter that's balanced just right. The only reasons you could hate this game would be if you couldn't stand the lore, or simply don't like the game's composition. There are sections that cater to every level of skill, and force nobody to stay within or go beyond them. Get into Warframe, but bring friends if you want a crew to work with you for more than one or two missions.
Revacane;-;u basically play as a space ezio.....
Trooper~Spective;-;Takes a while to get the hang of it but is very fun
Lelouch VI Britannia;-;If this game was a bowl of ramen, then it would be a very good bowl of ramen.
XXX_Crocodank_XXX;-;its good but the community is mostly idiots its impossible to co-op stealth because everyone else just charges in blasting everything and gettting you detected
WaffleMaddness;-;Amazing game to play with your friends! Very awesome and it takes true skill to be good!
blackmib;-;Its A bit hard to get the grasp of the foundry and modding system at first but its well worth the task once you figure that out its smooth sailing from there it has a good survivability and technically doesnt require you to spend one cent even though its easier.
Waifu Lifu YamatoRinko;-;ing SPACE NINJAS. Need I say more?
Generic Name;-;Ah yes, Warframe. The game that did beat my favorite game in that one MMOBomb tournament. So it is only natural that I try the game to see how it works. For the record, what happened with that MMOBomb tourney is all said and done, and what was said will be the last time I mention it in this review. Looking at it for the first time the game doesn't really stand out. It's a third person shooter set in space, and while space games are a viable genre, it's a known genre. You take control of a Warframe, out to defeat a faction hell bent on taking complete control of the Solar System or a massive weapons manufacturing company wanting to exploit secrets of a past life being, one of which is your Frame, or tasked with wiping out an infestation of mutated beings from the first two factions. Sounds pretty run of the mill, but it works. Graphics are solid; the Frames themselves seem realistic (or as realistic as they could be for a sci-fi shooter) and one can definitely sense the textures used on their suits. The environments are nice looking as well, ranging from industrial grit to high-tech polish to overgrown biomass strewn all over the maps. I can't say that I was too immersed in the game, but with a game like this, immersion is almost impossible so what the game does it does well. I do feel that a few of the newer Frames do seem out of place - they're over designed and have too much going on with them, leading to messy textures to gaudy coloring - but for the most part everything feels solid. The weapons are nicely modeled and textured as well; weapons that are from a particular faction look the part though some do stick out a bit, namely the Infested type weapons, which don't seem to fit in the game as well as the others. Sounds are good as well, though I do feel that the enemies - namely the Corpus - do get annoying with their gibberish. Turning the sound off is easy enough however. The UI is also good in this game; it's clean, easy to read, and unobtruisve, which is what every UI should be. I have seen screenshots of the game in its infancy and I am glad they changed the UI to what it is now, which makes the game look a lot more professional looking than before. The gameplay is where the game does shine though. As stated, this is a third person shooter, so the game isn't too groundbreaking. However, what it does it does well. Everything seems to fit seamlessly together, with intuitive (for the most part) controls and fluid motions. Using melee is a bit awkward at first; to use it quickly one presses E and one has to bind a key to switch to melee altogether, but in the end it makes sense as E is readily accessible. There are a few more problems though; wallrunning is a bit akward, especially if one is trying to run up into a vent. It does not always work and often leaves me annoyed. Another is switching weapons, which is done using the F key (rather than the middle mouse wheel like other shooters) but I am assuming that can be rebound. Crafting is straightforward enough. In order to make something, you need a blueprint and materials. Blueprints are often bought from the marketplace (the rest farmed from missions are bought from your clan dojo) for in game currency while the player farms for the materials. Simple enough, and once that is all done, you hit build and wait about 12 hours. I do find that the time is a bit silly; 12 hours for a gun? On top of that, there are few weapons available that can be bought with credits, which is the in game currency. The majority of them are bought with Platinum, which is the Cash shop currency, though Platinum can be traded between players. It feels cash grabby and arbitrary to have those timers, as one can rush build them for Platinum. Now for the drawbacks of this game. One is the mastery system, which requires players wait a full 24 hours before each attempt, especially the first test where new players are screwed because of the starting gun. This could be solved in many ways - one, attempt the test as many times as you want if you fail. This is a video game; why should you have to wait? Two, give new players a better gun, or three, make the test somewhat easier. I know many are thinking that I suck because of the gun being used, but for the record, I have switched to a better gun and as expected, I passed. Normally I would say that it depends on player skill for these tests, but with the damage system in the game, it's the gun that makes the difference moreso than the player. In short, remove the 24 hour restriction; it is pointless and all it does is add frustration, or if DE wants to keep it, give new players a better gun or make the test easier. The next drawback is the elevators in the game. They seem simple enough; call for the elevator, get in, wait for your team, and trigger it. Except almost every team I ran with forgot the third part; wait for the team. I know that this is more to do with the players, but DE could put in a way for everyone to tag the elevator BEFORE it can be triggered. Otherwise - and this is what happens usually - you have one person who shows up too late and misses the elevator. If it's a short ride, this is no problem, but in some cases waiting can be a real pain and all it does is thin out the party. DE has a checkpoint system with the dual locked doors, but something in the elevators that forces everybody in the party to tag it before triggering would work wonders. Third, and probably the biggest drawback of the game, is the fact it runs out of steam VERY quickly. What I mean by this is simple; one can reach the end of the game pretty quickly, even with lower levelled items. This could be for many reasons; the build timers could be one, or the fact that certain materials that are required for some weapons are far off and by the time you get the materials you either have a better weapon than the one you want to build OR that you have your weapon modded enough that the one you want to build is actually worse. It feels awkward, and makes me want to play the game less. Why would I want to repeat the process with a Frame or weapon that is worse than the one I have? Maybe it's just me, but I feel the game just runs out of steam. In all, Warframe is a great game. It's not anything groundbreaking, but what it does it does well and makes for a fun hack-and-slash game that can keep you entertained. I do hope that it is expaned on in the future though, and not just with events but things that acutally expand the gameplay. Aside from that, it's definitely a game to check out.
ConviX;-;Great game, all I can say
sporeman594;-;Story: Game has lore, but not much of a story line. The devs do put a nice touch on lore with the ever frequent events. Gameplay: Movement is my favorite part of the gameplay. From wall running to dodgerolling out of enemy fire, with a creative mind you can get almost anywhere. Gunplay and melee is also great. The massive amount of weapons in the game allow for you to have any type of build. Run and gun? Pick up an assault rifle. Like to pick people off from a distance? Plenty of long-range weapons. Feel like going Rambo and shooting exploding arrows? Go ahead. Warframe has enough weapons to satisfy hundreds of hours of bloodlust. F2P vs. P2W: Probably the best reason why you should give this game a try. The devs are extremely careful with how the microtransaction system works on the game. Every weapon, warframe, and sentinel are easily craftable via-ingame. Or you can help the devs out a bit by purchasing them in the market. The only thing that isn't available via crafting are some cosmetics and exp/credit boosters. Overall: Warframe is a great F2P game that has a vast deversity of niches you can get yourself into. The community is great although a bit quirky at times. The developers also take great care in working and communicating with the community in order to make improvements on the game.
OH;-;Great for quick co-op action. Good balance of a Third Person Shooter mixed with RPG elements. A number of glitches can be identified, but seriously its F2P so no complaints (and its still in beta). 7.5/10
jo-nathan-777;-;This game. If I remember correctly, I found Warframe right before Easter 2013. Everybody I knew was getting bored of ME3 multi or still playing Skyrim. I found Warframe one night tooling around on steam looking for something to replace them, and what a replacement I found. Warframe gave me the PvE and the grindy-collection I was looking for. It's missions can be so fast paced that you will loose track of time and, if you are like me, make other games seem like they are lacking. Digital Extremes updates and patches this game so often that it is almost a completely different gameplay since I started playing way back in April. I'm not going to sit here and tell you it's perfect, everything has cons. Every once in a while hotfixes or patches will break something in the game and we the players have to report it to DE for them to fix it, usually they are pretty good at clearing these things out, but hey, it's technically a beta. To keep blabbering on about what a good game it is would be repititious, so I'll leave you with this: if you like PvE, 4-person coop, extreme character agility, ability powers, and all with somewhat grindy crafting system that you can make a multitude of unique weapons with interchangeable mods; you will like this game.
GarageFridge;-;Warframe has undergone a ton of changes since I played it in August of 2013, almost all for the better. The gameplay is surprisingly fun and addictive. It's a fluid, 3rd person combat where you can transition seamlessly between ranged and melee combat. There's multiple frames with unique powers and builds, plenty of weapons, a handful of environments/tilesets, and a neat trading card type system to level up mods for your weapons. Between PS4 and PC I've probably put around 100 hours into this game and Digital Extremes is doing a good job of adding things that make you come back for more. There's always something to unlock, something to level up, and plenty of short-duration "events" for awesome rewards and specials. The game isn't without its flaws, however. There are some F2P shenanigans I'm not wild about. If you want a new rifle, you may have to buy blueprints with in-game currency, farm materials of varying rarities, and then wait a day or two while it bakes. There's plenty of room for shortcuts though; you can use Platinum (real-money currency) to buy the gun outright or speed up the build time. In the 100 hours I played I didn't pay a single dime, which says a lot for how much content is accessible without being overbearing. Since it's co-op, and many things are gated by a proficiency level (which is based on how many items you've leveled up), there's no real sense of P2W. There are some technical issues with the game. Some of the environments start to repeat, a lot. There are only a handful of tilesets, and 3 factions of bad guys. Movement is sometimes clunky and unresponsive, which isn't normally a problem but some of the finesse-based platforming means you feel more like a dumptruck and less like a ninja. All told, having put 100 hours into this game and not having paid a dime for it I can say it's worth playing...you've got nothing to lose.
legocrazyjedi;-;i think warframe is fun and most peeople would enjoy
Why Kay;-;warframe is like ze best 3rd person shooter i have ever played tried it :D
[TRC] Swinker;-;I personally like this game a lot but I feel like not enough people play it. It's a very creative and beautiful game that sets itself apart from from other games with its levels, but after a while it gets slightlyh repetetive in my opinion. I give this game 8.5/10
ScornfulMoney;-;Dis gam is so gud that i soiled myself upwards of tree tims.
Raven;-;It's a bit like pve third person quake with mmo-elements. You run through linear level and gun/cut down lots of enemies. Enemies drop ressources, credits and modifications with which you can upgrade your warframe (class) and your weapons. Ressources and credits can be used to build new warframes or weapons. Weapons and Warframes level up, which allows them to use more modifications. You can build new warframes and weapons with ressources and credits, both found in missions. Quake because the gameplay is pretty fast, warframes are very mobile including options for running up walls and sliding. The controls are well done, one of the few shooters where i didnt change the settings by much. The f2p-mechanic is really f2p. While you can buy pretty much everything with real money in the game, the game doesnt force you to do so. The gameplay is always nice and the farming isnt very time consuming until very late in the game. The only thing i would critizise are the few slots for warframes and weapons, but it's possible to somewhat negate that with the starting platinum (platinum is the real money ressource and you start with a 100 of it, so you can spend that to get more slots). The gameplay is somewhat repetitive though. there are about 10 enemy types per faction with 3 factions and 6 mission types. 4 of the missions play out very similarily, and the other 2 are pretty much the same. It also doesnt really matter if you play an exterminate mission against grineer on one planet or another (aside from the enemy-level). The developer has added 2 recently more which play a bit more uniquely. The weapons and warframes somewhat off-set that, because they play out differently. The endgame is pretty bad from what i can see though. Some weapons and warframes are really overpowered, one faction is heavily underpowered. So once you get your angstrom or ogris and max it out, there is no real reason to play the game anymore. Especially since the game is a bit to easy if you play it with 3 friends anyways. The graphics are pretty good for a f2p game. It isnt really performant though and quite odd in that regard. It runs more fluid on a computer of a friend of mine even though my computer is stronger for example. so overall: +nice gameplay with lots of options, you can melee, shoot, sneak (somewhat) and are pretty fast +fun +fair f2p model +big amount of content +good at not frustrating people. Mods are reuseable, discarded weapons give you a bit of money back. No f2p tyranny. -repetitive -bad endgame -bad balancing -bad difficulty scaling with more players I give it a 9/10 for a f2p game. I would give it a 6.5 if i paid for it. Try it out if you have time to kill and dont hate science fiction or third person shooter.
jbreaker7;-;warfram is a pentacle for its. What i've been waiting for!
Elit3;-;My legs don't grow back by themselves. 10/10
Draconic;-;it's pretty ing sick
Rambo;-;Very good game.. Dont worry about the other reviews... This game has been updated and is very good now... Highly recomend... The graphics are amazing and who doesnt like a game that allows you to climb walls?! Also its f*cking free.... Get it
PhantomStrikeX12;-;Its amazing people should totaly play this game is an amazing guns and melle ninja game ever ive never seen anything like this before i will never stop playing this game forever because there is alot to explore in this game this is something the whole world should play to enjoy because im sure enjoying this.p.s to the producers of this game-good job! i love you guys for this game long live the tenno!!
[NG]Infektion;-;Hours of gameplay straight to you for no cost! Weapons, frames, and missions golore! If you love dungeon crawlers and have a passion for third-person Shooters.... You will spend your time investing into this game. I know I have after 800+ Hours of non-stop grinding
T.w | BeanToast13;-;The game is fun but it gets repetitive.
PartySex;-;I was a little skeptical abou tthis game because I heard it was still in beta. But after I played for 20 hours on a friend's computer I am now hooked! With the great graphics and controls, the game just feels really fluid. There's little to no glitches and all around just a great game. Try it out for yourself and see!
Robin_Dude;-;I was a bit cautious about playing this game because I was afraid it would be Pay-to-Win.. But is actually possible to get everything in the game through standard gameplay. Weapon Mods, Parts, and Blueprints can be sold to other players in exchange for Platinum (the premium currency). The game is very fun to play, and there are Guns and Warframes (essentially characters) to accomodate just about any playstyle, whether you enjoy sniping from afar while cloaking yourself and sneaking around, running around shooting lightning from your ****ing hands, using magnetism to crush your enemies into oblivion, running in guns blazing and raising hell, getting up close and personal with your enemies and ripping them to pieces with one of the many, many melee weapons. Weapons, Warframes, and Sentinels can be built, leveled up, and modded with special abilities and perks with a surprising amount of customizability. All in all this game is very, very fun and I would highly recommend it to anyone who enjoys playing Third-Person Shooters with online co-op. The community seems generally nice and willing to help out new players from what i've experienced.
Frankenstein;-;Seriously: The only f2p title that ever kept my attention. First I thought: "Ugh, another 'pay to win' title" and worse, being kind of a Mass Effect ripoff. Then: Hey, whatever it is, its fun!!! It is tremendous fun. I like the fact that it is only PvE and PvP doesn't factor in at all. Most of the community is nice and fun, even if there are some di**s around, so even playing with random people is fun. Playing with friends is the best.
Rainbow;-;Set in the far reaches of outer space during a new Dark Age, WARFRAME introduces the Tenno, a race on the brink of extinction after being enslaved by the Grineer for centuries. Players enter WARFRAME on the cusp of the Grineer's victory over the Tenno until they begin to arm themselves with WARFRAMES - an ancient exo-skeletal technology only they can operate. Hidden within the Orokin Derelicts of a lost civilization, new WARFRAMES lie dormant and undiscovered. These artifacts are the Tenno's only hope for survival. With the lack of a Pay to Win system and easy engagement for new players, Warframe offers some quality time. As a free-to-play game, Warframe is a nice surprise that sets the base for a promising future. Warframe isn't anything special. It's not revolutionary, exceptional or timeless. Still - every time I returned to the game, it kept playing for at least an hour (without regret). Digital Extremes has made an enjoyable, engrossing, spectacular game. Especially, when you find yourself a team or - even better - invite some friends. If you need a new opportunity to slaughter aliens, you should try Warframe.
MyasterKruzaderz;-;I like best for the armors, creatively made by the warframe creators, lots of cool weaponry, to many planets, amazing enemy armors, warframe nearly beat Star Wars! lol, and amazing tricks, it's just to cool and amazing for my size lol, and the game is good for me not to big not to small mmorpg that haven't beat the size of Star Wars the Old Republic mmorpg that is kind of huge near 23 gigabytes. I dislike a few things, that is bugs, pretty much bugs. I can't even login since 4 weeks ago(Need help if someone know how to fix this). And i had a bug about the foundry that i can't even finnish the items i built up. Well to bad i hav played for quite near 40 hrs, and end up in the login issue. I still want to move on to the next levels. And btw please help my issue. One last thing, I Recommend this really-really futuristic, creatively built Online Game!..
Whiskey Lullaby;-;Lots of bugs and flamers 10/10 would fap to agian
Fireus;-;Not bad if you're looking for both F2P and something that will last you a while.
Baldo McDerpPants;-;Awesome game. You must play this if you like FPS games.
Yato @toilet;-;Really nice game.
Sir Swagrid;-;Warframe is a great game to play with friends, since it is very much a Co-op game and teamwork is essential for success. On top of everyting, it's free! Also, this is not a Pay to win game, since all in-game items can be crafted or won in in-game events without spenidng a dime. The graphics are great, and sometimes I just play because of them! Though there is no actual story, there are planets, items, guns, clans, and anything needed to make this a great Sci-Fi game that'll give you hourse of fun! Just beware, if your computer is VERY slow, lag may affect gameplay.
VIXVIMCMLXXXIX;-;Ive been playing warframe for a year and a half now, and i can say it is the best MMOFPSRPG game ever. The graphics are amazing, the customizability is exstensive, and the gameplay itself is addicting. This game is not for everyone, particularly in the sense that it's not a normal MMO.
ViPeR;-;It's very hard to believe this is a free to play game. It takes many machanics from other games I enjoy and uses them in a way that makes you want to keep playing. You will lose hours.
Yahia;-;A REALLY COOL GAME for heavy machines and even normal ones
Weaboo Jones;-;This game is pretty great, if you like space ninjas and eviscerating things, this game is the one for you.
Alphadragon;-;This is a very fun and adicting game with a fast pace and shooter aspect. Fun for all types of gamers!
Echo;-;THIS IS ON OF THE MOST AMAZING GAMES IVE EVER PLAYED ON STEAM AND I KNOW WHY EVERYONE IS TALKING ABOUT IT .. THE AMAZING SPACE NINJAS AND GREAT WEAPONS PLUS THAT SWEET PARKOUR IS THE BEST MIX!!!! :3
Leygon;-;I downright LOVE this game! It's chaotic fast action with space ninjas! Play however you want with a wide variety of weapons and abilities, which you can then further customise with mods (add-ons to your weaponry and Warframes that add effects such as increased stamina or fire damage). Honestly one of the best free-to-play games on Steam, AND IT'S STILL IN BETA. However, I do recommend a decent computer.
Custard;-;You're a space ninja with an obsession for grinding, you grind for more space ninjas and space ninja weapons so you can grind for better grinding weapons, the end game consists of trying to grind the hardest and surviving literal hours against waves of increasingly more difficult versions of enemies you've fought before, possibly over thousands of times before. I've lost control of my life/10
APPLES FOR SALE!;-;Great game with a unique aesthetic, frequent content updates, and fun combat. Unfortunately, the lack of an overall story or objective tends to make it feel like an endless grinding simulator. If you can look past that, Warframe will provide hours upon hours of free entertainment. It's a good game to kill time and have stupid fun.
Shadowpalm;-;Ninjas. With guns. In space. Doing parkour. Plus magic. Just play it, it's free. You have no excuse.
Dr.DoomLittle;-;Warframe, though it may be slow at first, is an outstanding Free to Play game. With a  amount of content and completely new classes and weapons and cosmetic items earned completely free, it is also an excellent deal. I have spent no money at all, and about 60 hours in have constructed dozens of weapons, hundreds of mods and killed thousands of enemies. Give it a try, and add me if you need some help! 85/100
Toxia;-;A very pretty sci-fi shooter with impressive ninja-style gameplay. Levels are randomly generated so if you replay a mission its different every time, this can get a bit repetitive when the same room or corridor is used 4 times in the same level though, but hey, its space, efficiency in ship design is crucial. :P Unfortunently there are no free female warframes by default, you have to pay for one or basically complete half the game to craft them, normally I wouldn't complain about this but Warframe promotes heavy character development and customization, ergo it's difficult for me to get in touch and immersived in such a game while playing a male character. Other than that it's a really nice game... oh and free to play of cause!
Mara;-;This game has two things I normally dislike, Free to Play and a strong multiplayer focus. On top of that it has next to nothing going on in terms of story or characters. However, it is a ton of fun to play. Gradually improving your equipment and facing larger odds and threats is very satisfying and it's easy to find a build that feels unique to you (or be a boring person and follow a guide, I guess). It takes a while to get going, there are some rough edges (it's a Beta, after all) but the combat is very rewarding and generally fair and the monetization mechanics are generally not that annoying.
AgentGoomba;-;Think of Castlevania HD on the xbox. It's the type of game that you would not enjoy if you are playing it solo. However, add a couple of friends in the mix, and you got yourself a rootin' tootin' time. The game lacks a true story mode or a single player experiance, but makes up for it in the sheer amount of content. Various types of mission have you and your friends going through shooting baddies and collecting material to build your next mass murdering machine. The game even has boss battles that put your Warframes and gear to the limit. Although the game Free to play (F2P), most content can be obtained with a little effort on your part. You can even go as far as selling that hard to find mod (modification cards to increase the stats of warframes or weapons) or insanely difficult blueprint (used to craft new material) and obtain money from a willing buyer in the community that can be used to obtain weapon slots to add more weapons to your arsenal or buy some cosmetic items to make your warframe a fashionable kililng machine. There's nothing to lose when playing this game, so it won't hurt to give it a try. Like said before, this game would be geared towards someone who is looking for that new multiplayer experiance with friends.
The Sun;-;I have put near 500 hours in to this if that says any thing about it, a masterful game with strong game play and with a high skill cap, plenty of gear and levels to play war frame is best played with buddys, and id recommend dropping five or ten bucks on it and forgetting the Free to play. You can earn any thing in the game by playing, events offer any thing from new guns to cosmetic items but buy plat will make getting started a lot more easy, the only draw back to Warframe is the truly insane crafting times to build new Frames a and clan gear, but that is vastly out matched by it's meany other achievements. At it's base Warframe was made by People (And Scott) who love ninjas and space and robots and zombies and pirates, and made the perfect combination hack and slash and shot and space magic with rouge-like elements and rpg to bring you Warframe a game about having fun!
Burtical;-;Ninja Pirates in Space. What else would you expect?
NewbiestNoob;-;This game has come such a long way since release. Now I can't stop playing it. Everything in the game can be unlocked as long as you put some time into it, so even if there are a lot of purchasable items and equipment, you can still be on par with those players. The combat is extremely fluid, physics are wonderful, graphics are fu**ing amazing, and the diversity in the frames and weapon builds make it fun to show off to your friends.
thisguyisbored;-;a definite must have, just download and see, once you start playing you wont stop, ive been playing since ive downloaded it.
The Green Knight;-;Very nice looking free to play game. Very addictive. Still a bit buggy, but there's a steady stream of updates and hotfixes. Devs are really responsive to player input.
Nuka;-;With the newest update (Update 14) changes have been made to make this game very new player friendly. This was a big issue with the game before- it just didn't accomodate new players well. So if you tried the game before and got frustrated with it, now's the time to come back and try again. Trust me, you won't be disappointed.
Toucan Sam the big strong man;-;great game
Redd;-;An extremely fun game to play, lots of jumping, lots of movement. About spot on if your looking for a game that suits your taste of simple pve dungeon running. The levels do tend to get grindy. But what good ol' fashioned mmo isn't? Get this game! It's super fun!
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Mr G Almighty;-;The depth in this game is surprising, it is very entertaining although the controls can be a little lacking.
Mufaki;-;It'll make your friends think you have a problem, and your parents will think you're just doing drugs in your room the whole time. 10/10
Mr.White;-;Very good game i enjoy it .But i would like more sword swings like combos and stuff would be great.Still this game is amazing try it because is Epic
Megas;-;I've been playing Warframe for a while, and i have to say that it is a pretty good game. Any bugs that are found in-game are almost instantly fixed by the next day in their very frequent bug fixes and updates. I feel that this shows a dedication to the consumers to provide a very enjoyable gaming experience. I feel that the gameplay is very invigorating and engaging, keeping you on your toes most of the time. Its a multiplayer game, even though you do have the option of playing solo. You have a wide variety of customizations for your warframes cosmetically, and stat wise. Overall, i think that this game is great, and that anyone who reads this should give it a try. Its free to play, even though you can pay real money to make micro-trasnactions in-game for special items. I give Warframe a 9/10
IseeBlack;-;Really fun and enjoyable. You have to have patience while playing though. Building anything can take quite a few hours.
Man_of_Jelly147;-;i've played this game so much that when i try playing a different game, i just find myself playing more warframe
AtomicWaffles;-;the game is really fun there may be some things that cost money but if u work hard u can get it without spending a penny
[WP] Northern1;-;Warframe, where space ninja's do battle to ensure their very survival and uphold balance in the universe. This game, put simply, has been an interesting and amazing experience. There are people willing to help, there are constant updates to keep you interested, and has an immersing UI system. The endless possiblities of modding your weapons or frames, the amazing color packs (if you decided to get extra's), and the actual visual gameplay. I am proud to say that DE has made me hooked on this game. Good job and congradulations to any awards you guys may win. I look forward to playong more of your creations. :)
CapricaSix;-;Warframe is a PVE focused cooperative scifi action shooter game where you get to play as one of this Spec Ops people with exosuits who are infected with technocyte virus that gives them supernatural powers. It's meant to be based on the Dark Sector universe, but in a distant dystopian future. There's about 5 female and 5 male warframes currently with their own unique abilities and appearance, and still more coming. You can go around collect cards which work as weapon or warframe upgrades from the missions you play, level up your warframe to be able to equip more of those upgrades and fuse the mods together to make these upgrades even more powerful. Nearly anything can be obtained through ingame progression and be crafted after a bit of grinding and farming so you don't necessarily need to spend any real money to get the "good stuff". There are several yet similar game modes and environments, most of them fun and replayable, but still has room for more improvements. All that being said the game has near to no customisation aside from alternate helmets and colour palettes. There's no genderswap option which is a huge downside for me personally. And the upcoming PVP feature {much much later} which I don't care for in the slightest. This game is definitely worth a try if you've got friends to play with, PUGs aren't an option as everyone seems to be either "speedrunning" or trying to be a , going solo is always an option though if you want challenge. Updated August 2013: The company behind the game seem to want to turn the whole game into a tedious repetitive grindfest cash-cow where you'll just get stressed or bored enough and resort to buying what you need from their store. Rather than a replayable funfest. It's their first MMO and they're "learning" that's all fine, but I'm afraid they're learning from the wrong people. Stay away unless you don't mind the grind, otherwise still a regularly updated fun game.
Based God;-;Get this  now, its ing awesome
PrivateAzib;-;One really enjoyable game, especially with friends. Also you can play it for free without needing to buy anything! Also, space ninjas are cool.
Claritii;-;If you got the time and effort. This game is fun and easy. Paying makes the game boring and short lasting appeal. I mean. Yeah, colors are cool to buy. But the items that you can buy for free? Not cool, bro. I find it funny this games "a beta" and if you have friends or strangers and the good guns. You can have some extreme fun, or just hangout in your clan dojo. Or shoot a random army down. And I played this game 2 months after "beta" release. So I know what I'm doing. This game is phenonmal. I can't imagine whats in the full version. Lost out.
Nigellllllll;-;cool
Gordon Olaf;-;recommended for third person view style lover nothing more to say to this awesomeness wish i played this 1 year earlier :(
SaiyanSquad;-;This game is one of the first games I got when I got Steam. I LOVE this game. This is an amazing game. It's almost hard to believe it's free! LOVE IT!
XoN_TrickzZ;-;Pros + Good Customisation. + Good Combat. + Sound Quality is excellent. Cons - No clear story, your just thrown into the battle with no real reason to kill the enemies apart from your told to and that they're shooting at you. - Repetetive Environments (Jungle, factory, maybe if your lucky..... a bright factory). - Odd Weapon unlock system. Overall i would reccomend this game for the combat and customisation alone however if you look for fun and story telling in a game then this isnt the game for you, the gore may give you some giggles for the first few times you make an enemies torso fly into space team rocket style but once you've seen one decapateted enemy sliced and diced like mince meat, youve seen them all.
wuster11;-;all those of you who like hardcore coop shooters like warframe will be delighted with its content although its reliability of you spending real world money on a free game is kind of unfair
SkyZo;-;Warframe is great. Its lore is fantastic, the setting and artistic designs are excellent and its gameplay and re-playability are quite recommended. I easily found myself wanting to know more about the Tenno, the Lotus, the other factions, the Infestation viruses and mysteries within the solar system (Orokin and the Void, anyone?)... but the game explains very little outside the mini-solo Vors campaign. This game could have easily been my Game of the Year if it wasnt for so many issues regarding its game design. The most infuriating one being -> it's clearly a NOT PLAYER FRIENDLY game. - You're early forced to choose a single warframe and weapon composition at the very beginning of the game and commit to it whether you like it or not. - The Vor campaign feels like a mini tutorial. It's a fantastic way to explain the game mechanics and part of its lore, yet once it's finished, the game feels kinda empty plot wise and very little is explained. -Failing a mission will result into a TotalTimeWaste inc. - Playing stealthy is pointless. I found myself going sneaky bow, bo and kunai fighting when, to my surprise, the matchmaking kept throwing players at my game gun-blasting and speeding throughout levels, therefore ruining the solo experience I had enjoyed so far. - Soloing survival / capture / defense missions is a titanic task. Matchmaking is then mandatory. And it may result into god-like 1000+ grinded hours players or Hi, I just killed Vor and I barely know how to Warframe, bro players, so good luck! -Grinding for crafting materials throughout the solar system in a wide variety of missions is fun. Grinding a concrete annoying boss (Im talking about at you, Alad V and your pesky Zanuka) for a rare material that may or may not drop in order to craft an important part of the game such as Warframes Helmets is not. -80% of the mods you find are just salvage / vendor meat. -Map repetitiveness, predictable AI from the enemies and very little purpose on doing some missions makes you lose eagerness to login daily quite easily. -Learning curve is quite blur, and once you master the sprint + slide + melee attack drill, thats pretty much it, aside from Warframes powers. Dont get me wrong. Most of what Ive played from it is incredible for a F2Play game. Combat is fluid, build options are quite wide (2-handed, shotguns, spamming lightning Warframes, stealth, tanky-melee, etc.) and co-op features (clans and the like) will have you willing for more. STILL The game grabs you in, hooks you up for a while and tries to milk the platinum out of you. At some points, youll feel like playing Dark Souls 3000: some missions are plain *t to go through alone or no money invested. Again, having to wait 3 days for your new hard-earned Warframe to come out of the foundry or not being able to customize it with the colour you like (cosmetics aside) is not cool, yo!. I wouldve definitely paid 40+ bucks for a solid well put together single player campaign and a patchable online mode with 100% of the content reachable by crafting. But since the game offers the chance of not paying, I will continue to login every now and then and grind with no purpose at all (since the real cool stuff like Orokin reactors, Formas and its like are something out of the plebs' reach). At this point, and considering all of the above, Im quite certain to say that Free 2 Play model has screwed Warframe up. See you next patch, Tenno
Luciel;-;It's really worth it to play this
ScrubLord;-;This game is not pay to win. nuff said
Phaall;-;Very fun game to play with friends
EtchyaSketch;-;It's free. It's fun. What more do you want.
Jo3H;-;Remeber when you wished you was a futuristic space robot ninja fighting space russians to make advanced weapons and new robot ninja suits? well our day has come, if you have the time(and lots of it)
Louisarius;-;awesome game!! Lots of good updates and free stuff from DE itself. 9/10 recommendation for a free to play TPS. Pay2Win doesn't seem to be taking it's place here and we can rade and farm stuff. Lots of high level players didn't spend a single penny for the game yet they're all so pro (OoO)
[TeamSexy]Tortuga;-;Great game, requires quite a bit dedication for farming materials and pieces but the action and playability is great.
P13R0W;-;Warframe may be just another online game but a fairly decent one that can last a while for those who can stomach some of the grinding. It is being constantly updated because it still isn't really out of beta after all of this time. It is just too buggy to be considered a full release. The guns and melee system are keen and work fairly well but the AI aren't that great. The game needs work done but can be fun if you are willing to overlook a few glaring problems.
Happycreamcheese;-;Once you get this game, you'll be playing it non-stop!
Druterium;-;This is one of those rare games that isn't addictive because you're grinding for the best gear, or hunting achievements, or any of the other conventional gameplay gimmicks; it's addictive because simply playing the game is so damn fun. The gunplay and swordplay, mixed with fluid parkour-style movement around the maps, makes the action in this game very dynamic. You'll want to log in and bash baddies not because you need materials to make that new gun (although that's also a worthy goal)... you'll want to log in because playing the game is like living out your own personal sci-fi action movie. With ninjas. In space. Space ninjas. Almost forgot to put that part in here.
paddysius;-;Great game and free content every month ! Long time fun guarantees ! No pay2win !
KingMe;-;Amazing guns blazing or stealth shooter for anyone who likes space and/ or ninjas :D
Darkwalker;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun. It's a game about space ninjas destroying space nazis and futuristic EA representatives. I don't think I need to say any more here.
KingSpar7an;-;Perfect xbox Controller Support! Best i seen yet! Game is great! Loveing every second of it!
#26;-;I don't even know where to start with this game. It's just awesome!!
Pounce De Leon;-;Changed my life as much as chipotle did: entirely
Zab;-;Cool game :3
Royan;-;Overall game is good , but it lack in tutorial of the game and helps section
ZakOnestar;-;The game is great , one of the best Free to play games I've ever played - only played 123 hours so far. The amount of grinding that needs to be done and missions to complete of different difficulties makes it so that the player can never say "i've done everything" without properly playing the game for hours upons hours. A good selection of warframes (different characters basically) to make and use. Missions like survival make it fun to play with friends for a long period of time and with so much bosses and items to collect one can not be bored. I'll give this a 8/10 due to the fact that I haven't tried the PVP nor have I ventured deep enough in the game (i.e. the HIGHIEST missions) to give a full review. I'll mostly give this a 9 after venturing further and maybe a 10 once i get in to the PVP and so fourth. Also there are many glitches and beta issues that pop up from time to time, for example people getting disconnected as soon as a game starts / people getting kicked from the party at "extraction" and so fourth. But Overall for a BETA - this game is pretty awesome. So 8/10 for now and it can only get better in my opinion, TRY IT OUT!
ZSquatter;-;I spend most of my time hitting random storage containers with a sword. Good way to waste time. 10/10
Taco Nuke(Dapper Edition);-;Cybernetic ninjas/events and constant updates...The developers are keeping this alive, and I am pretty damn happy about how far they have come with all the content that has been added to the game itself
shuPRinov.;-;This game is just awesome. You can choose from just a few weapons when you start, but then you have the chance to craft your own weapons (and there are like, alot). The graphics are awesome too, about how it looks and how efficient they are. you can easily get +40 fps with a fairly old computer. The detail I personally like is that its not P2W (atleast not completely, if you get KIA, you can spend a revive, wich is bought from the market; OR you can be revived by a teammate in Coop). The only things I dont like about it are the unstability of the game servers and just a few bugs in the connection system and in the Steam launcher.
phoenixfeather;-;One of the best-if not THE best-F2P games I've played. To get this out of the way, this game is NOT Pay 2 Win. In fact, the best gear is only obtained through playing; cannot be bought. Warframe strongly encourages working in a team, though that doesn't mean that you can't go solo (there's a whole option dedicated to that). And with a large list of weapons and Warframes to choose from, there'll always be something to do. The only bad thing I could say is that if you're looking for a story or indepth game, this is definitely not for you. The missions will get tedious for those that don't like killing things over and over again. Still, it is a very well developed game that delivers several hours of ninja fun.
[BLT]AsianDucky;-;This game is Great, plus its free. the game is fast paced and hard.
bobronan;-;its a game you dont always have to play to advance in, but it has to build stuff like clash of clans, if you do play warframe (which you should) join my clan!
Gasai Yuno;-;GOOD game , but craft is bad
u80696006;-;awesome game, huge selections of warframes to choose from, each with unique playstyle and skills. hundreds of mods to customize your build and weapons. everything other than weapon and frame slots can be obtained by playing, well, a lot of time, or get it with real money
Master of G;-;I was hammered in my suit. 63/10
gunslinger20121;-;I love this game so many hours and so much content.
Sam Fisher;-;Gotta say really great game, Been playing it since its beta phase and its only managed to get better and better. 10/10 would reccomend.
Cypher;-;This is awesome game. Very awesome!
Polarbawr;-;I.... My . It's swollen with blood. I cannot think very clearly. You will do one of two things : A) Play for 2-5 hours and think "eh... I don't get it", and stop. B) Press on when you have a feeling like you aren't getting anywhere. Than 100 hours will disappear like a dry fart that you overlook while in an intense game of Lag of Legends. I am B. B for ..? B for...balls... my testicles are so swollen from sitting for so many hours.. Ninjutsu Spaceru Help me, Senpai
Approving Arnold;-;Ok, Pros: Fast paced shooting mechanics, decent sword mechanics. Good mobility, customization not that good but workable. Teamwork, can still play solo however. And a stealth and free-run mechanic. Nvidia graphics and Physics! Cons: You will NEVER get into PvP becuase of "Your inventory ### doesn't meet the requirements." Unfair, if not almost cheating AI. Cash store always dangled in front of your face. When the game adds a new playable Warframe, it feels like "YOU MUST PAY." in order to play it. Feels unrewarding. Buggy beyond beleif, but that's because its an MMO. Near impossible to join a guild/clan. Notorius time waster. Lotus voice. Overall: I enjoyed this game for a few days, but between DRM, lack of commmunication with other players, and cash store ads. I reached my Pain; enjoyment thresh hold. It just seems like a time waster, and you never feel like you accomplish anything, unless you sink in $$$ of course. If you need to waste a few hours go ahead, but it just felt to as if there was no point to doing ALL of the same repeating missions OVER AND OVER again. It's up to you.
OverWorked_PartyAnimal;-;This game is filled with ups and down but over all the gme is very good in all the aspects of the fight and firefights I verymuch enjoy this game and will being playing this game until my eyes bleed but i dont think i will let it get to that point althought i cant make any promises so if your thinking about playing/downloading this game do it is seriously Awesome and i recommend it to everyone i know!!
[CG] SEXY PANDA;-;I would recommend this game to people who are used to the diablo style of grinding, as well as have a group of friends to play along with. This game can get very tiresome fast unless you form a clan or join one and do missions with your clan mates. Pvp is also not were it should be, it has a lot of balancing to do but has a ton of potential.
Working Title;-;Damned fun game. Takes some time to get into, but it's great for a F2P.
Ghost;-;This is such a good game
etfromsd;-;Oh my god the best thing ever
Primogenitor;-;Where do i start with this game to hold your attention? Warframe is a fast phased, action packed thrill ride with marvelous graphics in an ever expanding universe with it's own level up system, upgrades, parkour, magic, spaceninjas, you name it. And the devs who brought this game are very talented people who do their best to daily bring new things to the table. However, this game does lack a proper endgame as of yet and suffers from repetition, but it's the constant content which will keep you coming back for more, it really is a great experience with lots of potential for years to come.
Slightly Stealthy Steve;-;I haven't played this a lot but for the time I have played I enjoyed it. I wanted different Tenno though but that's really grindy and really hard to get if you don't have a good group with you. The controles may seem wonky but if you change them to your liking then they're amazing. The only thing bad I can really say is the melee. It's weak and everywhere, but if you know how to make your Tenno, it's strong and everywhere and sometimes the only freaking thing you use. The maps are practically all the same but different routes, the weapons are the same just different stats just like Dust 514, and it's easy to get out of control thinking you're a badass and getting yourself mauled. Overall it's a pretty good game, not something I'd play all day every day but still good enough to catch my attention, especially considering I don't like super fast paced anything or third-person games. Oh also the lighting, the lighting is too extravegant, so if the flare bothers you turn off lighting effects, it helps speed up the game and its better on the eyes and makes it feel more natural.
DuckQuack;-;u can do wall run like in prince of persia... i think i dont need to tell u anything else
Tyger991;-;Great game to play! I have already put hours into it and it gets better with every update.
grimm reaper;-;its a great multi player free game with a choice of weapons quests pets and money i love the game because its fun to play with your mates and i recommend it
Axel;-;This game is cool, like a coop hack and slash sci-fi game + tps shooter, awesome.
Peppermint (TMFtwelve);-;I feel like this is a game I'm gonna be playing for a while... Pros: - NINJA SPACE SWORDS SHOTGUNS - Co-op elements - Awesome introduction - Multiple guns and a awesome arsenal - Also some RPG elements added Cons: - Kinda lags on lowest settings - I prefer first person - Some P2W elements, but at least they don't scream MONEY at you I recommend this game for the awesome shooting n stuff, and cool storyline.
Naoto Shirogane;-;ive been waiting for this and its here finally
ionize;-;It absolutely ruined my life +10
lee333;-;This is one of the best third person shooter I have ever played wwith good graphics and a nice soundtrack with energetic and fast pace gameplay makes the game very enjoyable and also the choice of stealth or aggressive gameplay and also the choice of support roles if you dont like to lead in games, the main problem with the game is that it is a freemium so you can play it for free and be just as good as premium players it just takes a lot more effort and grinding to obtain the really good items but for me personally I dont mind but I can tell some people dont like stuff like that.
ayy lmao;-;Complicated, but once you get into it and understand how to play, it is one of the most fun games I have ever played. 10/10 would recommend.
Grayfell;-;I'm enjoying Warframe immensely. The cooperative atmosphere among the players is refreshing, and the gameplay is varied and fun. Your loadout will become tuned to your playstyle in so many ways, it's astounding. I have a good friend showing me the ropes and helping me get some of the items, but it's just as playable with random strangers. You'll quickly learn some things, and slowly learn others. A few bugs speckle every play session, but not enough to frustrate me out of playing. Highly recommended.
PAULEIGEE;-;I'm hooked. Warframe is so well done. One of the best 3rd person, action, free to play game i have ever played. Keep up the good work Digital Extreme.
The "Chosen" Undead;-;It's quite fun...... but mostly the *clears throat* you know what i mean right? If you are one who likes to Grind things with friends (and  them off like me) then this game is for you. If you enjoy the excitement of crafting things then this game is for you. That is why I, myself, renamed this game something inappropriate c:
Ludwig Sphinchter;-;Great game, love it a ton. Free to play just makes it all the better. Controls are easy to adapt to and the freerunning/parkour aspect is amazing, but slightly buggy. 9.5/10 Would play.
KTM251;-;Best free to play I have ever played. No need to spend money at all. Major plus, the game acts and looks as if its worth at least $50. Highely recommend.
secondnull;-;Really well thought out game. Not your standard FPS MMO, this is like a hybrid of a MMOrpg, an online first person shooter, and a collectable card game. Really fun to play once you get used to what is going on. Biggest downside is that the maps/enemies get a little repetitive. A solid 8/10
racingsqrrl;-;Much better if you have friends to play with
callumhirst;-;Love it
DreadFather;-;Hello people, This game is worth it. Simply download and play. Small learning curve with wild fun. Join a clan for even more added benefits.
VisualEcho;-;This game is awesome! Has quite the grind to it, definitly will keep you busy.... Can't beat free to play
Eyes;-;3rd person shooting with the loot/grinding of an mmo. Good stuff!
Joo Baptista Arajo Jr.;-;freakin awesome just play it
Sprncenatu';-;This game.....is FREAKIN AWESOME!
[2PRO4US]Mancoforce;-;As a power-armored space ninja with cowboy neon revolvers I punched a space marine to death while a companion cube of deth shot its friend. 10/10 If you think the shooty aspects are good enough to outweight the grindy aspects.
LunarNexus;-;One of the best games I have played.
Sergeant Keel;-;You are a space ninja. IN SPAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAACE! In all seriousness, a lot of fun. I have sunk a lot of time into this one.
[SOTV]Mr.ChocolateZzZ;-;I love this game, its space ninjas cutting up dudes with guns, using an assload of weaponry. It does have Pay to Win elements, BUT you need to work hard to be the Very best. I recommend it gets my A/5
Varg;-;An awesome cross between Assassins Creed and MDK. Parkour meets hack and slash in a sci-fi world. Wether you prefer a stealthy approach or in your face brawling, this game has it all!
savvykinkajou;-;Space ninjas killing things with guns is fun
Deez Nutz;-;Perfect nauesea simulator, good graphics 8/10 would get sick again
_/| 1k ping gg of Cykaland;-;Still better than COD
aribenjamin;-;As I near my near my 200th hour in warframe, I still consider this one of the best games I have sunken my time into. MMO's are sort of my thing, I have played hundereds of hours in many diffrent games, and Warframe is by far the best I have played. Part of what makes it even more increadible is that they are still olny in Beta. I have been around since alpha, roughly patch 9.0 and I have been impressed with every minute. I love the feel of the game, the weapon system, the seemless incooperation of melee weapons, and especially the movement system. I alos appreciate that as a free to play, they have a live pay market, but that they have managed to make it possible to earn or craft nearlly anything in the game, making it not pay to win. As it stands I consider this one of the best Sci-fi games on the market, one of the best MMO's, and by far the best F2P MMo. It is especially great if you enjoy small group multiplayer, friend olny squads, and resource based crafting. While it currently lakes in story, hopefully to be fixed soon, it makes up for it in shear quality of game mechanics. I rate this roughly an 8.75 to 9.5
Cormath;-;Plays like most FPS with smooth graphics and more coop missions. Few real solo-only mission so ban open upmost any map to let others spawn into you game and work as assault teams. Custom mods allow for a lot of variety (from weapon upgrades to cosmetics). Like many other games this can quickly go pay-to-win, however it is not required if you want to go slower and enjoy the experience as free-to play. Very pretty and fast graphics.
tyrantofbullets;-;CYBORG MUTHA ING SPACE NINJAS WITH MAGIC
MonsterKitty;-;Awesome for a free game. lots of cool and different features.
#Hashtag;-;Out of all the games that i have played (probably about 208)this one is my most favourite
Suizidaler Kse - INTJ;-;I think Warframe is a pretty cool guy. He fights aliens and doesnt afraid of anything
Xero;-;Playing WF for 250+ hours with no steam makes me happy.
e dragon;-;this is one of the best shooters iv played, sure its slow at the start but this game has so much to offer. lots of weapons,check, epic bosses,check, loot,of course, ninja skills,defintly. and everything is acessable for free, just have to unlock them
loupeeh;-;Really good game, there are still some bugs. Runs smooth, even on an older computer. Optimized really great. Sad there isn't any cross-platform.
ScottishBlackWatch;-;This game is amazing. So much content and a company that releases updates constantly, and it's free! Great story and background, team work is a must. The whole presentation is crisp and clear, I would almost consider it out of BETA. MUST TRY THIS GAME, not pay to win at all, :D
DarKGameR177;-;Awesome action game to play with friends :D
Logan_Winters;-;This game has changed a-lot (for the better) from when i last played it. it is now in my top 5 favorite games, instead of my top 5 worst games. 12/10 dolphins.
chalthas;-;What more is there to do than recommend this game? First of all, it's free to play. This means you don't have to pay money to play it. It does not mean it will run like those flash-games that represented what was free to play just 5 years ago. (Although free to play used in the manner as it is used in Warframe it means you can play without paying, but paying could make the experience better. Nonetheless, as a non-paying user, I think for myself that it plays just fine for free.) Warframe's looks are equal to or better than most AAA releases and the gameplay is likewise. It might take more than a few hours of playing it to understand how to work it properly, and it doesn't always tell you excactly how to pull off every move, but this also leaves a lot of room for experimentation, which I think is one of the points where this game shines rather brightly. If you like ninjas, sci-fi, shooters, stealth actions or slashers, Warframe is likely to hit you in at least one good spot.
Romsia;-;Great game, time-eater but giving satisfaction from completing a quest or crafting a new frame.
//esthetic;-;Feels like a full-game, every time I play I forget it's free-to-play.
Sharkey;-;This game is pretty fun... I did not enjoy it that much but if you have a gaming computer on high graphics? you will not bee dissapoint...
Dailybreeze;-;pretty awesome game, lots of things to shoot
GLaDDYS;-;Space Ninjas with delicious buns. 40/10, will play until the end of time.
HerpingTurtle;-;I know this may seem odd, and I love this game non the less. But it felt oddly like Global Agenda, it runs smoothly, overall I can say it is a great game, addicting, time consuming, and fun to play. What's to say that's bad about this game?
Akallabeth;-;Very entertaining, fast-paced action. I love the style of combat as well as all of the customization and the feeling of being unique that back it up.
DoktorSkrublord;-;Really fun and a good way to be introduced to an mmo
Flamerider901;-;it was fun
owlink23;-;Warframe... MAH GAWD!
Light #LF Invoker Immortal;-;Best Raiden Simulator i've played yet.
Lewis;-;Glory to Warframe. When I first started the game offered a challenging scaling game. With all the updates after it the story progresses and the game gets better. DE tries hard as a developer to listen to it's fan base. Not so much on here but on their own forums. Fast paced gameplay, ninjas, and a great Sci Fi setting are the hallmarks of this game. I still have not yet cleared every map point and the alert missions keep me on my toes as I see chances for good loot and the battles between the Corpus and Grineer. I'd recommend this game to anyone who has an open mind and maybe a buddy or two willing to give it a shot. With U14 a great tutorial launched making the learning curve less of a pain. Good luck if you take the game up! If not best of luck where you end up.
^4 mums spaghetti;-;well uh, this game has good graphics. thats about it. :\
The Deanie;-;This is what happens when you marry the excitement of the Mass Effect Trilogy to the Gears of War Franchise, you would have Warframe. If you enjoy both those games, the visuals of Mass Effect, and all it's Sci-Fi goodies, and just want hords of baddies coming at you. Get this game.
Thug owl;-;i really love warframe butthey need to add more wild on earth, hope that happends!!
[ MAXIMUM OVERKERMIT ];-;I went into Warframe thinking it'd just be another ORION: Dino Horde. ...After about 6 hours of nonstop gameplay, a lack of a need to purchase in-game items with real money, jumping into bulletfest after bulletfest, and an utter addiction to being a proper freakin' gun-and-sword-weilding space ninja, I said otherwise.
kylie jennier;-;good graphics
verolife47;-;great game, its fun
Zurcatron;-;Extremely good game! And im only a few hours in LOL
hazzus1983;-;great game
[blue]Master[red]Sinpai;-;GO AND GET THIS GAME NOW AND EXPERIENCE IT !!!!
OfficerOvary;-;I hate my life
Nitro_Milk;-;this game is a very fast past game and it is full of adventure i highly recommened
Gaphiel;-;This game is so fun. If you enjoyed the Mass Effect franchise, do give this a go. Plus, the art direction and graphics are beautiful.
Yolobux;-;This game is amazing, great graphics, but a little laggy.
Kens;-;Great 3rd person shooter/fighter game with great CO-OP potential for up to 4 friends. Good and incredibly friendly community both in-game and through support forums, this is by far one of my preferred games to play, when I don't want to feel the need to catch up to anyone or anything! Plus.. Space ninjas.. who doesn't friggin' love space ninjas?! 8.5/10!
N1ggachu;-;Feels and plays good!
ZekoNyan;-;I love it because I get to know what it looks like if I'm an alien. :D
Panzer Bacon;-;power armor...spells...killing stuff...what not to like?
Gintiam Silver;-;This is a very good game to play if you love action; and adds to the plate with a unqiue diveristy to other games.
Kurozetsu;-;Try it.. It's awesome ;)
NightHawk;-;So I played Warframe a lot during the Beta. Maybe a little to much to where I out did my self on the game and then it just got boring. It started to get boring though when Shotguns came into play and anyone who had one could whipe the floor of any mission. Later on I come back and see they changed EVERYTHING. While some is nice I hate most all of the changes made. Not to mention the gameplay is still Boring however All Co op style games are boring and are even more so if one person is able to do all of the work for you. kinda like Boarderlands 2 its dull as hell. I havent yet beat it because after the first 30 mins its just straight up boring to me. Warframe is Fun playing it alone though as a single player or sometimes with one other person if they do not have something Overpowered. I got this one guy in my clan into the game...he is addicted. He has over 3K almost 4K hours into it.
Light Zangetsu;-;Space Ninjas. Nuff said. If you want to know more well...This is game is legit because it is constantly evolving. The developers patch it almost every day. New content delivered every Wednesday. Livestreams from the developers every 2 weeks. Tonnes of content in the game. The only thing it is missing is a story line.
Jedisilvr;-;It is free, amazing, unique, and fun. What else can you want?
Jamega;-;Ninjas + Awesome Armor Suits + Guns = This Game. Get it NOW! Edit: This is very underrated by Metascore. Don't listen to that score, this game is insanely fun and it's worth your while.
arx;-;Pretty good Free-to-play game.
LERONARDO DE BETSY;-;GET THIS GAME YOU WILL NOT REGRET IT. New things all the time and great support team too c:
Panda King;-;Awesome game can't believe it's free!
Pimp;-;NINJA's Really to play for FREE :)
Rixnane;-;This is a grindy f2p game, so if you don't like to grind, then you should turn back. You can buy the weapons and Warframes you want right from the start (excluding the primes) if you're willing to dish out the cash, or you can buy them with the platinum you can get by trading items in-game. I worked my way up to rank 14 by grinding, and the feeling of accomplishment is worth it. Anyways, the game might get boring once you get to rank 8 and above, cause they don't really have many weapons that are unlocked with high ranks, so basically, when you reach rank 6, you'll be able to get the end-game stuff. The game is constantly updating with hotfixes or new content every week to keep the game from feeling too boring. I would like it if they added newer game modes, which they have done a couple of times before, so it is expected that they will bring more later on. The community is bustling, and you can make clans and alliances. I like being able to edit your own dojo, but once again, that gets boring after a while, and also takes a LOT of Forma, this resource in game that can only be grinded after you grind for keys, and it's not like you get Forma a lot. Anyways, besides the tedious grinding, it adds to the experience, unless you're really far into the game, otherwise, it might feel more like a hinderance. Loyalty to the game is also rewarded for logging in every day, and you get stuff like weapons you can only unlock from the daily rewards, and also discounts on platinum. Loyalty is also rewarded if you check the updates or site often, cause they usually put up these events with exclusive rewards that you can only get by doing the missions. Newer players may have missed many vandal weapons, but there are other weapons that are better than them in-game, so you're not missing out much. The only things that you may be missing out on are the exclusive mods from the events, where they could go for 100+ platinum in a trade. If you want to get stuff like this, just be sure to check the site occasionally. I highly recommend the game, it's fun. The community is pretty good, but once in a while, you may run into a troll or show-off, so yeah. Anyways, I hope this review was helpful.
AMDestroy117;-;A seriously fun game if you have the patience to repeatedly do missions to gather materials for better weapons.
Chris;-;Maybe this is what are you searching for , Warframe is free-to-play cooperative third person shooter video game , and you should give it a try because it worth.
Mr. Ace;-;Warframe is a great sci-fi thirdperson shooter. The shooting feels great playing in the suits or "Warframes" feels great. The abilities are fun to use. And it seems to run fine on my old laptop. The game is still being updated and there are events quite often. There is actually a story in the game, not the best, not the worst. The game uses a easy-to-use card-based modding system to up your abilities, weapons etc. Plus: -Great variety of weapons and Warframes. -Everything in the game can be get without purchasing, except Warframe and weapons slots. -You get 70 Platinum (In-game currency.) to use when starting. I recommend spending them on weapon and Warframe slots. -Clan system and customisable dojo. -Big and easy-to-use card-based modding system to upgrade your gear. -Lots of different planets and missions. -Play with your friends using the in-game invitation system or play with random people via the in-game matchmaking. -Randomly generated levels. Cons: -The levels are randomly generated but they look the same a lot. -The prices in the shop are sometimes absurd. -A few bugs and glitches here and there but the game is in openbeta. -Some of the mechanics are sometimes unexplained. Like the parcour mechanic. -Foundy crafting is really irritating. -Joining a session via matchmaking is sometimes pretty irritating and sometimes just doesn't work. The game is still receiving updates and new weapons, Warframes etc. I give this game a 8.5/10.
creepy_banana;-;i reccomend to people who likes guns and weapons
Destinedkiller (luna);-;this game is perfect to play with your friends and still fun to play with yourself or with others online. 100% free for all the needed parts but pay to get an advantage. try it out and you'll enjoy it.
Gaia Kitten;-;I was pleasantly surprised with this one. It's a great pick-up-and-play game Since I do not have a lot of spare time, I love being able to grab a quick half-hour or fifteen minutes. Having played many player-vs-player games, I've found I do prefer co-op since it encourages unity rather then turning on each other. Warframe fits that goal perfectly, together everyone achieves more than alone even though the option to solo is there. The variety of warframes seems small at first, but I quickly learned there are dozens of types and I can see there being a lot of evolution over time as I play this game. Being able to fight my way through the planets of the Solar System is really fun, and you can always go back and replay old missions with better equipment. That can benefit beginners and veterans alike. A great thing about Warframe is being able to play it on my HP G56 Laptop which is not powerful and yet I turned down half the graphics to minimum. That was a mistake and it looked pretty awful, then I turned all the settings to minimum including resolution, turned off anti-aliasing and suddenly it looked a lot better. So the point is if you're going to turn down the graphics, turn all of them down. Once I did that the game was smooth, and I can play without any framerate drops and no detectable lag through wireless connection to a Sky Fiber modem in the UK. All in all, a great game that should not be underestimated, I can see there being 'FrameCon's! And people re-producing their frames in RL at conventions, that seems like fun to me. This game should also be made into a live-action movie! I can't wait to find out what happens next! Oh and the AI is pretty interesting! I found myself chuckling at their behaviour which was unexpected. Five stars!
Sir RainbowDinoshwar IV;-;Future space gunman ninja awesomeness!
RageFuzz inniej Cnarf;-;This game is one of the best Fps co-opperation games i have played.From dense action to ninja like silence is the game filled with some bosses have a very unique design and a good back story and few information about their mechanism can turn the table. Weapons have their own unique mechanism stats and complex design that every weapons i worth a try and mastering the style of use is a key the battle ground.Neither good or evil the Tenno stands never alone against his foes the Warframe is the strongest weapon and deep story can hide behind the shell what is known is that they are hunting for us fellows Tennos so be on the look out.To not get hunted down by the Stalker.
c4maniac;-;This game is bad  and it's free. Give me a reason you don't want to play it.
Sir Salad Saladson;-;GET FRAMED FOR WAR CRIMES IN THIS THRILLING THIRD PERSON SHOOTER
toby121;-;this game is very boss.
dieKPie (   );-;fun third-person co op shooter with ninjas....IN SPACE
TacticsFTW;-;This game's fantastic PvE puts many full price games to shame. I've been playing for months and I always find more to do! A must play!
BigChris503;-;My favourite steam game. Definitely worth at least a try. I didn't think I would like it at first, but then I tried it. Amazing quality, both visually and content-wise. Does not take an amazing computer to run it.
Nekociel;-;Hello everyone, I got two minutes to write a quick thing about this game. Around the internet you could probably read something good and something bad. I think this game definitely deserves the good side of the review. First of all, the whole engine of Warframe is of indie manifacture: it's an independent project quite successful. Seriously, the whole thing is really light (not Source's lightness, but still) and scalable. The gameplay is seriously good: various combos, quick reflexes actions and complexity of combat (expecially with some specifical Warframe , which is the type of your armor, aka "your class/role/set of skills") will keep you intrigued only to see how much combinations you can get with basic attacks. The game doesn't use a real "cover" system, there is a flexible system with the objects around the map. Here comes the first (maybe of the few) bad thing: you can't change your "aim side", stuck with the character on the left. The aim point remains on the center, anyway. It's just a matter of perspective. Now, the second real thing is the level up system: you'll level up weapons, "Warframes" and, obviously, your account. Leveling up will unlock more "mods slots", which are equipped with "cards" having each a cost going from 2, to 10. The free-to-play system is really cool: you can't get anything in-game which you can't obtain without game money. At least, at the state of thing right now. Maps aren't really vary, but they're critically and intensive, opening new areas when you do new missions and also, having hazards in the midst of the map: fire, ice, biological things... all sorts of things. Ending this (and for too long to read): Warframe is DEFINITELY a free to play third person shooter, without PVP for now, so the whole "cooperative" side of the game is true. You can obviously try to do missions alone, but you'll simply and quickly regret that decision. Did I mention the whole crafting thing has crafting times of a Browser MMO? And the story unveils quietly surprising, too! This is great, seriously!
Blondicaithefox42;-;Great game. Solo or with a clan its tons of fun! You'll meet new friends and enemies on your journey master the way of the space ninjas... the Tenno.
CryoHelix;-;I enjoy this game, one of the best free to play games out their at the moment. The combat has a flow to it as you switch between shooting and chopping people up. The idea is simple but well executed, the game requires some patience at the start but once you start leveling its very addicting because of the hoarding and loot that you get later on. Over all its very enjoyable and i recommend it to any player that wishes to try something slightly new.
Bluehh;-;new hud every month, blur, bloom, flashing lights.. expensive colors... expensive scarves.. expensive skins.. expensive robot parts..  network.. laggy servers.. ded community.. im still playing it since alpha so it must be good for something 10/10 would go blind again
NKB_Twinz;-;Spent hundreds of hours on this game, this game is really fun when you play with your friends. Warframes are unique and the majority are worth getting and trying out.
Aphaux;-;After watching The Legend Of The Drunken Master starring Jackie Chan and every Bruce Lee and Tony Jaa movie known to man I was finally qualified to join the Warframe community. After picking my first warframe (Loki) I traveled across the stars slaying untold horrors. But my blade was sturdy and my spirit strong, Infested, Grineer, Corpus I cut them all down. Hordes of enemies like a flood would droun me if it weren't for my amazing ninja abilities I would have been defeated. Warframe is amazing, and it's FREE! Only other game on my Steam Library with over a few hundred played. It is well worth it. The graphics are just beautiful for such a game and they don't even put stress on your computer, the Warframe varities, levels, modifiers, weapons and customization leave you satisfied. Not to mention the many different game modes to choose from and massive amounts of planets to trek across. You are a badass ninja fighting through the galaxy with your amazing suit (Warframe) abilities and destructive weapons that can all also be modified with Mods you find. Best free game I know of. I highly recomend it.
bajanhulk_1;-;WarFrame is the best free to play game so far and i recommend it to most people cause its fun to play co-op with people, and Ninja-Aliens in it so why not =D .
Darkhearts;-;It's free, try it. Game is fun with friends, good graphics, and plays nicely. Problem for me was how repetitive it is.
Kunph;-;When there was aliens i went to doctor and bout a cheese bottle andi ate it for free. When i lept i saw aliens were dead and bick  in my hand. So i cooked it and made soup
Witcher;-;One of the best FTP games. You dont have to pay to be good,and it's awesome
Fusions;-;This is a game that is fast and a fun shooter. Need i say more?
Tymai Shu;-;So ye want t' be a space pirate aye? But can you kinit? This training program will fit you in the finest regal and armaments any swashbuckling space pirate from here to Senda will gawk in envy. Lace up your boots and vest straps, Space Ninjas are afoot and only you and the rest of the space pirates can stop them!
digitaliism;-;Wow, what a title! For a free-to-play game, the graphics far exceed the norm and gameplay is painstakingly put into detail. It's co-op modes are excellent, and there are always new events happening on the servers. For an online multiplayer, this is a GREAT title. Definitely not one to miss, so you might as well click that download button RIGHT NOW!
Nicholaslimck;-;Warframe's combat is awesome. This is a third-person shooter where you dash around, shooting or slicing your way through robots, heavily armoured marines or infested zombie-like creatures. Or, you use your powers to stomp so hard they either die or float around, discharge thousands of volts into their systems or stab them with a dozen javelins. The gameplay doesn't get boring easily; you have a variety of enemies to fight against, with different game modes to satisfy your desire to either fight endless waves of enemies, capture a specific target, and more. Boss battles are interesting, with a couple of them now possessing separate battle phases with different required strategies and weakspots to target, while the weapon customization can keep you busy creating the best loadout to slaughter different enemies with. Collecting different frames and weapons allows for a multitude of playstyles too, with different focuses depending on how you build your mod loadouts. However, Warframe lacks a story that draws you in. Sure it's fun to kill hordes of ever growing varieties of enemies in different environments, and I've enjoyed all that. However, you're essentially farming for materials to build your frames and weapons with, sometimes killing the same boss over and over again, hoping that RNGesus gives you the drop you want. Why are you killing this boss? Well, the Lotus says this and that while you're on your way to kill him. But is there enough lore behind the game? Not yet. Sure, Digital Extremes is working on the Lore, especially with the Codex, but why not have us live through the backstory a bit more? The events are nice, adding to the constantly evolving world that Warframe is set within, but backstory-wise Warframe lacks the substance that should be there. Overall Warframe is a great Free to Play game - the only paid-only items are cosmetic, or weapon/frame slots, which you get starting amounts of cash currency, Platinum, to buy a few with. And if you insist on not paying a single cent on the game, you could always keep building and sell weapons to keep slots free for new content. You get relatively frequent updates, with developers who actually listen to the players and respond on their forums. Pay to Win is not a problem - this is a co-op PvE game in essense, after all, and all the weapons and items can be obtained with enough time and effort. And honestly, it's pretty fun to play. I've wasted enough hours of enjoyment on it to say that.
John Smith;-;One of the coolest free games I've seen. Absolutely fantastic. Reminds me of Dead Space which is an awesome game which I would like to purchase on Steam and re play. I like how you don't need to pay for anything, and with the packs you can buy, they aren't overly expensive. Great gameplay and story.
Mr. Trainee;-;This game is really fun and it's free to play. A recent update allows people to build up a dojo which is a housing for your clan where you can perform research, build new rooms, etc etc. As you play, you upgrade your gear, install new mods onto them and upgrade your mods. You can also farm materials and craft equipment and other things from them. Each Warframe has a different set of skills and there are several warframes to play. Join me in this awesome game and join my dojo!
Ameretat;-;If you liked the ME 3 multiplayer, you'll love this. Lovely little f2p game that has a lot of potential in the beta stages.
Earthflame;-;An extremely fun, fast paced and challenging third person shooter. Different Warframes provide a wide variety of play experiences and the number of different mission types and environments stops the core gameplay getting boring. Definitely worth a try.
Dalton;-;Great game for a beta it has a few glitches here and there but thats what all betas have right?
[LKM818]Gearbox;-;The best free-to-play from launch I've ever played. This game is fast, fun, stylish and very enjoyable. So much so that I paid for it after the first 40 hours! Try it out and see if you like it; you've got nothing to lose but time.
ROOOCKS;-;THIS GAME HAS ALOT OF GRINDING BUT ITS ALSO FUN WHY IS IT FUN HELP ME I CANT STOP PLAYING IT HELP
Alabrax;-;A very fun game at just the rigth price. I would say that this isnt just a fun free game, but also a really good game, period.
OmittingCoder;-;Probably the best free to play out there,
Xetelian;-;Very fun with friends
4k PIXLe_KINg;-;This game is an amazing game. I honestly cant believe its free. The potential this game has is absolutely astonishing. yes there are some issues with it. i cant play with my friend from romania and it gives me this UDP port error message that i have no idea how to fix, but all that aside i still very much enjoy this game and wish i could help in its development.
Nep-Nep;-;Space. Ninjas. Nuff said.
HEYitsATAXFPS;-;This game is a great oppertunity to burn a few hours and have tons of fun doing it. For a game in beta it is fantasticlly built, they have a great community and is in a very fast paced setting. AND ITS FREE TO PLAY! When the developers release an update they pack so full of fixes and additions to the game youd think that they were adding a mod. (But then again a update is basiclly a mod) I enjoy playing this game for two main reasons: 1. the fact that it is very fast paced and requires lots of thinking in the now, because the AI is very sophisticted and reactes accordingly but could get some improvements. 2. the amount of fun that i have just grinding away to get a cool item. I personally spent 40+ hours grinding away to get two really cool items in the game and i really enjoyed grinding that. When i dont know what to do in the game I go and play with my freind the first few missions. Im now going to write about some minor issues in the game :D When i played the tutorial it was preety laggy the first time, so you might want to take that time and change settings Ive only chrashed twice for no appernt issues but on review of those logs my PC stopped two important files from working. But i recommend this game greatlly and i can't wait to see where this game goes.
Shadowhawk;-;One of my top games at the moment. It is currently in open beta (it has been in open beta for a while). Pros: -There are very few bugs I have noticed -A massive variety of classes, weapons, and sentinals (basically pets that attack) -Accompanies many play styles -Many ways to travel around, freerun, stealth, charge, what ever you like -A insane amount of mods!!!! Cons: -You can only have 2 warframe slots (a warframe is basically your class) unless you pay more -Also a limited number of weapon slots -Annoying to play without using any money on the game -Other than the in game lore tab you can read there is no story running hand in hand with the game.
Mrpilchards;-;This is very much a pay to win game. If you want the good  you've either got to put in many hours of gameplay and crafting, or you can simply buy all the advanced equipment straight off the bat. It's certainly not a bad game, just a very reptitive one.
kd5kuv;-;Free to play, still in beta, but worth a try if you haven't checked it out yet. Great aesthetic, addictive and visceral gameplay that manages to be smooth and fluid. Lots of variety in play. Really worth a shot. And free. So what have you got to lose?
Wormeck;-;So far this has been my favorite free to play title. The amount of time I've poured into this since I started is kind of insane...
Ominous_Paladin;-;Many gamers have "THAT" game. The game that you will spend hours on, farming for one item. The game that you would willingly spend more time than sleeping on. For me, that game is Warframe. I origianally started Warframe as a skeptic. The name is somewhat vague, and the gameplay looked fairly ordinary. However, the pathetically high number of hours I have logged are evidence of why I'm glad I stuck with it. Warframe calls itself a Beta so they can get away with major changes to the game that a full game wouldn't. That being said, I haven't seen an update I disagreed with. Not even the almost complete rewrite of the damage system. It was a wierd adjustment but I feel it works better now. If you want a game that is a full polished product then you should skip over Warframe The name itself is a little strange, that is until, you get into the game when it is explained. A "Warframe" is the armor that you, a Tenno wear into battle. Each Warframe is equipped with unique and powerful abilities. These abilities include; a time shattering stomp, invisibility, setting the world on fire and sooo much more. On top of these insane powers, you bring weapons into battle as well. A primary weapon, which can be a rifle, shotgun, sniper, laser cannon, or even a bow and arrow! Your secondary can be a pistol, dual or single wield, a hand crossbow, throwing knives, and there's even an exploding gel gun for chrissakes! The melee weapons get just as fun. There are of course swords and daggers, but you can also wield an energy whip, dual hand axes or a freakin hammer! There is very little PvP in Warframe, it's really just for settling Big  Contests and for friends to test their new gear. The game is entirely based around PvE. Whether you're slaughtering an endless horde or trying to take out one specific VIP, there's always something to shoot, smash and generally  up. If you've read this far...thank you. But despite my praise there are a couple cons to this game as well. The game can be hard to start for one thing. The beginner weapons are beyond noobish, and if you pick the experienced Warframe as your starter and don't like him.....leveling up will be a complete pain in the . Adjusting to third person can also be a problem for some players.....it was for me. Another problem I do have though, is with the grinding. There is a lot. Sometimes you need one material to make the last piece for your new Warframe and you just can't get it. This can get demoralizing, but just take a break. Play something else for a day or two and come back fresh. Also, tramwork is sometimes in short supply. Many players are just grinding for materials or trying to finish off a planet. Because of this you rarely find anyone who will run with you. This is less of a problem it could be thanks to independant looting. If a rare mod is dropped, it's there for everyone, and most players will run back to revive you, should you down. If you want to talk though....you had better have some friends. All in all Warframe is a great game that never really gets old. The Devs keep in regular contact with the gaming community to fin the problems and fix them. As well as cranking out new updates with weapons, and events on a regular basis..I honestly think DE could charge people to play Warframe. You won't regret downloading this gem.
OmegaRed;-;Best free to play game seen in a while.
Blizzar0;-;Action packed to the letter. Definately worth a playthrough if you love incredibly smooth controls that guide you into cleaving a fascist clone in twain. Also comes with rogues, necromancers, clerics, fighters, paladins, various mages of the elements, and giant diseased dogs.
TallonAM;-;If you've seen me on Steam at all recently, you've seen me playing Waframe. It's a great game. It is a great example of how to do F2P. You can do everything in this game without ever paying a dime, if you want to work for it. If you'd rather put money then time into getting gear, that's possible too. Everything that the pay currency can be used for, in some way, is a shortening of time. Yes, once again Time = Money. The action is fast, fluid, and fun. Space Ninjas. That line should sell itself. Ever want to do a wall run, flip off and take out three enemies as you fly over their heads? This is your game. The movement system is probably the best you will ever play. It's still Beta, and it's not hard to find the Beta points, but it's already a ton of fun and things keep being added. More polish and this will be the best game ever.
Chazmov;-;Wonderful Graphics. Good Gameplay. Joining Random games is not Suggested when starting out. Play alone or with Friends. One of the key point i enjoy of this game is: -The Amount of Customization. You can have 4 of the Same 'warframes (Tenno's) In the same Match, and Can still all be completely Different. Due to Mod Card customization. Its a fun game, Maps can get confusing, but it takes some getting used to. As Do most games. I give it a 4/5. Also, you can get "Blueprints" to build your own Weapons/Armor/Warframes. Instead of buying them with Credits(In Game Currency) or Platinum(Real-Money).
Loxon;-;Amazing, flashback to fond memories of Unreal Tournament/Championship from highschool. More PVE than PVP, but hey, SPACE NINJAS, Halo meets Ronin Warriors.... can't go wrong, just all around fun, as most of your parents taught, try it, you just might like it.
SLICK TRIK FOR A PILE OF PRICKS;-;Jewish ricing simulator of the year
zerntech;-;this game with the your own music makes for unbeleivable game play
Snoopin's A Good Job, M8;-;Pretty sweet game but i played this game for a week and got bored of it.
Cookie;-;I love the graphics. O_O So astonishing.
Almarath;-;This $hit is Awesome..
Sasha Grey;-;Fun game to play with your friends.It has elements of 3rd person shooter combined with RPG.It has a big variety of weapons that will make you wanna level them all up,and a fair number of warframes that you can build and each of them has different abilities that are very interesting and unique.I would recommend you to try it out,i guarantee a lot of fun.
Dinomaite;-;Farming in space
Midgetgirl41;-;Awesome game. I definitely recommend downloading it.
peanutpalooza;-;Warframe is a sci-fi based third-person shooter. It is a very fun game with replayable stealthy or action played levels. Co-op mode is very fun and interactive apart from the fact people steal my kills >.<. Other than that i like how i can change my armor, customize my weapons, and use different colors on my character and my trusty blade. Me, personally i like to play it stealthy on all missions, but if you're not that type, that's your way of playing :) Overall, i love this game with its parkour aspects where as i can run across walls to get to the other side of a pit of lava or acid and i can climd up on a box to straddle over a railing to find myself six feet from an enemy. Very fun and lots of cool features i highly reccomend it to shooter fans. :)
MDAWG;-;This game is quite awesome for being a free-to-play title. Fast-paced action, a leveling/modification system with depth, and space-alien-ninjas. What else could you want?
Justan Dyadat;-;it is awesome please play
STR-;-;Fun as hell, just be sure to bring your friends along for the ride.
the rarest pepe;-;For being in an open beta stage, Warframe is an amazing game to play. It is really fun, but sure, it takes some time and effort to get into it, that is if you craft or earn everything. In some aspects, people can view it as a "pay-to-win" kind of game, but people tend to craft more than buy (besides blueprints). You can craft every single item in the game too, and some of which you can craft, you cannot buy. But anyway, I am not about to go into a full depth description of the game. To make a long story short, Warframe is awesome.
Purple_Batman;-;Amazing game... Slow at first but quickly speeds up. Highly Recomended.
forechan;-;really like it so far best free to play game ive tried on steam
Orden;-;Great game, great customization and replayability.
Jaydian;-;Game is difficult to start out with, but once you understand the flow of the game, it defines entertainment. Do note that this game might become repetitive after so long. However, constantly getting new equipment will mostly remove the dull of repetition.
Death666Saint;-;When it come to free-to-play Warframe really stands out. Everything in the game (except for exclusive offers that DO NOT make the game pay-to-win) can either be purchased with either time or money. If you want a character asap you can purchase them, or if you're more patient you can find all the parts and build them yourself. Everything from the combat to the graphics have been done amazingly and are always being improved. I've watched this game develop over the past year and it's almost unbelievable what this game has transformed into. I missed the chance to become a founder and everyday I regret it. There's a huge variety of weapons, warframes (characters), powers (each warframe has their own), power ups, maps, and game styles that make Warframe addicting. They have recently added challenges that are loads of fun to play with others online that greatly pay off. They have also listened to their fans and have added pvp matches even when they said they did not see pvp in their vision of Warframe. The developers know what they're doing and their ears are open to their players. If you have not played Warframe yet then I highly suggest that you get on it right now! This game is so much fun and can be even more fun if you play with your friends. If you have played Warframe but it's been a few months then you should give it another chance; there have been many updates and the game has been improved in every way.
Lord Kelvin;-;warframe is one of my favorite games, it has some of my favorite things. lots of guns swords and anything to fit your style tons of costomization play with frinds play alone very graphic free crafting rp hard
irishsaint23;-;This game is kinda fun
BilboWS;-;Awsome game! You should get this! I have the worst computer and it runs really well!
Atheroth;-;This game is very fun, it was one of the first f2p i tried and honestly it's one of my favorite. You play a a in space ninja, running on walls, awesome tile sets, fun clan system, fun to just mess around in the clan or the void. Only dowsides is that some weapons are clan research, or some are only possible to get though the use of platinum which is real money. And that once you farm for dayz to get the needed resources you must wait for either 12 hours up to 72 hours or 3 days to get the item you farmed for dayz to get. But other than that i think it is an awsome game well worth the time you spend on it
Haze-E;-;Warframe can be buggy at times, but the devs are always coming out with new content and hotfixes. Warframe has a bit of a steep learning curve and can seem confusing at first, to understand the damage mechanics of the game, but there are plenty of tutorials online, and there are few guys within the comminity who create really excellent videos that can help you understand the different weapons and warframes and how to mod them. The game can be quite grindy, but the rewards are sometimes worth it. I personally love playing Warframe, it has a futuristic feeling, with a large and ever growing assortment of weapons and gear to chose from and the game is quite challenging. You can play parts of this game solo, but it can become very diificult at higher levels so you must work as a team in order to finsih missions. Would I recommend this game ? Yes, I do recommend this game and quite highly. It is not for everyone, but it is free so you have nothing to lose by trying it out for yourself.
Ake Andi;-;This is the best FPS game I have ever played, 10/10
tcs;-;this game is all about shooting, killing , and sneaking. and if your that type of person, you should get this game!
Greatlando;-;Good game, lighting isn't the best though and it could be improved a bit.
B3stNoobEver;-;I'm not reccomending this game because of its core dynamics (Farm fo dayz) I'm reccomending it because it can be something better within the coming years/months. My only plea is that they make sure that the main story line is good for holding out for so long, and to decrease some mod drop rates and to decrease the time needed to create Warframes/weapons. This game has a lot of potential and I enjoy watching it grow.
Jerry Mcghoulberry;-;Warframe is a very nice looking game with pretty decent performance compared to the graphics, this game may take some time to get used to but in the end it will become very fun there are lots of items to craft and collect and lots of weapons and Warframes to choose from. 8.5/10
Nakra;-;If you ask me, Best game of all time!! Free Shooter MMO Sci-Fi Ninja Game. Make your own perfect killing machine, Collect Mods to power op your Frame Pet and weapons!!! Good Hunting. xD
Wilbert;-;This game is one of the most hooking game i have played. In this game you need pals, really pals, virtual or real. Weapons, warframe powers, sentinels and events are all worth of your time. Also this game supports controller so you dont have to play with keyboard. Also in game there are couple hard parts like: Stalker, Poisons and Napalms. But its nice and it is free.
SeaBornCow :o);-;great game
Raptor Steel;-;Warframe is a co-op game (up to 4 players) inwhich the player choses 3 warframes upfront being vangaurd, volt, and loki to start their adventure through the galaxy. You are an ancient warrior designed to do specific tasks. You will go through levels solo or with your team completing various objectives, finding loot, and leveling up your gear and it never gets boring; the levels randomize every single time so you will never play the same map on any level. Though, only 3 warframes can be used for free upfront, that does not mean they are the worst, some consider them to be the most powerful or atleast equal to the others in their various playstyles. There are roughly 6-8 other warframes currently which can be made in real time (3days) by blue print bought from the marketplace with credits, and parts dropped from bosses or platinum bought with real money. Platinum is extremely expensive and I do not reccomend buying it to get a warframe or gear. You'll be able to craft everything(as far as im aware) though it will take some time, you save the money in your pockets. (trust me, i've made this mistake) There are tons of things to keep the player intwined with this game for hours between difficult missions, random events, and playing with their friends. The only cons about this game thus far are the high priced platinum and the beta stage bugs that occure but not very often. It seems that each day there are bug fixes. There is much more to be described about this game but due to the lack of space i have left >.> i can not go over everything. Another con that some might not like is how long it takes to level your avatar, ive spent well over 12 hours and im only lvl 1, though everything availiable to you right now only needs lvl 2. Your avatar lvl is seperate from the gear lvl which goes much faster and maxes out at 30(from what i've heard). For a free to play game and a quick download I HIGHLY reccomend this for you and your friends.
JKil0;-;10/10 Best Mass Effect game. Would play again
jakeraven6;-;This game rocks!
Ferreira206;-;Really cool game and great concept. graphics are a plus. Only downfall is it gets pretty repetative quick
ZomBabe;-;best ftp game of all time
B'adyl yrx;-;global agenda, new wersion
Iceage50;-;I like it! pretty cool !!! Worth a try if you have not given it one!
Wilbert;-;This game is one of the most hooking game i have played. In this game you need pals, really pals, virtual or real. Weapons, warframe powers, sentinels and events are all worth of your time. Also this game supports controller so you dont have to play with keyboard. Also in game there are couple hard parts like: Stalker, Poisons and Napalms. But its nice and it is free.
SeaBornCow :o);-;great game
Raptor Steel;-;Warframe is a co-op game (up to 4 players) inwhich the player choses 3 warframes upfront being vangaurd, volt, and loki to start their adventure through the galaxy. You are an ancient warrior designed to do specific tasks. You will go through levels solo or with your team completing various objectives, finding loot, and leveling up your gear and it never gets boring; the levels randomize every single time so you will never play the same map on any level. Though, only 3 warframes can be used for free upfront, that does not mean they are the worst, some consider them to be the most powerful or atleast equal to the others in their various playstyles. There are roughly 6-8 other warframes currently which can be made in real time (3days) by blue print bought from the marketplace with credits, and parts dropped from bosses or platinum bought with real money. Platinum is extremely expensive and I do not reccomend buying it to get a warframe or gear. You'll be able to craft everything(as far as im aware) though it will take some time, you save the money in your pockets. (trust me, i've made this mistake) There are tons of things to keep the player intwined with this game for hours between difficult missions, random events, and playing with their friends. The only cons about this game thus far are the high priced platinum and the beta stage bugs that occure but not very often. It seems that each day there are bug fixes. There is much more to be described about this game but due to the lack of space i have left >.> i can not go over everything. Another con that some might not like is how long it takes to level your avatar, ive spent well over 12 hours and im only lvl 1, though everything availiable to you right now only needs lvl 2. Your avatar lvl is seperate from the gear lvl which goes much faster and maxes out at 30(from what i've heard). For a free to play game and a quick download I HIGHLY reccomend this for you and your friends.
Ghost01;-;`warframe` is a very good game and slightly like Prince Of Persia where you can sprint across walls, The Reason why i think this game is good is because you can purchase weapons and most of all play and enjoy all of the missions.I would definately recommend this game to any sort of player.
TR-1 DASH_;-;Fast-paced, high octane space ninja action, what more could you want? I mean, come on, SPACE NINJAS.
PartyCow;-;The best f2p game I have ever had. In fact the best game I have ever had in general. Runs really well on all but the worst computers
TheRegistater;-;Warframe has incredibly imursive gameplay, it is free to play and is not pay to win, sure you can unlock most things much quicker but everything in the game is accessible without paying except for skins which is really cool. The multiple experiance systems really brings a strong dynamic of replayablity and scaling to the game!
Penguinator<O;-;This game is pretty fun but I would say it's kinda easy. Maybe make it a little less predictable.
Vorian_xx;-;For a free to play game it is simply amazing. The amount of customization and changing gameplay beats many pay-to-play that i own. The best part is this title is not built around model where you are forced to pay $ to progress, everything can be created through collecting resources and money. Put 20+ hours and still finding new types of missions and more features that I didn't know were in the game.
RC|Aleksandr.MSI;-;Warframe is a F2P game based on a story of a forgotten civilization who awaken,to stop the forces of the enemy that grew. This game is all about playing for fun,unlocking new content, having a clan , socialize with people and more fun. This game is a team-based game , with a Co-Op feature , a Private feature and a Solo feature.You begin as a poor tenno,then you will become a master of the old ways. You will find yourself with other people hunting for rare items or even going to kill the Bosses that terrorized their army.This game if fun, I recommend it! If you want a help you can contact me in game /w UFColonel and me and my clan will assist you! :D
Turkey_Cup;-;This game is seriously the best Free to Play game i have seen come out in awhile. Its really fun being able to play with your friends or just others online. However I noticed that plaing solo can be challenging for new players, and the whole upgrading your warframe, weapons etc. isnt very clear. it took me about a week to finally figure out how upgrades really work and how you use them. The graphics on this game are amazing even at the lowest setting. the levels never really get boring, and its chalk full of different ways to play. Me personally i like to sneak around and kill unsuspecting enemies. Overall the game is a well put together game. (note: this is a 3rd person, so keep that in mind based on your preference) If they had put this game up for sale, i would buy it. thats how great this game is. even if your not a 3rd person kind of player, i suggest downloading it and just play 1 or 2 rounds, you'll understand why there is so much hype for this new game. Now the other con to this game is that many of your weapon arsenal will have to be paid with real world money, which is sometimes for those budget gamers, "a pain in the " but they give you an option to buy a blueprint, find all the things needed to build it, and then actually build it, this doesnt cost real worl money, but it costs game money, which is fairly easy to obtain. once you really get into the game you really wont notice that your gun is bad, in fact they can stand a really good chance against most enemys, so having a new gun isnt a "must have". you can make your warframe look amazing, you choose skins and all different kinds of things. you start with 50 p and later you would have to go buy more with actual money if you want to customize more. hope this helps you guys out.
Gnomey;-;Really awesome game full of ninjas.
Critwrench;-;Have you ever wanted to be a ninja? How about a samurai? How about in SPAAAAACE? WELL TOO BAD, YOU'RE NOT. But if you play Warframe, you can be. Fling fireballs, cut things with swords, throw kunais, electrocute your enemies, run across walls, and even get repeatedly bounced into the air in this squad-based, mission-based, over-the-shoulder shooter! And maybe have some fun while you're at it, you stick-in-the-mud.
[Soiled-It];-;Poondis Frames Make Me Per Second FPS is Nice for Me too thombs upward
Anonymous;-;Great download it and join me
Legacy;-;One of the best free to play games I've ever had the fortune to play. Plenty of guns, warframes and enemies to keep you busy for a long time, and the story is great. Over 100 weapons, classified between primary, secondary and melee and you can change the way each weapon acts by modding them with 8 of 250+ modules. The classes in this game are the different warframes that you collect and build, giving you different skills and stats that help you depending on the mission your trying to complete, allowing for you to play whatever role you wish, be it stealth, healer, support, tank, or just plain old damage. And once you have completed the main missions in the solar system, there is the Void and Derelects to clear and loot, giving you wealth and power. It also has no pay to win, you actually never have to pay a cent in your entire career, as you can trade modules for the real money currency, Platinum. I did this over a 1 week period and made 50$ worth of Platinum. I found playing this game solo was pretty boring, being much more enjoyable with atleast 1 other person, but you can have groups of 4, which is very interesting trying to compete for the most damage done or simply just destroying all the enemies standing in your way. Another great aspect of the game is the deep storyline, which you can read all about on the wiki or simply read codex entries inside the game. Personal Rating 4.5/5
mental bob;-;really good at pinching
Dragon10143;-;Do you like an intense storyline?! Too bad... Do you like epic characters?! Deal with it... Do you like Space Ninja's with freakin Assult Rifles, Pistols, and an OP Meelee weapons?! THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU!!!
c4maniac;-;This game is bad  and it's free. Give me a reason you don't want to play it.
Matt Finlay;-;Best free to play game out!!!
<3 DanSkateKid <3;-;This game is amazing i love all the weapons and the customization of your warframe and there is a lot to do in the game like going to all planes and you can builed weapons and you can get mods for your weapons and warframe there is a lot to do on it you will be up all night have fun and be the best ninja warframe you can be
wraith;-;IF you like grinding/farming - space ninja style, Warframe is a game for you. If not, dont bother downloading at all.
BMOR21216;-;This a great game and fun to play with friends. The powers, acrobatic, and gunplay and swordplay are amazing. But this game is money hungry, to get weapons and different classes you'll have to to wait and pay alot of in-game currency and it tempts you to buy another in-game currency that you have to buy with real life money which allows to buy weapon and classes and not have to wait hours to make. If you can look past not having all the great weapons(not the best) at the begining or for a little while this game is for you.
Grandok;-;The best online shooter i've ever played!
Gorman8or;-;I've been playing this game since way back in March '13 and Warframe has come along way. It is still as grindy as ever, but it is also still great fun to try out new weapons/frames and mess about with friends and randoms alike! This game is improving all the time and I can't wait to see where it will go in the future. You should at the very least give it a try, as it is free!
RedEnigma!;-;this game is really fun and very addictive. everything on the game is achievable! all have fun
Magikarp;-;This is a great free game I've spent so much time playing this game that my real life problems just seemed to disapear. Such as money, women, and activeness. This game is an amazing looking game that when I feel like going outside I just go on the earth map and stare at the sun but for not to long because I dont want to go blind. The relistic feeling about being outside is really amazing that it hurts less that I haven't left my house in 3 years. But overall this game is amazing it would be awasome if I had people to play it with but everybody just isn't as cool as me.
Coldfireing;-;Great Game!
MGKBurrito;-;It's ninjas IN SPACE, and cool abilities.
FeFo;-;its cool
Drikun;-;thumbs up
That_guysteve;-;SUPER ING AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Eden Flamehart;-;Warframe is an action packed alien-ninja game that is combines a strange passion for weapons!
Action Jackson;-;i like warframe because its fun and awesome
Clem;-;Extremely fun, particularly with friends. New tilesets are being added almost every update, and where once there were a handful of re-used levels, they're moving rapidly towards one or several unique looks for every planetary sector. Player customization, while unfortunately heavily cash-gated, is constantly growing. Weapon variety is everything you could want, and again, is still growing. Enemies and bosses are varied, and even with that variety, the devs have confirmed a FOURTH hostile faction to be added at a later date. In short: this game has quite a few strong points that grow stronger with every update. One caveat: be prepared to exercise either patience or your credit card. New stuff is either crafted very slowly or bought for an assload of dosh. I can forgive the bugs because it's still open beta, and they do correct them fairly quickly. However, the frankly absurd exchange rate of "Platinum" versus actual goods bought hurts it in my opinion, as that gating has turned almost a dozen of my friends off from joining. 8/10
Yatori;-;This game is ridiculous
GrayAegis;-;What can I say about Warframe that hasn't already been said? Space ninjas. Grinding. Awesome combat thanks to Melee 2.0. (Look it up, or better yet, play it!) I would recommend joining a clan though, the best gear is clan research. The grinding can be reduced by buying boosters or actually buying the items from the store. However, that's horrifically expensive and makes me think that the devs WANT you to grind and PLAY THE GAME. The shop's there for the few impatient people who NEED everything and need it NOW. tl;dr, play it, it's free.
DoctorDrew;-;game owns
JaBoiMario;-;The best game of all time and guess what ITS FREE
Hoarder Chaos;-;This is a great FTP game with ways to earn all the weapons and suits that you want. The paid transactions allow you to gain access to items faster, cosmetic items, and credit and affinity (XP) boosters, but in a game that is mostly about cooperation, it does not affect the overall balance. The developer is good about getting out bug fixes on a regular basis, as well as the major updates. The overall community is great and are very helpful. There are a great variety of maps throughout the whole game as well as weapons and character types. There is some PVP elements, but they are still a work in progress. The only issues that have cropped up are the random (and sometimes amusing) bugs and some of the newer areas they add do not have a lot of areas to randomize and they will repeat more often than not. Overall, this is a great game for coop play and well worth any time and, if you so choose, money.
Knee's Bees;-;This is one of the best free to games that I have ever played. Basically it's about space ninjas and every ninja has its own powers and stats. You can also build your own weapons, which is really fun to do because you have to travel to all differant places to get the resources required to make the item you want. The game gives you a lot of things to do but it is a little rough to get into. Totally deserves a better rating.
Maddkipz;-;is rly gud
Me.Greedy;-;This game is freakin sweet.... if you have the desire to level things; this is the game for you. it almost feels endless.
PapaSmurfAMF2;-;It's an awsum RPG game, i love the gameplay and it's a very extensive game. Amazing graphics and playthroughs. I've already logged in almost 50 hours in a weeks lol
Lokreas;-;I want to get off Steve's Wild Ride.
PotatoKid;-;The game is a pretty cool the first few hours but over time the missions and gameplay becomes old.
Mordred, Saber of Red;-;Warframe is a level-based third-person shooter where you go around in PvE mini-dungeons and complete your mission (Defence, Extermination, and Capture). The game has a uniqe weapon/ character upgrade system, in the dungeons you will pick up Mods, Mods let you upgrade your items (DMG, Atack Speed, Crit Chance, Fire Dmg, etc.) and will make your weapons and character extemely powerful. If you decide to give the game a try, use this link: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=5323606c1a4d802e7e0003b9 My in-game name is Raphael7 and I'll help you out as best as I can. Enjoy!
Blu3 M0nk3y;-;hace u played theesafsdfasfa gaem sit is drealy good
Dr. Steak;-;Probably my favorite free game our there right now, others include Path of Exile, Ghost Recon Online, League of Legends, and Loadout. This is a great example of how the business model in a F2P game should be. Any item that you can buy for real money, you can easily get for free. Anything that you can't get for free is purely cosmetic. Graphics are great for a free game, and crafting a new gun or warfame just never seems to get boring. It is kind of a grindfest though, and after spending almost 200 hours into this, i'm starting to get burnt out... It's still in beta and I've heard that the devs are gonna start to change things a bit, make it more interesting. As it stands now its a must play. It's free, so theres nothing to lose :).
Noble Hawk;-;Ever played Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer? This is very similar, except it most of the game modes are more akin to dungeon runs than static defense. That being said, shooty stabby space ninja super funtime is quite entertaining. Very fast paced gameplay.
Kagetatsuya;-;Its fun to pass the time and having patience will get you anything in the game.
Nanking;-;This game really has gotten my attention. It probably has all I could ask for. It has tons of action, an RPG mechanic which makes you want to farm those mods to become more poweful. Play with friends, levelup, gain new weapons and warframes and rank the  up! :)
$xffndr;-;Game type: MMO / Third person / Free2Play (but in a good way!) / Shooter / Hack and Slash / RPG. This one is very different from most pay2plays out there. You can reliably get almost anything in-game that you could want. I am sure there are one or two things only available to people who have paid money into the game, but any weapon or warframe worth having, can drop during the game. All without endlessly farming for the same materials. You can end up with great weapons, skills and "warframes" (the games answer to a suit of mech armor.. I guess) just by playing the game regularly. No extra, obnoxious farming.. although you will probably be "farming" for hours anyways.. levelling up your, everything is key to having the most powerful weapons and skills. Skills.. oh my god if I could describe how the skills can vary from person to person, warframe to warframe, weapon to weapon it would take me a degree in math and I would still have to write an entire article in order to describe it. (A tutorial would take an entire wiki). You level up (your account) on a fairly regular basis.. but can only take the test to level up once every 24hrs. This however doesn't impede your ability to progress and make gains on your character/frame/weapon combination, as each fight may drastically alter the way that you choose to play your game permanently, or perhaps just for certain missions. Anyways, it's been said before.. but never by me- The possibilities are nearly endless. They are legitimately endless if development continues on the game and the growth is exponential with each update. No need to worry about Mic-spamming kids in this game, the voice-chat is nearly unusable, and encourages the use of teamspeak. My advice, get a group together (either IRL friends or use the lobby to quickly put together a squad of unstoppable ninja!) and get into this game, it's the only way you'll understand.. and remember when playing - The wiki is written by people with experience and will save you hours of potentially wasted time. Good luck, and honestly.. try it out. You will probably like it.
DreC22;-;SPACE NINJAS YOU CANT BEAT IT
jasparagus;-;It's a very fun game; it's repetitive at times, but there's a very steady stream of new content and it always adds variety. The visuals are sleek and the combat feels really cool. It's definitely worth playing for that cool-factor alone. It's also a very enjoyable multiplayer experience with friends.
Jaxseven;-;There's a reason Warframe is a "launch title" for the PS4. Honestly it's probably for all the pretty particles that'll be flying around when you cut space marines in half with your space ninja sword while sliding on the ground after wallrunning from across the map because you are a space ninja with all the powers of space ninjutsu. In all seriousness, this game is fantastic, not because of the terrific graphics, not because the co op with different Warframe (you character with a set of stats and powers) that allow for great synergy between teammates, but because this game gets Free 2 Play. At no point have I felt the need to pay for the game, but I have because I like it a lot. Everything can be aquired without real world money and it all seems fair and balanced. This is a brilliant game and I recommend it to anyone looking for a great co op game or something to really show off to "next gen" console friends.
Neon Zombie Zero;-;This game honestly wasn't what I epected when I started playing. I figured, "Oh an action MMO, so we're looking at a massive world full of people all doing random quests only with guns". Wrong. The world is divided into small maps that you play with teams and completing each map unlocks the next. The combat is fast, requiring you to go back and forth between shooting things to slicing them up with melee attacks. The sheer depth of customization options you have is astounding, and the way that skills are handled is a nice addition. The graphics themselves are nice, and players can drop in to a map in the middle of play so you may start a map with only you and another player but end it with 4-5 people. There is an element of grind present, as to manufacture gear once you have the blueprints you need materials for which you'll either have to pay Platinum (the real-monet currency) or play maps over a few times to get what you need from enemy drops (easier to do on Survival levels). Also, leveling up yourself is a seperate things from leveling weapons and frames, and ranking up as a player requires completing "challenges" which you need to wait 24 hours to try again if you fail. I have a few problems with the game; First, you're kind of thrown to the wolves when it comes to initialy setting up your character, but the Wiki helps. Secondly, I feel that, while the graphics are wonderful and the visuals themselves nicely done, the bio-mechanical look of the game could have been done better. That's not to say that it looks like crap, just that the disproportionate bodies of the enemies can look out of place compared to the avatars of the you and the other players. Sometimes the game won't remember the mods I've added to weapons/frames after I exit that menu, but that might be something I'm doing wrong and not the game itself You're best option, if you try the game and enjoy it, is to buy the $40 starter pack. You'll seriously need the in-game and real money currencies as well as the other bonuses to help get yourself started, otherwise you're stuck with the most basic of basic gear for quite a long time.
DICKBUTT;-;this is the best free game on steam i've ever seen :D...
Sakazuki;-;I love this game, its well made. Good graphics and fighting mechanics, all bugs are dealt with quickly, so they aren't much of a problem. A wide range of missions, well suited for leveling up, as it doesn't rise too fast, nor too slow. A massive selection of weapons, with challenges to get the materials to craft them adds even more fun to the game. I really do recommend this game to my friends and the public, especially since it is a great game for being free. Get it now! You're missing out on all the ninja fun!
Namiya;-;The first thing to notice is how nice the graphics look, especially for a free to play game. You get to play as a Tenno, a kind of a space ninja, which is pretty darn cool. There are many weapons to craft and use, and even more mods to upgrade them with. When you find the blueprints for a new warframe, you can craft it and play with a new character. Each character has a different playstyle, also depending on what mods you decide to equip. Running trough the missions and blasting and cutting our way trough the enemies feels good. Not much communication happening in multiplayer, everyone just races to the finish. Thankfully players can still be very helpfull. The game is still in beta and many things need some work such as droprates, lag and mob balance. Missions can feel repetitive because most levels look the same. The rooms are always randomly connected to eachother, so the layout is different. It is possible to 'finish' the game without spending real money on it, but it will take a bit longer. It is free, so why not give it a try and see for yourself.
AtilaJihad;-;Impressive parcore and long ranged combat. Personally I love having the melee combat in a game like this. It adds a whole new realm of combinations that are available to the user.
____Z____;-;This game is really easy to play and fun for the first few hours, but eventually, it'll get very repetative. Either way, you can get a good few hours out of this at best. And it's free! :D
(A.C.W) Sneaky;-;Great game get this game it's fun to play with friends.
cromos [];-;it is the awesome game ever but it has some complications to it. You use chips to buy responds if you die in the game you respond back, but eventually you waste those chips and you have to use real money to buy more and i love the game but please who ever made it. get rid of the buy more chips it is super annoying
PotatoSalad;-;There is a voice inside me. Somewhere deep down in the fossilising lobes of my brain resides an eager mouth that calls in from my past. It is a youthful me, filled with irrational exuberance. It looks at the art and sci-fi glamour-gloom of Warframe and says: THIS IS THE STUFF!
ghostbullet498;-;best computer game i have ever played
gill22;-;best f2p I have played so far. graphics and detail u expect from AAA game. Really addictive game definately check it out.
hellhound999;-;This game is amazing, good graphics, good gameplay, never get bored.
FluffyNat TF/CSGO/DOTA;-;The fact there's a 92,99 euro DLC for this game makes me think all sorts of stuff.
Dustinpuffer;-;The game was very good, but it lacks support
Omnitude;-;Awesome game! I loved it! One of the best looking free to play games i have ever played.
Viiri;-;A great game. I wasted my whole summerbreak with it.
Arcadia VII;-;Warframe is a co-op thirdperson action shooter. The player is given a nice variety of weapons they can work towards, though knew warframes will be what you spend most of your time working for. This is as this is a very heavily grind based game, and you will revisit the same missions over and over, depending on what you need to make your next item. The acrobatic mechanics add a very nice ascpect to the combat, allowing flips and wallruns. All of this is very nice, but in the games current state it lacks variety in enemy an missions, an the lore, which seems very nice, is given to you very lightly, leaving the best part of the game obfuscated. Warframe -7/10 Good! What is "Stalker?"
Fox-Two;-;This game, will just keep you entertained for hours on end. Sure its a F2P game, and really tries to get you to spend money on it. But the hours and hours spent grinding for that god damn Gallium, was sure worth it. I would like to thank the devs for this great game.
[VENAOS]  Mynnie;-;It's just too good for a free to play game oh my god.
Revan;-;MGR:R + BulletStorm+ (UT3) + Clan Dojos + Crafting = some kind of awesomeness
Iofen;-;Among one of the best Free To Play games out there right now with amazing gameplay that only continues to improve with each big update. If you've ever wanted to feel like a Ninja in a Cybernetic Exoskeleton suit, now is the best time ever with the release of Update 13 which includes a total revamp to the Melee system. Get started today, you will not be disappointed. This game is just gonna continue to expand more and more.
Yugiomega;-;Warframe uses an interesting combat style that includes the use of maneuvers like wall-running and wall-jumping that add to the skills one can have in combat. These maneuvers are complemented by the large assortment of weapons that range from traditional weapons in shooter games, like assault rifles and pistols, to weapons like bows and throwing stars that have been upgraded to fit the futuristic, sci-fi theme of the game. One thing that must be noted about this impressive arsenal is that while one must pay money to buy in-game currency, Platinum, to buy most weapons and warframes, these same items can be just as easily built through the purchase of blueprints in the in-game market using credits earned from completing missions or by using blueprints found during missions. I am not normally the type to pay in places where it is not needed, so having this option appealed greatly to me. On a negative note, I feel that at this point the stages and enemies are overly uniform with not enough variation between planets and individual stages. Though, at this point there have been changes made to some of the stages and enemies and I assume that more individualism will be seen between them, especially considering that at the point that I am writing this the game is still in beta. Also, the fact that the stages are generated differently each time it is played helps to keep it from seeming too much the same, as well as keeping it fresh instead of being able to just memorize stages. I have enjoyed my experiences with Warframe so far, and I would recommend it to others who may be on the fence about playing this action-filled game.
Uni Black Sister;-;you can run up walls and shoot things gg 10/10 would play again
Matt Finlay;-;Best free to play game out!!!
GreenLantern;-;i could write essays about this game but instead ill go ahead and recommend it, it's actually one of my best f2p games on steam(86/100)
Starkiller;-;This game is very well done for a beta, hell this might just be the best third-person free-to-play game I have ever played. Most of the things in here are grindable so you dont have to spend real money to get everything you need, so good luck Tenno!
Krethion;-;Good graphics, different playmodes, cool interfase and free to play =D
Neon Zombie Zero;-;This game honestly wasn't what I epected when I started playing. I figured, "Oh an action MMO, so we're looking at a massive world full of people all doing random quests only with guns". Wrong. The world is divided into small maps that you play with teams and completing each map unlocks the next. The combat is fast, requiring you to go back and forth between shooting things to slicing them up with melee attacks. The sheer depth of customization options you have is astounding, and the way that skills are handled is a nice addition. The graphics themselves are nice, and players can drop in to a map in the middle of play so you may start a map with only you and another player but end it with 4-5 people. There is an element of grind present, as to manufacture gear once you have the blueprints you need materials for which you'll either have to pay Platinum (the real-monet currency) or play maps over a few times to get what you need from enemy drops (easier to do on Survival levels). Also, leveling up yourself is a seperate things from leveling weapons and frames, and ranking up as a player requires completing "challenges" which you need to wait 24 hours to try again if you fail. I have a few problems with the game; First, you're kind of thrown to the wolves when it comes to initialy setting up your character, but the Wiki helps. Secondly, I feel that, while the graphics are wonderful and the visuals themselves nicely done, the bio-mechanical look of the game could have been done better. That's not to say that it looks like crap, just that the disproportionate bodies of the enemies can look out of place compared to the avatars of the you and the other players. Sometimes the game won't remember the mods I've added to weapons/frames after I exit that menu, but that might be something I'm doing wrong and not the game itself You're best option, if you try the game and enjoy it, is to buy the $40 starter pack. You'll seriously need the in-game and real money currencies as well as the other bonuses to help get yourself started, otherwise you're stuck with the most basic of basic gear for quite a long time.
DICKBUTT;-;this is the best free game on steam i've ever seen :D...
Sakazuki;-;I love this game, its well made. Good graphics and fighting mechanics, all bugs are dealt with quickly, so they aren't much of a problem. A wide range of missions, well suited for leveling up, as it doesn't rise too fast, nor too slow. A massive selection of weapons, with challenges to get the materials to craft them adds even more fun to the game. I really do recommend this game to my friends and the public, especially since it is a great game for being free. Get it now! You're missing out on all the ninja fun!
Namiya;-;The first thing to notice is how nice the graphics look, especially for a free to play game. You get to play as a Tenno, a kind of a space ninja, which is pretty darn cool. There are many weapons to craft and use, and even more mods to upgrade them with. When you find the blueprints for a new warframe, you can craft it and play with a new character. Each character has a different playstyle, also depending on what mods you decide to equip. Running trough the missions and blasting and cutting our way trough the enemies feels good. Not much communication happening in multiplayer, everyone just races to the finish. Thankfully players can still be very helpfull. The game is still in beta and many things need some work such as droprates, lag and mob balance. Missions can feel repetitive because most levels look the same. The rooms are always randomly connected to eachother, so the layout is different. It is possible to 'finish' the game without spending real money on it, but it will take a bit longer. It is free, so why not give it a try and see for yourself.
AtilaJihad;-;Impressive parcore and long ranged combat. Personally I love having the melee combat in a game like this. It adds a whole new realm of combinations that are available to the user.
Codmater779;-;Fun to play with other people :D
Zleoots senpai desu~;-;This seems like a good game. I haven't played for very long, but I beat the first couple levels with a friend of mine. All I can say is that it's a fun game, especially with an xbox controller.
rector;-;Fun if you can handle some repetitiveness.
Joeyz9876;-;MAKE THIS GAME IN MAC PLZ! (not on mac but fun)
Deionxick;-;This game is probably one of the best MMOs out there. It's very amazing to play with friends, and just as fun when you solo as well. The gameplay is quite addicting, to the very point that it'll constantly draw you back into the mix if this appeals to you in any way. The beginning, like most games, is quite the grind fest, but once you get past that point, it only gets better. While melee is not the best in this game, they offer quite a wide variety of weapons and Warframes, which signify the classes. The game can get quite tedious, but try to look past that and you'll be addicted just as easily as I am. My only complaint about this game is that there are so many weapons and warframes that I can't have them all because you need platinum to buy slots, which they generously give you 50 to start out with for extra warframe or weapons slots. If you enjoy playing with friends, this is the game to download. Teamwork needs to be handled very carefully or you can end up failing a mission that you could have easily won. While the game doesn't have the best soundtrack, it makes up for it with the ambiance. I'd recommend you to try this game at least once if you are curious about it.
Godzelda;-;Overall a very VERY good game! Great graphics, epic and intense combat, and well...space ninjas! Aside from some bugs here and there my only complaint is the levels get repetative, but it's not a game breaker for me. HIGHLY recomend this game, it's a lot more fun then it looks, and it already looks really fun!
Explosive_Paste;-;It's an amazing looking game with great mechanics. I love the feeling of being a space ninja in the middle of a solar system war. I rate this game a 9/10 smackaroos. Unfortunately even on the lowest settings I still get the occasional lag spikes when my computer can't handle the graphics.
Taco Nuke(Dapper Edition);-;Cybernetic ninjas/events and constant updates...The developers are keeping this alive, and I am pretty damn happy about how far they have come with all the content that has been added to the game itself
shuPRinov.;-;This game is just awesome. You can choose from just a few weapons when you start, but then you have the chance to craft your own weapons (and there are like, alot). The graphics are awesome too, about how it looks and how efficient they are. you can easily get +40 fps with a fairly old computer. The detail I personally like is that its not P2W (atleast not completely, if you get KIA, you can spend a revive, wich is bought from the market; OR you can be revived by a teammate in Coop). The only things I dont like about it are the unstability of the game servers and just a few bugs in the connection system and in the Steam launcher.
phoenixfeather;-;One of the best-if not THE best-F2P games I've played. To get this out of the way, this game is NOT Pay 2 Win. In fact, the best gear is only obtained through playing; cannot be bought. Warframe strongly encourages working in a team, though that doesn't mean that you can't go solo (there's a whole option dedicated to that). And with a large list of weapons and Warframes to choose from, there'll always be something to do. The only bad thing I could say is that if you're looking for a story or indepth game, this is definitely not for you. The missions will get tedious for those that don't like killing things over and over again. Still, it is a very well developed game that delivers several hours of ninja fun.
[BLT]AsianDucky;-;This game is Great, plus its free. the game is fast paced and hard.
bobronan;-;its a game you dont always have to play to advance in, but it has to build stuff like clash of clans, if you do play warframe (which you should) join my clan!
Gasai Yuno;-;GOOD game , but craft is bad
SaucissonFromage;-;A very good games. It has a lot of potential but it is ruied by a none fluid gameplay and of course a pay to win systeme 6/10
draco_darksmith;-;hey you have to try this game out pretty standard and easy plus online play is fun
A Copious Amount Of Humblebrag;-;Holy crap. This is as good as f2p gets. There are 3 basic weapon types, Melee, primary and secondary, each unique. I give this game a 10/10. I run a good 60 fps, and the graphics are outstanding for free to play.
Professor Beerad;-;It's sexy good time.
[BB] Darkmatter;-;No reason not to recommened this, great visuals. fast and fluent gameplay. And some awesome animations and whats more its a free to play non-paytowin in my opinion 8/10.
AgentGoomba;-;Think of Castlevania HD on the xbox. It's the type of game that you would not enjoy if you are playing it solo. However, add a couple of friends in the mix, and you got yourself a rootin' tootin' time. The game lacks a true story mode or a single player experiance, but makes up for it in the sheer amount of content. Various types of mission have you and your friends going through shooting baddies and collecting material to build your next mass murdering machine. The game even has boss battles that put your Warframes and gear to the limit. Although the game Free to play (F2P), most content can be obtained with a little effort on your part. You can even go as far as selling that hard to find mod (modification cards to increase the stats of warframes or weapons) or insanely difficult blueprint (used to craft new material) and obtain money from a willing buyer in the community that can be used to obtain weapon slots to add more weapons to your arsenal or buy some cosmetic items to make your warframe a fashionable kililng machine. There's nothing to lose when playing this game, so it won't hurt to give it a try. Like said before, this game would be geared towards someone who is looking for that new multiplayer experiance with friends.
The Sun;-;I have put near 500 hours in to this if that says any thing about it, a masterful game with strong game play and with a high skill cap, plenty of gear and levels to play war frame is best played with buddys, and id recommend dropping five or ten bucks on it and forgetting the Free to play. You can earn any thing in the game by playing, events offer any thing from new guns to cosmetic items but buy plat will make getting started a lot more easy, the only draw back to Warframe is the truly insane crafting times to build new Frames a and clan gear, but that is vastly out matched by it's meany other achievements. At it's base Warframe was made by People (And Scott) who love ninjas and space and robots and zombies and pirates, and made the perfect combination hack and slash and shot and space magic with rouge-like elements and rpg to bring you Warframe a game about having fun!
Kurpz;-;So much to to in a free to play game is amazing!! 10/10
Willi Brennt;-;space ninjas. with magic space swords/hammers/scythes/... cutting nazi zombi cyborgs in half/quarters/... best thing ever.
StickyBassline;-;The most expensive free to play game I've owned
Daketsu;-;This game is amazing..iit is not a pay to win game. you can unlock everything in the game. paying only speeds up the process of unlocks and ruins the whole point of it. but over all amazing to play with friends.
Smokus;-;Great and funny game, recommending it.
ForcesOfOdin;-;Being a Warframe is badass. The path of a tenno is violent and satisfying. Progression feels naturally paced as a free user, I don't feel like I'm really missing out. It can be played solo, but is much more fun with people, even random strangers. It's really easy to get into a game with others. Events where you have a limited time to complete a mission keep things fresh, are very rewarding, often giving access to real-money-only items , mitigating the need to spend real money (i.e. there is no need). Badsides: occasionally games are laggy, though thankfully this is rare. There is no player versus player, but that hasn't bothered me to much. The bosses can be real bullet soakers, some of them take a long time to kill. The mission types can wind up feeling generic, yet despite the fact that all you do is kill hordes of enemies, it still feels fun. Certain keybindings are less responsive than others, I had trouble with the 'e' key binding for melee, but when I switched it , I had no issues. The controller doesn't have this issue, yet I prefer mouse and keyboard in this game.
Tirami;-;9/10 This game is just fun to play, also a bit addictive since you can't stop getting more gear and customizing your 'Warframe' (in-game character), I give it a 9 because at the beggining it's a bit overwhelming for new players, so many features and options, not to mention things to do. Anyways I played in an old account after dropping this game some time ago, and may be that's why it was so overwhelming. It's free, fun and the community is great. Give it a try!
Xan5131;-;Yes it is repetadive as hell. Yes the diffaculty ramps very fast. No your levels means almost nothing well picking maps. Yes they want you to spend real money to get anything cool fast. Yes the knockdown stackdamage is |=uc|<ing stupid. Yeah the whole NinjaLaserGunningSwordswingingFlying bs is kind of hard to get use too but eh. This is a super casual mmofps. I would not recommend this if your about compatition or quick satisfaction from anything other then slicing some dude in 1/2 well getting lead sprayed at your backside. Edit: Forgot to say... you must wait a real 12 to 24 hours for most things to complete or for a chance to do them again. Take that how ever you like.
0ddfx;-;THIS...IS...THE...ONE
kubbiss;-;Alien space ninja's in space with magical ninja powers in space. Its undeniably grindy but the gameplay is fun. Its free anyway. So just get the game, enjoy it while you can. Then delete it once the RNG in the game has screwed you in the bumhole without lube too many times.
Aero;-;Fast Paced Third Person Shooter, It is by far a rather interesting and fun game to play, Playing basically as a ninja in space is truly something
Aero;-;Fast Paced Third Person Shooter, It is by far a rather interesting and fun game to play, Playing basically as a ninja in space is truly something
SweetLoaf;-;Warfrmae is a game ive been following since alpha and like many other games i never loose intrest in playing it, Yes this game isnt for those who just 'want it all now an not wait' but i think that the grind and trial to obtain warframes without using real money makes the warframe that more rewardable, the game just amazes me every day, its one of the only games that actually feel like a living breathing world every weekend has a new global event where the developers have us go up against a grineer vs corpus rivalry or a sneaky corpus tradesmans escort. Every warframe adds a new field to play with within the randomly generated levels and i love all the customization and loadouts that are avaliable you can play how you want to play; Be a tanky rhino and destroy the fron lines or a Nova who assists the whole team in a damage amplifier or be a sneaky assasin like loki or ash and stealth an entire mission. Oh and dont get me started on U11, in the lastest update they have added more amazing rooms and decoration to the clan built dojos. Alot of the content in warframe is not visble at first glance but if more people gave this game a chance i promise they would love it. Plus its FREE!! ( Btw I play warfame from the website and not through steam, i actually have 450+ hrs on the game not 19 hrs :/ )
Goodpaige;-;This game is seriously addicting. It has a ton of different elements from almost every game type there is, which is incredible. Immense customization, innumerable combinations of weapons and mods. This game really has it all.
Engwathang;-;Awsome game :D
[TRFF] Freddy Fazbear;-;You can play with the spaceship on the loading screen. 10/10
Scribbletist;-;Once I had regained my password, Warframe had still turned out to be a grind. You will spend ages rerunning levels and hoping for drops for specific pieces or patterns to unlock equipment. For those of you with fat wallets and little time to earn the gear legitimately, you can pay to unlock the weapons. It's a bit of a shame none of the vanity items can be earned in game though. Luckily, the game is still fun in a very visceral sense. Gunning down grunts while they swarm at you on defensive missions is one of the best parts, though it does appear they've rebalance a large portion of the game since I last played. The emergence of a story that does not require you to go browsing forums and creators notes is refreshing as well. 7/10 Would be better if you didn't have to spend so damn long (or so damn much) to unlock some of the gear. Seriously. Stop charging so damn much.
Fait;-;"Incoming security force detected - it's the Grineer."
Vinarth_Kirito;-;an amazing game.....the fact that its in 3rd person view, it makes it easier (for me at least) to see approaching enemies
Ninja Preto Canibal do Piau;-;I really like it!
BigdaddyM;-;Give it a 10/10 With the new Kubrow update ing Awsome
Ronald McDonald;-;Been playin since since pre-Steam partnership Great Game 8/10
Argoti;-;600 hours in, still farming. Space potato farming ninja simulator. Now with Dog Breeding!
SheepGoMad;-;Way too addictive. Can't stop playing. Must sleep more..
CLUD;-;Starts slow, but honestly, this is a diamond in the rough. A game that needs to be played to be understood. I never knew I what fun it was to play a space ninja, but after about 15 hours, it's got a few hooks in me, and not bad for free. I'm in my mid twenties in rank with the starter gear and am pondering the grind for new equipment or simply cashing out and having $10 or $20 to ride on for a while. The missions of Mercury are a bit dull, but once you get the Venus, the missions open up a bit and become a bit more engaging. In terms of polish, it isn't the shiniest stone but it isn't the buggiest by far. I would put it on par with a Payday 2 or Tribes Ascend sort of feel.
doowahdiddy/DUSKSHIMMER;-;GRATE GAME LOVE IT NBETTER ON PS4 BUT ITS FUN
BjkWolf;-;The fact that you have to read this in order to understand the level of amazingness that comes from this game... may God have mercy on your soul... If you like completlely custom game play... with ablility to BUILD every thing you can buy... all within a free game...each game mode (even while farming missions) is completely different.... GREAT graphics (even when compared to a buyable game)... and a community of helpful people...and other stuffs... then this isnt your game... Because your too busy reading what OTHER people think about it.... have some faith my child...Download it... add me on steam... I can personally tell you how awesome this game is! Either way.... your lack of faith is disturbing....
piupiu55;-;Best free to play, i've ever played! After the update 14.0, it feels like i bought a game with in-game transactions, to speed things up and look even more badass. It's a game about mother ing space ninjas with magic! Also, it has swords, aliens and now huge killer puppies... yeah!!!!
Roxerg;-;SPACE ROBOT MAGIC NINJA WARRIORS FIGHT POTATO PEOPLE, EVIL ROBOTS AND ZOMBIE PLANTS. And it's amazing as . You should totally buy it. Except it's free. You can buy wepons for irl  but it's PvE so  off. Also game is grind-based (but i mean you kill  and it's awesome so it's not bad grind ok?) so if you buy  you want then why are you even playing.
jasonsharp1985;-;brilliant, great design and a must for anyone. also free :)
Ghost01;-;`warframe` is a very good game and slightly like Prince Of Persia where you can sprint across walls, The Reason why i think this game is good is because you can purchase weapons and most of all play and enjoy all of the missions.I would definately recommend this game to any sort of player.
TR-1 DASH_;-;Fast-paced, high octane space ninja action, what more could you want? I mean, come on, SPACE NINJAS.
PartyCow;-;The best f2p game I have ever had. In fact the best game I have ever had in general. Runs really well on all but the worst computers
Toki;-;particle effects + farming
zeroburn666;-;Absolutely love this game, Action packed, and the support you get for bug fixes is really good, always adding new things every week or so :)
Cruz;-;Great F2P game, kinda like Mass Effect but free :)
Pirate Cove Foxy;-;"Oh boy another FTP game, bet it's pay to win...." I'm pretty sure that's what you're thinking right now but I would possibly come over, slap you with a glove and say "No." Well....It does have some pay aspects to it but that's only if you're the speedy type who don't like to wait. I'll go into detail over this in a second. All in all the game is still in beta, and it has been in beta for a while so don't expect it to come out of beta anytime soon. That being said, Digtal Extremes (Here on in this review will be known as [DE].) Does interact with the comunity of players new and old. From talking to others in the forums and holding weekly Twitch Livestream events they do it all. They even give shout outs to the user submissions as well as join some players sessions. I can personally vouch for this when I had a fangasm when [DE]'s on Rebeca joined in on my game during a mission. (If you're reading this Rebeca it was amazing to co-op with you. ) You're probably thinking "Why has it been in beta for so long?" Well [DE]'s still working on stuff like performance improvements in networking, maps, AI, etc. and overall performance of the game mechanics it self while tossing in new enmies, more content and more lore. They also hold events in the game for extra nice things too like rare mods for your warframes, weapons, and sentinel pets. Co-Op? Plenty of co-op, you'll run in a team of four, it can be with your friends, or random people who can quickly become friends with considering the userbase is full love lively people. (You know who you are. >;D) "What about PvP?" There's PvP in the game as well, though I don't dabble to much into that so I couldnt tell you much about it. CLAN WARS! YES! BRAND NEW! CLAN WARS! Get up with a clan and go take on other clans by destroying thier 'Solar Rails' which are things that allow you to go into other parts of the game for extra things too. "What about customization?" Here's where I'll get personal, I LIKE TO CUSTOMIZE! From Macho Man Randy Savage zombies in L4D2 to motherhumping Thomas the Tank as dragons in Skyrim. It makes it all the better to me. Now there's no client mods for Warframe but you can customize your stuff in the game itself. Either by paying for currency called platinum, which isn't all that expensive, and in my opinion, wait untill you get a discount from login rewards, oh yeah, did I mention there were login rewards? Because there are. And the more you log in, the better they are. ANYWAY! The cosmetics in the game can be bought with platinum or be recived through alerts, login rewards or events. Also, you can 'technically' earn platinum by trading rare item drops for them. Oh yeah you can customize your weapons damage effects too, nifty eh? :D those you don't have to pay plat for that. "I THOUGHT THIS WASN'T PAY TO WIN! YOU LIED TO ME TOYO!" No I didn't. Also, turn off caps lock, it's not getting you any brownie points. Weapons come in two different flavours, you can pay for one, and get it right then and there with a booster to allow more damage customization or you can buy the blueprints with ingame credits, grind for the needed resources, and build the item and wait for a bit. You wont get that boost like I mentioned before but you can get those via login rewards, alerts and NPC faction wars. Jsut gotta grind and build those too when you recive the item. The game's set up where you don't get a winning advantage just for throwing money at the game. The only thing that does is get you cosmetic items and such. [Though I will admit I have thrown money at the game for some shiney things. I'm not proud of myself, but at the same time, I look totes cool yo!] "What about end game stuffs?" There's one right now, and it will be a grindfest...well the entire game is a grindfest if you really think about it and don't mind waiting for your stuff to finish building. They're actively adding more content with weekly updates to the game with various fixes, tweaks and new items which, for me, keeps the game refreshing and not so stale like some other F2P games I know but wont mention. All in all it's a VERY fun game to play and as you can see, I played the game fairly religiously [Drank the kool-aid maybe? I dunno] So yeah that 750+ hours isn't just having the game runing in the background. That is actual game time where I physically played this game. It's free, so what do you have to loose? Besides not be a badass ninja with a badass sword and parkour skills? 10/10 Will keep playing till my HP hits 0 irl....and maybe in the afterlife....hopefully...wonder if they got pcs in the afterlife...?
-EsP3ctRo-;-;a perfect game for PVE that you can play hours and hours with your firends or make new one's in the game
TossingToddlerz;-;fantastic but hard to pick up at first. helpful to play with experience friends
AdmitImagery;-;Pretty Beast Game for being Free!
ThatonePenguinPerson;-;Stop reading and play this game!
Grimm.Archanist;-;Great action in a high paced mission based mmo. This clan based operation game truly ushers in the new era of online gaming.
Artoomis;-;Im going to start by saying if you dont have patience then you wont like this game, In other words it will leave your steam library within 5 hours. Alright after that your here for the review my experience with the game is amazing other than that annoying So called "Crafting" the game is great. Melee 2.0 reveloutionized the games melee system giving it a whole new aspect, First Heavy Weapons actually have a purpose other than more damage, They have different attacks but still more damage. Smaller weapons such as the glaive attack faster and deal less damage and is throwable. This pretty much wraps up the review one of the best prequels to a game ever not storyline wise but gameplay wise. 9.5 Out of 10
KILLER;-;pretty outrageous game but incase it very good to ply ninjas
SYN DeadlyCurry;-;An absolutely amazing title that entertains for hours, definite recommendation.
denimgorilla;-;Really solid f2p game. Graphics are decent. The developers are constantly updating, rebalancing, and adding new contact.
Matt;-;It's a fun coop game that you can play with your friends and it makes time fly, this game is my favorite freeto play game.
insanelyroguepotatoes;-;Space Ninjas. Nuff said.
V!Ru$ (Nathank35);-;Love this game!!
TrollingTroll;-;like this :D
Koidz;-;WEE!!! IT REALLY IS THE BEST GAME!!!
enderhunter101;-;WARFRAME IZ LUV WARFRAME IZ LYF. If you have ever wanted to be a ninja space cowboy ninja, without the cowboy, then get this game... its free, looks amazing, runs smoothly, and can be played many different ways. Such as if you want to be a true stealth ninja, or a raging tank of death, or that guy who plays support... like a boss
IMM Back;-;This is a pretty cool game.... my game lagged so hard at first..... good thing i can do setting to play a cool game and not lag
PrinceKaname;-;Just play the damn game, if you don't like it then get out.
{NIP} Ninjas In Pyjamas;-;i have not had this game for long but so far it is a great game with the weapons and the add sword making it feel like you are a master at using different weapons, im really hoping that this game will get a new update where its pvp with you and your team vs the other in a battlefeild with small buildings that cover you and tall buildings for snipers and close quaters for people with shotguns or machine guns, they could also make it control point one level, free for all and team death match. if this is based in the future they could put jet packs in and making the characters have a light up suit and/ or having a customisable character where u could also change your characters helmet and body amour and guns but over all i give the game a 8/10
Asian Pepe;-;This game is really fun and should be played by many, i may not have many hours playing it but in those hours i have been playing it ive had the most fun in my life.
youtube/XRaYzOuLiS;-;really nice game
Drifterxion;-;Compared to most people, I'm an f2p mmo fan. I bounce between mmo to mmo just looking for something to keep me occupied. Warframe has done a pretty good job with mixing social, building, hack and slash, shooter and just plain ninja elements together to create something interesting and addicting. I've ended up getting 4 friends addicted to this game without much effort and the other 6 friends are still playing on a regular basis. The game provides enough satisfaction to keep rabid game hoppers still for some time. The graphics are gorgeous and the gameplay is 95% smooth. (the other 5% fails due to the occasional glitches and like). Its worth checking out. It is free afterall.
chief117;-;awsome game need beefy computer
Amilesparker.CMD;-;Beautiful game! Love it! Yes i played for a while in the closed beta, and i love it even more in the open! every warframe is now mine!! MAUHAAHAHAH.
schaffenhausen;-;Gets kind of repetative.
Lord Alucard;-;Excellent gameplay and tutorial.. I would recommend anyone to play this game.
Kalaster1;-;Pros: Action packed fun Cool graphics Cons: There are micro-transactions so it's nearly a pay-to-win scenario, or just "play a ton of hours to win" Very (very) repetetive gameplay
Quarter Life 3;-;It's free. You get to play as a cyborg ninja. Get the friggin game.
Shanu_razor;-;definelty will recomend this game
TheBrandoGR;-;Best Parkour simulator ever, 10/10
veroma;-;Space Ninjas with swords, guns, and blob guns. If you need anything more than space ninjas with an arsenal of weapons that make you the coolest dude in space I've got the kicker.... There is also robots. 11/10 would play again.
olliebradz4;-;for a free to play third person shooter i would recomend this game to you as its got a good story mode the combat system is very sharp and you can also jump in and out of online mode as you please
Rajan aka Graphx;-;Its Space ninja with guns. Lots content updates, interesting lore and lots fan interaction.
DeztinedGr8ness;-;Amazing game with a lot of content that grabs your attention and challenges you to do more and try more. Would smash 10/10
Omgprkl8D;-;Awesomely good game for free to play, awesome active devs, lots of fixes and big updates allmost every month. beats many non-ftp games 10-0. play it.
Fairy;-;Okay, so Warframe...What to say... Well first off, its a fun progressive game. More you progress the better you can play... With this being said It isnt in the slightest like other games that do the same deal. Warframes combat and just just overall friendly feel will keep you coming back. As many times as Ive tried to take a break from it, it ALWAYS managed to pull me back in. The community in-game is amazing...Most helpful bunch youll ever meet. Overall its an extremely addictive game, and vets might aswell connect your warframe to Steam for the free acheivements. Its definately worth it, I debated it for a bit but finally broke down and Did so. The game lately is going through some awesome changes, With a new melee system, New damage system and above all the new GUI and Upgrades to what the games been for awhile! Events that give you some neat and pretty powerful gear, Voids can grant you the power of an ancient race of beings through weapons and Frames. Unlike alot of FTP games it isnt P2W. Everything can be earned in game with time played. YEs there is a transaction option for people with less time and those who want to overall just support the devs. Need I say more? I possibly can't without writing a would be book! Try it for yourself, its constantly updated with new gooodies. Go on, download it :)
Aewynne;-;This game is a great blend of melee and fps with fun acrobatics and spells mixed in. I recommend spending enough time to create your own "Warframe" after running through the tutorial to get a feel of all the customization available. This is one of my favorite games, with a great matchmaking system, good loading times and cinematics, as well as skins and colors available for purchase if you want to personalize your Tenno even more.
Overdose;-;I've played this game more than any other Free to Play game. The reason is: It gets you into the action immediately Everything is free aside from weapon/warframe slots and Orokin Reactors and Catalysts and purely cosmetic stuff. It looks beautiful Great weapon variety Great playstyle variety Fast Paced action and quick loading times Decent enough community to help you when you need it There are a few issues you should know about: The game is a bit buggy and sometimes will crash (Doesn't happen very often) Anyone who is not a hardcore gamer will be turned off by the large amounts of repetitive gameplay and grind. The game is a bit on the easy side and whatever isn't easy is usually cheap. There's no real balance of difficulty Your favorite weapons or warframes might (or already have been) nerfed to the ground making them almost useless Overall I enjoy the game though and recommend it
NoLagNoLife;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME ^_^
Reprimendi;-;I love the unique aspect of a multiplayer campaign with multiple mission types. Really makes it a fun and unique experience!
Fo0otsteps * TESCO;-;I've played a bit. just a bit it's pretty neat
_Panzer_X_OZ_;-;I dont know how this is Free? I cant stop playing it.
Macrosprime;-;This game is a ton of fun. And does a very good job in the free 2 play model. I level up more than fast enough, so I don't feel cynical about being driven toward some clowny "xp booster.' And-- all the good stuff in the game can be researched and built by you. The only thing you 'have' to have real money for, is cosmetics, and extra 'hanger' slots if you can't bear to sell back old weapons. TLDR: It's Chinese Space Ninjas in Space. Flipping out, cutting people's heads off, and being awesome.
Rastafarian Targaryen;-;This game got my pregnant
{}EventfulSumo3;-;BEST GAME EVERY PLAY AS A NINJA AND IT'S FREE
Sunset Superman;-;This is one of the most attractive games that i ever played. It is hard to get inside it, but once you've passed the firsts steps, this game becomes a place for ultimate enjoyment.
HonkyPunch;-;VARIOUS ABHUMANS BATTLE THRU THE HEAVENS! CHEAP AS FREE! SHOOT MANY THINGS AND COLLECT MUCH STUFF IN THE PURSUIT OF SWEET NECTARINE POWER! YOUR SEARCH IS POTENTIALLY ENDLESS, BUT ENJOYABLE WOULD SUGGEST PARTICIPATING IF YOU ENJOY GUNS AND SPACE
Lenny B.;-;I have spent (unbeknownst to me) over 300 hours playing this game and I have nothing but positive things to say. Despite the fact that many free-to-play games often require you to pay in order to progress, this isn't true with Warframe. As I've learned from the very beginning you could play for hours-upon-hours without having to spend a single penny. It wasn't until I was nearing 100 hours that I realized how much I enjoyed this game. Not only that, but I also thought that investing in (platinum for) the game would only help make my already-pleasant experience even better. Warframe has evolved alot in the small amount of time that I've played it. Through player purchases the developers have added new maps, new mods, a killer melee battling system, and outstanding and unique missions and modes that only add to the spontaneity of this game. Just imagine a game that mixes Ninja Gaiden with Call of Duty with Vanquish. From my own personal experience, it's worth checking out - especially if you're a college student (like myself) and are strapped for spending money on the new games coming out every-so-often. Give this game a shot and I'm sure you will come to find at least a few things that make Warframe a fun, great, and unique experience. Game On. - Lenny
oius;-;Rating: ++++ Very fun game, however you do need to put some time in it and get into the game to get good gear and stuff like that. one very big plus of this game is that all gear can be crafter with resouces you gain troughout the game, so even if you dont have the money you can still have everything that somone who pays also has. with the exeption of a few decorational stuff wich does not affect gameplay.
FlipnsFloopity;-;everything is over priced
Benevalent;-;This game has everything you could ever want
Summer Biscuit;-;Good game, been playing for quite some time now. And all i can say; it doesn't explain much in the start and it's too repititive. Graphics are very good aswell, and this is NOT a pay to win game. But you can pay for cosmetics which you can easily earn by selling mods and keys for Platinum.
.inf;-;This game offer a new way to be a ninja.
Smug Skeleton;-;Warframe is good-looking, smooth-working and lets you be a futuristic alien space ninja. Why are you still reading this and not playing the game?
EpicxPacman;-;Amazing free to play game. A lot of things about the game are frustrating. But i cant stop playing it. If you want to play a game that makes you feel like a badass. this is it!
Piegod;-;Fun game with friends, recommend for team play, not solo play!
Kroaken;-;This game is awesome and everyone should at least give it a shot. It is free after all.
aiaidoidoi;-;Great game, great experience. No end-game tho
Tsume;-;THIS GAME IS PRETTY AWESOME.but there is no "end game" so kind of gets to the point "why am i playing?" the game is still rolling out and it is alot of fun for new players. but after about 50 or so hours of game play it is like "okay, whats next" though 50 hours of game play is totally worht this game.
bluelol;-;love this game been playing it for a while and it just keeps getting better and better with each update cant wait to see what it becomes in the future
Owner of the worst stream;-;This game is about friendship, you play as a man in a suit made from materials and use your void powers to fight mutated space bunnies, people from Star Trek, and the zerg swarm. 10/10 You can get a bow and pin people to stuff.
Irish;-;The Best free to play on steam get it play it : ))
FrostyHobo47;-;may seem like its a pay to win game at first but when you start to play you relize its not its very good game
Fire Hoes;-;overall a great game. good character choice with plent of upgrades.
Ravicon;-;Love this game, been playin since befor I used Steam and was using Raptr. Awesome gameplay, easy to use controller support, vived lush graphics, excellent voices, tons of content with new content added regularly, and fun co-op. Super fun game to play for free. Now for gripes (Though Very Few), The story is very lacking, its not really in your face you have to be looking for it but there is one, also this game gets seriously repetitive and if your not playing with friends or a team that talks as you play... You get bored and last but not least.... This game is a Epic GRIND. If you dont wanna spend money to get other warframes or speed up the process of leveling and crafting this game will eventually make you put it down because of repetitive grinding. That Being Said... This Game Is Awesome and I recommend anyone give a shot... Its free for Goodness sake! And lets not comment on the epicness of playing this on a Big 1080 TV with surround Sound, and Dualshock 4, and Steams Awesome Big Picture mode!
ODI.CptPancake;-;This game is a very fun in-depth TPS, unlike most it has a social system, decent melee, and lots if cool missions. 8/10
LSZL;-;After all, I can't say its , cause' it isn't.
[SG]zz;-;goood game download it if u love free running
BEARDOFTHUNDER;-;ruined my life this last winter. excellent game. 10/10
Illusion;-;Awesomest if its a word game ever :D
NeoBlaze "BAM!!! Said The Lady";-;grade a sci fi shooter heavy on customization and PVE
FoosinSama;-;cool game its basicly ninijas in space.
yendis;-;Great game, plenty of content. Definitely worth a try!
Desdinova;-;Very fun game if you enjoy ME3 multiplayer, but can be a bit grindy at times
Mr Ruff IV is an inkling!;-;How I Lost My Life to Warframe To me, for the longest time it was one of those games that I'll see and hear about early on and decide, "Nah, that's not my kind of game, I won't bother getting into it". Anytime it pops up the same thought is there, and nothing budges. Eventually, lots of friends were getting into it, playing all the time. "That game has never seemed fun or my kind of game, I still wouldn't like it so I won't get into it still. Even though they're playing it so much, they're prolly just overhyping it, I've always felt it won't be fun to me." But then I decided, for whatever reason, "Hell, I'll try it out at least." And now, I'm on the other side, as friends watch me play constantly and wonder how it's even possible. It's just a plain fun game, pretty to look at and play, and even its F2P tactics feel good in the long run. I was pessimistic about the waiting and grinding involved, but pacing your gameplay helps to enjoy things longer, without burning out on things right away. Don't wanna wait 12 hours for a weapon to build? Just take a bit of control, sleep it off, wake up to a nice new shiny toy. There'll be more to do in the meantime, the new player experience is just a bit slow to get you off your feet is all.
Miter;-;Warframe is a good game, it may dont have a story or exact campain. But hey! it's an open beta, what are you waiting for?...This game contains an XP system, if you keep using your char (Excalibur, Loki, Ash, Rhyno, etc.) it will lvl up, with each lvl up you can add mods that you can find on missions, they are very unique and the mods depends of how you equip them. if you are lvl 4 you can add a mod that is lvl 4, lvl 3 or lvl 2 with another lvl 2. The missions are pretty big after an update, you can spen from 30 to 1 hours at exploring the big map, it worth it because you can find more ammo, health and credits. killing enemies with a specific weapon it makes it worth even more, because if you only kill with your braton mk l your rifle will lvl up and you can add mods to your wep, you can use a primary weapon, a secondary wich its always a pistol and a melee that you can use if you spam that damn E button. after you finish a mission you will recieve extra points. You can only recieve this points if you killed a lot of enemies or depending of how much enemies you killed, this extra points will not help all your weapons to lvl up, it depends of how much you kill with them. Lvling up your Tenno and your weps makes this game very entretaining and long! and please....dont go to a mission where the enemies are lvl 50 and you are lvl 20 with lvl 10 - 20 weps...they will kick your  so fast...so lvl up everything you can before doing those missions. Go for them tenno! Yes i know i didnt "review" the online stuff...buts who cares just click on the big blue button that says "ONLINE" and choose if you want to do your missions alone, with a friend or public forgot to mention. This game actually have Bosses..witch them are generals or bigass robots, they are very hard to kill, so if you are a high lvl guy go for them, if you are not...join or make a lobby and let your tenno buddys help you with the damn general or robot.
Atlaskeeper;-;Great game for a free to play! Lots of cool weapons and Warframes (classes) with awesome abilities.
I am pie;-;I recommend This Game to everyone
Lord Loss;-;I've spent so many hours on this game and with update 13...theres no word in any language that can express how much I love this game. So uh yeah. Play it. Worth your time.
jameswandpower;-;I found Warframe to be a very fun game, one that I've spent a lot of time on. However, if you plan on getting invested in it without spending a lot of money, you will need to invest a lot of time into it. I was only able to create a new warframe by the 40 hour mark, so keep in mind, stuff takes awhile in this. You can get the option to just pay for a new warframe, but most you can make if you got the patience for it. It takes awhile, but once you unlock most of the missions, you'll have access to most of the parts you need to make a Warframe. However, when you start the game, you will only have two Warframe slots (so you can only have two warframes). If you want more, you have to buy them with platnium(real cash) or use the 50 platnium the game will start you off with. Overall, if you want to give this game a try, I would recommend it, but just know that it takes awhile to get some of the other warframes, so be sure you know what your starting warframe is.
FrozenDUTCH;-;Its a great game so much detail and missions its just unbelievable its a free game. I just played 7 days without anygame and its still adictive like i just started the game
ThePinkRanger;-;Heaps of fun. Leans more towards the Pay to Win but you can play free and still get the same benefits. Best played with friends
Hastarin;-;Space Ninjas! After playing the Destiny Beta on XBox One and loving the PvE co-op I was looking for something similar to kill the month and a bit until Destiny is released. In Warframe I've found that and more. Destiny it's not, but for a Free to Play title it has a lot to offer. You have a range of parkour type moves that help you rapidly navigate the levels once you learn how to combine them to vault, slide, flip, wall run, and more, your way around so fast the enemy can't keep up. You can take the fight to the enemy at range with your primary/secondary weapons, or get up close and personal with your melee weapon. Gather enough energy from fallen enemies/crates and you can unleash your true space ninja powers to devastate the enemy, aid your allies, or boost your mobility, depending on the warframe you're using. The Free-to-Play model is well done, and you could conceivably play the game for hundreds of hours without paying a single dollar. I will personally spend some cash on the game just to support the developers, but you can get along just fine without doing so. It's the typical F2P model with cash either saving you time, or letting your characters look just that bit funkier. The game also offers PvP if that's your thing, but it's not mine so I haven't checked it out yet to comment on it. If you are old enough to remember MDK fondly or enjoyed Too Human then you owe it to yourself to check this out.
Frankencookie;-;wow... This is incredible for a beta...
Crysis;-;Pretty good free to play game.
Siewperhero;-;Love the game!
Gay Nixon;-;Warframe, an amazing third person game which would be pretty accurate to say is the epitome of robot ninjas, which in turn, makes this game extremely fun to play. Besides the repetition of levels and the occasional glitches, this game has everything pretty much down pat, from awesome graphics to a solid fighting system which makes this game even better to play, and its all for free!! So I highly recommend adding this game to your library, and you will get quite a few hours of entertaining moments out of it.
[Raika] KyuubiBankai;-;Warframe is not only my favourite game of all time but it is also a game where legends are born my friends, let me explain why. This game is where patience and dedication is needed because most of the time you will need to gather resources to build the weapons and characters which suit your play style. How this game works is that you the player must travel across the galaxy and battle against the three main fractions which are constantly fighting each other and you. You the player are known as Tenno who are this BADASS super race which existed in the past generation and have just awaked from a deep sleep. From here you fight enemies and gather different resources to build your equipment to use depending on the enemies your are against. There is a HUGE verity of weapons which are never ending because as we speak more weapons are coming out, you have three different weapons at your disposal. The main weapon, your secondary weapon and your melee weapon. I can sit here all day and go in GREAT DETAIL but that would take forever, let's just say the combat system is so in-depth its like sitting a science exam, ITS SO INDEPTH. The weapons you have are insane, we're talking cannons, laser rifles, swords, axes, scythes, gauntlets, rocket launchers and even weapons made from the flesh of your enemies (I'm serious). There are so MANY weapons in this game there is something for everyone...even cowboys. But I'll be honest here the main thing to make this game shine is time...allot of your time. As I've already said you need to gather resources to craft your weapons. Different planets have different resources so you will have to farm for your equipment. So if you thing you can go all badass right at the start YOUR WRONG! This is not that type of game. If you don't spend time gathering resources then this game is not for you. If you're not nice to the game, the game will  you off and trust me. It's very easy to get  off with this game. As long as you are patient enough you will start to get the ropes of the game and you will be smiling the whole time. There are different mission in the game to add some verity like capture mission, exterminations and defence so you won't get board anytime soon with just one type of game mode. And this game had events that appear from time to time which reward the player which especial and unique rewards for completing the mission. For this reason you will be constantly be login to the game to see if anything special comes up. You can play with three other people friends or no so you always have someone covering your back but the option is there to play alone but I wouldn't recommend it. If your liking this stuff so far then it gets WAY better. You can craft different types of character you can play as which are called Warframe, that's where the title comes from. Warframe have special abilities they can use in battle to change things up. One Warframe controls fire while another controls ice. Once can controls the minds of their opponents and one can even raise the dead to fight for you. The characters are AWSOME and have so much unique play style you will never bet board. Through the game you will collect pickups known as 'mods'. These mods drastically change the gameplay in Warframe, they can be used to upgrade your Warframe and your weapons. Upgrades like more damage or more health. There are HUGE amounts of mods in this game so you can customise your Warframe and weapons to suit your play style. SPEAKING OF CUSTOMISATION! You can change the colours and appearances of your weapons and characters so you can SWAG your way thought the universe in style. For those who are interested in the setting of the game its defiantly interesting. It's a sci-fi universe but there is just something about playing as the Warframe who are pretty much GODS which gives this game a really different feeling. The graphics are top quality and the soundtracks are solid. IT DOSN'T END THERE! You can also create a clan for your friends which you can trade and make deals with, or even fight against each other to see who's the strongest. Clans can even make alliances with other clans and best of all. Clans can claim part of the galaxies by participating in missions knows as 'dark sectors'. This is where the higher level players play at. Completing and conquering the dark sector means your clans symbol will be displayed to all other player to show that your clan is one of the best. There is so much more to talk about but for the sake of my hands and your interest I'll just stop right here. This game is never ending and is constantly being updated and fixed with patches which also give new weapons and characters to play as its endless. Give this game a try, there is something for everyone but as I have already said. You MUST but the time into it. One more thing for those IDIOTS saying that this game is 'pay to win'. NO! These are the types of people who don't know how to farm for their equipment. Anyway I'm done. PLAY WARFRAME!!!
Donnie;-;bcuz i dont have it, swag duhhh im downloading it right now noobs suck my bootyhole
RebeL #Beach Time !;-;150% Better than the time it first appeared :D Good job guys !!! Play it now and become the ULTIMATE WARRIOR
BurninOrphans69;-;love this game.
RonaldMcFondles;-;Got stuck in a wall as all of the enemies lost control of their limbs and flailed around, 10/10 would have a seizure again.
~MaliceKurohime~;-;this is like metal gear rising with a bit of slow close combat but replace with badass guns :3
DelusionalRon;-;top notch create graphics fun community and over all a dam good game if you like gears of war or anything similiar id recommend this jam
LordAjei;-;Started playing this game two days ago, and has been running smoothly so far. The co-op gameplay is really impressive and fun to play. There's always the option to get into a mission by yourself and hope that people are going to join you, but some missions aren't well-balanced for solo play. The graphics of the game is okay and most critically, there's no lag or ping display anywhere. There's a good variety of guns to choose from, including really powerful bows that can pin enemies against the wall, I think the swordsman archetype was a little overplayed, the melee combat here is also satisfyingly weighty. Charged attacks that can cut enemies clean in half are their own reward. One of Warframe's significant issues at the moment is its failure to display important information, especially in the mission-select interface, other than that the game was pretty well made and I will recommend this game to all who are looking for some fun in co-op gameplays.
HexxenHammer;-;Best game ever! Totally hooked! :D
DiazWaffleCrab[PWI];-;I can not openly recommend this game to anyone, not with the problems the game still has, Some of the worst connectivity issues i have seen in an online game, terrible physics issues, and even worse, terrible UI issues. If I were to give this game a rating, as it is now, i would give it a 3,5/10. But it has a potential for a lot more, so despite hating all the problems, i am going to look where this thing goes, Most importantly, If you are reading this, you are doing it wrong, dont read recommendations or meta scores on F2P games, make the decision yourself.
hydro;-;One of my favorite Co-Op games on steam. Having a friend to go into this with you, is a must. Great game, especially for the fact that it is free. 5/5 must play free game.
GTO;-;Very fun
Starr Silara - Tattood IT Girl;-;For those who love the FPS or even a group mission to look for the best looking gear in todays fasion, this is it! An FPS in 3rd person and the outfits are so colorful! Functional too!
Scrump;-;Fun game, probably one of the best free-to-plays out there. Almost everything is obtainable through progression.
BoboTheClown;-;warfame is an AWSOME game i love it...its a very good game.....my preference is first person shooters but this game is a great exception this game maes it not even matter it is so awsome......sadly for me i do not like how u have to pay for more charecters or craft them which takes forever but besides thatfact the charecters are well balenced and it is a great game
NekoArtist;-;Suggest you play this game if you like violence, shooting, 3rd person and sci-fi :D. Really good and free to play, unless you want to buy platnium.
Foxy;-;the game is so fast and i like that in a game :)
Kuzomaki;-;Pros: -Good graphics -Fun gameplay -Lots of weapons to choose from Cons: -Expensive items in market -Expensive in-game currency. But it a fun game you know. but im not sure why platinum is expensive, its still in open beta. would be better if there was credit to platinum exchange or be able to buy everything in the market with credits. I only reccomend this game for people who have lots of cash to spend on to support the Devs or for people who want to experience a fun coop sci fi action game with friends or other people.
RockCambo;-;I've had so much fun in this game, it is simply amazing and impressive. An interesting concept, with nice asthetics across the board to boot, and fun gameplay. It's main drawback is an endgame of a massive grindfest depending on where you want to go, but even so you can still have fun with what you have. In all, it was a fun experience to be part of, and still is today.
LeeSnake;-;Quite fun to play online and alone, only thing that felt bad was limited inventory slots, that you have to buy with real money.
SamCube;-;Fast-paced, PVE, sci-fi with an incredible art direction. And it's free! And it's fun!
Lipucd;-;Got a ton of hours, LoL and Dota2 just not filling your daily grind, and like to jump around being tech ninja? Then Warframe is chances are for you. A game still rising up from a Beta status, it's pretty damn repetative for sure, but it at least offers you some goals to reach out towards. Better gear, upgrading gear, upgrading cards to enhance gear, and the long grind to get just ONE more warframe suit to use. It will take you HOURS, inclduing after the recent updates, to see progress, but in a F2P enviroment, that's kinda given isn't? On that note, for the MOST PART, it is pay to go faster, as ( anything outside of colors and extra slots ) can be earned without spending a cent onto the game...if you are pacent enough anyway...
Onodera-kosaki-Waifu;-;This game is fun and comes out with lots of new content it is simply awesome
Loken E-Drop;-;Totally awesome, but i've been playing a while now, and it's crying out for a new race.
Wizo;-;This game is too good to be free to play, become the space ninja you always wanted to be. Slice your enemies and use your powers and abilities to eliminate your foes in the snap of your fingers. Grab a couple of friends and save the system. (good game)
Milk N Cheese;-;The new standard in which all Free-to-Play games should strive for. Digital Extremes has raised the bar once again since they first created Unreal Tournament. Warframe is simply pure bliss to play.
Artorius;-;Well, this game is kinda out of my expection. Not just a simple shooting and cuting game...This game has a very unique weapon and mods system, and you can also craft your own weapon and gear. (That means you don't need to waste your money in the online shop, unless you love showing off...) Although it is almost impossible for low level players to solo most of the maps, it is a online game..so....why not make a team with other people. ( PS: the main reason why I love this game is because .....Hint: Metal Gear )
cyborgmachine90;-;Warframe is one of the best multiplayer games out there which is worth playing it. The game is simple, you play a role as a Tenno and fight enemies in outer space. When I started playing the game for the first time, I found it a bit hard to understand the interface especially on how to mod your warframe & weapons, how to use the foundry to build tools, how to obtain resources(played before update 11 was out)... because it somehow lacks the tutorial for such(i guess its one of the cons). Excalibur was my first warframe(actually it was Loki but then I made a new account to link with Steam and chose Exca instead). After a few rounds, I found it being addictive especially when playing with friends or random strangers online. The graphic is good and lovely. The dev really put aan effort to make the game more realistic despite making it fun and enjoyable to play. It kinda has this Mass Effect feel to it due to the space environment and being a 3rd person. The beautiful environment really brings up my mood to play the game more. Getting credits to buy stuff in the game can be hard since the items in the market require a lot of credits. Plus, most of the items sold require platinums, which you can't never get in-game and have to use real money and purchase it online. But that doesn't stop you from obtaining cool items like premium users. Instead of buying directly, you can buy the blueprints of the desired weapon from the market and build it in the foundry but you have to spent quite a lot of credits on the blueprint, excluding the materials you need to build the item and of course building cost and a long waiting time. Some items like Warframe can take up to 3 days to be built in the foundry and require rare materials such as Orokin cell, Neural sensors etc which is time - consuming. So if you can't buy the weapons straight away, you can use the alternate way, but it'll cost you. I don't think this game has any storyline but somehow it can be related to Dark Sector(previous game made by the same dev). So I can't say much about this because you don't have any clear goals other than fighting enemies, bosses and farming materials. But this game is always updated by the dev so there are surprises coming(new mission, warframe, weapon, boss etc) so keep yourself updated. So far I really enjoyed playing it, got new warframes and weapons in my inventory and unlocked a few systems. Overall, I would say it's a pretty decent game and I suggest that gamers out there should try this game. Play solo, or with friends or with random users, it can never seize to amaze you. So Tenno, get framed up and fight 'cause NINJAS PLAY FREE!!!
DeltaKai;-;In all honesty and entirely an opinion, this is a very well made game. Having patches pretty much every week or so, DE manages to pull off some amazing things with this game. Now onto the game itself, it's a sci-fi third person shooter. This is one of those rare F2P games which can be enjoyed with friends,random people or just going in solo. The gameplay is pretty much what you would expect from a TPS, but you have a lot of movement and actions to pull off in this game, making you have that "ninja feel." If you're a person who does not mind farming for items or rather just enjoy that, this game has plenty of that. But after all that and finishing up your warframe or weapon, you'll have the satisfaction of just playing with a new toy you made. You have a wide variety of "Warframes" consisting of different powers to pretty much choose from and see what interests you the best. Weapons are always being put into the game to make things more interesting, from kunais,dual swords,scythes rockets, etc. The lore is another eye candy for those who love to read into games to learn their story. Now onto the topic of paying real money. You really don't need to give money to play this game. This game in no way is a P2W, I would say 70-80% of the items in the shop can be bought with in-game money or "alerts"(missions in which will give you special drops from time to time). But if you are to pay money it's only for cosmetics or space in your inventory, which in all honesty is not that bad since you can delete weapons which you don't feel you like anymore and move on.
Ren Tsune;-;"Made by the same crew who did Dark Sector. Feels and looks very polished even though its in beta. Very fun, I'm looking forward to the new content the Devs come up with.
Dr. Steak;-;Probably my favorite free game our there right now, others include Path of Exile, Ghost Recon Online, League of Legends, and Loadout. This is a great example of how the business model in a F2P game should be. Any item that you can buy for real money, you can easily get for free. Anything that you can't get for free is purely cosmetic. Graphics are great for a free game, and crafting a new gun or warfame just never seems to get boring. It is kind of a grindfest though, and after spending almost 200 hours into this, i'm starting to get burnt out... It's still in beta and I've heard that the devs are gonna start to change things a bit, make it more interesting. As it stands now its a must play. It's free, so theres nothing to lose :).
Noble Hawk;-;Ever played Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer? This is very similar, except it most of the game modes are more akin to dungeon runs than static defense. That being said, shooty stabby space ninja super funtime is quite entertaining. Very fast paced gameplay.
Kagetatsuya;-;Its fun to pass the time and having patience will get you anything in the game.
Nanking;-;This game really has gotten my attention. It probably has all I could ask for. It has tons of action, an RPG mechanic which makes you want to farm those mods to become more poweful. Play with friends, levelup, gain new weapons and warframes and rank the  up! :)
$xffndr;-;Game type: MMO / Third person / Free2Play (but in a good way!) / Shooter / Hack and Slash / RPG. This one is very different from most pay2plays out there. You can reliably get almost anything in-game that you could want. I am sure there are one or two things only available to people who have paid money into the game, but any weapon or warframe worth having, can drop during the game. All without endlessly farming for the same materials. You can end up with great weapons, skills and "warframes" (the games answer to a suit of mech armor.. I guess) just by playing the game regularly. No extra, obnoxious farming.. although you will probably be "farming" for hours anyways.. levelling up your, everything is key to having the most powerful weapons and skills. Skills.. oh my god if I could describe how the skills can vary from person to person, warframe to warframe, weapon to weapon it would take me a degree in math and I would still have to write an entire article in order to describe it. (A tutorial would take an entire wiki). You level up (your account) on a fairly regular basis.. but can only take the test to level up once every 24hrs. This however doesn't impede your ability to progress and make gains on your character/frame/weapon combination, as each fight may drastically alter the way that you choose to play your game permanently, or perhaps just for certain missions. Anyways, it's been said before.. but never by me- The possibilities are nearly endless. They are legitimately endless if development continues on the game and the growth is exponential with each update. No need to worry about Mic-spamming kids in this game, the voice-chat is nearly unusable, and encourages the use of teamspeak. My advice, get a group together (either IRL friends or use the lobby to quickly put together a squad of unstoppable ninja!) and get into this game, it's the only way you'll understand.. and remember when playing - The wiki is written by people with experience and will save you hours of potentially wasted time. Good luck, and honestly.. try it out. You will probably like it.
DreC22;-;SPACE NINJAS YOU CANT BEAT IT
jasparagus;-;It's a very fun game; it's repetitive at times, but there's a very steady stream of new content and it always adds variety. The visuals are sleek and the combat feels really cool. It's definitely worth playing for that cool-factor alone. It's also a very enjoyable multiplayer experience with friends.
Sauturos;-;This game is very promising. A beginner's guide would help; after the initial training session I was taken to a big overview mapmenu with basically no information on how to navigate it/what to do.
=7Cav=PVT.Pauls.M;-;One of the best Free to Play Game ive ever seen.. Bit boring when things get repetitive, BUT when you do missions with a team, its good fun! Amazing graphics, stunning animations and skillset effects. Plus, you cant go wrong.. its free!
DovahPete;-;Sick game :P
MunkyMeat;-;More fun than a fat girl and a tub of crisco. I recommend that anyone who loves FPS's and MMO's give this a try.
EvilRussianBear;-;Warframe Review. Level: Space Comrade Ninja Bunnies One of the most interesting projects of 2013 that flowed into 2014 that I've seen. The game has all what a gamer needs. Guns, fancy karate gimmicks, swords. Two words: Space Ninjas. What is actually good that the game even tho is F2P but it does not follow a shadowy P2W path. You might be confused in the beggining, as getting the stuff, crafting, locations and controls. But when you get over it, you might as well like it. Another aspect that drives the attention. Constant new content updates from very friendly Developers. I might add that DEVs do take in considiration players ideas and implement ideas and throughts into a real thing. Almost all the stuff ingame can be aqquired just by playing the game, you just need to get over the beggining. BUT this game is still in beta. There could be bugs, there could be flaws. Currently DEVs implement tons of content every two months (aprox). In general this is a game that you might totally like or just play for two minutes and uninstall. Playing with friends is recomended.
Undastelar_;-;Do you recommend this game? Of course I will, because it's damn good and fast action game. It's about team work and you would not miss it because it is not like other games like "pay to win". Here, everything depends on your skills and reaction, about your accuracy and moving style. So go on and download it. You won't be disapointed.
Daniel;-;With no doubt, one of the best F2P games. First of all it is actually free, meaning, everything in the game is obtainable without spending a single penny thanks to the in-game trading system. That speaks to DE's generosity. Fantastic customization options for both weapons and frames, Stunning visuals, addictive gameplay and a lot more, have made me to spend more than 600 hours of my time into this game. Recommend it to any and every gamer.
Jeff;-;Awesome Games, Good Graphics, Good Gameplay, And Many More. Love This Games :*
zXMegaSnailXz;-;Fun and exciting game. That's like all I have to say.
Now You See Me;-;The pinacle of MMO adapted to FPS. Third person adds to the overall experiance, custimization is to die for, graphics are Next Gen. I would advise this game to anyone and find a single person who didn't enjoy.
The Artist of War (Shadowsword);-;Good game for cooperative players. Fun misions. Overall 7/10
[MNI] Sandro;-;Good game for free to play with fun and interesting combat and teamplay but it has several severe flaws which are that it has a bad payment model, things are overpriced and you are required to buy more slots for warframes and weapons i u want more then two. Secondly the game becomes very repeatitive and there is not very much metagame. The last thing is that it is very difficult to get interested in this game starting off due to its repeativeness.
morejoeridi;-;Warframe has a few quirks here and there but you should not just give this a glance. Invest at least a good hour and you'll form a new passion to the free-to-play lifestyle 8.5/10
Bobbert The Lemon;-;This game is an example of free to play done (mostly) right, which is very rare. You, a member of the Tenno race, are equiped with suits known as Warframes, each with unique stats and powers. It is your mission to aid in the war between the Tenno, Grineer, Corpus, and Infested. Admitadly, the game plays like a standard third person shooter, where it really shines is all of the different weapons and mods just waiting to be discovered, like Bows to assault rifles, Health increases to abilities. It's not without it's problems, though. The game is LITTERED with microtransactions, and while optional, grinding isn't fun unless you have friends. Oh yeah, this game has a standard 4 player co-op system too, which it is usually designed around. Overall, I would suggest getting this game with a very open mindset.
Tulip O'Hare;-;Despite my username and avatar, I don't go in much for FPSs. I still LOVE this game. It's a lot like Mass Effect multiplayer, with the addition of martial arts flick acrobatics. Good balance so far in the freemium aspects -- new equipment comes along fast enough (particularly when playing with friends) that I don't feel screwed by not paying money for it. Looking forward to how this game develops over time.
Korriban;-;Good co-op 3rd person shooter. Graphic is good enough for a free to play game. Game's mechanic is a bit hard to learn, but you'll get the hang of it soon enough. The action during missions is often fast paced and some of them are a real challenge. I would eecommend this game to those who like dead space mixed with some mmorpg mechanics (farming loot, craft better equip, etc.) Not recommended for those who dislike farming and crafting
Kalvart;-;Very fun and entertaining.
Ruledragon;-;Warframe is a pretty enjoyable co-op game, as you level you get to understand that this is one of those games in wich leaving a team mate behind is not a choice, because solo is not a option (at least on low levels). It lacks PvP Maps like... let's say Halo Combat Evolved had, in wich 5 or more players on 2 different teams fight to accomplish one common objective, may it be killing each other or capturing a certain objective (Capture the Flag for example would be a pretty cool game mode in warframe since players have high mobility with the Shift + Jump + CTRL combo). You can make your own warframes and weapons wich is kinda well though. It's still in Open Beta but i hope when it goes live it turns into a better experience. I'll give it: 7 out of 10 points
Saqiw;-;Better then Firefall game imo, a lot of stuff to do
kungfoo45;-;this game is good
DTD RALIC;-;ya its pretty cool but way to heavy on the pay to win area that part is mega fail.
sceg;-;A very enjoyable game to play. the combat style is very much like Mass Effect 3 from a 3rd person point of view. if you're looking for a Battlefield 4 level of graphics, look elsewhere, but if you like games such as the Diablo line of games(the constant runs through certain levels to try and obtain specific items), and Dead Space/Mass Effect 3 then this game in my opinion merges all of that beautifully and even with at least some kind of a story. I would like to eventually see more than just 4 players in some of the game modes though, like the survival modes. this game also offers an offline play mode and just having that makes this a great game for me because I am currently working on an offshore oil rig with limited wifi capability.
Terabyt;-;so far the best 3rdperson freeonlinegame out there
Lord Gorbie;-;Warframe is an Innovative and Addictive game with a really cool "Ninjas With Guns"vibe. I have great hopes for this game and can't wait for it to leave BETA. Quite honestly, for a BETA game it is very stable. As for the few hiccups that do occur, they are resolved reletivly quickly by the developers. Infact alot quicker that most "Large Reputable" Gaming Developers. Massive thumbs up from this guy!
Lupus;-;First experience with Warframe might be bad, at least it was bad in my case. Game graphics are ugly, and tutorial is quite boring. After that there is also strange interface with solar system, but... since you start playing missions on Mercury solo - with silend assassin style - or multi (impossible to sneak with random people), there is great chance that your perspective might change. Warframe is fast paced third person shooter/slasher in type of dungeon crawler mixed with teamplay known from Left 4 Dead. You pick your starter Warframe/class, but you are able to craft any other class withought using real money - its nice epsecially for Free to Play game. Each warframe has its unic abilities and you can boost them with mods, found on fallen enemies or bough from other players. The Game has great community and devs which is great advantage. What might hurt, game still has bugs, nothing serious but after while it might be annoying, when you need to start all over again for the third time because mob disappeared in textures and you can't finish your run. And also if you are impatient, crafting system will make you suffer because its not about farming materials (well it is, but its not that hard) but time, that takes real hours or even days (last stage of warframe craft takes over 3 days) to craft - no worried there is plenty of thing to do so you won't be sitting and waiting for your weapon/warframe to be ready. Game mods are fun, there is also waframe customization and even that there is some similarity to every run, the game can keep you focused for a long hours before you deciede to reach for another game. So... if you want to feel like killing machine, Warframe is definitely worth playing.
[E2L] musicalF0X;-;my favorite game so far great for team work
Mogsy;-;this game is fun and a bit of excitement when they start swarming you.......co-op play fun too. cool graphics and smart-enough AI, just love to keep repeating missions to get special boss drops and level up my gear!!
Osvega;-;Warframe is one of the Best games I have ever played! Beautiful graphics, awesome Coop Third-person gameplay and FREE TO PLAY!!! Get it now, No questions asked!
Leo;-;Veteran Warframe player here. This game is very fun to play with friends however becomes dull very quickly if you're playing alone. The game itself has great graphics and controls however the gameplay grows dull as the maps are generated using a tile system and you'll see yourself fighting the same enemies. However this is made up by the vast amount of weapons in the game as well as the damage rework that the staff did. The staff really listen to the community and try to respond to the best of their ability. I would say that Warframe has one of the best staff for not only listening and responding to the community but also doing livestreams and giving away Platinum. Platinum is Warframes in-game currency that can only be bought with real world currency, as expected from a f2p game. However there are little to no paywalls in this game. For me, I didn't have to spend any money on this game however the only aspect that I would count a paywall is the limitation on slots for weapons and warframes (the suits). You are given free platinum when creating an account which can be spent on buying slots for more weapons and warframes however once you start spending more time and creating more items you'll see yourself running out of space. This game however is a f2p game and getting hundred's of hours out of it is worth spending money on. In all however you start to see yourself just grind for weapons, materials, and levels through the same tiles over an over again so the game becomes very dull and boring which is why I recommend playing this game with friends as well as to treat this game as something you would just play casually.
Skinless;-;Its grinding a lot of grinding but it's CYBER NINJA GRINDING.
Ozt;-;Alien space ninjas cruise around the universe crashing parties and saving hostages. It's good.
C A K E B O Y Z;-;Closed Beta player here. Warframe is an excellent action TPS about, well, space ninjas. The gameplay is great and its aesthetics have improved a lot. With an unique art style and fun, fast paced gameplay, this F2P game is fantastic and you should try it out. (What's there to lose?) Don't worry about "pay to win" as there is really nearly nothing you can get with paid currency that you can't get through playing.
KpnKale;-;Space ninjas! I could stop my recommendation there, however there is more! It's free and beautiful. The land scape, ship design and detail are amazing. This is a great hack and slash third person game that atleast deserves a try.
Hitsugaya - Frozen Wasteland;-;I found this game difficult to understand at first but as soon as you complete the tutorial it all just fits perfectly in place
badboybuddy;-;best game i have played in ages always keeps you sucked in
Jonnothin;-;Great game. Though I know of a few people who would really enjoy it better with a controller. I can manage with a keyboard. 5 button mouse also helps, but try it for yourself it is free after all. Almost everything is obtainable by playing. The only thing that's not is colors (for warframe and weapons and sometimes they give you free ones), warframe slots and weapon slots. These can be purchased with platinum, the premium resource. You get 2 warframe slots and I think 5 or 6 weapon slots. You get random daily rewards which include coupons for platinum up to 75% off. So if you wait you can get a decent amount of platinum for a few dollars. My only complaints would be: 1. that you need certain mods to continue. These are upgrades for your weapons and warframes that can buff just about everything. You really need a damage mod to continue past Venus and most should be able to get this by playing survival or defense missions which give you a good variety. 2. They make you choose a warframe before you know what you want. So here's what I recommend. If you like being stealthy and are good at avoiding damage pick Loki. If you want a balanced and tough warframe pick Excalibur. If you like being a caster and are good at avoiding damage pick Mag. For more detailed information on the warframes and everything else for that matter, search for warframe wiki. The link is warframe.wikia.com. Some games that might be a good measurement of your skills for comparison are: devil may cry series (but especially 1 and 2) and Gears of war series (especially the ones with horde). The game isn't that hard to start with, but it does get harder later.
elluuhnn;-;Really fun once you learn the basics. May seem very confusingat first but otherwise its great! There are also a couple of bugs and the game crashes sometimes, but that is fixed in the regular updates.
CbIHA KOP3NHA;-;This is one of the best f2p games I've ever played. It's a very unique game and everyone should experience that. The game looks pretty fine and there is no "pay to win". And also the game is not that easy, so grab urself some buddies to play with. The one thing that I didn't get is the stealth mechanics, but after all - it's a mother flipping action shooter.
Nartsi;-;if you like mass effect you should try this out
VeteranRanger;-;This game isnt that bad as i thought! Great graphics, interaction with stuff, and also, my favorite! Wallruning!!! :D I recommend getting this game anyways. And if you do, See ya in space!
Bitches Love Cannons;-;Perfect for relax
icekachang78;-;This game has superb graphics+smooth gameplay+detailed environments+form a team & whack the Grinners!
S E P H A R I G;-;it free! it haz gunz u shot. i think teemwerk iz most impotent cuz i kant killem sumhow
Royal;-;Simply and Stunningly amazing.I recommend it to all who play games
teeeeeee;-;A fun co-op fps with leveling elements. In addition to your characters, your account, weapons and minions gain levels as you progress. With higher levels, you can apply modules to your items, increasing various attributes in them. Modules themselves are drops, and the module collecting and building your gear mechanics feel like deck building in a collectible card game. The game is peer-hosted, which probably helps keep the game free to play, but also means that you will sometimes end up playing on a server that is hosted on a connection that can't handle the bandwidth requirements of four players. This can be somewhat resolved with ping-filtering peers, especially if you have the connection and cpu power to host yourself. Almost everything in the game can be obtained without paying real money (except character/weapon slots), but as usual, time is money, and helps you progress faster.
Dolorem;-;I downloaded it initialy becouse it was a free game on steam. it sat there after my first few mision for a couple months, i practicly ignored it at first but then i relize people in my guild wars clan were enthralled by it, since then I,ve played it for about a week and it brought me closer to people in my guild i sooner hadent even known funny how stuff like that can work. to really love and understand this game you need to know a few things the current priceing for a few packs like excaliber prime is a project to give people limited time weapons to further increase production of the game as awhole. this game is currently in open beta and as such has some bugs most of wich are negligable. the currency system gives players the ability to buy everything no grind required get your warframe your guns and off you go to be some kinda crazy space ninja. the most importent part of the game however is that if you purchase the high end 200$ bundle your ideas can truely play an ear and major roll in development. some can say thats a bad thing but howmeany opertunitys to you find now a day to actualy controle the content in your persistent world. in closeing the game is majorly focused on co-op not pvp in fact the devs words pvp will go as far as friendly sparing nothing more. i think thats as far as i can stress how awsome this game is and can potentialy be its free you have nothing to lose
BlueCyanide;-;Amazing game. Repetitive but addiciting and fun. Once you've started getting far in the game u are bassicly forced to spend real currency to advance. If money isn't to much of a problem its an amazing game!
FormerlyTheGuy{TPoH};-;Space ninjas with super powers. Also free to play What more do you need?!?
Mini;-;Such a game
ccwofk;-;Great for a free game, constant updates are making it better all the time. I wish the costs of things with in game money were cheaper though.
takeshi_bui;-;really good game mechanics, great community, lots of grinding
THC.BlueDream;-;I great 3rd person shooter. Great feel and look. However, the fact that it takes a REALLY long time to aquier new gear/weps draged me away from this game. Still enjoyable with friends none the less.
Nightlash;-;Really fun and awesome F2P game
SeRg;-;great game smooth and nice gameplay keep hoping open beta will come one day to final version with no bugs!
BananaMuffin;-;An amazing game with very good content, Storyline may not make sense but the game graphics and how the game works is very interesting. People who love to farm will like this game.
Kyoraku;-;One of the better over the shoulder shooters i've played
-DeathOnWingz-;-;This is an addicting Free to Play RPG/FPS with a deverse weapon selection and great matchmaking with hundreds of new people to play with every day.
Jaggermeister;-;Warframe is essentially a grind-fest with fantastic gameplay and visuals. It borrows heavily from Diablo-style loot drops, although none of this is explained in-game. I recommend using a wiki if you fall in love with this game, as it has a suprisingly deep character customization set, though don't expect to get much visual upgrades as most of the "mods" that drop function essentially like a MMO-talent tree. Lots of fun, but bring friends if you plan on sticking around.
Carubs;-;This game is too damn good my god. If you are a F2p Player you can Get plat By doing void missions and selling Prime Parts for Plat. This way makes it possible for free players to earn in game money. Im a f2p player and Have earned over 200 plat so far just by selling Prime Parts. Love this game
Broseidon;-;Warframe is literally the best FTP game out there, and it even beats out most paid games I've played. Warframe does free to play the right way, everything you NEED to play is avaliable by in-game credits or leveling up, the only things you absolutely have to buy are purely cosmetic. All in all, you're a space ninja killing space monsters in space ships with space guns and space swords. Oh, and now you can fly. In space. SPACE ING NINJAS, man. Just... its free. and space ninjas. Literally the one reason I don't have a life.
Vikeo;-;Started playing this game in closed beta, and back then this game was so much less than it it now. Now they add new content every week, make tons of events kinda frequently to keep me in the game. I sometimes just log on to get that Alert-mission reward, or to quickly level up some of my gear, and I always have a fun time doing so. So for me this game is one that I jump in and out from. One week I play all day every day, other weeks I log on to complete Alerts. I like the fluidity of the movement and how it makes me wanna improve it with every new movement tweak. The weapons are kind of standard if you look at them raw, but with mods in this game, it opens a whole new world of damaging your opponents, and they recently did a rework of the whole damage system for Update 11.0 and they addad a whole bunch of new interesting combinations to learn and use. Along with Update 11.0 they also added a Codex to the game. Before this I and alot of other player relied on the Warframe.Wikia page, where we found all the information for pretty much everything. The Codex puts all of this in-game, so no more false Wikia information! Overall a really good and fun game, and it's expanding more and more every week. Also a really interesting game to follow as it's developed further! "Would play." - me
NACHOMILK;-;I've read some of the reviews and im surprised no one has said this, in honest truth deep down its a grind fest you go to 1 planet you get the materials you need and you keep doing it until you have enough over and over again and to top that that off it takes maybe like 20+ hours to get a new warframe if your at least trying i've been playing this game before it was realeased on steam and i finally downloaded it on steam. Anyways you finally craft a new warframe but wait you have to wait another 75 hours for it to be done and you get more materials and you grind again until you get a new warframe and its the same process over and over and over again and then it just gets repetitive, also not to mention the cost of platinum its either xp locked witch is ok or its 200 platinum whitch evens out to be about $5 for $5 i could get a decent game but of course devs got to make money too but 200 platinum only gets you like 1 wep -.- don't get me wrong this is a good looking game and can run on pretty much anything but people are hiding the fact that it truly is a grind.
Blu3Y (Illuminati?);-;I like this game, it got ragdoll physics, nice graphics, awesome moves and other cool stuff. I recommend this to players who like Third Person Shooters and Sci-fi games!
I'm Mr. Spy;-;I get lost in how much time I spend on this game, if you are interested in joining my clan, drop me a message.
BIOSIG;-;This is one of my most played game in my library best game i have ever played, that is free.
bailenrules;-;This is just an amazing game with all sorts of different play styles for everyone. The only thing is that it can get repetitive after a while.
Dkgamer14;-;Superb game...this game is for those pc gamers who want to experience gaming like destiny which is exclusive for console.. same experience but different viewing angle...i like to play this game with my friend and like the missions too..
Jimbles Notronbo;-;>Fighting corpus >"It's the Grineer" 11/10
|RH| Storm;-;robot ninjas in space. what more could you want? 9/10
BIGPARM;-;An awesome game! You can do many  to kill those scrubs. Play with friends to make a  squad and go solo when you are a badass.
Dofke220;-;Graphics: + spectacular effects + nice animations + varied areas + additional physx effects Sound: + rapid music + great weapon sounds + great sound effects - language only english Balance: + warframes and weapons very different + variant warframes work good in team + many missions can be played solo Atmosphere: + outlandish, dark scenario + very fast gameplay, feel like a ninja + own spaceship as base - weak storyline Control: + easy shooter control + good tutorial + basic skills are easy to learn - warframe and weapon function will barely explained Game Size: + many planets and moons + many warframes + big assortmant of weapons and equipment + different mission types + pvp mode - long farming for new equipment - few enemy factions Level Design: + every area has a own flair + outdoor levels + random obstacles - some maps to big (walk to much) - areas repeat a lot Combat System: + fast shooter combat system + enemys hide and attack from flanks + acrobatic moves - fights sometimes to hectic Weapons and Extras: + crazy weapon systems + every warframe has unique specials + many upgrades + combat dog companion - pistoles little bit weak - only a few weapons has a secondary shoot mode Character Creation: You have a choice between 3 Warframes (ninja suit like robot killing machines AKA; YOU). Each warframe is unique in look and abilities. Excalibur, has a slash dash ability and stun ability. The others use stealth and or mob manipulation. This is something I enjoy about the game as well. You are not into a role or other limitations most shooter have. You can still build weapon from sniper to assault rifles. Once you have a character chosen you can modify it's colors on several layers of the warframe suit. F2P are locked in basic color scheme. But there is enough there to get creative. My sword used a nice red and white. To start, you will be happy with what you have. But you will run across some great looking warframes and that alone makes me want to put some money into customize! The Size of costomize is very good for a FPS game. Most games give you uniforms or character choices. Warframe has logical purchases and very nice looks. You can also change colors anytime in the game. Graphics: The animations create that dark space feel. It is not just corridors and tubes. There are open areas, small areas and Hangers. In Warframe, it is unique as well. The creators really developped a mark of it's own. The graphical setting are really unique and make you feel immersed in their world. You are sneaking in every mission, it also adds that "you are alien, and you are here in a wrong place. They could use just a LITTLE MORE interaction. More "living" elements to the game. Some spot feel abandoned or to cold. But all in all, it makes a great battlefield and perfect game setting. Game Play: You start in a planetary system and move along. As a space ninja, you sneak in at the start of each round and are given orders for your mission via com link. Each time you complete a mission the next path opens up. The missions include assassinating a target. Sabatoging the systems. Rescuing a prisoner. etc. One of my favorite things about Warframe is the map change. You can restart the map and it is a new map with new layout. Same mission! This randomization of maps is very nice. The UI is great. I could be assault that shoots and scoots. I could be mele and slash my way through. The UI is logical and makes use of your warframe. It is a compliment you and battle systems. And the other players Warframe builds compliment each other. That is the one word to summarize this game play: "Complimentary". A great shooter. The map progression is nice with a few places to stop and farm. A few bosses to stop and kill. A few events. You will be traveling the universe and looking for places. The leveling system unlocks new potentials and weapons for you. The game is based around Crafting. You can purchase to advance in the game, but over all it is F2P and requires you play and collect parts to CRAFT the items. Once the game takes you. You will be out to collect as many pieces to build as many warframes. There are several other warframes than the starter frames. To play them. You have to collect the blueprints, and then get the materials to craft each piece. This is true for weapons as well. Grouping is fun. Not just another body to zerg content. Some players can be jerks and just run and rush to the end and not care about the team. All in all. This is a great shooter that supports any kind of FPS role. Assault. Pistoler, bow and arrow. Sniper. Sword. Etc. I have not reached the end game, but my only worry is the rate of enhancements vs Content. If it requires all my cards are maxed and I cannot max them until I farm parts in the lower areas. But it seems everything is fine for the moment. The game seems to progress of the F2P and keeps you end gamers busy in crafting every frame and weapon available and testing it and tryoing out combos Sound: Wonderfull! The sound of the material of your suit sliding across the floor. The little "clink" of metal as you roll and your sword smacks the ground. The sounds of bullet casings dropping after firing. The sound of ambient voices and machinery. Economy and Crafting: Standard upgrades come in drops and rewards. They are like cards. You put this card into a slot on your gun. It has 4 rank slots. To increase the ranks you modify the card by FUSING it with other cards. You can purchase base weapons with in game currency as well but they are the base, the better weapons have to be built or purchased with cash. The enhancing of abilities starts to get difficult after 4 to 5 upgrades. I did not notice an auction house... But there is a trade channel... The currency seems balanced at the moment and the deals fare. You buy out right the parts in real cash, or build it yourself. Combos you add to your weapons. Cold + Poison gas = Poison shock. There are so many kinds of damage and effects to test and build, and try out on weapons. Some deal bonus damage to mutants. Others on robots. You can build in laser armor bonus to get resistant against laser fire. This helps with more laser dealing enemys.Or extra ammo builds for survival missions. Overall: I like this game. Rewarding, interesting, beautiful and a great space theme. It is not perfect. Has some unfair drops rates. Social aspect could be better. I would like to see more living elements in the maps. They already are doing a sort of base building and PvP structure... Sorry for my bad english. This is my review account, because the low playtime. Thanks for reading! If you Like my Review, give me a Thumbs up in Steam. Your help is greatly appreciated :)
Yasurra;-;Warframe is the most Badass game ever invented by mankind, it features cybernetic robot ninjas with epic weapons. In Warframe you are a rare species called the Tenno who have been in cryosleep for a long period of time, and during this time new factions have been built and are fighting conquests all over the galaxy. As a teeno you must go through each planet node and do each objective to weaken the enemy factions. The combo system is amazing and it only gets better once you find the Warframe that suits you the most. The graphics will most likely give you epilepsy and you won't be able to see due to the lights and motion blur distorting your vision. The free-to-play model used in this game gives no player advantage however this does not really matter due to the lacking pvp in the game itself. Overall Warframe is a good game however you may experience alot of grinding and replaying mission 7/10
ZCC Zombie Chicken;-;Warframe is a cooperative Third Person Shooter which involves a strange blend of melee combat, shooting, and parkour. There, now that we've gotten the standards out of the way, Warframe is a good game, good meaning that it has its pros and it's cons. When it comes to pros, the graphics quality is amazing for a Free-To-Play game, everything stays moderately difficult (and even harder if you play like you're supposed to, you know, 2 or 3 friends all starting at the same time), and the parkour system is very smooth and easy to use, even for new TPS players. Since the last time I reviewed this game, it has changed greatly. Whereas before I was too scared to make a new weapon due to credit and resource restrictions, I've found that resources are much more common in most cases, so I've been free to experiment with guns and find the ones I like. (Latron I love ya baby.) Now I have a set of cleavers, two hammers, a machine gun, rifle, shotgun, several swords, and the list goes on. The best part about this, though, is that, since credits are more easily achievable now, I've been able to experiment without fear of losing much. Also, the way you earn warframes has also changed much. Whereas before, there was a chance that it may or may not spawn once every 5th moon after you've sacrificed your firstborn, now you're guaranteed to get a frame part after fighting the boss that drops them, so I've actually coughed up some plat and now have six warframes, all of which provide an incredible spin on gameplay, forcing you to change your playstyle for each frame. Of course, I've got a favorite, (Nyx I love ya baby.) but each frame is a refreshing take on the game that renews it completely. To continue, the levels are now actually changed. The levels change style depending on who's in control of the planet. Of course, if you play the same planet alot, then you may begin to notice that the levels are the same, but that can be expected of any game. However, it can still be a tad grindy at times, and several of my friends found the beginning of the game too hard a hurdle for them and quit early on due to the upper levels carrying them through the low levels and making the game boring for them, so if you're going to enjoy this game, it's a NECESSITY that you don't play public matchmaking. Players tend to rush through the levels and not allow the lowers to really enjoy the game or even get a kill, for that matter. If you're going to play, you either need to play by yourself or with friends. I Recommend this game, (Provided you've got some friends to play this with.) Zombie Chicken
UNKNOWN;-;'' Oh hey there Mister Grineer, how are you doing? Oh thats good, yes, i've had a good day y'know just killin' fools. Been turning them into some mince beef, yeah, so... well... i hope you dont mind but my Valkyr is a bit low on health and you are shooting me so, um, nice knowing you '' ----48 Hours Later---- '' Hello Miss, are you the wife of Mister Grineer? '' '' Why yes I am, how come you ask? Is he ok? '' '' Well, im regret to inform you that there was a Tenno attack the other day at his post. He didnt make it, im sorry. '' *Crying from Miss Grineer* '' Well, I didnt really like him anyway. Do you want to come in Officer? I've just boiled the kettle for some coffee. '' '' Oh, how kind of you. --- Well we all know what happens next, anyway, Chopping fools with a 7 foot sword and mangled body parts. 8.9/10 If you want to join my clan add 'TheGreatWhiteTigger' or join 'ScaledHornet'
Fabulore;-;I can not believe that this game is for free and its in beta stage it has so much to offer i can not wait till it is fully finished
Sp;-;Farming the first level for stuff, alone of course. Oh how lonely I am... *Sniff *Sniff I would describe this game as: Loner Simulator
Lady_Exorcist;-;this game's graphic is so cool
OxY;-;god game but hard to control
PepeLePoney;-;Really nice game Really beautiful graphic And a lot of fun to play with friends ;D
QuantumPredator;-;So Good, and free!
Joontfish;-;Warframe is a great game you can pick up and put down as you have time to play it. It requires a lot of grinding type play, but the rewards are easily achievable. You are not required to purchase platinum, but it is useful if you have a few dollars to spend. The community is friendly and are usually happy to help new players get into the game.
Feed_mee_more;-;holly 1584 hours , still can play it for ever , u never get bored always have something to do , download it now before tomorow , realy awsome game.
Inuichi;-;For a Free to Play, multi-player game, Warframe does an excellent job of avoiding the pitfalls of most of the free-to-play genre. You can navigate and play the game to your hearts content without having to buy anything at all with real money, and if you want, even earn the in game monetary currency just by playing the game and trading your loot. And this is before we even get to the great gameplay, with all sorts of various frames you can build and play as! Highly recommend anyone i know at least give this game a shot. Use a referral code like this one: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=5168ef4c1a4d800214000026 and you start off with some stuff to get you through the early game a bit faster, probably the only part i'd say was slow moving at all. The rest is fast paced, ninja running, shooting action!
deezypharell;-;A great game.. free to play a what a price
Meridia's Bacon;-;A quality F2P game. Graphics are great, the servers are well-populated and (mostly) well-maintained, and it's a ton of fun--if you're into grinding for resources. You don't HAVE to spend money, but if you want more weapon/item slots in your inventory, you may want to buy some platinum (in-game currency). The community is very friendly, as well. Never had a negative experience with another player. Solid 7.5-8/10
Seiga~;-;This game has been one of my favourites since I had joined its Closed Beta. I love this game to death simply because of the many things that make it something - something which brings the sense of awe back to me when I first played a 4-mandungeon hack/slash game for the first time except this time it was a 4-man-third-person-shooter-intergalactic-slaughterfest-of-supposedly-superior-factions-which-we-know-bow-down-to-us-on-their-knees-by-space-ing-ninjas: The game mechanics are simple but it is difficult to master a weapon/warframe. The fine tweaking and use of modifications and augmentations allow freedom in creating a weapon/warframe that is limitless in power. Basic gameplay mechanics such as freerunning/parkour and shooting whilist doing so are also things which are easy to perform but hard to do with ease unless practice comes into play. The interactive community and the fruitful response from the developers of the games: it is definitely pleasurable to see the developers interacting with its community through devstreams and events, even threads in the forums. As anyone reads this  review, the devs are working on reworking some bosses whilist adding new content into the game. The community you meet in-game is quite interactive, and very helpful in regards to educating new players in regards to tips and assistance in getting better at the game. Indeed, some would label this game as pay-to-win, and I can understand that suchslander to be used in this game. But to be good at this game, it depends on how you build your Warframe and their weapons, not what you buy with the in-game currency that you cash your real life money into.
Spiko;-;Intergalactic space ninjas versus robot people, zombies, and IT'S THE GRINEER.
Tumbleweed.exe;-;Well Your a Person in a suits called WarFrames Each WarFrame has its own set of abilities I go With Loki It can Go invisible to get past security and can Switch Places With the Enemy So the enemy Is confused As you could probally tell from the warframe picture it has guns and what every person needs to spill blood a Sword which can be upgraded and you can get different melee weps mostly swords but there are power gloves that can be purchased which allow you to Pack a Punch(Get it gloves and punching Huh huh Anybody?) Any way download it it's free
Myr;-;nice and adictive gameplay but repetitive, weak background story, nice setting
Osvega;-;Warframe is one of the Best games I have ever played! Beautiful graphics, awesome Coop Third-person gameplay and FREE TO PLAY!!! Get it now, No questions asked!
Leo;-;Veteran Warframe player here. This game is very fun to play with friends however becomes dull very quickly if you're playing alone. The game itself has great graphics and controls however the gameplay grows dull as the maps are generated using a tile system and you'll see yourself fighting the same enemies. However this is made up by the vast amount of weapons in the game as well as the damage rework that the staff did. The staff really listen to the community and try to respond to the best of their ability. I would say that Warframe has one of the best staff for not only listening and responding to the community but also doing livestreams and giving away Platinum. Platinum is Warframes in-game currency that can only be bought with real world currency, as expected from a f2p game. However there are little to no paywalls in this game. For me, I didn't have to spend any money on this game however the only aspect that I would count a paywall is the limitation on slots for weapons and warframes (the suits). You are given free platinum when creating an account which can be spent on buying slots for more weapons and warframes however once you start spending more time and creating more items you'll see yourself running out of space. This game however is a f2p game and getting hundred's of hours out of it is worth spending money on. In all however you start to see yourself just grind for weapons, materials, and levels through the same tiles over an over again so the game becomes very dull and boring which is why I recommend playing this game with friends as well as to treat this game as something you would just play casually.
Skinless;-;Its grinding a lot of grinding but it's CYBER NINJA GRINDING.
Ozt;-;Alien space ninjas cruise around the universe crashing parties and saving hostages. It's good.
C A K E B O Y Z;-;Closed Beta player here. Warframe is an excellent action TPS about, well, space ninjas. The gameplay is great and its aesthetics have improved a lot. With an unique art style and fun, fast paced gameplay, this F2P game is fantastic and you should try it out. (What's there to lose?) Don't worry about "pay to win" as there is really nearly nothing you can get with paid currency that you can't get through playing.
KpnKale;-;Space ninjas! I could stop my recommendation there, however there is more! It's free and beautiful. The land scape, ship design and detail are amazing. This is a great hack and slash third person game that atleast deserves a try.
Hitsugaya - Frozen Wasteland;-;I found this game difficult to understand at first but as soon as you complete the tutorial it all just fits perfectly in place
badboybuddy;-;best game i have played in ages always keeps you sucked in
Jonnothin;-;Great game. Though I know of a few people who would really enjoy it better with a controller. I can manage with a keyboard. 5 button mouse also helps, but try it for yourself it is free after all. Almost everything is obtainable by playing. The only thing that's not is colors (for warframe and weapons and sometimes they give you free ones), warframe slots and weapon slots. These can be purchased with platinum, the premium resource. You get 2 warframe slots and I think 5 or 6 weapon slots. You get random daily rewards which include coupons for platinum up to 75% off. So if you wait you can get a decent amount of platinum for a few dollars. My only complaints would be: 1. that you need certain mods to continue. These are upgrades for your weapons and warframes that can buff just about everything. You really need a damage mod to continue past Venus and most should be able to get this by playing survival or defense missions which give you a good variety. 2. They make you choose a warframe before you know what you want. So here's what I recommend. If you like being stealthy and are good at avoiding damage pick Loki. If you want a balanced and tough warframe pick Excalibur. If you like being a caster and are good at avoiding damage pick Mag. For more detailed information on the warframes and everything else for that matter, search for warframe wiki. The link is warframe.wikia.com. Some games that might be a good measurement of your skills for comparison are: devil may cry series (but especially 1 and 2) and Gears of war series (especially the ones with horde). The game isn't that hard to start with, but it does get harder later.
elluuhnn;-;Really fun once you learn the basics. May seem very confusingat first but otherwise its great! There are also a couple of bugs and the game crashes sometimes, but that is fixed in the regular updates.
[MNI] Sandro;-;Good game for free to play with fun and interesting combat and teamplay but it has several severe flaws which are that it has a bad payment model, things are overpriced and you are required to buy more slots for warframes and weapons i u want more then two. Secondly the game becomes very repeatitive and there is not very much metagame. The last thing is that it is very difficult to get interested in this game starting off due to its repeativeness.
morejoeridi;-;Warframe has a few quirks here and there but you should not just give this a glance. Invest at least a good hour and you'll form a new passion to the free-to-play lifestyle 8.5/10
Bobbert The Lemon;-;This game is an example of free to play done (mostly) right, which is very rare. You, a member of the Tenno race, are equiped with suits known as Warframes, each with unique stats and powers. It is your mission to aid in the war between the Tenno, Grineer, Corpus, and Infested. Admitadly, the game plays like a standard third person shooter, where it really shines is all of the different weapons and mods just waiting to be discovered, like Bows to assault rifles, Health increases to abilities. It's not without it's problems, though. The game is LITTERED with microtransactions, and while optional, grinding isn't fun unless you have friends. Oh yeah, this game has a standard 4 player co-op system too, which it is usually designed around. Overall, I would suggest getting this game with a very open mindset.
Tulip O'Hare;-;Despite my username and avatar, I don't go in much for FPSs. I still LOVE this game. It's a lot like Mass Effect multiplayer, with the addition of martial arts flick acrobatics. Good balance so far in the freemium aspects -- new equipment comes along fast enough (particularly when playing with friends) that I don't feel screwed by not paying money for it. Looking forward to how this game develops over time.
Breezy;-;the game is very fun and runs good on most computers in all i really enjoyed the game and you should too. the bugs you may find are never to serious and yet some of them are funnt.
HexxenHammer;-;Best game ever! Totally hooked! :D
DiazWaffleCrab[PWI];-;I can not openly recommend this game to anyone, not with the problems the game still has, Some of the worst connectivity issues i have seen in an online game, terrible physics issues, and even worse, terrible UI issues. If I were to give this game a rating, as it is now, i would give it a 3,5/10. But it has a potential for a lot more, so despite hating all the problems, i am going to look where this thing goes, Most importantly, If you are reading this, you are doing it wrong, dont read recommendations or meta scores on F2P games, make the decision yourself.
hydro;-;One of my favorite Co-Op games on steam. Having a friend to go into this with you, is a must. Great game, especially for the fact that it is free. 5/5 must play free game.
GTO;-;Very fun
squid kid;-;The game is really fun if you have the patience to wait 2 days or so to build new things. Or, if you have money, you can buy them off the market.
Cribby the Fish;-;It is amazing, it may not seem like it at first but if you get a friend or two it becomes the best co-op game ive ever played.
BlueeyesWhiteDragon;-;There is a bit of a learning curve with Warframe, but just push through the first 10 hours or so and you'll find an incredibly addicting experience. If you like 3rd person shooters and the sci-fi genre, or just blowing things up, I highly recommend you give it a look.
-Baby-Skeletor[LpOol]-;-;Do you like war? Do you like frames? Well, in Frame Maker 2015 awesome mega ultra edition, you'll be making all the picture frames you could ever want, then you can fill them with war pictures, but nothing else. Picture frame weekly said 'Exebeastingtastic fun for just you, not the family!' I've stolen this quote.com said ''Exebeastingtastic fun for just you, not the family! Last time I played this is was good fun, so I'm trying it again. WooT wOOt!
xMilkyChocolate;-;It's ok. After the first 1600 hours of grinding through you start to wonder if other games should be played instead. Not to say Warframe is a bad game, But I spent probably 500$ total on the game, and played the same levels 1000 times over. It's essentially the coolest character customization and power based game I've ever played. With a very high skill cap and Timed waiting (build times for everything some reach up to 3 days) to get to late game content (unless you have some money). With the downfall of having sub par repeating "tileset" based levels. The idea of it is ok, and will not become repetitive until about 100 hours in max. But overall this is what you can expect from warframe. Pros -Amazing easy to do indepth character customization -Large amount of weapons -Large variety of weapons (seriously there's a freeze gun in this) -Solid upgrade/leveling system. -Fun and epic character abilities -Easy to play with friends -Active community forums (Devs will read posts in forums to help improve the game) -Detailed and informative wiki page -Updates from devs via stream -Everything non asthetic is available to get with in-game currency Cons -Long wait times for items (e.g guns, warframes, keys, blueprints) to build (with the exception of real money to rush it) -Repetitive levels. (you'll play the same level you did on the first planet, as you will on the last planet with the exception of higher level enemies) -Not pay to win, but if you want to look cool in anyway, you're going to be paying for platnium (paid currency) -Very Grindy (seriously if you don't like grind games look somewhere else) -Poor PVP balancing and gameplay Overall, it's worth downloading and checking out. I have been playing since patch 2.0 (almost 3 years ago) and I think this game has the potential to be AAA status if they remake the map and planet system.
Mischaka;-;One of the best free to play games i have ever played!
TRYHARDMAX;-;whatever mother er, game's good like fothermucker
pookie;-;Very fun, for anyone with any playstyle. Don't have many hours because play it on PS4. c:
HUmar;-;If you like a good CO-OP game that is updated and improved often, this is the game to play! The best of it all, it is free! 10/10
Wozzernux;-;2385hrs spent on this game so far and loving it, waiting for Update 14 to hit!
Ghazter;-;Space Ninjas in Exoskeleton Suits...in Space! Need I say more?
Stormhill;-;Warframe is the all-time best Free-to-Play game ive ever played, and probably rhe best all around PC game aswell
Ceranoe;-;great game but i hate the fact that if you die 4 times you have to wait a day or pay money. that is the stupidest excuse for a quick buck.
Kromblite;-;I am a space ninja pirate. Ten out of Tenno.
karizma-;-;Very fun game when you play with friends. Lots of farming you have to do if you wanna get better weapons and other characters to play. Other than that the game still needs more work but it is overall a fun game
RivalAzazel;-;Warframe is amazing the development team aswell are amazing people and hardworkers always pushing new updates out.
Teepo/Expelz;-;Your basically a space ninja.....why not play? :)
Rezzy;-;Game with guns and stuff, blow  up 12/10
Karll;-;Mechanically enhanced space ninjas with guns.... sounds weird but, works out perfectly.
Rocketmango;-;Super Teenage Mutant Ninja Master Chief's
BrightScyde;-;Warframe is a great way of playing some F2P 3rd person shooter action. Warframe is still in beta, and it seems that the devs are happy to take on board advice from the fans, so hopefully a few of the details that could use polish still have a chance to be completed. With the price of entry a flat nothing, it would be a shame to miss out on quite a bit of fun to be had here.
Roxerg;-;SPACE ROBOT MAGIC NINJA WARRIORS FIGHT POTATO PEOPLE, EVIL ROBOTS AND ZOMBIE PLANTS. And it's amazing as . You should totally buy it. Except it's free. You can buy wepons for irl  but it's PvE so  off. Also game is grind-based (but i mean you kill  and it's awesome so it's not bad grind ok?) so if you buy  you want then why are you even playing.
jasonsharp1985;-;brilliant, great design and a must for anyone. also free :)
Korriban;-;Good co-op 3rd person shooter. Graphic is good enough for a free to play game. Game's mechanic is a bit hard to learn, but you'll get the hang of it soon enough. The action during missions is often fast paced and some of them are a real challenge. I would eecommend this game to those who like dead space mixed with some mmorpg mechanics (farming loot, craft better equip, etc.) Not recommended for those who dislike farming and crafting
Kalvart;-;Very fun and entertaining.
Zaihum;-;Wanna be a badass futuristic shooter ninja, runing on walls, sliding on the floor with a mix of magic ? Don't even think twice, it's free and awesome !
PurpleJoker;-;Its a pretty good game , but gets a bit repetitive and the level designs of the first two worlds seem to be quite similar. The ninja movement is quite fun to experiment with , as their isnt really any tutorial to tell you each individual jump. Either way this is a good game to play with others or even on your own. I recommend this game to anyone whos into ninja mechanics and tps'.
EGI5;-;Is a fun game cool MMORPG try play it, it's FREE!
Darcho;-;A free to play gem. Pros: Great action, art style (not for everyone), and gameplay Drop in drop out co-op (PvP in early stages via Concalves and Dojo Dueling) Interesting advancing mechanism with mod-cards And a great community (mileage may vary) to top it all off Cons: Does get a bit repetitive RNG based rewards can be frustrating Some bugs prop up here and there with new updates
Lady Kai;-;Love this game, if you want combat that isn't just mindless and to get to the next level to end the game then this game is for you. Loads of different missions to enjoy on mulitple maps and loads of different skill combinations to destroy the ever hardening enemies. Like to craft weapons and research them too, it's got it all in your dojo. Test your skills with the rank up system lets find out if you really have mastered your sidearm. Game mode survival is very fun, every new wave of enemies is harder than the last, got to upgrade your mods and weapons to keep the fighting going or you become the ever favourite squishy. Love this game totally 10/10 even better with friends :D
DragonSlayer;-;haha a very funy shooter to play multiplayer XD
Sauturos;-;This game is very promising. A beginner's guide would help; after the initial training session I was taken to a big overview mapmenu with basically no information on how to navigate it/what to do.
=7Cav=PVT.Pauls.M;-;One of the best Free to Play Game ive ever seen.. Bit boring when things get repetitive, BUT when you do missions with a team, its good fun! Amazing graphics, stunning animations and skillset effects. Plus, you cant go wrong.. its free!
DovahPete;-;Sick game :P
MunkyMeat;-;More fun than a fat girl and a tub of crisco. I recommend that anyone who loves FPS's and MMO's give this a try.
EvilRussianBear;-;Warframe Review. Level: Space Comrade Ninja Bunnies One of the most interesting projects of 2013 that flowed into 2014 that I've seen. The game has all what a gamer needs. Guns, fancy karate gimmicks, swords. Two words: Space Ninjas. What is actually good that the game even tho is F2P but it does not follow a shadowy P2W path. You might be confused in the beggining, as getting the stuff, crafting, locations and controls. But when you get over it, you might as well like it. Another aspect that drives the attention. Constant new content updates from very friendly Developers. I might add that DEVs do take in considiration players ideas and implement ideas and throughts into a real thing. Almost all the stuff ingame can be aqquired just by playing the game, you just need to get over the beggining. BUT this game is still in beta. There could be bugs, there could be flaws. Currently DEVs implement tons of content every two months (aprox). In general this is a game that you might totally like or just play for two minutes and uninstall. Playing with friends is recomended.
Jihadi Jeff;-;better then destiny LOL
Futurism;-;I just ordered a steelseries gamepad specifically for this game. With that being said, time to get back on the grind.
[JP(   |||) ice lemon;-;Hi everyone played warframe before. This is my first time play it,after i spenting much of time viewing it.The conclusion can be made as nice graphic such as enenmy ,ruined place and much more many ,yet i will recommends to you all
Harley Quinn;-;This in greatest game ever for me :3
CrazyNerd;-;When I played it at my freinds house, it was a great game. But every time I try to run it on my computer it pops up with a message saying "update of directX failed" and wont let me play.
CrowLegacy;-;best Free 2 play games
Cineck;-;This game has come a long way since its release. Wow. So much content! I am a bit overwhelmed but I love it!
Nunderwater;-;Farmframe is a very farmy game that allows you to collect all kind of materials to craft new weapons, for which you'll need to farm more XP to level up. With your brand new leveled up weapons, you will be set to farm a few more materiales to repeat the proccess! Truly an amazing experience.
ArcoTheOshawott;-;Ninjas in space, good game, nothing bad to say.
Nex;-;This game is very in-depth, it starts off really slow and boring. But if you have a friend that has played alot and can help you, then it is a much more enjoyable game.
Trogdor;-;Pretty much an awesome game if you actually stick around and play and level up your character
9ush did B/11;-;Great Sci-fi RP game, Awsome in game mechanics that make the game much smoother. Frequet patches to ensure players get the best outcome out of the game possible
sirieous;-;How to grind through the early levels: 1) Get an overpowered high level friend 2) Tell him what Warframe you wish to farm 3) Get on those maps to get the pieces 4) Let him do all the work 5) Stand in a corner with your melee out and hold right click Rinse and repeat.
Cyberzerg;-;Amazing game with both Co-Op elements, solo and farming, with space for different playstyles which makes the game awesome to play with friends and others from across the world, and compared to other games with these elements they lack alot of customizations which is splendid to see, the only thing the game needs i just more weaponry and i know its beta and i know more items are coming soon and more warframes so keep it up this is compared to many AAA Games a very incredible game
J.;-;I've spent more money on this free-to-play game than I care to admit. #Worth. I am a friggin' space ninja with my own space ship and space dog and we do cool things...in space. Need I say more?
Hit-Monkey[MCM];-;SPACE NINJAS! Whatmore can you ask for?!
Konga;-;Best game 20/10, would fap again
Beefman110;-;this si a great game seriously get
Revolver Bossalot;-;I have two accounts with 400+ hours on both of them. Fairly solid game. Gets incredibly repetative. Some community members make runs a pain due to lack of experience. Just run ahead of them and kill all of the things and make them feel slow. Once you get the wall run/jump thing down, you will be flying through levels.
g6x8h12;-;At last! What a game!!!!!!!!! Fealing like I'm not going to play any other than Warframe lol AWSOME GRAPHICS AND VISUALL EFECTS!!
BoneBear;-;Extremely amazing game. As well as the fact it is somewhat a sequal to the game "dark sector" which i love so much. Edit: If your really willing to donate the time, you don't absolutely have to spend money. Grind, grind, grind some moar, then get that shiny new Excal prime you always wanted....oh wait.
El Muchacho;-;always wanted to be a ninja
DVAted;-;Best, most steadily updated, upgraded, improved and expanded game I've ever played. The Developers really do take a lot of input from the fans, the world they've built has no equal and the customization is absolutely insane. Not to mention that the gameplay itself, with free-running movement, slicing, smacking, whipping and stabbing with everything melee and all the projectile and laser weapons you can imagine. Activity always builds up more around the (very often and awesome) events, but it hahs enough content to keep you busy for months. I've been playing since March 2013, and I'm not considering uninstalling it in the near or far future. 10/10
Niteowl33;-;This game is grindy as crap. I can't tell you how many times I've gotten a new weapon to find I need that one hard to get resource. Most of the time I would yell "FUUUUUUUUUUUUU!" to the gods. In this game I've never done that. DE has somehow found a way to make grinding fun. That's all I have to say.
Terekyestur;-;Very fun game but sometimes the map is confusing o.o
Sweetdelete;-;BEST FREE TO PLAY EVER! In-game purchases? YES! Buuuuuuuut.... Platinum is the currency you get when you buy for real money. All War-frames are up to sale for real money, but you can also get them by doing various missions. When you are crafting weapons, you can press "Rush" and pay with your Platinum. Some of the thing you can't get without platinum is weapon and warframe slots and some colour palettes. So, basically, you're buying time when using Platinum in Warframe. PLAY THIS GAME! With friends!
dragonight1993;-;omg his game is so much fun.
SaumusThe3rd;-;Pros: -Spectacular graphics -Fast paced, really feel like a space ninja -Voice acting -Great sound effects -Great music -Lots of content to explore, would take a while to complete everything -Each warframe is unique in abilities and in looks -Great community, very friendly -Good AI -PvP feature Cons: -Weak story -Can become very repetitive -Borders on becoming a freemium game (though isn't) -Grindy, very grindy (which to some is a good thing) -Some maps are just wayyyyy to big -few enemy factions Summary: If you like grinding, this game is for you, and is definitely worth at least trying out, even if you're a little skeptical if you'll like it or not.
Sketch McArthur;-;Like Destiny but good
Toast Ghost;-;i cant get enough of this game its so fun i mean kudos to de for this game i hated dark ectors gameplay wise but hayden was cool looking anyways kudos de oh and if you want to still have a life dont play this game hahaha just kidding play it it is beast
DelusionalRon;-;top notch create graphics fun community and over all a dam good game if you like gears of war or anything similiar id recommend this jam
LordAjei;-;Started playing this game two days ago, and has been running smoothly so far. The co-op gameplay is really impressive and fun to play. There's always the option to get into a mission by yourself and hope that people are going to join you, but some missions aren't well-balanced for solo play. The graphics of the game is okay and most critically, there's no lag or ping display anywhere. There's a good variety of guns to choose from, including really powerful bows that can pin enemies against the wall, I think the swordsman archetype was a little overplayed, the melee combat here is also satisfyingly weighty. Charged attacks that can cut enemies clean in half are their own reward. One of Warframe's significant issues at the moment is its failure to display important information, especially in the mission-select interface, other than that the game was pretty well made and I will recommend this game to all who are looking for some fun in co-op gameplays.
Griffator;-;This game is a great mixture of third person shooter, sci-fi, and ninja all bundled up into one great free-to-play game. Has great variation of enemies and is loads of fun with friends. I highly recommend this game to anyone especially if you like third-person shooters and the
s[K]aRe[K]rOw;-;This game is amazing! I haven't played it for long, but, I spent a good amount of time trying it out for the first time. May I say... BRAVO! Jumping around in a space ninja suit is awesome... Choose your playstyle! Stealthy or plain Rambo, this game allows either! Smooth interface, incredible graphics, an immersive selection of mulitplayer and solo missions... And extremely satisfying mechanics! The only way you can be disappointed is if you don't have a good enough PC! This game is flat out amazing! The best part... All of this for free!
BoboTheClown;-;warfame is an AWSOME game i love it...its a very good game.....my preference is first person shooters but this game is a great exception this game maes it not even matter it is so awsome......sadly for me i do not like how u have to pay for more charecters or craft them which takes forever but besides thatfact the charecters are well balenced and it is a great game
NekoArtist;-;Suggest you play this game if you like violence, shooting, 3rd person and sci-fi :D. Really good and free to play, unless you want to buy platnium.
James/Durp;-;I have a ton of hours put into this game. The question is, was it worth it? The answer is yes. I enjoy this game. It is a free to play game aswell. Ive spent over $200 on just in game purchases. I reccomend this to anyone who wants a switch up to a game that is a 3rd person shooter with space ninjas.
Edmond;-;Awesome gaming! Very exciting and addictive! Once you had started it, you won't be able to stop playing! Reminds me of Metal Gear Revengeance....you can run on walls like a ninja. Fast and swift sword play with lots of blood and gore! It is superb and simply awesome! Use a Xbox controller to play with this game will be even awesome! The best online gaming ever!
arachnid8219;-;Bloody fun game..the game and infected remind me alot of halo in ways and i love that game, ya dont have to pay to get the good stuff either...its just faster and easier to then waiting for event rewards or ya can sell items people want to get whats called platnum ...ingame currency thats obtained by spending money for many things i personally reccoment this to anyone wh dosnt mind a grind with a similar feeling to halo in some ways
Beauty;-;My all time favorite game! I would recommend for anyone and everyone to play it! It's fast paced and fun. Every update adds something amazing and the combat is beautiful. Every Warframe is wonderful and unique in their own way. When you get on a team with other Warframes the magic you can create is beautiful! Getting Platinum (a currency you CAN pay for) can be obtained in different ways without having to spend money which i find wonderful considering it allows players to create their own little economy. One of the all time best free to play games I have ever played. I mean, c'mon, space ninjas.
Shinnieshan;-;Pros: Free to play. Great graphics. Great voice acting. Great gameplay. Lots of content. Challenging. Constantly updated. Lots of customisation. And more. Cons: 151.0 hrs last two weeks / 759.9 hrs on record Can be a wee bit repeditive.
Toy Maverick;-;I'll be honest; I love this game, love it to pieces. You on the other hand may have a very different opinion. I would normally say to do a lot of in-depth research before making a commitment to any MMO, but considering Warframe is free, I would say that all you need is a light brush over of what the, in my opinion, pros and cons of Warframe are before trying it yourself. PROS: -FREE -Very Intense action -Addictive -Very immersive for a 3rd person game -BEUTIFUL atmosphere and world design with decent graphics -Interesting lore that is slowly revealed by community events and progression -Very good administrative team -Updates on a regular basis -Great customization of your arsenal -Everything necessary to the experience can be done without in-game currency (platinum) -Runs very smoothly even on the lowest end computers -Very helpful and friendly community -Trading system (you can even trade for in-game currency) -Not pay-to-win CONS: -Not friendly to the impatient (Long wait times for crafting, slow progression) -Very repetitive/Grind-y (missions are clones of each-other with different graphics or gimmicks thrown in) -Big pay wall as far as anything not essential to the experiance (vanity, exp multipliers, Credit boosts, Faster crafting etc.) -Buggy as all hell -Default settings are awful (motion blur... MOTION BLUR!!!!! D:) -Balancing is off (as far as weapons) These are, as far as I can tell, the major pros and cons of Warframe. In conclusion, Warframe is a very satisfying and addictive game for those who are into fast-paced action that makes you feel like a complete badass. And although it is not essential, I would suggest laying down about 20 or 40 bucks (or your regional equivalent) just for convenience sake. But please, before putting any money down, play the game for at least a day or two just to evaluate whether it is something you would truly enjoy. Thanks for reading, I hope this was helpful.
TwitchHitbox.tv/osnugglebunnyo;-;fun game to chill and play with a couple buddies
Harvey and his rabbit;-;what can i say one of the best free2play games ive come across scince star trek online it has imo AAA graphics which seems to be very well optimized.I will admit i havent played fro long but i would say try it as its free.if you like sci fi and manga style battle suits you will love this.
Korsoleeo2;-;This game is great. I would give it a 9/10. They only thing bad about it is that it is a lot more fun when you play with a friend via Skype. But other than that the graphics are great, very kind community, no lag (unless you have a bad pc) and just a lot of fun overall.
redgroove;-;Fires seven beams of continuous biochemical energy which instantly corrode any surface they contact. The Phage is an Infested Shotgun researched in the Clan Bio Lab, with prerequisite being Mutagen Mass Research. It requires a Mastery Rank of 6 to build, and comes with one - (Dash) polarity slot. Note that its damage is Viral, not Corrosive as the description implies. As the Codex description says, it fires seven tentacle-iike beams in a wide spread, which move toward the center when you zoom. There will always be a central beam, while the others are emitted from glowing "fingers," three on each side of the weapon's front. Without focusing, targets to the side of the spread actually get hit by more beams. When focused, the resultant cluster of beams is about the size of your Warframe's head. Not pinpoint accurate, but enough to land headshots on Grineer. The reload is quite... unique. The weapon's "fingers" wriggle and it makes something akin to purring while you reload. Weapon Mechanics The Phage uses ammo very slowly. I'd estimate it at one ammo per second of continuous fire. That makes it more efficient than other continuous weapons, though the decreased rate of shotgun ammo drop balances it out. Its focus can be tweaked depending on what you're up against - rarely do you want to fire the gun unfocused. Holding down the trigger lets you keep the current focus level without zooming in. Interrupting your fire in any way will unfocus the Phage. This means landing after a jump, getting knocked down, etc. I found that you can walk off small steps without interrupting the fire, so it's not that bad. I prefer leaving it at a semi-focused wider cone of fire instead of the fully focused setting in most cases, so I can sweep hallways and take out light units. It feels like a hybrid between the Ignis and the Synapse - not as good as either in their optimal roles, but very versatile. The focus is a big issue for most users. It will take time to get used to. Despite being a shotgun, my personal tests (using Vay Hek as a target) haven't resulted in any damage dropoff over range. However, this weapon is designed for closer range combat than the Synapse - the slight spread of the beams at max focus means that you can't land full-damage hits on small moving targets at range. Weapon Build The Phage is a slower-killing weapon because of its focus time. I would recommend a potato if you intend to use it as an actual primary. It has a long delay before the spread approaches usable levels. This is my build, no Forma. Point Blank boosts base damage. Hell's Chamber adds additional beams to the Phage - at max rank, each "finger" will have an additional beam. If you have them, Blaze and Accelerated Blast. Fire rate boosts rate of ammo consumption on continuous weapons, but also increases damage. Add an elemental mod that fits in the Dash (-) polarity slot before adding on Hell's Chamber, because it'll boost damage more efficiently. Toxic Barrage - I'm low on Forma, and this is more efficient than other elemental mod for damage. Vicious Spread increases the initial spread of the beams. It does not slow down the focus time of the Phage, and increases damage. Since its unfocused mode is awkward anyway, go for it. Builds Thanks to /u/MonkRag for writing up elemental optimizations for factions. I usually don't bother changing loadouts at all, so I'm pretty bad when it comes to maxing out damage. Point Blank, Hell's Chamber, Blaze, and Accelerated Blast are staples of a shotgun build. Accelerated's Puncture damage is calculated like elemental damage, and its fire rate is good on any gun besides the Tigris. Vicious Spread is also pretty good, for reasons I mentioned above. Tainted Shell cuts down on the Phage's initial spread, but also IMMENSELY impacts weapon damage output, and is a very expensive mod to max. I do not personally recommend this mod - making the beams narrow enough to be functional will also reduce damage output by 50% or more. Grineer: Radiation - Viral damage has a 75% bonus against Grineer Flesh, and Radiation has a 75% bonus against Alloy armor, which Grineer Heavies use. Blaze + Charged Shell + Incendiary Coat. Corpus: Magnetic damage rips through shields. Chilling Grasp + Charged Shell. Put these mods before Blaze so the Fire damage doesn't try to combine with anything. Void: Corrosive + Cold makes short work of shields as well as Heavy Gunners. Toxic Barrage + Charged Shell + Chilling Grasp, add Contagious Spread if you didn't get Tainted/Vicious Spread. Infested: Gas balances out the Viral penalty, and the Phage's spread takes out Light Infested easily. Contagious Spread + Blaze + Incendiary Coat. Seeking Force may be useful, as it'll basically be a beam-shooting Ignis at half focus. However, its main strength is very high damage output without burning through your ammo too quickly. In Conclusion I'm preferential to Infested weapons and shotguns, so this may be a bit biased. I love versatility in a weapon, and not just the "one size fits all" method. The Phage's damage spread control is amazingly fun, letting me clear mobs of mooks as well as that Napalm standing in the doorway. I wish it didn't unfocus instantly though. This thread on the Warframe forums got a dev comment, and they are looking into possibly changing the way the unfocus works. That said, it is not a shotgun as much as it is a jack-of-all-trades continuous weapon. Despite its high damage output, the long focus time means that when you're using the Phage, you can't take out a higher-level threat instantly, which might get you killed instead. When I'm talking about higher-level threat, I'm talking about things that a potatoed Soma has trouble with. This is not a "must-potato" weapon. If you like it, it will certainly deserve a potato though. It's a viable alternative to the more standard endgame primaries, offering more variety without causing power creep. With ~65 mod points to play with, I can take out level 15-20 Corpus in a few seconds without focusing. It's strong, and feels fun. But it's also really awkward seeing tentacles everywhere... and given that DE doesn't release weapons this strong all the time, Phages are going to be common sights for quite a while. Edit: Tested things with full Vicious Spread, added a little more commentary. Adjusted
ltuamoheloa;-;Great game, just started to get into it! So far it's been a very good experience for a free to play game.....
paulyster;-;Its quite repetitive, however the amount of work being done to the game constantly is what makes it so refreshing. Since I started I have seen overhauls and great work being done to gameplay and mechanics. Its a great game, but it is slightly grindy. Also, if you get a dog and aren't able to log in for some time, the dog dies.
Imseti;-;Do you play action games? Do you like science fiction? Do you like shooting things? Do you like collecting loot? Are you broke? If you answered yes or no to any of these questions, you should be playing Warframe. It is the epitome of a successful F2P game. The devs are dedicated, inventive, and care about the game in ways that show they're invested in it, and the game universe and lore itself. It's the pinnacle of cooperative PvE. It's probably the most enjoyable MMO I've played. There is no reason you should not be playing this too.
Wolf69;-;It is one of the bast free to play game i have played!!!!!! so get it!!!!!! no harm of you do not like it because it free. (: i hape you will like it baceuse it a great game and it has space ninja!!! as i said get it. :)
LunarDagger;-;I Love this game, it has got to be one the best F2P Games ever i loved every miniute of playing it, Even griding is fun if you have one or two people to do it with.
DerelictJustice;-;Easily the best free to play game I've ever played. I started playing back when they released it on Steam last year and it's still something I play most days for at least a bit. With constant new content (every week or two), extended and new features frequently, the option to get EVERYTHING in-game without spending a penny and a pretty helpful and fun community, this game is fastastic. Over 100 weapons as of right now with over 20 warframes, quite a few pets and hundreds of mods. It is a game that's 100% about grinding and waiting for your items to craft so you have to be patient. If you like grinding and such (which I do) this game is definitely for you. Download it.
DecayZ;-;this game is awesome!
alex88chao;-;Pros: + Good Graphics + Cool variety of different weapons + Combat System + Fast Bugfixes + Many variety of different characters to play with + Different types of bosses and enemies + SPACE NINJAS Cons: - Grinding (seriously if you dont like grinding you will not enjoy this game) - Not noob friendly - End game dont exist yet (only survival and defense mission that can last for 40-60 min) - Repeated map tileset - Confusing Maps - Pray to RNG god a whole lot, you never get what you want - A bit of event to win (so dont miss events) Be prepared to sink tons of hours like I have if you want to experience everything that warframe has to offer. This game is not friendly to new players cause all weapons and warframes takes many resources to build, so expect many reruns. Despite all of its flawes its still a fun game with loads of contents for newer player, so if you have time to play many hours I can recommend this game for you.
jfx.;-;A great FTP game which will make you feel happy shooting things and going pew pew. You do fun jumps and dive everywhere and shoot these robot guys and do missions and advance forward. Co-op is great in this game aswell get it now.
BOT Senpai;-;So, here's the game in a nutshell. (Or my experience at least) The first several missions are beyond easy, you don't need any help killing guys who don't know that their armor protrudes 3 ft from their cover, or guys who wear cubes for helmets. They get progressively harder, but at that point you can group up with other people (and feel completely belittled by the dudes who kill everything before you can aim)! And, if you ever get bored of playing Piking Simulator 2014, you can just put on invite only/solo. But, instead of the way it used to be (silly little enemies, no problem), this game smacks you in the back of the knees with a baseball bat, and clubs the  out of you until you weep trying to think of how you even made it this far. But, if you wanna be cheered up, just look in the regional chat; there is NOTHING quite like Warframe's in game chat community. If talking about Ebola Prime doesn't cheer you up, you could always craft with the vast amount of resources in the game. It's a great way to schedule the rest of your life around it (believe me, it is one of the few things that I'd wake up at 3 in the morning to check). But on a serious note, I've played this game for nearly 100 hours withing putting a single penny into it, and it's still an epic game. Can't wait to see what direction the devs pull it into next.
FractionOfRed;-;I like this game ant u can help people and join clan to get the weapons u wn
ReportMyLife;-;Game is perfect for playing with your friends. My friend and I together gather resources and complete missions. Can't recommend more!
cacoman 1000;-;free and great gameplay and graphics
Alibaba;-;amazing cyber ninja game just what i needed for a game to play on steam bored of other games that are fps or sandbox for now
Ooaloly;-;This game combines amazing graphics and fun, fast gameplay into a amazing package. The division between different warframes and modifications available make this game unique. The best part is that there is no pay to play. Yes to get things it gets alittle grindy but its worth it. Well made game with more coming up for it hopefully
las viejas de juan;-;good game, nice graphics and a good playability.
[NAGO]VoidKingHD;-;Ive spent some time playing MMOs but this one changed everything -Fast Paced Battles -Awesome Graphics -Crafting -Great Community If you want a good TPS MMO give this one a try
Tensei;-;Pretty fun game, especially if you are into sci-fi stuff. It becomes even better if you are playing with frinds as squad. The main defect is that it can be boring if you want to craft weapon/frame and you need to get materials- it takes long time and you have to play on same maps again and again.
karlsc2000;-;l -ABSOLUTELY- recommend this game. Incredible fun. Co-op too, so pay to win is almost out of the question. Go solo or go with friends, even go online and you'll have a good time. ;) Choose a weapon that suits your playstyle, and choose a frame to go along with it. The game is amazingly free to play - however you want. All in all the game is great. l can't explain much with this text alone, and if a picture is worth a thousand words then that must mean actual gameplay is worth 100,000. Go try it out now, you'll be glad you did. It's only 30 minutes to download, and 36,000 of fun. ;)
TheBlackBandito;-;Shoot the  out of some aliens and explode people into cyber bite size bytes and die
DerpyWhaleGamer;-;game is amzing just the problem is that i couldnt get past 1st test and i was stuck on 1lv
Oni Guardian;-;If I could spam the utter living hell out of the thumbs up button, I seriously would. I never thought I'd like a game like this, but it's absolutely amazing! The graphics, the gameplay, the mechanics of the game, the stories (missions, really0 are pretty cool, the variety. It's basically the father to Destiny, but better. I love Destiny, DO NOT get me wrong, I really do, but all the exotic things Destiny promised are actually here in Warframe. The weapons have deeper variety and the cutomization is pretty freaking awesome. They're still adding new things to the game (Like the hounds they added to the game not too long ago called Kubrows) as it keeps going and it's all incredibly awesome! And there is so much to do, I hardly have enough time in my day to do it all. If you like Destiny and the Mass Effect series, you'll love Warframe!
Yugiomega;-;Warframe uses an interesting combat style that includes the use of maneuvers like wall-running and wall-jumping that add to the skills one can have in combat. These maneuvers are complemented by the large assortment of weapons that range from traditional weapons in shooter games, like assault rifles and pistols, to weapons like bows and throwing stars that have been upgraded to fit the futuristic, sci-fi theme of the game. One thing that must be noted about this impressive arsenal is that while one must pay money to buy in-game currency, Platinum, to buy most weapons and warframes, these same items can be just as easily built through the purchase of blueprints in the in-game market using credits earned from completing missions or by using blueprints found during missions. I am not normally the type to pay in places where it is not needed, so having this option appealed greatly to me. On a negative note, I feel that at this point the stages and enemies are overly uniform with not enough variation between planets and individual stages. Though, at this point there have been changes made to some of the stages and enemies and I assume that more individualism will be seen between them, especially considering that at the point that I am writing this the game is still in beta. Also, the fact that the stages are generated differently each time it is played helps to keep it from seeming too much the same, as well as keeping it fresh instead of being able to just memorize stages. I have enjoyed my experiences with Warframe so far, and I would recommend it to others who may be on the fence about playing this action-filled game.
Uni Black Sister;-;you can run up walls and shoot things gg 10/10 would play again
Atheroth;-;This game is very fun, it was one of the first f2p i tried and honestly it's one of my favorite. You play a a in space ninja, running on walls, awesome tile sets, fun clan system, fun to just mess around in the clan or the void. Only dowsides is that some weapons are clan research, or some are only possible to get though the use of platinum which is real money. And that once you farm for dayz to get the needed resources you must wait for either 12 hours up to 72 hours or 3 days to get the item you farmed for dayz to get. But other than that i think it is an awsome game well worth the time you spend on it
Haze-E;-;Warframe can be buggy at times, but the devs are always coming out with new content and hotfixes. Warframe has a bit of a steep learning curve and can seem confusing at first, to understand the damage mechanics of the game, but there are plenty of tutorials online, and there are few guys within the comminity who create really excellent videos that can help you understand the different weapons and warframes and how to mod them. The game can be quite grindy, but the rewards are sometimes worth it. I personally love playing Warframe, it has a futuristic feeling, with a large and ever growing assortment of weapons and gear to chose from and the game is quite challenging. You can play parts of this game solo, but it can become very diificult at higher levels so you must work as a team in order to finsih missions. Would I recommend this game ? Yes, I do recommend this game and quite highly. It is not for everyone, but it is free so you have nothing to lose by trying it out for yourself.
Ake Andi;-;This is the best FPS game I have ever played, 10/10
tcs;-;this game is all about shooting, killing , and sneaking. and if your that type of person, you should get this game!
Greatlando;-;Good game, lighting isn't the best though and it could be improved a bit.
Teebussi;-;The second best Free to Play game I have ever played. Number one being Team Fortress 2. Download both of them. Nuff said.
The Artist of War (Shadowsword);-;Good game for cooperative players. Fun misions. Overall 7/10
Skar;-;good game its fun and very addicting
Synfire;-;This is probably the best Space-Ninja game you will ever play. If you want a quick recommendation, you have it. EDIT: Once upon a time there was a very long page here. Well many many updates later it's safe to say that this game is still growing in surprising and exciting ways. It's still a game that feels that you have to dump a couple bucks into every now and then, but it never feels forced: by the time you feel the urge for some platinum you've probably put a hundred more hours into playing, so why not? Money you spend should be based on the fun you're having, and Warframe is promising to keep entertaining for a long time.
AlifTheGreat;-;Better than ganja. I give it a 420 / 69.
Microsoft Excel;-;This game literally is the true definition of F2P as it doesn't make you pay for a single thing, where as everything can made in the foundry. Highly addictive game...
jimbobslimbob;-;A great FTP shooter with interestingly fresh mechanics and RPG-like leveling up of "frames" and weapons. It is very grindy and can get repetitive, but is great fun to play co-op with a group of friends. It features sword-play and parkour, along with the run-n-gun mayhem. Randomized levels are a blessing and a curse. It suffers somewhat from an expensive economy too - where buying things with real money gets expensive very quickly. Overall it is well worth a shot (it's free afterall)! Jimbo Rating: 7/10
KnifeInAce;-;The Best CO-OP Game Ever
BadConker;-;Awsome gameplay to me its similar to halo. Recommended :)
(G-S.N) Chicago Ben;-;This game diserves its own genre its such a unque game compared to the rest of the flock. Even with it being f2p it is by no means a p2 win game as it balances in a good manner. Only peeves against it is it can get repetitive with certain tiles and the difficulty in playing this game is hard at first but once you reach endgame status it becomes such a cakewalk. 8.5/10 Great game!
Dr. A. Elemayo;-;Free to play is exactly what this is, There is NO paywall, there is no pay to win nothing that absolutely requires that you put money into the game, and on top of that, the game is really damn good. I've put 600+ hours into this game, met tons of amazing people, played through tons of amazing updates and watched a lot of their livestreams. The community is what makes this game as amazing as it is. Also, SPACE NINJAS.
MaxImpact;-;Basically? You run around as an epic wall-running gun-toting space ninja, defeating hoards of enemies and collecting new and awesome gear along the way. It is a good F2P model, where you can get almost anything without paying (with the exception of some cosmetics). Definately an overall great game, pick it up.
Metal Beard Salad;-;I am disappointed that this game is so underrated, I mean what can be more awesome than robots, zombies and ninjas in SPAAAAAAAAAAAAAACE!
ViPeR;-;It's very hard to believe this is a free to play game. It takes many machanics from other games I enjoy and uses them in a way that makes you want to keep playing. You will lose hours.
Yahia;-;A REALLY COOL GAME for heavy machines and even normal ones
Weaboo Jones;-;This game is pretty great, if you like space ninjas and eviscerating things, this game is the one for you.
Alphadragon;-;This is a very fun and adicting game with a fast pace and shooter aspect. Fun for all types of gamers!
Echo;-;THIS IS ON OF THE MOST AMAZING GAMES IVE EVER PLAYED ON STEAM AND I KNOW WHY EVERYONE IS TALKING ABOUT IT .. THE AMAZING SPACE NINJAS AND GREAT WEAPONS PLUS THAT SWEET PARKOUR IS THE BEST MIX!!!! :3
blaze1810;-;fun+free=awesome?
MLGBlazeItMichael;-;A surprisingly good sci-fi game that doesn't fail to impress. Gorgeous graphics, gripping gamplay and massive multiplayer action make this game a great next-gen titile!
CaptainHedgeHog;-;Awesome shooter game. Recommend for all who like a good scifi action game.
Royal;-;Simply and Stunningly amazing.I recommend it to all who play games
teeeeeee;-;A fun co-op fps with leveling elements. In addition to your characters, your account, weapons and minions gain levels as you progress. With higher levels, you can apply modules to your items, increasing various attributes in them. Modules themselves are drops, and the module collecting and building your gear mechanics feel like deck building in a collectible card game. The game is peer-hosted, which probably helps keep the game free to play, but also means that you will sometimes end up playing on a server that is hosted on a connection that can't handle the bandwidth requirements of four players. This can be somewhat resolved with ping-filtering peers, especially if you have the connection and cpu power to host yourself. Almost everything in the game can be obtained without paying real money (except character/weapon slots), but as usual, time is money, and helps you progress faster.
BOT Xero;-;In general an awesome game. While it does get a bit frustrating with running through some of the environments several times, you get used to it. 9.7/10 -My Review.
Miles-dEN-kungeN;-;Awesome game! Note that it is free to play :D
Aldesso;-;What SimCity should have been
Harvester_OS;-;Such a wonderful game. It's a little slow and repetative until you get your second frame.
_;-;Great game, with a lot of fun to be had. You'll have much more fun if you choose to play as part of a group, however. This is not a solo game by any means (even if you reach the point where you can overpower all content outside of the void), and leveling is much faster as part of a team. The game needs more difficult content, though. A well coordinated squad with strong weapons and frames trivializes ALL content currently in the game.
Vint;-;It's okay I guess
Castiger;-;This is a just wonderful game, I've seen no other like it. All the maps are procedurally generated, the rooms are the same, but arranged completely different every time, and the map could be long one play through, and short the next, on top of all that, every planet in the system has its own environment type, so you'll come across many interesting landscapes, and every playthourgh of a mission, there's a chance of there being a different penalty, for example, if there is ice in the level, it will reduce your maximum shields, and sometimes there'll be fire, making the terrain hazardous.. Every piece of equipment, including your warframe, has its own level, and your account does too. There are several different warframes/classes for you to find and build, and one of them is bound to suit your playstyle, not to mention a large arsenal of weapons to choose from, but you must earn the credits to unlock these. Eventually, if you get enough credits, you can buy a Sentinel, a small floating robot that'll hover over your shoulder, and support you any way you have it configured. Also, every piece of equipment has specific mods that will work for it, such as damage types, fire, ice, shock, armor piercing, rate of fire, reload time, and many more,, you can also level every mod up to a certain limit to increase its potential. There is an extensive crafting system, you find certain materisl in each system, and you use these to complete blueprints you've found or bought with credits, in order to create new gear, or even warframes. If you get really good, you can run along walls, and keep jumping to other surfaces, to speed your self up far more than a regular run would. It takes some decent aim to to a good job, and good reflexes, so come on and give this game a try, it is very fun indeed.
MazCPH;-;Awesome graphics and intense gameplay!
[Kry]XelOnii-chan :3 :3 :3 :3 :3;-;Good game, quite boring in solo but really funny in multiplayers !
Foolrule;-;I have played it for 3 days now. Recreating my review. This game has a bittersweet taste of fun and pay. At first it feels like you have to pay for everything, but after some time playing it, I've found out that you can get probably every item you could buy with real money, or the ingame currency "Platinum" which is bough with real money, also with just some time. And that is the real reason to play this game. It's not really about killing every boss or playing every mission or getting every achievement. It's about spending time ingame. And for me, playing this game, is getting new warframes and crafting new weapons. And after getting them, leveling them is the next part. But as lovely as it is to play this game, it's also a bit annoying that you can only have 4 warframes at a time without spending a single coin. And spending money in this game makes me kinda angry. There is an online rating for the ingame currency "Platinum", which says that 75 Platinum is around 5$. Most Warframes cost around 225 Platinum and some of the cooler ones cost 375. Most of the Warframes are gainable through resource gathering and buying the Blueprints for them with Credits (The other, ingame gainable, currency in Warframe). One problem there is, you only have 4 Warframes slots if you don't want to pay for this game. That means, you can have 4 Warframes at a time, while players who pay can have a pile of them. The game is called Warframe, why would you do this with the items the game is called after? I'd prefer a way to gain these slots ingame. All in all is this game a nice longtime game with a lot of cooperation between players. The community is nice aswell. Hell you can even ask them if they taxi you to a mission you don't have access yet. I will keep playing this game and might aswell put some money into it to get more Warframe slots.
Ryudo;-;If my play time wasn't enough of an indicator, this game is so much fun that it stole my life. Visceral combat, agile movement, and great aesthetic keep me from doing pretty much anything else. Play this game. Hit me up when you do, I'm always down to help.
Calv1n_andhobbes;-;A wonderful Free to play game that doesn't shove microtransactions down your throat. What more can be asked?
JackTheRipper;-;Warframe is a very good F2P TPS and has a wonderful community of gamers that are easy to get a long with. The game play is smooth and nice graphics but the only problem is there are a lot of maps that seem like you have seen before, Meaning it seems like there are maps that they used before but just put a few new things in it. Also you can drop a lot of money in the game if you get into it because of different customization for warframs and sentinels. You can also buy weapons with your plat but for the player that just wants have a fun game with not droping a dime there is goos news for you. almost everything you see in the store you can build in game with no real money charges it just takes longer to obtain that item. So i give WarFrame 8.5/10 and recommend you give it a try!
LethalSystem98;-;Crazy game.. gotta give thumbsup to the developers.
Jaxseven;-;There's a reason Warframe is a "launch title" for the PS4. Honestly it's probably for all the pretty particles that'll be flying around when you cut space marines in half with your space ninja sword while sliding on the ground after wallrunning from across the map because you are a space ninja with all the powers of space ninjutsu. In all seriousness, this game is fantastic, not because of the terrific graphics, not because the co op with different Warframe (you character with a set of stats and powers) that allow for great synergy between teammates, but because this game gets Free 2 Play. At no point have I felt the need to pay for the game, but I have because I like it a lot. Everything can be aquired without real world money and it all seems fair and balanced. This is a brilliant game and I recommend it to anyone looking for a great co op game or something to really show off to "next gen" console friends.
XenO - Kun;-;Best third person Ninja game I've played. Very fast paced co-op or stealthy solo play. Loads of wall running, jumping, flipping, and tons of other stuff. Weapons and characters can be crafted and modded to fit your style.
Yin;-;I can say this is a nice game, playable for anyone. ^^ Even if just for a try, you will come to like the gameplay and the people u meet in the end.
space cat;-;Space ninjas super fast technologic many-ways-to-kill fast action meleestyle very custom customization and cool co-op gory halarious action game.
metal.head;-;This Game totally ROCKS :) never played anything better than this
Collychamp;-;Takes a long time and can sometimes seem repetitive, but the challenges it presents will keep you coming back. If you end up getting this game or already have it and are not in a clan. Let me know. I will invite you to join mine and give you some gear.
Anzacs;-;Love this game there forever updating and creating new challanges, you can paint your WARFRAME to what ever colour's you wish to your taste, join a clan and help set up your dolo and weapons etc awesome, lots of fun when in a group, and evan if your not, it isnt hard to make friends and have fun.
Specialist;-;A fun, 4 player, co-op game that is relatively easy to understand. Been a favourite amongst my friends and I for a while now, would recommend! The gameplay is wonderful, bringing together elements from third-person-shooters, RPGs and MMOs and combining them into something new. The graphical design is nothing short of beautiful, dazzling the players with a variety of levels and effects! The audio quality is great. There is nothing nicer than hearing the drums of war start to play rhythmically as you enter battle. Finally, the community is large, diverse and friendly.
Ravicon;-;Love this game, been playin since befor I used Steam and was using Raptr. Awesome gameplay, easy to use controller support, vived lush graphics, excellent voices, tons of content with new content added regularly, and fun co-op. Super fun game to play for free. Now for gripes (Though Very Few), The story is very lacking, its not really in your face you have to be looking for it but there is one, also this game gets seriously repetitive and if your not playing with friends or a team that talks as you play... You get bored and last but not least.... This game is a Epic GRIND. If you dont wanna spend money to get other warframes or speed up the process of leveling and crafting this game will eventually make you put it down because of repetitive grinding. That Being Said... This Game Is Awesome and I recommend anyone give a shot... Its free for Goodness sake! And lets not comment on the epicness of playing this on a Big 1080 TV with surround Sound, and Dualshock 4, and Steams Awesome Big Picture mode!
ODI.CptPancake;-;This game is a very fun in-depth TPS, unlike most it has a social system, decent melee, and lots if cool missions. 8/10
LSZL;-;After all, I can't say its , cause' it isn't.
FoosinSama;-;cool game its basicly ninijas in space.
yendis;-;Great game, plenty of content. Definitely worth a try!
Desdinova;-;Very fun game if you enjoy ME3 multiplayer, but can be a bit grindy at times
Mr Ruff IV is an inkling!;-;How I Lost My Life to Warframe To me, for the longest time it was one of those games that I'll see and hear about early on and decide, "Nah, that's not my kind of game, I won't bother getting into it". Anytime it pops up the same thought is there, and nothing budges. Eventually, lots of friends were getting into it, playing all the time. "That game has never seemed fun or my kind of game, I still wouldn't like it so I won't get into it still. Even though they're playing it so much, they're prolly just overhyping it, I've always felt it won't be fun to me." But then I decided, for whatever reason, "Hell, I'll try it out at least." And now, I'm on the other side, as friends watch me play constantly and wonder how it's even possible. It's just a plain fun game, pretty to look at and play, and even its F2P tactics feel good in the long run. I was pessimistic about the waiting and grinding involved, but pacing your gameplay helps to enjoy things longer, without burning out on things right away. Don't wanna wait 12 hours for a weapon to build? Just take a bit of control, sleep it off, wake up to a nice new shiny toy. There'll be more to do in the meantime, the new player experience is just a bit slow to get you off your feet is all.
lexadel The Wallfle Born;-;yes play this game won't stop
Onii-chan;-;Immerse into a future where strenght make the rules and power beyond your imagination can be acquired. Weapons,Skills,Ninjas,Robots in a combination to a masterpiece called Warframe
HelpJumper;-;DAMN NEW SHIPS! NEW STUFF! NEW PLAYSTYLE! If you love crazy motherf**** space ninjas,Well this is your game! There's even new graphichs and better brightness,quests,SENTINAL HUNTERS,DOGS! Play this game! Its free and awesome.
TaCHi;-;Great game, especially for a F2P. You don't need spend money to enjoy or advance in this game, everything's pretty much available through plans to assemble items and mats are quite easily farmed in game. Varied missions and goals, mobs, and boss fights. The addictive part is leveling your character and its weapons.
Ruledragon;-;Warframe is a pretty enjoyable co-op game, as you level you get to understand that this is one of those games in wich leaving a team mate behind is not a choice, because solo is not a option (at least on low levels). It lacks PvP Maps like... let's say Halo Combat Evolved had, in wich 5 or more players on 2 different teams fight to accomplish one common objective, may it be killing each other or capturing a certain objective (Capture the Flag for example would be a pretty cool game mode in warframe since players have high mobility with the Shift + Jump + CTRL combo). You can make your own warframes and weapons wich is kinda well though. It's still in Open Beta but i hope when it goes live it turns into a better experience. I'll give it: 7 out of 10 points
icekachang78;-;This game has superb graphics+smooth gameplay+detailed environments+form a team & whack the Grinners!
MLG Mercenary;-;Going to Xbox One Warframe, do it . expand your name, i would love to see people get to know this game and where it game from { online}
NexusNemesis;-;Ever wanted to become an unstoppable force of destruction? Then try out this third person shooter, set in a futuristic universe. With the broad spectrum of weaponry and warframes (classes), you can be sure to find a build that truly fits your playing style, if its being stealthy and quick or just run into the middle of the action guns blazing and tanking while you dish out the hurt, you decide. Ranged weapons to fit your every need, shotgun, sniper, submachinegun, machinegun, semi-automatic and automatic versions of the weapons, not to forget the Bow that shoots with such force that it impales your enemies to walls or eachother if you line them up. Slice, bash or punch your enemies to gory bits with the various melee weapons if you want to get up close and personal. Fists, Hammer, Dagger, Axe, Sword, Dual Axes, Sword and Dagger dualwield or go for the Greatsword. There is much more in this game than just this, each warframes set of abilities that aid it in battle. leveling up system joined with the Mod system that improves your various weapons damage output or perhaps your warframes ability to tank better. Craft your weapons or warframes by picking up blueprints and materials when completing missions and fighting bosses. And finally an AI that doesnt just stand out in the open, taking hits without retaliating. No, Warframes AI makes good use of cover systems and strategic vantage points, to give you a better challenge. When they first notice something is wrong, they will alert the entire enemy force of your presence, so being stealthy has its perks but also takes skill to pull off. 9.5/10 -NexusNemesis
Shootergod(GM);-;Damn nice with light-detailed graphics,+ story line is amazing.Highly ercommended!
batkid;-;This game is AWESOME!
TheCyanBlade;-;Brilliant!
Zunknown;-;This Is very Cool game :))) I like the way the graphics are :)
Meta;-;Really good. Better than the average bear. YOU SHOULD PLAY IT
Brotaku;-;7/10 if it wasnt for the insainly long patch downloads i would probably play this game more often, really fun if you are into grinding the same missions to get your favorite warframe like i have
HADES;-;This game...I dont know where to start. On update 13 It was a great game. It had its bugs and its flaws but It was fun to play, but with the new update It has improved A LOT, its beautiful. Even though the wait was a pain in the , it was worth it. It almost feels like a brand new game. I dont understand some people that hate this new update so much... I simply cant hate it in any way. The new tutorial is fantastic ( compared with the   tutorial of before, if you can call that a tutorial ). It shows new players how to play properly and gives you diversity in your first guns, depending in your style. Its great to see the implementation of your own ship and how you control everything in a more fluid way. Some may say that its less practical, but theese people are hayterz (JUST KIDDING). Before you could be overwhelmed by all the different stuff that was presented to you all at once ( foundry, Arsenal etc ) and it was tricky for me to get the hand of the game. Now you are showed what you are doing, instead of waching some slides that show you what you do, they make you do missions to get parts for your ship and guide you through lots of things that are a little complicated for a new tenno. Its also good to see that theres an actual quest line instead of complete this planet to go to the other planet and so on. It looks more fun this way and makes a little more sense. There is a lot of work to be done into this game to make it perfect, but this was a BIG step into creating one of the best games that, In my opinion, will ever come across steam.
Senparos;-;Warframe is the best free2play game I have ever played. Not only is it a fun game that is constantly getting new content and features (as it is in open beta right now), but it is the best free2play model I have ever seen in a game. Like most f2p games, it has an in game earned money-type (credits) and a paid for type (platinum). In warframe, every single item can be obtained without spending platinum. The only exception to this is vanity items and room for more warframes and weapons, but you can actually EARN platinum to buy those things through the trading system. if you have something rare, you can trade it to other people in exchange for platinum. The developers also have a very active role in the community, they have livestreams every week and are active on the game's forums. Instead of seeing the developers as more of an ATM for games than anything else (EA for example), you see them as people who actually want to make a great game. Overall, this is a fantastic system, and has actually encouraged me to spend money on the game, not because i have to in order to do well in it, but because I want to support the growth of this fantastic game.
MauriceB;-;Would recommend. A very fun PvE game with lots of costumization options and it gets updates very often. It may get repetitive due to levels being fairly similar, but additions are being made rapidly. Overall a really nice free game to pick up if you've got a few minutes to download it.
Dr. Ive;-;This game is proof that the whole 30/60fps debacle is utter . This game is just one frame, a warframe, and it still looks really good. It's obvious that fps is completely irrelevant to the smoothness of the visuals in a game. Just one frame is enough to make a game look and run smoothly.
Himself;-;Absolutely amazing for a free to play game!
FreeLancer;-;Free to play game with a large and unexpectedly nice community. This game is good for people who have been looking for an alternative to the multiplayer of Mass Effect 3. Just worthy of note that the game has an extended grind once you get into the mid-to-late game. Also noteworthy is that melee is not as gratifying as other games in the MMORPG scope. Gory, yes, but repetitive after going through all the different animation sets available for melees currently in the game.
UndeadGargoyle;-;It is AWESOME, lots of running, stabbing, shooting and SPACE NINJAS, i highly recommend it to anyone who likes 3rd person running and gunning.
Plasma Snake;-;Suprisingly fun for a free to play game. At least until you get tired of grinding constantly for new weapons. Still, worth a try.
Lady Gauss;-;I'm going to say two words, and then you are going to download this game. SPACE. NINJAS. Why isn't this game already on your hard drive? It's fast, crazy fun, gorgeous, FREE, and can even be played like a single-player game if you're so inclined. There is literally no reason you shouldn't try thi out.
chocoboknights;-;I ninja flipped off the map. 8/10 would do it again.
Toad41145;-;warframe is the best F2P game ive played 386 hours on it just playing i would recomend this game if you are looking for somthing to play!
Biscuit GONE 4 2 WEEKS;-;It's kinda a mix of Transformers war for cybertron and spiral knights.
flamingblueice;-;this game is simply awesome. though the maps may appear to be repititive, but playing this with friends is a loving experience. and the game mechanics are simple and easy, if in doubt just check the in-game tutorials. amazing weapons, cool warframes, upgrading and modifying weapons, and the best of all.........................................it's FREE!!!!!!
Bobo Baggins;-;cool
[IRL] Peqqy;-;As soon as you learn to play and get used to controls this game is definetly worth playing! Double the fun with friends!
predator;-;best f2p game on steam
1-UP;-;This game is too ing awesome. You can wallrun and do some really awesome rolls. This game in my opinion is the best F2P game on Steam.
FlyingLamps;-;can't stop playing this game it's so fun :D
Hastarin;-;Space Ninjas! After playing the Destiny Beta on XBox One and loving the PvE co-op I was looking for something similar to kill the month and a bit until Destiny is released. In Warframe I've found that and more. Destiny it's not, but for a Free to Play title it has a lot to offer. You have a range of parkour type moves that help you rapidly navigate the levels once you learn how to combine them to vault, slide, flip, wall run, and more, your way around so fast the enemy can't keep up. You can take the fight to the enemy at range with your primary/secondary weapons, or get up close and personal with your melee weapon. Gather enough energy from fallen enemies/crates and you can unleash your true space ninja powers to devastate the enemy, aid your allies, or boost your mobility, depending on the warframe you're using. The Free-to-Play model is well done, and you could conceivably play the game for hundreds of hours without paying a single dollar. I will personally spend some cash on the game just to support the developers, but you can get along just fine without doing so. It's the typical F2P model with cash either saving you time, or letting your characters look just that bit funkier. The game also offers PvP if that's your thing, but it's not mine so I haven't checked it out yet to comment on it. If you are old enough to remember MDK fondly or enjoyed Too Human then you owe it to yourself to check this out.
Frankencookie;-;wow... This is incredible for a beta...
Suizidaler Kse - INTJ;-;I think Warframe is a pretty cool guy. He fights aliens and doesnt afraid of anything
Onii-chan;-;Immerse into a future where strenght make the rules and power beyond your imagination can be acquired. Weapons,Skills,Ninjas,Robots in a combination to a masterpiece called Warframe
HelpJumper;-;DAMN NEW SHIPS! NEW STUFF! NEW PLAYSTYLE! If you love crazy motherf**** space ninjas,Well this is your game! There's even new graphichs and better brightness,quests,SENTINAL HUNTERS,DOGS! Play this game! Its free and awesome.
Benchor;-;Robot Ninja Wizards in Space is probably a better title.
kRaZiEGAMER;-;This is one hell of a game.
Doc McStabbins;-;This a Fun Far Future GAme im soo iliterate this is for da comunety bafge
Pandemik;-;It's a really good game considering it's free to play. I would definitly recommend it to people if they asked me, there is alot of action intense gameplay as you progress and lots of great characters to choose from. At first it seems a little slow and grindy but when you work hard for what your aiming for it really makes it seem worth while, where as some games just hand you the best stuff in a day. Definitly a good time killer when you get bored, or you can always play it in between games.
Abyss Raider;-;I love Warframe, and while I don't play the PC version as much as I do the console, it's fun regardless what platform you play it on!
Gnollbard;-;A pretty fun over-the-shoulder shooter/ninja-ing/parkour/sword-swingin' kinda game, you play as a space cyber-ninja in a cruel space-future. Also you can get an ugly lovable space bat-dog. Honestly, a fun game if you're looking for a time-sink, as it is fairly grindy. All weapons need to be levelled up, as do suits, and you have to gather materials to improve stuff or make stuff better. Like I said, grindy, but... still entertaining.
Concrete Surfer;-;Grindy grind! But still cool.
I EarliestHippo27;-;Space Ninjas. Period.
Norton | tipofthehats.org;-;Warframe is truly a wonderful games that ticks all of my boxes. It's god the best Sci-Fi feel, best action and of course the Ninja feeling to it. You can choose what you want to do when it comes to missons, want to go in guns blazing? Go ahead or if you prefer a more stealth approach to it then again, go ahead. The sound has improved dramatically over the years of Warframe and is really been a milestone for the developers to be proud of. They always surprise us with every update whether it be small or big. The music is perfect, it really does add the best theme you can get to battles and of course the music varies from battle to battle. The design is just the key symbol of Warframe, why you ask? See for yourself, it's just perfect. Every little detail Digital Extremes puts into the game always made the game more beautiful. The lighting is very dynamic, it's not too bright and not too dark in missions while keeping the good mix of lights to create the desired atmosphere. Gameplay in my opinion does need a bit of working, I just think Warframe is really hard to get into when you start as it only gets good when you start getting a real challenge. Digital Extremes did a good job when it came to Ninjas, I mean come on, you get to do Parkour. You get to run on walls while shooting and perform attacks with your sword in mid air flight. That's all I can say really, well there is one more thing. Get the game. You'll wish you played this game a long time ago. 10/10.
Steven Bills;-;Robots and Ninjas. Whats more to love? 11/10 Would ninja again
SuplexCityBitch;-;WARFRAME IS LIFE WARFRAME IS LOVE...............
Coldfireing;-;Great Game!
MGKBurrito;-;It's ninjas IN SPACE, and cool abilities.
FeFo;-;its cool
Teebussi;-;The second best Free to Play game I have ever played. Number one being Team Fortress 2. Download both of them. Nuff said.
alion;-;the best gme but i can get cs 1.6 plz
RyzeN King;-;Great game for customization, stunning graphics, and great co-op experience. I highly recommend this game!
H2ODelirious;-;Slice  up plus shoot  up  me.
Byeforever;-;Great third person beat em up style shooter. Just purely fun.
IWillHealUrBalls;-;Most epic 3rd person shooter i have ever played
Dragonlord3344;-;Awesome game, full of alot of small glitches, but always getting better.
-CM-Grimm;-;best game i've played in a long time
[229] Lego Player;-;A little repetitive, but the customization, teamwork, and overall fun factor completely make up for it.
Douifer;-;Love it 10/10 will play again
ReeceKrispie;-;Fantastic game, sliced.... then diced all oponents. Doing all sorts of ninja madness... reconnmended
HugeTiger100;-;This is an awesome game... I WOULD pay for this. lucky its free though :P 9/10
twizzm.;-;its free. it has guns. its in space. why not?
sab0t;-;i play this game like i would play quake. 10/10
A random guy;-;Ainsley Harriot approves. This game is amazing, keep cooking.
Crowley;-;11/10 - So good it will give you a headache
Al Capone;-;This game is awsome i've seen some gameplay and it looks awsome i will so download it :D
1234thien;-;I murdered a bunch of feral spacedogs and stole a spacedog egg to make a baby one to kill more feral spacedogs, commited mass genocide against cloned humans and a huge space corporation, I drowned a bunch of people as a tentacle monster human thing, and I did it all while invisible.
Kiro :D;-;Warframe... This Game I knew this Game Before his release, i Reserved my username and all that stuff, but For a magical reason my Email wasn't in their list so i forget about the game And... Well Here i am Again, Adicted to This Awesome Game, you never Get bored of this, At least i dont xD Thanks DE For Bring us this awesome Game! and For begin F2P!! :D
SIlver elite bezt rank;-;I was a boy who had never spent a cent on games so I went to the free to play section of steam and I saw Warframe at the top of the charts and it looked really cool so i clicked on it, I failed my exams....... BUT FOR A GOOD CAUSE
DancesWithBears;-;This game is amazing though I found that it is more fun and easier to play with friends and it does have quiet a bit of grinding but it also has a lot of diversity from other third person shooter games and its the only one ive seen that has actually clans.
PlezWarmy;-;Such an awesome game! :D Super fun game to play when your bored and you just can't pla it alone. However, i dont know if it was warframe or steam that removed it from my game's list, but now it's gone. So just going to redownload it...
wgklassen;-;Great game just everyone thinks its all about running fast and being first to the finish line lol
fnatic.jihadjosh;-;Better than any farming simulator and it's free. Exploit. Abuse. Farm. The never ending cycle. Solid 10/10, would farm again.
KEboobs;-;Great Game,lost my job,lost my girlfriend 10/10 IGN
Claid;-;You can slice dead body into pieces, and slice dead body's pieces into pieces, and so on and on and on... 10/ Tenno. It's like Cooking Mama in space
@Sherman;-;Pay to play game for one day. 4/10
Zero Fucks Given;-;If you thought Destiny was a grind fest, you ain't seen nothin' yet.
cgYallo;-;Great Game! Already over 1000 hours playing it. Constant updates keeps adding new content for players. Great community and great dev team, would recommend.
Pomurnik;-;Slightly addictive ;)
Polyphia;-;nice cant even playing it
JINBABA;-;Really Liked it , just hope the player base was bigger
Kelevra;-;Very good free to play game. -no pay to win -cool game setting -Many weapons and warframes -trading -clans and own customizable clan dojo and ship -coop and pvp -regular updates and new content Give it a shot, its worth it :D
Asuma;-;this game is really fun to play. Recommend :)
HeatOff! #deag2stronk4u;-;Man ..... If You ever wanna play a MMO game.... just pick this one up ..... its the best and is ranked no.4 I started 2 weeks back and now my record is 116hrs :P If u guys wanna join me just install this game and add me as friend... My Account: HeatOff
The Jester;-;This game is incredibly entertaining.
Ryuuzetsu | Trafficlight(s);-;In my opinion, the surroundings get a bit boring after a while, but Warframe is a great game with loads of potential. Warframe has a great variety of weapons and skills, there is something fitting for every playstyle. Solo-playing is just as awesome as playing with other people. I would give it 80 out of 100 points.
WinterSoldier65;-;very nice game !
Cosmicus;-;Superb game , 3 person RPG farm pve/pvp a time killer a super cool game + it gots space ninjas yes SPACE NINJAS ^^
Anti Hero;-;Who dosen't love a good grindfest/space ninja/ 3rd person shooter/ overcomplicated game? Luv dis game.
ana;-;Takes alot of time but is really fun, especially with some irl friends. It's quite pay2win tho, unless you are extremely patient :d
CHVMVNDII;-;This game is easily one of the best free to play games out on the steam market. Very addictive, Grinding, Repetative, Always updating with new content as well as events. I strongly reccomend this game. Technically this game is still in Open Beta. Digital Extremes is the Developer, who has also developed Unreal, Unreal Tournament. see the website for more details on games these guys have developed. http://www.digitalextremes.com/games
(  ) NoSuchPersonExisted;-;THIS GAME WAS ULTIMATELY AWESOME THAN DOTA>>>NO BACKSTABBERS AND YOUR CLAN HELPS YOU ALOT....NO DOWNGRADING NO SNIDE REMARKS>>>PLAY THIS GAME AND YOU WILL TRULY FEEL THE FEELING OF PLAYING ONLINE GAMES>>10/10 stars DE
Johnny;-;Spent 520 hours for a 10 next to my name. 11/10 Would grind again.
TheFox;-;This awesome game got me hooked as soon I clicked the button. It took a while tho before you could do something. but once you're through the slow start! You wont stop going untill the bodycount is skyscrape high!
Hunter_Skulls;-;It`s fun game and good community.
rakados;-;So far I have to say this game is really fun. As you can see I enjoy this game very much. +A lot of content. +Hours of fun. +Interesting Design. +Space Ninjas. +Awesome/Active Dev's. +No Paywalls/Everything can be acquired with 0$ (Except some cosmetics). +Tons of Warframes (Characters). +Decent Graphics. +Cool Soundtrack. -Too easy endgame, and not much endgame content. [(I tried?)(I suck at reviews].
OGBites;-;Fun game, similar to Destiny, not gameplay wise, but menu, scenery wise. For a free to play game, it's a pretty fun game
shoogs;-;I ran up a wall, backflipped, and took down 20 people with nothing but my dual axes and pistols while sliding. This game makes you Jesus. I'm pretty sure Jesus did that.
840blazeitforJeezus;-;My life means nothing anymore after spending an entire week on this game.
Bloobite | trade.tf;-;Seriously. Stop reading these things and just get the bloody game, you wont regret it + its free! 10/10 (could be 11/10 even)
Obo;-;Game is awesome. The cash shop is fair. fast, fun and crazy.
J-Sizzle;-;Probbley one of the only free to play game i like. a bit of grinding but it makes up for that with really good gameplay
PsychoDelicBoulevard;-;The graphics are better then i could've ever hoped for. It's like a mash up of halo and destiny. I find this game very interactive and intriguing.
Imperator;-;Dear fellow gamers, For years, I played this game. I joined in when it was at update 6, now we are waiting for the update 16. I watched how it was developed from a simple normal game to a masterpiece. The devs were adding lightshows, new content, new features, new playstyles and even greater optimizations. They were doing so much thing with this game, that its just nostalgic to remember back how was it back than. The game is hard when you play it first. It is hard, like you can die anywhere at anytime. Than you advance and level, the game becomes harder, but you become better and than it becomes easier and filled with more and more action. Than you make new weapons and frames. My first choice of frame was the Rhino, the Boltor, and the Dual-Ether blade. Slowly you become the best of the best and seek new challenge. Higher type of enemies, than even higher type of enemies for even better stuff. Than you go for the towers, the enemies become harder to kill. The scrub remains scrub, but they add these little -chops enemies which makes your life ten dozens time harder. As you advance you begin to see that the Ai is not just a stupid clone-brain anymore, it thinks and makes a tactic against you, which will still mostly fail. -> it is the rhino who steps in the room first, you will understand why Than you wish to go higher, do mmo type repu for these freedom fighters or just for those green guys. Than you realize you need a prime and you want to farm it, than level it, than polarize it. Than you reached your meta-status, one frame over-the-top, with high-end-tier of weapons, you are the mass destruction in galaxy. Well, you can have a sentinel, or a pet, or just do archwing missions. But most of all, you can try out other things. In other mmo-s, there is the meta and the rest of the useless stuff. Here, you are the meta. If you do well, victory is yours. If you do the very best, it will be an easy fight. If you are the meta, you can step into the greater challenge. Also, there are pvp too. As you advance, you gain things. The game is free to play, but there are things closed down. Like two-warframe slots. But as you advance you can get platinum, through daily alert, or just trade. But if you wish to have more and more, you can do that without. As your mastery level increases, the slots increase too with it. The more you try out, enjoy and play, the more you can do. It is great fun for me, though I know it wasn't for some of my friends. There are those who like the gameplay style and there are those who don't. But I tell you it is worthy of your time!
Crimson Wolf;-;AMAZING!! Gameplay is awesome, graphics amazing definelty a game I love. 10/10
Jaffaking;-;Warframe is by far one of my favorite free to play games. The art style and combat is very unique as well as the general gameplay mechanics.There are over 10 warframes "The space ninjas" you play as and has over 50 different types of unique wepons. Although they are already many wepons and frames new updates keep coming making the game endless fun. The community is quites funny and interesting as well as helpful. The makers of warframe (Digital Extremes) listen to the players feed back and keep adding new thigns as well as fixing bugs. However, with all these pros in place there are some things that take away from this gaming experience. The fact that the maps are repetitive and many of the mission require you to do are the same, some may leave this game for a while. But after while and you return it will be filled with new goods. I would give it a 8.0-8.5/10. And way not try is. Its FREE!
[BWNY] Tank245;-;Best game ever. 15/10 would bang.
DragoniteAce;-;One of the best F2P MMOTPS games i've ever played. Most other Online FPS i tried don't come close to as good as this game. Became addicted to it and play it regularly now. Try it you will be hooked!
X-10A Freedom;-;Hands down the greatest F2P 3rd person shooter/dungeon crawler with energetic gameplay and loads of content. Digital Extremes live up to their heritage with this unique, eerie and vibrant world, which they diligently develop at a pace that should be envied by most F2P developers. Try it. If it's your thing, you'll love it and stay for a long time. See you there, tenno. ;)
FRANKY SHOGUN;-;executing jews is even more fun in space
Prepoznator;-;If u are into heavy grind yes,the more this game is around the grind is getting crazier,graphic is nice,combat system is nice too,this was originally pve oriented game and since changes implemented by pvp happen it kinda started loosing its soul for me atleast....If u have excessive time to grind stuff obsessively this is a game for u.
dack jouglass;-;IT'S GOOD.
Yurii;-;I liked the game while it was still fresh. But challenge, it ran out. All fights felt flat, no enemies posed any threat, the whole gameplay is turned into generic mass destruction with no need to use any brains. But what killed it for me is constant updates, which featured nothing but weapons and frames - new ways to kill old, helpless enemies. Uncool, bro, uncool. Still, I recommend this game to those who haven't tried it yet, just mind that if you're not into mindless repetitive grind - you won't be here for long.
Kit the Kat;-;Amazing detail, story and gfx. But I feel like im never happy with my : weapons, suit etc. I am constantly grinding to get better stuff only to get better stuff to grind further to get better stuff. The story line is great and the universe too, details and gfx are insane, but yea: when will i be content and have some fun just not trying to get better stuff. SO my point is this game looks and is amazing but you will never stop and just enjoy you will always be trying to get better stuffs.
JohnnyNemonic;-;INSANE ! (Creator)"Hey I got an Idea let's take the awesomeness of every MMORPG, FPS, TPS, RPC, and Melee slashers. Cross timelines with anchient yet alien martial arts weapons use actual katas and combine it into one game. " QUESTION DO YOU WANT HELP WRITING A SCRIPT ! THIS NEEDS A 4 HOUR MOVIE. Here is an Idea I'm just going to spit ball. The Anchients beings of pure energy bring all of the frames to earth one each. They need Earths help,Earth has recources needed to help the Teno in exchange the government wants tech and is willing to help by donating the soldiers who are willing to become the first to be outfitted with Teno bio suites (this means designing new frames which will be added to the game after the premiere) So the ANcheints knowing they are in a position to save Humanity from destroying itself make the deal on the request that we decommision all nuclear power sources and weapons (we need to anyway) So with teno technology in a month the earth is free of everything nuclear and toxic to humans people are getting healed ect... And the Soldiers are getting trained . THere are get to know them scenes ect (first two hours) then a friking 2 hour battle you could split the humans up with the Tenos so many options. I DONT CARE IF IT IS ANIMATED THIS GAME NEEDS A MOVIE LOL
Suu;-;Space shinobi action!
Miss Squirreletta;-;This is fantastic, I havent had this much fun in a game for a long time, also the community is so nice!
Gray;-;Though theres a lot of "tedious" work, and farming. With a good group of friends. Its definately a nice break from other shooters. 7.5/10
Coffee;-;10/10 can't even ing log in
Juegoman;-;Grind to grind. it's pretty fun. 9/10, it's OK.
kingofhearts;-;it's alright
Wozzernux;-;2385hrs spent on this game so far and loving it, waiting for Update 14 to hit!
Ghazter;-;Space Ninjas in Exoskeleton Suits...in Space! Need I say more?
Musuko_;-;If you guys like gunz u will love this game
Uplix;-;Overall this game is just awesome, with a fair buisness model and a great engine it has everything you would want. Even though some of the levels (very few) are repetitive you can enjoy the game alone or with a friend. I highly recomend this game so check it out maybe you'll have a new favorite game to play.
heinmeiinhe;-;This is one of the best on line games I have ever played. The physics are spot on and the environments eye popping not to mention engrossing. Having a very aggressive opponent is very crucial to any combat oriented arena. Coupling that with mazes and puzzles that I and my friends can get immersed in... POPS!
Haj Ahmad;-;a little pay 2 win(just a little !)but doesnt matter :D Its AWESOME but it has ONE HUGE PROBLEM, that is there isnt a place to try(just try) the guns, satllelit and warframes which you plan to make or buy them.(just try like ghost recon phantomes) but it s OK! play to gether with Stategy. 9/10
James/Durp;-;I have a ton of hours put into this game. The question is, was it worth it? The answer is yes. I enjoy this game. It is a free to play game aswell. Ive spent over $200 on just in game purchases. I reccomend this to anyone who wants a switch up to a game that is a 3rd person shooter with space ninjas.
Edmond;-;Awesome gaming! Very exciting and addictive! Once you had started it, you won't be able to stop playing! Reminds me of Metal Gear Revengeance....you can run on walls like a ninja. Fast and swift sword play with lots of blood and gore! It is superb and simply awesome! Use a Xbox controller to play with this game will be even awesome! The best online gaming ever!
arachnid8219;-;Bloody fun game..the game and infected remind me alot of halo in ways and i love that game, ya dont have to pay to get the good stuff either...its just faster and easier to then waiting for event rewards or ya can sell items people want to get whats called platnum ...ingame currency thats obtained by spending money for many things i personally reccoment this to anyone wh dosnt mind a grind with a similar feeling to halo in some ways
Beauty;-;My all time favorite game! I would recommend for anyone and everyone to play it! It's fast paced and fun. Every update adds something amazing and the combat is beautiful. Every Warframe is wonderful and unique in their own way. When you get on a team with other Warframes the magic you can create is beautiful! Getting Platinum (a currency you CAN pay for) can be obtained in different ways without having to spend money which i find wonderful considering it allows players to create their own little economy. One of the all time best free to play games I have ever played. I mean, c'mon, space ninjas.
Morgan Freckle;-;Its one of those games in which your think at first 'WTF am I doing?' but as you go on you discover a very well hidden gem.
Otilia;-;Impressive graphics :D
Mattrix;-;You play as an alien ninja samurai parkour robot, with numberous choices in melee, primary and secondary weaponary. Like all F2P games though, you can buy pretty much anything with real money, and if you do you will be heaps better then the other noob that just started playing, who has to grind heaps to actually get something really good. It's still a great game though, and it really is the skill not what weapons someone has that makes a player good at this game. You most likely will enjoy it. And it's free. And it has fairly good graphics. And you are an alian ninja samurai parkour robot.
Awesomeroguer;-;Great third-person, sci-fi, ninja, shooter fun.
Shawn;-;Space ninjas with guns. That is all. 10/10 like Skyrim with space ninjas.
Cloak;-;Great unique third-person shooter experience. I mean c'mon guys SPACE NINJAS. Plus it's free!
Shy Clinnger;-;Warframe: If you'd like to waste a lot of hours, and days passing away almost instantly because you're looting those mods, want to slice those Grineer and Corpus soldiers and make infested into green goo... You might actually like Warframe, probably more than like. It's amazing to play. And I'm not the type to actually play F2P games, but Warframe hits the spot, and you can get over 100% accuracy too!
The Dragon Memelord;-;Like Destiny, but better and it's free.
XDroptekX;-;THIS GAME IS AWEEEEESOME CANT LIE BUT ITS AWESOME FOR A FREE GAME
[OTG] NetBlaise;-;Cool game.. a must have/play.. I can't stop playing it....
Hellsing320;-;This is a great F2P game that i can play for hours and have tons of fun. if you download it and need help just message me and ill try to help in early game is a challenge so watch it
\~ViGILanT_GhoST~/;-;DRAGON FRAME>>>> THEY HAVE A FXXKING DRANGON FRAME!!!!! which alternately look kinda like a seahorse.... DRAGON AND SEAHORSE!!! 11/10 best FTP GAME EVER (ALONG WITH GHOST REC PHONTOM, that game is pretty gd too)
Baron;-;Warframe is unique, in many good ways and in many bad too. The premise of the game itself is brilliant, space ninja-samurai that fight robot-men and plauge beasts, it's radical and filled with flashy effects that you'd expect from a third person shooter mixed with a spectacle fighter, with an interesting and in-depth lore to boot it's hard to fault Warframe for what it offers and the price it offers it for, free. There is however something to note, Warframe features a cash shop that allows you buy anything within the game for Platinum, your Platinum account is charged by real world money and doing so gives you a huge boost within the game, I want to stress though that everything, every single item can be gained in game without the use of Platinum. To do so though, makes the game a massive grind. Starting solo and venturing into the game for the first time, my personal experience was that this game truly comes close to forcing you to have to pay for some item to break up the norm of running the same mission over and over again in order to gain new weapon upgrades, before spending any money on the game I was on my way to gaining my Prime Warframe, but purchasing a pack of Platinum surpassed all build times, item requirments and even allowed me to double my modification slots. A great, free game that becomes grounded by a borderline questionable payment methods, if you can deal with the occasional grind, it's well worth it. And I can totally deal with the grind.
s3r@ph;-;The only downside to this game is that there is no open world or even sandbox type environment to expand immersion within the world. In virtually every other aspect, the game is a dream-like playground for fans of games like mass effect, unreal tournament, or in some ways even Prince of Persia and Ninja Gaiden. There is wall running handled in a well executed manner, there is melee combat complete with actual combos and timing as well as blocking, there is evil space creatures and factions to kill and hate, and there is a huge array of both weapons and warframes to choose from and collect in order to diversify your experience. Even recently a new system of flight combat was added straight out of a space shooter sim hybrid. While it is true the game is VERY light on story line or explanation, and can become quite grindy after a deep binge of obsessive exposure, the core systems of the game are bieng constantly improved and there is NO pay 2 win mechanic because anything you can acquire through the shop except for a very few cosmetics are all obtainable in game. PvP players be warned however, this game is not about PvP, at all, and the PvP aspect of the game is not very well realized or implemented at this point. While PvP is playable, it is certainly not for everyone and is not what the game is focused around at all.
Lo5tInSpace;-;Logged On, Computer tells me to kill myself, Have to fight the jackal A LEVEL FRICKIN 2 BOSS THAT IS LIKE YEEEEEEEEEEEEE CROWD CONTROLL FOR YEAAAAAAARSS and then when you kill him you die from his mini troopers u AND YOUR  TEAMMATES DONT REVIVE YOU WHEN YOUR DOWN THEY JUST WALK PAST, Ai Tells  Pun, Game crashes, 12645/10 Would Buy Again
Atendega;-;A fantastic game that would be universes better with FAR FAR FAR more variety in it's environments and objectives.
MikMik;-;I started playing this game way back when it first hit steam and let me tell you, there wasn't much to be had there. It was a great concept and didn't seem like anything more than a coop thing. come into the last year or so and this game has made amazing progress and the fact that practically this game is 100% free given the fact you can trade items for Platinum (game credits) to which you can use to speed up timers, buy those aesthetic items or bluerints. You don't have to actually spend money for this game; but I can almost guarantee you will want to at some point. Warframe Login rewards will occasionally reward you with a 50% off coupon + free Plat on Platinum purchases to help regulate Plat flow in the markets, and give you a taste of what Platinum can do. Again Platinum is not needed for everything, as most things can be either farmed or bought with In-game money. But some things Will require Plat either excluseively or to help expedite things. The Core gameplay is somewhat grindy, as you'll be running missions for dailies, clearing planets to uncover new ones, gathering materials to craft new gear or items, or even gathering gear itself. Recently, updates have changed how Melee works and have also introduced Clans and PVP. Future updates are told to bring actual space play involving Jetpacks. TL;DR try the game. It's free. You could spend money if you wanted, but it's not needed. For a current gen game that has online play, free, goals and objectives, why not try it?
Al3xand3r21;-;Just Play This Now ...
JourneyPlayz;-;Very Nice Game
MooseHelm;-;First of all this game somehow doesn't feel like a grind you can get most of the weapons/frames pretty quick,the community are awesome mostly in the North American/EU servers, like help newbies etc. The stealth is just to simple and weak.Gunplay is fun with many ways to take out your enemies,from your oridnary guns to LAZORS BEAMS to enegry weapons etc. Each frame looks and funtions uniquely.There are so many ways to kill your enemies,Will you slash dash your way through your enemies? Will you zap them into oblivion? and many more.Also you can earn real life currency (platnium) though trading rare stuffs (prime parts)/mods/stuff :P. Arcwing is awesome as you fly around space and blast your way though victory, but there not much really to play arcwing as there are very little weapons/mods for it.There are syndicates you can fight for that gives you rewards of doing missions got them,though a little more lore can be added to why and how they were created so at least i could give a damn about why im helping the syndicates rather than focusing on the rewards.Overall this game is fun, but it is very repetitive though they have many game modes.They are feel the same at times
Badly Burnt Calamari;-;Space ninjas. Space baddies. Space farming. Best farming simulator 2016. 11/10 Would farm again. In all seriousness though. Warframe is a third person co-op shooter. You play as the Tenno, who seek the protect the balance. As I got into this game, it was confusing. Unless you check the wiki 24/7, which I did because I'm a nerd that way, you won't understand anything. However, once you get the hold of the mechanics, the game is really fun. However, the grinding and the cruel RNG does make this game feel repetitive time after time. When you do get burned out, just do something else. Come back in a few months and even weeks and I garuntee you that something new has been added/changed. Pros: -Beautiful Graphics -Fluid Motion -F2P completely. Everything is unlockable except for event items (which could have been done for free) and cosmetics -A Dev (Digital Extremes) that actively updates and cares about this game -Just fun Cons: -Repetitive at times -Confusing to the new player -And yes, DE is human, so they do make mistakes. These mistakes are usually temporary and will be fixed almost immediately. Overall, this game is fun and just pure awesome. Like any game, it does have it's cons but the pros heavily cover them up. I recommend you pick it up and give it a go. Remember, check the wiki. :3
GoreLeak;-;I have played this game since the day it has came out, and personally I think it's an amazing Co-Op game. If you get the chance, download it and play with me!
Glaceon's Magic Parcel;-;Press X to ninja. NOW. The Good- INCREDIBLE graphics worthy of cinema Fluent, easy-to-master controls A LOT of guns to choose from Various "Warframe" suits with different powers to suit different playing styles Various companions to aid you in your genocide Genocide Being badass whilst comitting genocide The Bad- Aforementioned graphics give older and/or weaker PCs a run for their money Acquisition of weaponrygets incredibly difficult and tedious Grinding More grinding More grinding No real campaign mode Not much of a "story" per se RIDICULOUSLY hard bosses The Ugly- Whatever the hell Lotus is wearing.
Yashira;-;Nice graphics for low engine, good gameplay although repetetive at times. 7/10
64M3_4DD1C7;-;Space ninjas. Need I say more?
Boylander;-;I give Warframe a 9/10. This is what a real free-to-play shooter should be like. I've only found very minor glitches. The graphics are amazing, better than some AAA titles. I recomend this game to everyone.
Brickstar;-;great game love it
Mrfrychicken;-;A very fun RPG with enough incentives to keep you going. There are some issues with Grinding, but for a free game I can't complain much about it. Overall, Very good.
RaveQuorra;-;Epic gameplay, massive updates, who doesn't want to play this game?? The first time I played it, it does feel a little bit dull, but now, IT IS AWESOME, like, REALLY AWESOME!! Those who likes to play 3rd shooter better try this game.. It will definitely, blow you to space! :)
GRIM REAPER;-;this game is awesome. anyone who enjoys sifi shooters. all i can say is get it
piggles;-;Why not play this game when you can work under Cube-Senpai.
miwa;-;Best F2P game I have ever played even though there are quite a number of bugs. (Still in closed beta) What are you waiting for? Be a space ninja now, grab a blade and cut enemies into half, wall run and more! :D
gunslinger 2.0;-;you should play it. its free and you are a mothering ninja
condescending asshole;-;Alongside of being addicting and fast paced (alongside of a stealth aspect being possible), the game introduces a challenging and in-depth grinding system that makes it a non pay-to-win game. Essentially a third-person Destiny, only free. No complaints here.
Choochoo;-;A fun game, especially with friends. It's a bit boring at first since you have little gear, but once you start leveling and collecting more, it becomes hard to stop. The game picks up at higher levels where enemies are more difficult. Overall a good game, definitely worth playing.
Claidheamh Mor;-;2 years of non-stop love for warframe, ive been here since closed beta and have no plan on leaving unless PWE ruins it like they do to everything they touch, i dislike you perfect world, no one likes cash cows
plinkoo;-;I LOVE EVERYTHING ABOUT THIS GAME IT IS WONDERFUL AND ADDICTING AND FUN
PandoraKae;-;I love the fact that Warframe is a social game. Unless you're kind of crazy, most of the missions require a group to complete properly, and random grouping is easy and friendly. Lots of people in the chat are willing to help out newbies, and the community seems overall very friendly. The game is beautiful, with a sleek and clean space-age aesthetic that is a lot of eye candy. There really is a Warframe for everyone, with a variety of looks, feels, builds and abilities that are as fun as they are variable. There's still a lot of small glitches here and there (not being able to see the color of another player's ship is a current one) but nothing that impacts real gameplay, so that is truly a nit-pick more then a criticism. Overall, if you love a fun flash and bash space ninja game, this is really the one for you.
mort;-;Had a good time with your friends!
Muther Rasha;-;What're you doing reading this its a good FREE TO PLAY game go get it!
Booty Lad;-;After starting Warframe, I've seen this game grow and change all for the better. Every so often, they come out with another game-changing update that will keep you hooked. If you've played Warframe when it was starting out and you haven't been back to it, you wouldn't be playing the same game (At least, you'de beed help recognizing it). Now, I'll try to keep it short, but here are the details I think you should know. Graphics: Amazing artwork, nothing to laugh at here. The visuals will not let you down, and for those with NVIDIA graphic cards, you even get extra effects that are exclusive to each character you play. Gameplay: As of right now, there are 22 characters, or "Warframes" to play as, not including several "Prime" counterparts (There are 8 Prime Warframes, 1 being unobtainable right now) Each "Warframe" has 4 unique abilites that are unlocked as you level that Warframe up. The max level for them is 30. Warframes benefit from adding Mods, which are randomly dropped from enemies. They require mod capactity, which a Warframe gains as it levels up. (there are currently 993 mods in the game) A Warframe is made by crafting 3 pieces in the players Foundry, then crafting the Warframe itself with the blueprints and all three pieces. Weapons are obtained in a similar manor, however, they vary greatly. Some weapons require parts, and others require Materials. They, too, require mod capacity for any mods to be added. The action of the game takes place in Missions (There are currently 16 mission-types) Not all missions are necessary to complete, however, certain planets and nodes require certain missions to be completed. There are 4 different factions the player will face (not including PVP) that require different strategies and builds to attack and survive. Damage types come into play here, as well as knowing what enemies are good at and hot to counter it. Free to Play: Platinum What is it? Platinum is the market currency players can buy. As a Free to Play game, Warframe makes it's money from this. Platinum can be bought from the store or traded for mods or Prime parts. What's it for? Platinum is used for buying coloring pallettes to better customize your weapons and Warframes, buy Costmetic items, buying equipment/Warframe/Weapons in the market you'de otherwise have to make, and for eliminating the crafting time of an item in the process of being made. Buying Platinum is not necessary to get far in the game. It can, however, speed things along greatly. It is important to note that the beginning of the game doesn't leave you with much. I recommend teaming up with friends if you have any already into Warframe, and if not, taking your time and completing any of the starting missions to level up and find mods.
Dr.Awkward;-;This game tends to come to me in waves... big ones. I really like this game and with 1000+ hours i can tell you its a grind...
Maniac-Watt;-;After 1 year, Warframe had evolved more than anyone would thought it did. Started off barely having any storylines and stale grinding (still fun grinding), now it had evolved to some RPG awesome love.
Warriorccc0;-;You are a Tenno, an ancient warrior reawakened to a solar system in conflict. The Grineer, a genetically deteriorated empire who use cloning, fighting against the Corpus, a merchant cult with strong technology and weapons. There is also the infested thrown in for good measure, who through a sentient virus, morphs living and robotic beings into hideous monstrosities. Warframe plays somewhat similar to Left4Dead, you can go co-op with up to four people, starting off at one part of a randomly generated map and make your way through to fulfill a objective, which can be exterminating all enemies, defending a point, defeating a boss or other such things, and afterwards you reach the exit and finish the mission. Warframes are exoskeletons used by players, they have unique looks, stats, and have 4 unique abilities each. When you start off you only get to choose one of three, but as you progress you can craft more to use. There is also a wide range of weapons, there are three different kinds you have equipped: Primary, Secondary, Melee. These can include anything from your simple rifles, shotguns, handguns, but can also include flamethrowers, throwing knives, bows, and many other exotic weapons which you can craft. You also level up your warframe and weapons, which increases stats slightly and increases mod capacity. Mods are a very interesting mechanic to the game, they modify your warframe and weapons and let you essentially min-max what you want, it adds strategy to how you play the game. Then there is the important question that comes up with most F2P games, is this Pay to Win? Can you only have fun or be as good as other people if you pay? Warframe is actually surprisingly fair with it's microtransactions, yes you can buy warframes or weapons on the market with actual cash, but it's very easy to just craft your own stuff. During missions you get resources and blueprint drops which you use to craft stuff, the only stuff you can't actually craft is cosmetic stuff and slots to carry more warframes and weapons, but thankfully you can trade with other players for platinum which you can then use, so you can very easily have a great time with Warframe without needing spend a single cent.
Lil SWAGBOI (prank gone sexual);-;Warframe, play it for the ninjas not the story, but still it is amazing game.
kentang;-;very good but little hard to play in early,
enVus;-;Well, there's not much to say about Warframe. It's got a very, very good F2P model and it ties that together in a very well rounded package of graphics and gameplay. Sure, the devs might be aiming a bit high with the $200 package but for the standard person, it's got some good stuff going for it.
1RedSkittle;-;It's a good game and has improved quite a bit through-out the updates. It's an on/off game for me personally, you'll return to it eventually. Overall pretty fun whenever you get back into the game. Also, you're a damn space ninja, what's not to love?
AngryKrogan;-;Warframe has changed a great deal since I last played it. The implementation of an actual tutorial/introduction to the universe, the addition of quests and the redesign of doing stuff in menus between missions, to walking around in your own spaceship and doing stuff between missions, all serve to make the game feel far more immersive than it was two years ago. The combat is still fun and fast paced, with a wide variety of different warframes and weapons to choose from and master, each with their own distinct abilites, strengths and weaknesses. However, the game's enviroments can get very repetitive after a while and the compelling nature of the game stems from grinding and collecting parts to build new warframes/weapons/etc (think Diablo or Torchlight), rather than experiencing a deep story and compelling characters, something which Warframe is devoid of. If you enjoy a good grindfest, you'll feel right at home. If not, then move along, this isn't the game you're looking for.
Brozime;-;Overall amazing FTP. The combat is fun if a bit tiring at times but everything can be gained through relatively low amounts of work besides pure cosmetics. The holiday events are fun and offer free cosmetics and large updates have been coming frequently to the game since it launched on steam. If you like Third person shooters you'll probably like this game. You can also check out some beginner tutorials on my channel as the full tutorial is still in development. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gq7yKi1t8RA
Sinister_Grin;-;The graphics r amazing for f2p.
Amaranthyne;-;Absolutely recommend for anyone that doesn't mind grinding through some of the slack. Space ninjas with powers is pretty fun, all the same.
Florzes Reynzo;-;WarFARM and Bugframe. Yet cool to play. WARNING: ONLY PLAY THIS GAME IF YOU WILLING TO DEVOTE YOUR WHOLE LIFE TO GRINDING AND FARMING IN THIS GAME!
Bane;-;This game is pretty addictive and the graphics are amazing, only downside is the micro-transactions but thats expected in a free-to-play game.
FroZen;-;As an organize-minded person, I will do a list of pros and cons this game has, and overall view/recommendation Pros: +Audio(gun sounds, ambient, level music etc) +Variety(amount of warframes, weapons, companions, enemy types etc) +Interesting storytelling(enemies/NPCs/playable characters' history, language, style, culture etc) +Up-to-date(widely approved in-game/game related modifications in Warframe forums added/removed in to Warframe relatively often) +Always something new(alerts, invasions, events) +Enviroment(multiple tilesets across the Solar System) +Looting system(very simple, wide variety of collectable items) +NOT pay-to-win(There is alot of things you can buy with real money via in-game alternative currency(Platinum), but you can sell in-game items for Platinum(special weapons, Prime parts. mods), gaining real money-worth in-game currency without having to use a single penny. Although this requires you to play decent amount of this game to have access to farm sellable items) Cons: -Netcode(Despite recent netcode updates, strict NAT problems still persists in some parts of the playerbase) -Tileset variety on a single level(this might bother once you've seen all tilesets many times) -Controls(takes time to learn[I got 600+ hours and still haven't completely mastered all controls]) -Resource-heavy(not recommended to run on low-end PCs, see system recommendation for more info) -Level size(for some missions, the levels forces you to do too much moving around to get to objective, and for some missions the level size is not overly small, but would definitely use a bigger combination of tilesets) -Overall bugs(random, massive, few seconds lasting framerate drops even on high-end PCs, players joining game might spawn over the map, and minor bugs that are just visual[holding your melee weapon like a rifle, or having the gun holstered and equipped at the same time, making the guns projectiles come from the holstered weaponmodels' barrel]) There probably are many other +/- in this game, but those are what came to my mind now. Anyways, I highly recommend this game to people who like MMO-styled Shooter games. Also if you only like one of those, still I recommend playing this game. And as I said before, no matter how much you feel like '' this games' soo p2w'', it definitely is not. This game just needs time and interest from a player to start ''making money''. Putting real money in to this game is completely voluntary.
The Guy From The Left;-;in which you cut dudes in half 10/10
Ghostii;-;A wonderful and inventive action four-player coop TPS and a welcome breath of fresh air in a gaming environment previously dominated by first person shooters and Call of Duty-likes. Fast-paced gunplay and creative parkour-like acrobatics coupled with alien and exotic character and creature design give Warframe refreshing 3D gameplay and aestetics without overly gimmicky or cartoony elements. Sadly, flow can easily be interrupted by game-breaking bugs, glitches, and server errors that seem to double with each patch and game update, and the game lacks many features one might expect in an MMO, such as a trading system and auction house. The game can also feel a bit grindy at times, with the need to farm the same areas multiple times to complete an item in the game's crafting system. Warframe is F2P and gets all its revenue from the in-game cash shop, where you can purchase options to further customize your Warframe, items to boost your abilities, and new weapons and Warframes. Thankfully, all items in the cash shop are also available in game through mission, so the game has adopted a pay-to-grind-less system. Despite the many flaws of the game, which is still in Open Beta, Warframe is a promising new game I would highly reccomend for anyone looking for a new and unique style of play with their friends. There are opportunities for both the hardcore number-cruncher and the casual gamer, and these aren't mutually exclusive. The wide variety of warframes, weapons, and abilities available to the player make Warframe a highly customizable and genuinely enjoyable experience for action-loves of all types. And honestly, who doesn't want to wallrun across a room, chop a robot's head off and then burn his buddy alive with your mind? Space ninjas.
Cirno Conway;-;A very grindy game, but otherwise fun if you can deal with it. Over 20 unique Warframes, TONS of weapons ranging from a simple automatic or a simple shotgun to something as crazy as a jet-fueled mace. If you can deal with a ton of grinding, this game is pretty good.
Omlette Du Fromage;-;ing amazing game. By far the best F2P game on steam so far.
VGproBis;-;Is one of the Best Free Games Here's an action Free to play you have like too
LeEddie;-;Great game, do missions, fight down bosses. You're pretty much a living, killing machine :D
Scherier;-;No thinking, no flustrating. Just relax:) This is warframe.
comrade artyom;-;the bow is cool i guess so is the game
CRUNZ4TY-;-;It's a really fun free-to-play type game where you can unlock everything for free if you have the time and patience to do so or you can support the game by buying it now. (Not a big fan of Pay 2 win games but i don't really mind). If you have some time off i recommend this game to play with a friend or three and do some missions and/or some defense missions to level up fast(er). Also remember to press "g" to mark moudels and stuff like that :)
MKultron;-;Diablo + Mass Effect + Space Ninjas theme = Warframe
KRAMUGS;-;gud to play
[TW]NateLo;-;This is really an awesome game ! You can say that it is top f2p game for now !
$@;-;Excellent game, literally the definition of immersive. If you dont have this, I have one question... Why not?
Warfare Reaper;-;if you like shooting, slashing and dashing your way to victory then this is your game.
Hoka;-;It's got a lot of grinding from where I stand, but grinding isn't so bad when you're being a space ninja, slashing and gunning down enemies and soaring through space like a one-man army of death. Addictive could very well be an understatement about this game.
J4k3 00;-;If you like futuristic games then this game is for you! Its awsome!
pyr0ball;-;This game brings the gameplay style of Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer into a new set of worlds, with much more comprehensive missions, and hundreds more weapons. I've been addicted to this game since I first layed eyes upon it. Join up and fight!
Xcorer;-;AWESOME, JUST 160 HOURS OF PURE AWESOMENESS!!!
Mental1ty;-;I had a review before, but I felt like its time to completely redo it, now that I am more experienced. So, we have Warframe. What is warframe? You are a Tenno, basically a space ninja-samurai-thing, and you have to restore balance to the galaxy. By that, you go around killing different factions, gathering their resources, to build more weapons to kill them all again. It's a loop, and if you don't like the gameplay or grinding, than this game has nothing for you. There is a tiny amount of story, but the game revolves around gameplay heavily. So, what are the three factions? -Grineer, an empire of cloned soldiers, who are genetically decaying, and who you'll probably be fighting the most. They are heavily armored, and prefer brute force. -Corpus, a conglomerate of merchants, who do whatever they can for a profit. They have armored helmets, but are mostly lightly armored, and they prefer to use robots and other tricks. -Infested, space zombies. They are infected by a virus from an old war, and kill whatever gets in their way. They are lightly armored, and usually swarm you. There are also the Orokin, but they just take some units from all three factions, and combine them all, which you'll be facing in the Orokin Towers, where you'll be spending most of the endgame. There are also a multitude of weapons. Some of them are better than others. For example, the Soma and the Soma prime spew crits like crazy. The Boltor Prime does pure damage, and the Latron Prime is very accurate, and very ammo efficient. There are constant wars over which is better, but it usually boils down to personal preferance. Modding can be a bit tricky to get used too, but there are builds online, and it's not too hard to learn. There are also Warframes, which is basically your class. They al lhave different stats (Health, Shield, Armor, Movement speed, and others), and different powers, which reflect what their based of (Necromancer, assassin, paladin, etc.) They take a while to farm, and 3 days to craft, but some completely change your playstyle compared to others. So, what about the gameplay? As you are a space ninja thing, you have a large amount of abillities, which include: Wallrunning, rolling, lots of melle attacks, wallrunning and shooting, sliding, sliding and shooting, slide melee attacks, and some others. You use all your abillities, weapons, and powers, along with three other Tenno, to run around maps, and kill everyone in sight. You've probably also seen it was free to play, so you're wondering "Is this game Pay2Play?" Well, my answer is a complete NO. Th eonly things you can get with only the premium currency (platinum) are cosmetic items, and you can get platinum from trading, so anything is available with dedication. All the game changing items are available for free. The community is great. Aside from some heated arguments (Boltor Prime vs. Soma Prime), they answer questions, are generally polite, and if you need help with a quest, want to do a tower, etc., ask in recruting chat, and they will probably help. So, this game all boils down to personal preference. Do you prefer the combat? Play it. Do you prefer grinding? Play it. Do you prefer a great story? Not the best game for you. I personally love this game, and I recommend you give it a try. If you don't like it, no money lost. If you love it, you are going to be spending lots of time on it. I've almost spent 400 hours, and that pales in comparison to some of my friends.
MastaMemebyte;-;You're a Space Ninja, what more do I need to say?
iamstillwater;-;Warframe is addicting in that it's space ninjas who cut and shoot stuff. At the same time, it's a bit grindy unless you've spent some money for platinum. Try the game, see if you like it, then come back for more.
Z3NRage;-;Ive Been Playing this game since Closed Beta aand its come a long way with very few flaws. This is my Favorite game of all time why? Because its free, the graphics are stunning,the environment is beatiful, and minor pay 2 win engine (even though i waisted more than 150$ on this game.....dont judge me)Overall its a very well and thought out game it is difficult but if u put some time in it you'll be quite the master space ninja you always wanted to be as a kid. Updates are always something spectaceclur even small updates like hotfixes or some more enemies can change the game a lot (like for example update 14 and 15 those where hude updates that brought more than 100,000 people back into the action) so my rating for this game (MY OK MY NOT IGN'S) 10/10.1
Mentova;-;The base gameplay of "shoot mans" is pretty damn solid and the devs are incredibly quick at releasing new content. Since the game was in closed beta it has become much, much better and very different. The devs even have some more massive gameplay changes coming that sound badass. The only problem I'd say this game has is that they don't balance some things very well (which isn't too big of a deal since its a co-op game and not competative) and the "catalyst/reactor" upgrade system (also not too big of a deal, but can be annoying). In short, the base gameplay is a blast and the devs are incredible at keeping it updated and fresh.
8Z;-;The only grinding game where the customer support will give your items back if you encountered a bug. 11/10 Will ask customer support to give back stuff again.
Mordecur;-;Want to be a space ninja with awesome looks and abilities killing everything? This is the perfect game for that.
Mr. Staffordshire;-;this is a holarius game its fantastic tell everyone about this game. the mulltiplayer can lag somtime but its the best game ever
[  ] [EV] Simple;-;When I first downloaded this game, my first thought was: "This game you cannot solo, and act like rocky." however as I progressed on through the game, and got better frames, and weapons & just in general better experience with the game I soon realised with the right setup you can solo anything if you put your mind to it. I loved this game so much that I spent 95 on the Loki Prime Acess package, soon after that I bought 5 kubrows and probably spent around 550platinum on them. Soon after that I stopped playing and left all my beloved Kubrows in Stasis where they would be safe (This was before they added "Consign to lotus" ability) 3/4 months later I came back to this game to find that 5/6 of my Kubrows which I spent platinum on had been removed, so I had been left with 1 fully grown one and 4 other baby ones (none of which I payed plat for) - So I contacted the support about this issue, and they deleted the logs of me ever owning those kubrows, and ever spending platinum on them. They deleted the Kubrows and said there are no logs of me owning any kubrows. This made me stop playing the game which I loved and spent so much of my money on (P.S I am 16 going on 17 and do not have any income so nearly 100 is a lot for me). This game has a great community and this is why I keep coming back to it, and enjoy playing it. It improves a lot, and as the game improves it adds new challenges for you to conquer with your friends. If you are lucky you can join an already made clan (I wouldn't suggest starting your own clan as it costs a lot of items to make a decent Dojo) - But if you join a pre made clan, and they're active and kind, and they help you out with missions and stuff, then stick around until you improve and help some of their new members out. The clans on here are really fun to be apart of, as they are able to attack a sector on the solor system and it brings you to a fight with the current clan/alliance owning it. P.S: DE are money grabbing s Pick this game up at all costs and play it, but please make sure if you purchase anything on this game with real money, make sure you will receive the items you buy ingame with the platinum (which you get).
Cyclone;-;After playing this game for almost 2 years for over a 1000 hours i can safely say that it's a lot of fun! If you don't plan to play it for long as a free to play player. Ok don't get me wrong, you can get EVERYTHING a paid user can get with literally no exceptions thanks to the trading system. You can trade paid currency and many in game item blueprints and mods as you like. This allows free to play users to earn paid currency. However if you're going this route expect to farm 24/7 for the rest of your life. I'm one of the Founders of this game and i own the highest prime access pack which give the highest value for money paid currency. Yet i still haven't managed to 100% this over all my hours of playtime. Good News Though, unless you're a crazy collector like me, you'll never have to. You can easily get proper gear you like within a week or two of playing. I cannot stress enough how much care and love was put into this game, the updates are more frequent than i'v seen in any game ever. Adding a bunch of new maps,warframes,guns,cosmetics and a ton of other stuff. It is the most space ninja game you're gonna get with an  ing ton of content. I recommend this game to it's fullest! It has it's flaws obviously... it can be pretty buggy at times but that's to be expected with constant updates, thankfully the bugs are dealt with rapidly but new ones will still come around. It is pretty grindy in it's nature and there are timewalls on crafting but they are no problem whatsoever once you have sated your lust for your first gear. What i do not recommend however is buying weapons or warframes directly from the in game store, the prices are really high and they're that way on purpose. You're really intended to craft them, that's how i got 95% of my gear. However if you are into costumizing your looks, well you're in luck. The prices for cosmetics in this game are very resonable and with the daily chance to get a 25% , 50% or 75% discount on the paid currency you can end up with a ton for dirt cheap. Warframe.. The Space Ninja Simulator RECOMMENDED
Krion;-;In the past one year there has only been one game that has kept my attention span for over 200 hours of play time and that is Warframe. As of the date of this review they just added a week ago a player driven economy and politics system which makes the map of the solar system dynamic! Nuff said!
?????;-;I could get into this game if the melee attacks was not so stiff....sheesh.....i have to spin the view around 4 times before I can kill something. Lack of a lock on feature in a fast paced game is also a dissapointment.
Nova Prime;-;Even though some people may complain about this game for it's excessive grind or the need to pay money, at it's core its a fun, space ninja shooter. Instead of having the take cover against the enemies, they have to take cover against you. My only complaint about this game would be the excessive grind in some areas, and the seemingly neverending cycle of patch, introduce more bugs, patch again. 7.5/10
Nahsik;-;I've been playing Warframe for quite some time, and it's by far one of my favorite games. It has the feeling of a fast pace shooter game, but with a unique feeling of individual player abilities and customization. Amazing graphics and decent community. With the different mission types and hundreds of weapons, there's always something to do.
Stryckr13;-;Its a good game.
HappyBastard;-;for free this game is really good thats all im saying
BNMspare;-;This game was awesomness, but its too hard for playing single player.
Chipiee;-;One of the best games ive ever played :D
[Cube]Von Karma;-;Pretty fun game ive spent hours playing it on my laptop
WEREWOLF;-;Its rly fun to play and for a free game it has a lot of graphics! :P
Snowybear49;-;Mixed opinion on this, the gameplay is great, with the wall running the brilliant animations and the series of characters you can play with that all have their own abilities. HOWEVER, the developers have used a tile system so after a while the maps get repetitive and they all look the same, that said the enemies are also reused and the only change is their lvl scaling, this game Is mostly for those who have nothing they'd rather be doing and just want to stab things with a sharp discus and shoot an arrow into something with a helmet 5 times bigger than the actual head(seriously knock off the grinners head & helmet and the head is actually a regular sized head.
AssassinLord101;-;One description of the game: Grindy Another description: Epic
kc_rednex;-;Played quite a while back and it was an awesome game back then. Haven't even finished reinstalling it and I know I can easily recommend it. Hands down one of the best F2P games out there with a lot of replayability.
George Bot;-;As an oldbro, and as a Tenno, I say... Go and play Warframe. Sure, it has problems. Sure, the playerbase knows nothing better but to run around with boltor primes guns blazing. Sure, half the time you;re online you go and farm xp in Draco. But, you see, Warframe makes you powerful. It makes you feel powerful. Hell, it even gives you three Warframes with strange... protrusions. And a stance that... erm... you understand. So go and play Warframe. You'll see the way.
~Naked Pikachu >~;-;To anyone who never played Warframe yet , here is a clear review for you from someone who played over 200 hours : NOTE : THIS MAY BE LONG REVIEW BUT IT WILL GIVE YOU THE INFORMATION YOU NEED . This game is worth playing and it's a great game to try for a lot of reasons : 1- This is not a pay2win game , you can almost have everything in it by grinding and crafting , I have some rare gear and frames in game and I didn't pay anything . 2-This not just a shooting game , you can run on walls , climb high places and even do stealth kills and avoid alarms ,if you get spotted you can stop the alarm too . 3-Frequent Updates and bug fixes , Nice events to join in and get a prizes sometimes . 4-Nice Support team that will reply to your complaints and try to solve your issues. 5-Very nice community and helpful players , it's rarely to find a rude player or a troll . 6-This game has no hackers or cheaters so far from my perspective. 7-you can trade some stuff you find with Platinum(in-game currency) with other players . Regardless of this game's positive things , There is some negatives that may annoy you : 1-This game has a LOT of bugs , even with updates and fixes , sometimes new bugs occur with the new update and fixes for old bugs . 2-Grinding and collecting resources may become very frustrating and make you feel that the gameplay is so repetitive , Specially if you are farming for a rare recourse and you need like 10 , the chance of getting 1 of this resource vary by your luck , if you are not lucky you may replay the same mission 4 times for just 1/10 of it ... 3-Game is very challenging and somehow hard for new players whose their rank is still low ,it will be very hard to play solo and you will always need squads until you have better frames/weapons . 4-Even with all the great thing in this game and you can almost get everything in it for free , There is still some Limitations that FORCES you to buy ! , for example if you want a bigger Inventory for frames or weapons ,Yes you will surely need a much bigger Inventory for everything which dissapoints me as a Warframe player. 5-Buying Platinum(In-Game Currency) somehow expensive and you will feel ripped of ! , like for 20$ you can get like 175 plat , if you want to buy a weapone from market or a ready crafted frame it will cost you 225 ++ plat , 2 inventory slots cost 12 plat , 1 Warframe slot will cost 20 , so you will need to spend a lot for little upgrades in the game. One Last Note : Despite of the negative side of this game , I Totally Recommend this game , it's a great experience and you will enjoy it ,besides it's still Beta so bugs will be fixed soon . I WILL WAIT FOR YOU IN THE FIELD FELLOW TENNO :)
Mukesh;-;Wow, well, where to start? Warframe is just brilliant! The best free to play game on steam(not counting TF2, because that was paid at one point)! The concept itself is just so tempting, you're a space ninja who beats up robots, ugly guys and sometimes space zombies! The graphics and art style fit the game perfectly. It has a great combat system, large selection of weapons and a vast amount of mods you can apply to make your weapon suit whatever roll you need. And each warframe has it's own abilities, and they are awesome! They range from distractions, teleporting, freezing, poisoning, creating black holes, clearing a room in a single stomp or even punching your enemies very soul out of their body! Theres just too much to talk about at once, it'd make your head spin. Great and helpful community and an awesome Dev team who just work on this game because they love to! The only money they get really is from people who pay for in-game currency, platinum. This is where most F2P games fail. Free to play but Pay to Win! This is not the case, everything you see can be obtained without pumping any money at all into your warframe account. Want a new gun? Buy a blueprint and get the resources! most of the time it isnt even that hard to grind for them. Tho warframes can take wuite a long time to obtain without money, it's so much more fun and rewarding doing it manually. What can't be bought from blueprints are available via random events. Seriously, if you havn't played this game. Just go, get this, now! It's badass! It's fun! IT'S FREE! You have nothing to loose except countless hours :P
[MAD6] Lioneye;-;This is a game I've been playing consistently for over a year now. The development team communicates with the community extremely well and they do massive updates every 2-3 months. The gameplay is solid, it looks great, and is a great co-op game to play through.
C4Chaos42;-;The overall gameplay and features are wonderful in this game, a really well developed masterpiece. Some of the things that really catch my attention and hopefully yours, I've listed below. Please try the game to see if you like it, everyone is different. + Free to Play - Paying wont give you an advantage over other players, it will only reduce waiting times to build items, unlock skins and colors pallets and other cosmetics. Everything that is not cosmetic, you can obtain from playing the game. + Free content - The game is constaly updated with new content - Weapons, Warframes, maps and game modes. + Events - There a multiple events in this game from which you can experience alternating goals + Weapon Modifications - Modify the damage, fire rate, add elemental type damage, reload speed, recoil control, appearance/color etc... + Warframe modifications - Run speed, health, shield, maximum energy, ability damage, ability radius/reach, appearance/color + Up to 4 Player online Mulitplayer - cooperative or deathmatch arena. + Bosses - Tiny to huge, deadly and tactical. These bosses know how to get under your skin. When you beat them, you'll find good rewards. + Voice chat (Optional) - Don't stop to type in deadly situations that require coordination, just talk using a microphone. Alternatively you can use the voice chat to chill, have some beers and talk about nonesense. + Large player base - Never feel alone in your region, there's always some people online that want to do what you want to do. Most of the players are also nice and they don't undermine anyone because of the shared common goals. - Repetition - Sometimes it will get too repetitive, so have another game you alternate between. - New HUD - Feels weird to some, may take time to get used to.
Kageryu;-;Basically you are a futuristic ninja in space, why would you not play this game?
Eddie;-;One of the great F2P Games out there ! Not P2W at all ! everything can be earned with in-game cash/items !
Mateszhun;-;This game is space ninja themed TPS, it has parkour moves, guns and fun abilities. It has nice visuals even on a low end PC, and even the visual design is good. It is a little bit grindy and repetative, but if you like the theme you won't mind it. It's not pay to win, it's only pay to spare your time (but then you get left out of the fun). The only drawback for this game is the bugs. When old bugs get patched new ones appear, so if you haven't played a buggy game for a long time, this one is not for you. But most players can live with the game's bugs, bec they are usually not annoying.
Pillow Valley;-;Good Game, but somewhat buggy
Handsome Jack;-;Great game.
spazztwich;-;great game tons of features must play
| JeffBarrels;-;Tis Be but a magnificent game worthy of the gods like loki (pun intended)
Scrub Mcfeed;-;Fun Shooter version of Diablo, Digital Extremes is good about updates and listens to the community. 8/10 though the game is still in beta. Written as of Update 12
Hoka;-;It's got a lot of grinding from where I stand, but grinding isn't so bad when you're being a space ninja, slashing and gunning down enemies and soaring through space like a one-man army of death. Addictive could very well be an understatement about this game.
J4k3 00;-;If you like futuristic games then this game is for you! Its awsome!
pyr0ball;-;This game brings the gameplay style of Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer into a new set of worlds, with much more comprehensive missions, and hundreds more weapons. I've been addicted to this game since I first layed eyes upon it. Join up and fight!
Xcorer;-;AWESOME, JUST 160 HOURS OF PURE AWESOMENESS!!!
Mental1ty;-;I had a review before, but I felt like its time to completely redo it, now that I am more experienced. So, we have Warframe. What is warframe? You are a Tenno, basically a space ninja-samurai-thing, and you have to restore balance to the galaxy. By that, you go around killing different factions, gathering their resources, to build more weapons to kill them all again. It's a loop, and if you don't like the gameplay or grinding, than this game has nothing for you. There is a tiny amount of story, but the game revolves around gameplay heavily. So, what are the three factions? -Grineer, an empire of cloned soldiers, who are genetically decaying, and who you'll probably be fighting the most. They are heavily armored, and prefer brute force. -Corpus, a conglomerate of merchants, who do whatever they can for a profit. They have armored helmets, but are mostly lightly armored, and they prefer to use robots and other tricks. -Infested, space zombies. They are infected by a virus from an old war, and kill whatever gets in their way. They are lightly armored, and usually swarm you. There are also the Orokin, but they just take some units from all three factions, and combine them all, which you'll be facing in the Orokin Towers, where you'll be spending most of the endgame. There are also a multitude of weapons. Some of them are better than others. For example, the Soma and the Soma prime spew crits like crazy. The Boltor Prime does pure damage, and the Latron Prime is very accurate, and very ammo efficient. There are constant wars over which is better, but it usually boils down to personal preferance. Modding can be a bit tricky to get used too, but there are builds online, and it's not too hard to learn. There are also Warframes, which is basically your class. They al lhave different stats (Health, Shield, Armor, Movement speed, and others), and different powers, which reflect what their based of (Necromancer, assassin, paladin, etc.) They take a while to farm, and 3 days to craft, but some completely change your playstyle compared to others. So, what about the gameplay? As you are a space ninja thing, you have a large amount of abillities, which include: Wallrunning, rolling, lots of melle attacks, wallrunning and shooting, sliding, sliding and shooting, slide melee attacks, and some others. You use all your abillities, weapons, and powers, along with three other Tenno, to run around maps, and kill everyone in sight. You've probably also seen it was free to play, so you're wondering "Is this game Pay2Play?" Well, my answer is a complete NO. Th eonly things you can get with only the premium currency (platinum) are cosmetic items, and you can get platinum from trading, so anything is available with dedication. All the game changing items are available for free. The community is great. Aside from some heated arguments (Boltor Prime vs. Soma Prime), they answer questions, are generally polite, and if you need help with a quest, want to do a tower, etc., ask in recruting chat, and they will probably help. So, this game all boils down to personal preference. Do you prefer the combat? Play it. Do you prefer grinding? Play it. Do you prefer a great story? Not the best game for you. I personally love this game, and I recommend you give it a try. If you don't like it, no money lost. If you love it, you are going to be spending lots of time on it. I've almost spent 400 hours, and that pales in comparison to some of my friends.
MastaMemebyte;-;You're a Space Ninja, what more do I need to say?
iamstillwater;-;Warframe is addicting in that it's space ninjas who cut and shoot stuff. At the same time, it's a bit grindy unless you've spent some money for platinum. Try the game, see if you like it, then come back for more.
Z3NRage;-;Ive Been Playing this game since Closed Beta aand its come a long way with very few flaws. This is my Favorite game of all time why? Because its free, the graphics are stunning,the environment is beatiful, and minor pay 2 win engine (even though i waisted more than 150$ on this game.....dont judge me)Overall its a very well and thought out game it is difficult but if u put some time in it you'll be quite the master space ninja you always wanted to be as a kid. Updates are always something spectaceclur even small updates like hotfixes or some more enemies can change the game a lot (like for example update 14 and 15 those where hude updates that brought more than 100,000 people back into the action) so my rating for this game (MY OK MY NOT IGN'S) 10/10.1
ALF;-;The first 5 hours were pretty horrific, you go in, the combat feels slow, everything that cost RL money seems to expensive. Then you start fighting in groups, you start realizing the training wheels are off, you start realizing how you can build your own play style, you realize that the cash shop stuff is a shortcut you really don't need to take, and that simply playing the game and evolving your strategies as you go depending on your mission and frames is fun and rewarding. Pros: -Menus, your ship is the menu, it is gorgeous -Insane customization of stats and builds and weapons -Community of people who (statistically) welcome, encourage, and teach -Gorgeous graphics (when everything is cranked to max) -Cash shop isn't needed to progress or enjoy a thing -Mowing down waves of enemies that aren't too bright is pretty relaxing and fun -New Warframes (at lvl 30) really bring about different ways of playing Cons -RNG, the "endgame" gear is all about grinding out challenging (but repetitive) missions for the low % chance of the items you actually need appearing -Certain aspects just aren't finished (Archwing, its melee/gun Star Fox, but gorgeous) which can leave certain modes/areas feeling shallow -PC controls for wall running/jumping rather clunky for a "Space Ninja Simulator" -Stealth, its not a working system in the game, its rather frustrating and slow to try and only stealth through a level, the current system isn't built for it Is it the best overall game you've played? No. Is it fun to relax after work and mow down hordes with your friends? Yes.
Relonikiv;-;Warframe is love. Warframe is life. 10/10
Budder Asian;-;its really awesome game and slices and dices which i like alot :)
Bambafrank;-;This game is awesome and so addictive!
EyeOfCthulhu;-;THIS IS A AWESOME GAME SO REALISTIC!
The Finest;-;One of the best F2P games i have ever played.
KorbanGado;-;I've already done a full review elsewhere (https://k986terminal.squarespace.com/k986-games/2013/6/6/warframe), but the main thing to know here is that it is a good substitute for the ME3 Multiplayer if you don't have it for PC. The dev team is constantly working to upgrade and make their game better, all the while trying to listen to the huge slurry of player responses and generate new content at the same time. As a F2P, it's one of the more effective layouts I've seen - as you can earn everything except slots to put things in entirely just by spending the time to grind/farm/luck it out. The pricing seems to be a bit steep as is most F2P games out there, but it's also not unreasonable considering the charges are essentially just there to replace the time investment on most items. Lots of unique "classes" in the warframes, lots of different weapons, an ongoing BETA that has resulted in numerous fundamental systems being overhauled in one way, shape, or form - it's worth a try at the very least - even more so if you play with friends.
Edythir;-;This game is fun. Amazingly so. But it has it's cons too. One of the facts that i love so much about this game is that most of the features are really unique. Like you can buy a lot of stuff for Platinum (Premium credits) but you can get platinum without having to spend a cent. Got a rare mod or items? Sell them in the trading section for platinum that you can use and trade however you wish. The leveling system is fun as well, There are 2 types of levels. Weapon and Character levels. And there are also Mastery Ranks. Basically the difference is that Mastery Rank can only climb in XP. There are 17 of them and each more different than the last. BUT! How you get XP is unique as well, you get 100 Mastery XP from LEVELING UP your WEAPON. and 200 for leveling up your Warframe. And when you have enough for a level up you face a Master Rank Challenge that differs each time. First killing with primary weapon within time limit, then kill with secondary, then with Melee. Then here come the fun part, the fourth is hacking consoles withing the time limit, it is a sort of minigame within the game you can do to reset alerts. The the Fifth is sharpshooting, shooting assigned targets within the time limit. Weapons level ups don't make you weapon stronger, but it gives 1 mod capacity per level at the maximum of 30 levels. But you can use a Orokin Catalyst or a Orokin Reactor to double the mod capacity to 60. In game term this is called Poatoing due to the shape of them. Changing your mods can DRASTICALLY improve you weapons. from adding elemental damage to increasing damage to adding clip size, total amunition or increasing fire rate. The mods for Warframes are different, they give plus shield capacity, plus health and buffs such as those. But also they can give things such as loot and enemy radars, make a shockwave from your feet when you jump from high up and land. But also the adition of Aura Mods are available for Warframes and Melee weapons. Aura Mods give extra mod capicity and grants you bonuses such as energy regen or health regen, some give gun damage or extra health or extra ammo. POLARITIES are basically types of mods. If you match a Mod polarity with a weapon or a warframe polarity, it only costs half. If you mismatch the polarities, it costs 1 or 2 more. Aura mods give double plus in mod capicity if matched with the right polarity FORMA you can use on max level weapons or frames to reset their level to level 0 but it does not make it any more powerful, instead you can alter one slot to what ever polarity you want, making you ale to fit more powerful mods on it. Now enough of this pros. Lets talk Cons. This game is glitchy and sometimes has poor AI. I have seen it time and time again where an enemy is 'hiding' behind a wall and won't do anything unless you are standing in their faces. This game is unbelievably grindy. When you have played it much, even as little as i have, you start to have a plethora of resources. I have like 60.000 of everything common that drops in packages of 200-300. And i have up to 150 of the rarest resources. the game counters that with ARGON CRYSTALS. To get argon crystals, you must first grind for a key that randomly drops in survival or defence misions, then you must do the mission the key opens and hope you get an extra rare resource, i have done 4 of these missions with loot radar and not get 1 of them. So, finally you got an Argon crystal but SURPRISE! it disappears from your inventory after 24 hours. And some require to have 3 of these things. So for the most powerful and most grindy weapon out there, the Dragon Nikana, you had to; Farm for 75 OXIUM, which you could only get by defeating specific flying enemies called OXIUM OSPREY. Oh, and here is the catch, if you shoot them they suicide bomb you and you get no drops, try to use melee and they fly away. So after weeks of grinding for oxium you need to have 1 forma as well, forma blueprints are found as a login reward or in special alert missions, and making it takes 1 of every ultra rare resource (Morphics, Gallium, Neural Sensors) and 24 hours to wait. Oh. and did i mention the 3 argon crystal that are required as well? So finally you got your Nikana. But to upgrade that to the Dragon Nikana, you need to have 1 argon crystal another 75 oxium and the mastery rank of 8. that takes a long time. So you can grind and grind and grind for hours but you can't keep using your same weapons or else you won't get any mastery rank ups, i didn't figure this out so i spent 70 hours without switching weapons so i am only in mastery rank 6 now.
Microsoft Office Assistant;-;This review is split into sections, using numerals to show each section. My rating: All in all I would rate it an 8/10. Would recommend if you can deal with a decent amount of grinding and some bugs. Also this game is still in BETA! I The game modes are: Exterminate (eliminate all enemies), Mobile Defense (taking a DataMass to a Control Panel, then defending it), Defense (defending something for 5 waves at a time), Survival (survive a mass onslaught of enemies for as long as possible, rewards every 10 minutes), Excavate (defend and keep a scanner and its excavators powered to extract resources, Interception (you Capture and Defend several points from being taken over by enemies), Sabotage (Destroy a Reactor), Assassinate (all boss missions, and to kill high valued targets), and Hijack (defend a mobile target and possibly destroy it). The game is 100% Co-Op, unless you go to the PVP (Player Versus Player) areas. Graphics are good. Gameplay is very grindy, sometimes buggy, and very well balanced. Bugs well crap II The game is grind worthy, grinding through many missions to progress is slightly boring. But considering that each mission is never the same, in the sense that they will always look different from the last time you played it. All weapons can be OP if you mod then properly, and you obtain mods from trading other players, rewards from missions, or by defeating enemies. There are Warframes, which is basically your suit with magical powers that are very destructive against enemies. There are 300ish missions and more than 10 different planets/moons with 10 or more missions each, with their matching environmental art styles. Each Warframe has their own special four abilities unique to that Warframe. Warframes abilities range from being able to turn invisible, to being able to stomp the ground and suspend all the enemies in the air, to shooting spikes into every enemy within your sights. The weapons in game can range from a Jet Power Hammer, to a Pistol that shoots rockets, to a gun that shoots circular blades or bolts. The lore is very simple, and easy to remember. There are three main factions, the Grineer that are a bunch of brain washed clones, the Corpus that probably are like humans, and the infested that are infested creatures of doom. There is an enemy called the Stalker that rarely shows up if a boss curses you, and then there are the G3 and Zanuka that do the same thing. You have these syndicates that are 6 different groups, you sign up with one and then you trade this thing called standing for a mod that boosts your Warframes abilities, or a weapon, or something else. The basic 300 missions, are the normal missions, then there are Void missions and derelict missions. Void missions come in 4 Tiers, each increasing Tier number indicates increasing difficulty. There is a void boss called Corrupted Vor, he comes around just as rarely as the Stalker does, but only in the void. Derelict are basically the Tier 3 and 4 but only with infested enemies. Also customization of your Warframe/weapons is pretty good, you can change every color to whatever you want, and same for additional cosmetics. Credits are the basic currency in the game, Orokin Ducats are prime pieces (rewards from void missions) traded for special currency to be traded for Primed mods/cosmetics, and the premium currency platinum. Platinum can be earned by the login rewards, by trading rare mods/prime components, or by purchasing them. Archwing I have not done too much of this yet, as such I am unable to give 100% valid information. AFAIK (As Far As I Know), you have a jetpack and fly through space and continue your basic objectives, and you can go fast just like Sonic the Hedgehog. This is mainly unfinished structure added into the game, there have been several alerts in game using this game type; but it remains with little content. III Alerts One of the best ways of acquiring rare mods/items is through daily/special alerts. There are daily alerts that often reward with only credits or a few resources, but sometimes they have a rare mod or weapon as a reward, sometimes rare resources. Normally a weapon or some high cost item would be reward from a Tactical Alert, rarely some type of cosmetic items. Tactical Alerts are long and tedious alerts that last a week or so, in which the player needs to complete a very hard challenge in order to obtain said item(s). The Tactical Alerts are mainly for experienced players, who are looking for challenge. IV Raids Raids are very hard (in my opinion much more difficult than Tactical Alerts), they offer a rare arcane item, and require a massive amount of teamwork. There currently is only one raid in the game, it has several team based puzzles/challenges, which works well with 8 player squads. In the end you face off a very easy to kill boss, as long as you dont die. My rating: All in all I would rate it an 8/10. Would recommend if you can deal with much grinding/some bugs/ absolute nonsense.
]][[;-;I founded love in this game.PLAY IT NOW
TheObliviousPrussian;-;Beta got boring really quick.... its been in beta for quite a while now and well, I dont know if it has gotten better or worse. All I know is its very based on alot of grinding on these boring missions, that like I said, get boring very quickly.
Ge[c]k0zZzZ;-;This game is awesome, just due to the fact that it is free and that the archwing staff care about their community. Try out the game for yourself, this game is worth it.
DuckFeces;-;It's worth every potato
Ventocrazy;-;Really well-made game that introduces features like sprinting and shooting at the same time, a little bit of parkour, crafting, shooting behind you while running, and other well-made features. I highly recommend this game!
-Imperial II- Magnificient;-;Never played it... everyones giving it a thumbs so... why shouldn't I?
Zesty!;-;It's very seldom that I find a free MMO that I like. Cash shops are a huge turn off for me, and I can be the class that I want to be. I recommend Warframe because although I'm a bit underpowered for not farming or buying anything, I will quickly be able to build the class that I want with the items I want, all within what I think is a reasonable timeframe for a game like this (~ 12 hours).
- killA_-);-;Nothing special :|
[KB-B] Captain Jag;-;I wouldy highly recomend this game to all ages exept for the parts were it has blood but apart from that this game is a realy good high grahpiced space ninja game! FIVE STARS
Renegade;-;Awesome ftp, always fun to play with friends but the one downside is real time for crafting
PandaPorn Trading inventory;-;Awesome game its better than the old game but it take FOREVER to get the stuff for a new guy
AngryKrogan;-;Warframe has changed a great deal since I last played it. The implementation of an actual tutorial/introduction to the universe, the addition of quests and the redesign of doing stuff in menus between missions, to walking around in your own spaceship and doing stuff between missions, all serve to make the game feel far more immersive than it was two years ago. The combat is still fun and fast paced, with a wide variety of different warframes and weapons to choose from and master, each with their own distinct abilites, strengths and weaknesses. However, the game's enviroments can get very repetitive after a while and the compelling nature of the game stems from grinding and collecting parts to build new warframes/weapons/etc (think Diablo or Torchlight), rather than experiencing a deep story and compelling characters, something which Warframe is devoid of. If you enjoy a good grindfest, you'll feel right at home. If not, then move along, this isn't the game you're looking for.
Brozime;-;Overall amazing FTP. The combat is fun if a bit tiring at times but everything can be gained through relatively low amounts of work besides pure cosmetics. The holiday events are fun and offer free cosmetics and large updates have been coming frequently to the game since it launched on steam. If you like Third person shooters you'll probably like this game. You can also check out some beginner tutorials on my channel as the full tutorial is still in development. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gq7yKi1t8RA
Amaranthyne;-;Absolutely recommend for anyone that doesn't mind grinding through some of the slack. Space ninjas with powers is pretty fun, all the same.
KING KHAN KILL;-;This game is a extreme masterpiece created for every pc. I thank the developers for there hard work and time for producing such a brilliant video game. Awesome graphics ! Creative gameplay ! Tons of weapons you can buy if you progress in the game ! It is free-to-play !! .......and a  load of missions to do!! I Would reccomend this game to every pc user
Classic;-;Fantastic, but if it has First Person Mode, this will make me crazy.
agusindrachok;-;this game is great game i like it
Edward the Great;-;Warframe is not a player friendly game but if you have a friend who is already experienced with the game or you can just read 1 or 2 guides you will be fine but overal Warframe is Very fun if you wanna be a freking SPACE NINJA and murder fools with all maner of weapons and super powers.
Smiley;-;Awsome
Eldyer;-;Very addicting, in the beginning. Seems like the new warframes are pay-to-win, which kind of turned me off.
Buttmuffin;-;This years installment of Tony Hawk's Pro Skater has taken a surprising turn, adding ninjas in space and neat missions, whilst keeping all of the co-op joy we all know and love. No for real though, don't let the metascore fool you, this is a very solid game with dedicated developers and the first F2P game that hasn't infuriated me with pay2win . Everything in-game that isnt discontinued can be aquired without spending a single shekel, and it is very doable to get expensive stuff from the market within a day by grinding for stuff and then selling said stuff on the trade chat. Not that there is a point to that, since the best items arent even in the market. TL;DR This game is paynot2grindasmuch if you're REALLY lazy, and its a great co-op game thats quickly turning into one of my favourites.
-SKRETAX-;-;The best online Multiplayer game I have played to date. If you havent played this you are missing out on a lot. Try it out :)
TheRageGuy;-;the best grinding game ever
Star;-;First and foremost, Warframe is a fast-paced, third-person, free-to-play shooter that is set thousands of years in the future, so it does have a big sci-fi element to it. There is a focus on co-operative gameplay, but it is viable to play alone, and with the recent PvP revamp co-op isn't the only thing to do. Free-to-play may scare some people off, but I have to say, this is a game that does it right. Micro-transactions do exist, but everything in the game can be earned through playing the game, albeit at a slower pace than simply buying it outright. Before I would say the only exception to this would be inventory slots and cosmetics, but since trading was introduced those exceptions quickly disappeared, leaving the system a true "Pay-for-convenience" one instead of a "Pay-to-win" one. The gameplay is fast, fluid, sometimes a little choatic, and easy to learn yet has some depth to it. The movement system itself will be changing soon, but at the moment it is also easy to learn, except for a couple of "mechanics" that aren't immediately apparent, such as "coptering" and "wall-flinging," but these are things that are picked up quickly as you learn. There's a lot of customization in the game as well, allowing you to choose from a variety of different Warframes, weapons, and companions, as well as how they look. On top of that, you can tweak their effectiveness through the use of the mod card system, allowing for quite a few different playstyles. The game isn't without its issues though, such as parts of the grind, the tutorial, and the state of end-game. As a free-to-play game, it does have grind, so if you're the kind that hates grinding, you may be turned away by this, and yes, since it's all RNG, it can be terrible at times, but it isn't on par with the kind of grinding you would see in Korean RPGs. The tutorial is rather long and drawn-out, and leaves some things unexplained, or aren't explained very well. I recommend asking around for help in the first relay (Social hubs) or looking at the Warframe wiki [warframe.wikia.com] for anything you need to know, while region chat should be left as a last resort. End-game is probably Warframe's weakest point, as it's either collecting everything or going for as long as you can in endless missions while waiting for the next event to pop up, but with the addition of raids and PvP, those are probably going to become a part of it as well, for the better. Since there isn't a real defined end-game, you're free to make your own. Of course, that is all my own opinion. All in all, Warframe is a fun, free-to-play, third person shooter that has eaten up more than a lot of my time, and I recommend at least giving it a try. What is there to lose? It's free.
Infante RavenRokh;-;Absolutely love this game. Still, anything can be good by adding Space Ninjas, am I right?
Zeka74;-;So this a game you grind in(alot...like no really alot) Just getting that out of the way now. Plot wise,the story is still developing and gets quests that add to it when updates come out,This isnt that great to me.It looks like it could have amazing lore once it gets fleshed out and established. The crafting in this game is where the grind comes from,where i can see that being off putting its the best thing really cause that makes it so you dont have to pay for in game items at all unless you want to do so to get them faster The combat in this game is fast paced and feels very smooth,With alot of differing loadouts it never really gets boring(But you have to put in time to get everything which does take alot of time....again like alot) They do keep changing the stats of weapons and warframes which is good and bad cause it can make something you put alot of work into,just terrible(Acrid) There is alot of types of missions you can do and 2 different Combat types(Normal and Archwing) In the normal modes its just you in your warframe doing the different mission types and in archwing you do missions in space using thruster wings(hard to explain exactly) The graphics are nice and flashy,sometimes a little to shiny for me but everything does have its own style and feel.The level layouts do repeat and feel mundane after awhile but i only really felt that way doing stuff solo,with people you dont even notice Now the only thing you have to pay for is Inventory Slots(For Warframes,Weapons,Sentinels and Kubrows) This is honestly kinda crappy to me but its not the worst the dont cost much and you can get coupons for 25 50 or 75% off the in game currency called platnuim All in all,I like this game and reccomend people to try it and see if they mind grinding,But again if you like this game,you are gonna need to put a little money into it
cxxx{}::::::::::::::::::::>;-;If you want pure action and you like ninjas... This is your game!
Puinguin (Hearth Addict);-;slow preogession, good graphics, almost always wants u to buy stuff, good multiplayer/co op. needs first person its like a 7-6 out of 10: you need to pull thru for baout 15 hours before u get anything good
iSuV;-;It's a great game with interesting mechanics, a free to play game that you can have every thing and don't pay a cent. And last look at my hours to create an opinion.
Nurse Muffin;-;I'm gonna start off by saying I have always been HORRID at shooter games, so I was hesitant to try this out. A friend plays it extensively so I thought I'd give it a go and I AM HOOKED. This game is so much fun. The missions, the weapons, the companions, the frames. I have fun just collecting things and leveling them. I play quite a bit with public matchmaking and I have yet to find a negative person. The community overall is very helpful and patient with beginners. Also, I love the fact that you can get just about everything in game that you can spending cash to purchase platinum and buy items outright. I don't feel this is a pay-to-win sort of game which is refreshing. I highly recommend this game ^_^
I am quite good, you know.;-;I have lost control of my life. 10/bird
Tripolarpandamonium;-;Great 3rd person shooter. Has melee primary secondary slots. Very inventive game.
Metatron;-;One of the games worth spending hours and hours of time :)
Scroom;-;Sci-fi enemies, action and powersliding, what more do you want?
NordiKyle;-;Looks like it could be a fun game if the updates ever worked so I can finish installing it.
DraconicBlade;-;Not a good game, But a fun game. Free to play without pay to win.
Xibalba;-;This game is super fun. They are always adding new content so you never get bored
Gumb4ll98;-;this game is meant for those who like quick combat as well as hack & slash games, especially for looters as well, since this game will make you sooo hapy to build something new and add it into your inventory and then begin to test it out immediately as you obtained it. this game is truly a masterpiece in its own way (artstyle, gameplay, atmosphere, etc.)
Carrot;-;Amazing graphics for a F2P game. Completely F2P, don't need to buy anything to be successful in the game. F2P players can rival against a P2P player. The only difference is that P2P get their items faster than F2Ps, but in the long run, F2P players will benefit more since they did not spend a penny and can rival a P2P player, who can spend up to hundreds of dollars. This game is about grinding for items or even platinum(premium currency). You can get platinum through trading, but sadly not everything is tradable. This can is fun, but sadly it is not for everyone. This game requires a lot of grinding in order to do well. And for people who don't like to do these 'boring' stuff, this game is not for you. This game requires time and effort to do well in-game. Materials take a long time to grind for and for credits, it is always not enough(for newer players). For those who have played for months or even years will definitely not find credits to be much of a problem since they have the general knowledge to know the best places to farm(often very high level, which is why newer players will have a shortage of credits). Overall, a great game with excellent graphics and gameplay. However, grinding is the main essence of this game.
Coffee;-;10/10 can't even ing log in
Juegoman;-;Grind to grind. it's pretty fun. 9/10, it's OK.
kingofhearts;-;it's alright
IronRush;-;Really, really amazing game! I have almost 500h of gameplay. This game is a blend of Mass Effect 3 multiplayer with the grinding system of Diablo, Borderlands, etc...
some shitty magus;-;Another Free to play. I'll admit this isnt the best of games, but its a fun game to play for a couple of hours every now and then. Lots of weapons and upgrades, but unfortunately you'll have to pay some money if you want the really good stuff. All in all, its fun but very very buggy. Full of glitches, but the constant updates are working on fixing this game up. Time will tell how this'll turn up.
Captain Morgan;-;All i have to say is. NINJA'S IN SPAAACCEEEE! The american servers are a bit slow so be patient. other than that i give it 7 outta 10
KaoS-freakin'-Echo;-;After playing for a ridiculous amount of time, I've concluded that it's probably one of the most engaging games I have played.
Leto;-;i thought this game was cool back when i first played it in closed beta forever ago. just started playing it in earnest this week and i have to say its alot of fun. more so when i played it originally. it takes some work to get into and figure everything out but the tutorials are pretty helpful for modding and such
Pirran;-;A great game became better with a newly introduced story line and quests. It's a difficult grind to get the better gear if you don't spend cash for Platinum or purchase packs, but it's still possible to get all high-end gear in-game without spending money. A great time sink, the game gets better and better as you put more and more time into it.
Clint;-;best game ever , THERE ARE SPACE NINJAS IN IT 11/10
SirBananaPop;-;You. Are. A. Space. Ninja. That's right... SPACE NINJA!> Do I even need to explain anything else? Space ninja.
VoidSaber;-;After playing this game for over a year, I have come to the conclusion that it is highly addictive, and has the potential to be something great. The combat is really fun, from being a stealthy and fast Loki, to a Tank like the Rhino, there is a Warframe to suit everyone. Pros: The game itself can be played without spending a single cent. The combat is fun, and can range in difficulty to easy to impossibly frustrating. The middle game and endgame content keeps you playing, and once you figure out how to actually play the game and how the systems work, it become easy to play. However, higher level missions are best done in groups, the maximum level difficulty that is possible to solo without dying would probably be 20 until you get endgame level gear. Participating in a clan/alliance is almost necessary during the endgame, but it is easy to either form your own or join an existing one. New game content is almost added, providing new things to do in the game, so unless you are a veteran, you will always have something to do. Cons: The game is not easy to pick up. The farming is almost unbearable as time goes on. The Early game is almost unbearable, and the Late game is rather stagnant, even with the additions of PvP and clan/alliance conflicts. Once you get to the end, all that is left to do is grind the same content over and over again. Although the same content is entertaining, you will find yourself taking long breaks from the game in order to make it feel fresh again. I personally just started playing again after 7 months of not playing, and I am enjoying the latest update. On a final note, the Platinum prices are ridiculous, and the artificial difficulty created by the low drop rates is clearly designed to keep you playing and paying.
Nathan_Hale53;-;Although the bugs may be a turn off, i absolutely love this game. Constant updates large and small keep the game more varied and interesting. The game alone may not seem to interesting but playing with friends is really fun. The warframes vary well having different support, offensive, and defensive abilities. Also this is probably the best looking free to play around right now. Overall if you have the room to download, give it a chance and play with friends and you will end up putting some hours into it.
chev;-;My favourite Sci-Fi Game so far. 10/10 for me. The graphics are beautiful, the choice of weapons, warframes(characters) and mods(to upgrade all these) are just huge. The game is mostly a co-op game, with a maximum of four players per mission. Your mission goals vary, the environment varies, everything is perfect. Only one thing I don't like: the updates. When a major update comes out(like new mission type, new event, etc.) there are so many bugs and glitches and sometimes a lots of game crashes, that it makes almost impossible to play peacefully for one or two days. They should focus on looking for these problems and repair them A.S.A.P. In brief this is a beautiful game, interesting, always gives you something new to reach. I have 350+ game hours and I'm still enjoying it.
Lucky Strike;-;Great game. Amazing fast pace combat more skill then grinding for gear. Expansive with many aspects including crafting and clan hall building. Great to play with friends.
ON PATROL;-;Spammed E and won for 2 hours 0/10
Joogy10;-;This game is so awesome with multiplayer and loads more
Asauchi;-;It's a grinding game in essence with a somewhat bland storyline. Much like a lot of mmorpgs or online free-to-play games. I personally enjoy playing it in moderation so that I don't tire of the grind and burn out. The developers are quite active and fix bugs from new patches consistently. New patches are released almost weekly with and major updates are monthly or bimonthly.
Soulzterz;-;While there are many things to brush up on this game by DE, they already have made this game a blast to play already. Not recommened for people who are not used to grind in online games but its doable for people wanting to play casually. As someone coming from a 5 year playing RO, I ensure u at the very least, the grind is not as bad as it is there.
axE;-;When it was in beta i loves playing this game but unfortunately deleted it cuz it was getting tough to fight players who put money in the game. Irrespective of that fact the game is impresive and the game mechanics ,artwork is commendable.
Eethir;-;Better then meth.
AR * Kinguin;-;Best game of all time. 10/10 u could ninja good story. good graphics. good ppls. badass ninjas. no pay. free play. no rage. best game ever. no hackers. not call of duty. blades and guns. rekt ppl. pvp. story modes. char costum. special abilities. primes. Fast download. Trololololol's. online. co op solo. BLOOD. gut 4 u 10/11
Saturn;-;its repetative yeah, but its challenging and fun. the character progression feels very rewarding.
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
| JeffBarrels;-;Tis Be but a magnificent game worthy of the gods like loki (pun intended)
[  ] [EV] Simple;-;When I first downloaded this game, my first thought was: "This game you cannot solo, and act like rocky." however as I progressed on through the game, and got better frames, and weapons & just in general better experience with the game I soon realised with the right setup you can solo anything if you put your mind to it. I loved this game so much that I spent 95 on the Loki Prime Acess package, soon after that I bought 5 kubrows and probably spent around 550platinum on them. Soon after that I stopped playing and left all my beloved Kubrows in Stasis where they would be safe (This was before they added "Consign to lotus" ability) 3/4 months later I came back to this game to find that 5/6 of my Kubrows which I spent platinum on had been removed, so I had been left with 1 fully grown one and 4 other baby ones (none of which I payed plat for) - So I contacted the support about this issue, and they deleted the logs of me ever owning those kubrows, and ever spending platinum on them. They deleted the Kubrows and said there are no logs of me owning any kubrows. This made me stop playing the game which I loved and spent so much of my money on (P.S I am 16 going on 17 and do not have any income so nearly 100 is a lot for me). This game has a great community and this is why I keep coming back to it, and enjoy playing it. It improves a lot, and as the game improves it adds new challenges for you to conquer with your friends. If you are lucky you can join an already made clan (I wouldn't suggest starting your own clan as it costs a lot of items to make a decent Dojo) - But if you join a pre made clan, and they're active and kind, and they help you out with missions and stuff, then stick around until you improve and help some of their new members out. The clans on here are really fun to be apart of, as they are able to attack a sector on the solor system and it brings you to a fight with the current clan/alliance owning it. P.S: DE are money grabbing s Pick this game up at all costs and play it, but please make sure if you purchase anything on this game with real money, make sure you will receive the items you buy ingame with the platinum (which you get).
Cyclone;-;After playing this game for almost 2 years for over a 1000 hours i can safely say that it's a lot of fun! If you don't plan to play it for long as a free to play player. Ok don't get me wrong, you can get EVERYTHING a paid user can get with literally no exceptions thanks to the trading system. You can trade paid currency and many in game item blueprints and mods as you like. This allows free to play users to earn paid currency. However if you're going this route expect to farm 24/7 for the rest of your life. I'm one of the Founders of this game and i own the highest prime access pack which give the highest value for money paid currency. Yet i still haven't managed to 100% this over all my hours of playtime. Good News Though, unless you're a crazy collector like me, you'll never have to. You can easily get proper gear you like within a week or two of playing. I cannot stress enough how much care and love was put into this game, the updates are more frequent than i'v seen in any game ever. Adding a bunch of new maps,warframes,guns,cosmetics and a ton of other stuff. It is the most space ninja game you're gonna get with an  ing ton of content. I recommend this game to it's fullest! It has it's flaws obviously... it can be pretty buggy at times but that's to be expected with constant updates, thankfully the bugs are dealt with rapidly but new ones will still come around. It is pretty grindy in it's nature and there are timewalls on crafting but they are no problem whatsoever once you have sated your lust for your first gear. What i do not recommend however is buying weapons or warframes directly from the in game store, the prices are really high and they're that way on purpose. You're really intended to craft them, that's how i got 95% of my gear. However if you are into costumizing your looks, well you're in luck. The prices for cosmetics in this game are very resonable and with the daily chance to get a 25% , 50% or 75% discount on the paid currency you can end up with a ton for dirt cheap. Warframe.. The Space Ninja Simulator RECOMMENDED
Krion;-;In the past one year there has only been one game that has kept my attention span for over 200 hours of play time and that is Warframe. As of the date of this review they just added a week ago a player driven economy and politics system which makes the map of the solar system dynamic! Nuff said!
?????;-;I could get into this game if the melee attacks was not so stiff....sheesh.....i have to spin the view around 4 times before I can kill something. Lack of a lock on feature in a fast paced game is also a dissapointment.
Nova Prime;-;Even though some people may complain about this game for it's excessive grind or the need to pay money, at it's core its a fun, space ninja shooter. Instead of having the take cover against the enemies, they have to take cover against you. My only complaint about this game would be the excessive grind in some areas, and the seemingly neverending cycle of patch, introduce more bugs, patch again. 7.5/10
mrcraboogely;-;I just kinda like that this game lets you KILL EVERYTHING.
Myth;-;Been playing this game for 2 years *hrs may not seem i have* and its been such a brilliant expirence 10/10 best f2p game
TUSK3N ._.;-;10/10 Would Idle Again.
Kyle;-;A game where you spent 80% of it grinding to get the good stuff, only to realize later, that there was better stuff and after you grind for that stuff, you realize an update came out, with new and better stuff, so you grind for that stuff until you realize that others have better stuff than you. I call that a win-win. Maybe also contain some rage inducing Orokin Cells.
NGE  EVA;-;you should try this !
Light Yagami;-;Warframe a game that you didn't expect to be that good i highly recommend this game to people who love sci-fi and aliens, space..... It's easy to learn and understand, a growing story-line, a lot of updates so that the game improves, an update can give you new characters new story, missions and an improving gameplay experience. Also: -It's free -You have a LOT of characters ad the moment 22-23 i think. -You have an insane amount of custumization and modification. -A lot of weapons and weapon, and weapon catgories. -Very cool and good graphics. -An astonisching environnement. -A lot of detail. -And so on.
Roby The Salt Ninja;-;too much dank youtube video
Ciderhelm;-;Awesome free2play game !!!!
Kyo, The Raven King;-;Space. Ninjas. What more can be said? 8/10 - Just because it is missing pirates
[OTG] NetBlaise;-;Cool game.. a must have/play.. I can't stop playing it....
Hellsing320;-;This is a great F2P game that i can play for hours and have tons of fun. if you download it and need help just message me and ill try to help in early game is a challenge so watch it
\~ViGILanT_GhoST~/;-;DRAGON FRAME>>>> THEY HAVE A FXXKING DRANGON FRAME!!!!! which alternately look kinda like a seahorse.... DRAGON AND SEAHORSE!!! 11/10 best FTP GAME EVER (ALONG WITH GHOST REC PHONTOM, that game is pretty gd too)
Baron;-;Warframe is unique, in many good ways and in many bad too. The premise of the game itself is brilliant, space ninja-samurai that fight robot-men and plauge beasts, it's radical and filled with flashy effects that you'd expect from a third person shooter mixed with a spectacle fighter, with an interesting and in-depth lore to boot it's hard to fault Warframe for what it offers and the price it offers it for, free. There is however something to note, Warframe features a cash shop that allows you buy anything within the game for Platinum, your Platinum account is charged by real world money and doing so gives you a huge boost within the game, I want to stress though that everything, every single item can be gained in game without the use of Platinum. To do so though, makes the game a massive grind. Starting solo and venturing into the game for the first time, my personal experience was that this game truly comes close to forcing you to have to pay for some item to break up the norm of running the same mission over and over again in order to gain new weapon upgrades, before spending any money on the game I was on my way to gaining my Prime Warframe, but purchasing a pack of Platinum surpassed all build times, item requirments and even allowed me to double my modification slots. A great, free game that becomes grounded by a borderline questionable payment methods, if you can deal with the occasional grind, it's well worth it. And I can totally deal with the grind.
s3r@ph;-;The only downside to this game is that there is no open world or even sandbox type environment to expand immersion within the world. In virtually every other aspect, the game is a dream-like playground for fans of games like mass effect, unreal tournament, or in some ways even Prince of Persia and Ninja Gaiden. There is wall running handled in a well executed manner, there is melee combat complete with actual combos and timing as well as blocking, there is evil space creatures and factions to kill and hate, and there is a huge array of both weapons and warframes to choose from and collect in order to diversify your experience. Even recently a new system of flight combat was added straight out of a space shooter sim hybrid. While it is true the game is VERY light on story line or explanation, and can become quite grindy after a deep binge of obsessive exposure, the core systems of the game are bieng constantly improved and there is NO pay 2 win mechanic because anything you can acquire through the shop except for a very few cosmetics are all obtainable in game. PvP players be warned however, this game is not about PvP, at all, and the PvP aspect of the game is not very well realized or implemented at this point. While PvP is playable, it is certainly not for everyone and is not what the game is focused around at all.
Lo5tInSpace;-;Logged On, Computer tells me to kill myself, Have to fight the jackal A LEVEL FRICKIN 2 BOSS THAT IS LIKE YEEEEEEEEEEEEE CROWD CONTROLL FOR YEAAAAAAARSS and then when you kill him you die from his mini troopers u AND YOUR  TEAMMATES DONT REVIVE YOU WHEN YOUR DOWN THEY JUST WALK PAST, Ai Tells  Pun, Game crashes, 12645/10 Would Buy Again
ShadowFox;-;love the game
Tronic;-;love the game
silverbae;-;As a founder, I gotta say, the game got really better. Loving the new updates. Highly recommended.
xXxXMLGname360noscopeXxXx;-;Awesome, smooth gameplay. Anything is obtainable in this game no matter what! This game is updated egularly, as it is still in open beta, but ocassionaly events take place. 4 player Co-op ninja-style gameplay with awesome graphics for a free to play game, awesome lore included.
Raven;-;Note: My Review Has Been Edited: Warframe is a co-op kind of game that is more fun to play with friends than playing alone. The game can drag out if you are trying to get materials to build that next Warframe or weapon or expand your dojo if you are gathering materials, completing missions, or just down right killing things if you do it solo. Don't get me wrong, this game can be played solo and some people like myself don't mind soloing- but the experience is improved tenfold when you are playing with friends or even other strangers online. Warframe takes place in the future within our own solar system and beyond. You are a Tenno, an ancient warrior who uses the suit of the Warframes to restore peace and balance to our solar system- which has errupted in chaos. The Tenno are a master of all weapons including boomerangs, blades, long swords, daggers, scythes, heavy weapons, bows, and all sorts of guns. To add onto the fast-paste action Warframe will provide, the Tenno are defined as "space-ninjas" since they have the agility of one. Tenno can wall climb, run on walls, and posses unique skills to help you navigate the levels of the game along with feeling a sense of accomplishment as you slice through hordes of enemies. As I stated earlier, you can play alone, with friends, or with strangers. The game is defaulted to have you play with other strangers- which will equal a squad of four with each mission you go through. Your squad will be tasked with a series of missions such as Survival, Extermination, Capturing, Hostages, and so on. You can adjust the settings to where you can play either with friends only or play on your own however. The first few planets such as Earth and Mercury can be easy to navigate solo- but the higher up levels such as The Void, Phobos, and so forth are highly recommended you go in with a squad of three other players who are also experienced within the game. No matter which mission you pick and what level you choose or who you play with, Warframe will provide a fast experience and you will have to adapt quickly in order to survive a mission. An example would include this: I was aboard a Corpus cruise shuttle in space and I accidentally missed my shot at one of the enemies and hit a window- in turn it shattered and the air in that room was being sucked out and I was losing health rather quickly. I had to quickly dispatch the majority of enemies in the room and then I had to hack the nearest computer I could find. As soon as I was done hacking the computer, the safety locks for the windows kicked in and air was restored to the room- keeping me alive. This game is free to play and I would personally recommend that you give it a try. The worst that can happen is you don't like the game, and you can uninstall it- it doesn't cost you anything. But with that said, you will get a sense of a Pay To Win environment in this game. You see, you can start out with three Warframes to pick from: Loki, Mag, or Excalibur. You then get a small selection of weapons to choose from. But if you ever want to get any other Warframes or weapons than what you had to pick from, there are two ways to go about it: 1) Buying the blueprints with in-game cash called Credits and then having to gather the materials needed to build that weapon or Warframe. (NOTE: Weapons can be super easy to find the materials for depending on what weapons you want to build, but Warframes are ridiculously unfair as it can take a very long time to find the rare components to craft them with.) 2) You guessed it, paying real money to get "Platinum" which is the fastest solution to earning practically everything in this game. You can buy booster packs, coloring options for your Warframes/weapons/ship, weapons and Warframes sooner, skins, and so forth using Platinum... some things are exclusive to Platinum only such as the Booster Packs and Coloring Palletes- meaning there is no way to earn these items without spending any real-world cash on. I understand that that can be rather frustrating as gamers, but as a Free To Play game- the developers need to earn money somehow. They do offer "Login Rewards" which you can obtain by logging in once a day. One of the many rewards you can earn from the login reward is a 25%, 50%, or even 75% discount on Platinum for 24-48 hours. While Warframe can feel like a Pay To Win environment at times, at least they are willing to discount their real-world currency for those who want Platinum- but don't want to spend an obsurd amount on it. Plus the majority of things such as the Warframes and Weapons can be obtained for free- they just take much longer. I have spent many hours in Warframe and it does have it's bugs that are still being worked out, but my experience in the game has been a great one all around. I would recommend that you play with a friend- but the experience is still amazing if you are playing alone or with strangers. They offer many social features such as a Clan for you to join- and you can have a clan dojo to go along with it. The playerbase is very much alive and there is always players online no matter what time of day you are on. But when in missions, the game provides fast-past action and at times you really need to think fast in order to survive the outcome. The game still has major updates and they keep adding something new every few months. One of my personal newer favorite updates they have added is the Archwing. When you become a Level 2 initiate, you can quest to build your very own Archwing. What the Archwing is is an device that allows you to explore the vastness of space- flying around in freedom. Once you obtain your first Archwing and go out into space for the first time, you will notice that the flight controls are fantastic. I don't think I have ever played a game with such well-built flight controls as what Warframe provides for the Archwing levels. Space combat has never been funner! Because of major updates such as the Archwing, I look forward to future updates knowing that there will be more coming in the near future. Warframe will be one of those games that will stay alive for years to come- it has the playerbase and it has the developers to stay going. Despite the times of feeling Pay To Win- I would recommend that you give the game a try and see if you like it. There are different ways for you to play whether you want to go into missions full on stealth or go in with guns blazing. It is a free download- why not give it a try and see how you like it?
THNDRzoid;-;From the hours I've spent in the game, I can say that it definitely has depth, going further than the flashy "space-ninja simulator" that can capture people at first glance. The microtransaction system is user-friendly to say the least, as I'm sure it has been said before, it is not p2w, everything non-cosmetical can be acquired with ingame currency and a little patience. The frames themselves feel quite different, and the combat system is awesome and responsive, there's a humongous amount of content even in earlygame. I'd definitely recommend this to anyone interested in a scifi third person shooter\fighter hybrid, and the somewhat exotic asian approach of the tenno culture can be yet another positive feature.
epicdude89;-;This game is a lot of fun to play, not only because of its good looking graphics quality or variety of available things to do, but that gameplay is not limited if you don't choose to buy Platinum.
MeowciferSirCat;-;Not pay to win, which is how it seems on the surface, the only items you have to buy with Platinum (that is the ingame currency) are visual items, everything else is aquired using blueprints, that you either find or purchase and then materials that you find, some a lot harder than others. The game play is great fun, run around hacking and slashing, burn them to death with fire as an Ember warframe or stand at the back and snipe, it is really your choice, you can play a stealth role if you so desire. The game can be quite overwhelming at first but it amazing once you get into it. The player base is really friendly and I have met a few people who help me whenever I need it, which is most of the time btw. I recommend this game to anyone.
SmexYouUp;-;Oh, Warframe. It's a pretty one of a kind game, I can't really say there are any downsides with the actual game, but there are some annoying mechanics that are kind of on the side from the core gameplay experience. First of all, the game's gorgeous if you can run it with everything maxed out. Just beautiful. And there is a lot of content to do. But it does get repetitive. Although, it's kind of relaxing (just like many people find grindy asian mmos relaxing or the grind of diablo relaxing) just running around slaughtering hundreds upon hundreds of aliens and robots mindlessly. doing parkour jumps off  like the badass space ninja cowboy you are. It's a fast-paced, shoot 'em up, hack n' slash with a tinge of card-collecting (your "mods" that modify your gameplay and your abilities). The group gameplay is fun. If you've got 1-3 buddies to team up with and chat over skype or something, do some of the higher-end content and have a blast and get sweet loot. They've recently been putting out a lot more content than they did when I played, but most of my friends have clocked out of their time playing this game so I don't see myself returning for very long if I do. They've added new characters to play, new maps, new quests, etc. The developers are great, very close to the community (have a casual conversation with them on reddit, maybe even in-game!) and they really do love their game and try to push it forward and keep it relevant and I'd say they're doing a great job.
HVC FOG3Y34;-;This game is so fun. A little grindy sometimes but its fun. Play with a friend and you can progress together.
UrbanShock (USG);-;I am incredilbly impressed with this and amazed that it's free. Not only is it super fun but it looks wonderful graphics wise, even at minimum settings. The style and game play remind me of something like Mass Effect smacking into Metal Gear, sword slashing and high tech pistols in space. My only concern is the controls; I'm not sure if it explains further in later tutorials, but it's pretty slow in evaluating in all of the controls and buttons. However it's a non-existant problem and doesn't affect the game play.
SMOKEYxDOMO;-;it is such a great game i reccomend it to all my friends its challenging just the way i like it :) xD
EwokAssClap;-;This is a great game for a fun time anytime.
K9black -AA-;-;I'm a fan of the muliplayer FPS, MMO and RPG scenes. I love the idea of an FPS in a Diablo suit, but I was worried it would be too repetitive. Would the replayability be there? The answer: A circumstantial Yes. I would highly reccomend that you play this game with friends. If you are solo the game can quickly become tedious. However, with friends time flies by! Something else that is not readily apparent - There is a somewhat steep learning curve to this game. Understanding how mods interact with polarity slots, how damage is calculated, various weaknesses and strengths, and learning all the warframes (really what style of play suits you) can be a daunting task. New players will find the first system of missions easy enough, but will soon find enemies that prove a real challenge. The correct application of mods on your warframe and weapons will be essential. All in all Digital Extremes is putting in a great deal of work into making this game an amazing experience. Updates are constant. It's free to play with an ingame store for both normal currency and paid currency. Everything that can be bought with real money can also be obtained without real money (except extra inventory space and a few cosmetics) and without too much difficulty. Try it out - what have you got to lose?
feardog;-;Its pretty good. I like it.
SomnusTheGreat;-;Beautiful game with tons of fun Co-Op gameplay. Pick it up, it's free.
Aekiir;-;Before you read this reveiw, you must consider these questions three: Is the game worth my money? Is the game worth my time? Are the developers in touch with the community? Now that you've done this, I will read your mind and answer three questions you have about Warframe. "Is the game worth my money?" I will dismiss this question out of hand, as a simple glance at the price will answer this. "Is the game worth my time?" This is where it gets tricky to answer. Warframe isn't for everyone. There's no underaged kids telling you that you're a "Haxxer," there's not very much math involced, and worst of all, there's precious few instances of acronyms and/or bizzare phraseology with which to confuse new players. In all seriousness, however, there are problems with Warframe's delivery. The gameplay itself is fun, the perfect blend of fast and tactical, with enough customizability on Warframes and weapons to allow a broad variety of playstyles. The troubles come when not playing the game, however. A new player, after slowly acquiring the blueprints and materials nescessary to build a brand-new Warframe, will suddenly find themselves faced with an intimidating three-day wait until it's done, and Warframe makes it very clear that a little cash will make it go faster. When I first built a new Warframe, (It was Ember, if I remember correctly,) I rapidly went from excited to depressed to angry to saddened. To the new player, this wait is an annoying wall that stands between them and fun, a barrier placed by malicious and evil developers who hate all manner of fun and enjoyment. Fast forward to a few months later, when this once-new player has three Warframes they need to rank up, two waiting to be claimed, and another building. Although Warframe's enforced waiting period seems like a cheap money-grab at low levels, it becomes less and less meaningful to a patient and determined player as they progress. However, this is really the most important thing about Warframe. If you arn't patient, if, like Veruca Salt, you "Want it now!" then Warframe will probably irritate and annoy you. If you have the patience to stick with it, however, you'll find a fun and entertaining game with a good variety of gameplay and weapons. "Are the developers in touch with the community?" If you've made it to this part of the reveiw, you should get yourself a cookie. Once you've done that, I'll answer this question. Yes. The developers, Digital Extremes, is very in touch with the community, releasing fairly frequent updates and devstreams. They keep a good touch on what the players want, and do their best to deliver it, with only a few instances of failure. We're not likely to see the next Cube World/Stomping Land in Warframe. In summary, the only drawback of Warframe is the patience required to get started. With that said, however, it's free, so why not try it out and see how you like it? See you in the game, Tenno.
H4YM4K3RZ (Casual);-;Review time: So this is a pretty good game, problem is it doesent really explain what to do, as a newb to this game 1.5 years ago I was lost. if you find that you are in this situation then I guarentee that you will hate this game, it has no direction and the mindless killing doesent really have much replay for the first Frame/Weapon and starter planets, but with time and persistance and a little bit of spending "creddits" for better gear then I guarentee that you will enjoy the massive ammount of weapons to choose from couppled with warframe abilities. Warframes are easy to aquire and weapons are really cheep for the most part, farming for monney is easy to do as long as you have someone in trade chat carry you to a high level mision for easy monney. Finally for a last opinion, I would despite all I have said get in a guild and play with people, this game is not meant for solo and playing with a squad of 4 is much more fun than sticking it out by yourself.
DrJusticeMD;-;This is a game that takes a bit of getting used to, but once you're in you'll love it. Rushing around doing parkour and shooting bad guys feels good, and the abilities of each warframe can feel awesome when used right. Take the time to learn the game and you'll find yourself immersed in one of the best free to play experiences on the PC right now, and it's only getting better.
Nius Atreides;-;Warframe presents a fast-paced, immersive and cooperative gameplay experience. Warframe is an OTS shooter or OTS hack-n-slash game, depending on the player's preference. Players construct from a generous library of weapons and warframes, which are essentially ninja space-battle suits, each of which drastically alters the game's play style. In this way Warframe is a highly customizable experience and makes way for player specialization inamongst their squads and clans. Warframe is a cooperative game. Though players can run missions and accomplish most goals by themselves or with internet randoms, the game is much better suited for squads (maximum size of four) of friends who can work cooperatively and communicate verbally via external voice comms. Each mission balances itself according to the size of the squad playing it, but the best challenges and rewards are only realistically available to larger groups. Warframe places new players directly into a series of tutorial missions which comprehensively explain the mechanics of the game. Because of this, Warframe's moderate learning curve is very easily mastered. This game's soundtrack is appropriate and envigorating, but the true artistic strength of the game lies in its graphic design. The visual effects of battle and the tacit graphical base of the scenery and setpieces compliment each other and afford an immersive combat experience. Warframe is appropriate for novice and mature gamers. Though the game is free of any age-sensitive content, the violent nature of the game may not be appropriate for younger audiences. Previous experience with FPS and combat gameplay is recommended, but not strictly necessary. Warframe is free-to-play, driven by optional in-game purchases. All story and gameplay content can be unlocked via gameplay, but players can at any point obtain nearly any item in the game in exchange for money. This does not inhibit gameplay or diminish the enjoyment of others, as players do not compete and one's overall rank is only improved by game time. Warframe can be played casually or hardcore and is worth considerably more than the time it takes to give it a try.
ShadoZzz;-;Alright so this is a highly recomended game! It's really fun.. and awesome :3 So join me on the game ahahaha Ninjas play free ;3
Goat Ogrelord;-;It's amazing
Ran-SnichClash;-;OH! YEAH this game is a a aswome! there tons of level a lot or friends fun and the feeling is amazing look you need to build stuff to make some weapons that you can buy only in cash there are some weapens for cash to but the point here every body should play it if there was a lot of player it will be ton of fun except that warframe have clans(that you can create rare suits and weapons with it) they want you to play with friends so go now dawnload it and have fun
JavierTMT;-;Great Game I love it but it can get repetative sometimes but if you got a great group of friends to play with it can be a really awesome game and I see the People all like " But its pay to win thats it just pay to win" and yes I will say there are some aspects that show the Pay to Win but as playing this game I have found that even people who pay real world money on Warframes and weapons are really just as good as you Myself I've been running an Excalibur the very 1st starter Warframe for 2 weeks and I can keep up with all the others in high risk mission I've actually been better then a lot of Frost, Loki, Rhino, and Mag Primes its just how you play if you run and gun or if you play it smart from a distance 9 / 10 If you have the time play it. Warframes a great game to play just make sure you got the time cause the mission can be really time consuming
Alastor;-;8/10 The game can be pretty aggressive on purchasing platinum since it is a free-to-play and it requires a lot of grinding at first but it is well worth it. Very fun game with tons of options and challenges with a good steam account sync.
xXTHOMAS_THE_420SWNK_ENGN_Xx;-;this game is a great grind. its grind are 10/10 i went ahead of my frind because i was bored of playing aneeded to grind if u liked destiny you will love this but i will hate u casue destiny is  and can go burn this could be destiny Its Destiny.
Krusty_Krust;-;So why is this game free again
LordSmack;-;I can't get enough of this game. They are always updating and adding content. 2 Thumbs up! Fight like a Space Ninja!
Wings of Fear;-;i love this game might take a long time to start but at the end worth it
EQuiliBriuM23;-;Free 2 play , awesome gameplay and graphics.No need to donate like in other typical games.Very good community.
Gopoise;-;Very fun and addicting, however, repetitive gameplay makes the game dull off after a month or two of constant play. However, the developers constantly release new updates and features that brings in gamers old and new.
Chiefox;-;Yes i would recommeded this to friends. Go and try it! Pros: Fun and awesome game. Play with friend and kill some bad guys. Upgrade your warframe characters and weapons. Long and lots of missions. Cons: Lots of grinding to get ranks up but still fun and part of the game. When i first play it, i had no clue what to do or where to go. But eventually you will get there once you look around and figure out. Rate: 8/10 Recommend: Yes
Akhenaten;-;Amazing game, and loads of fun to play with friends. Be prepared that this is a progression type of game and there is A LOT OF GRINDING to be done before you are powerful enough to enjoy the whole game. Be prepared to WORK for things you want over time , if you are not wanting to spend too much money. Easily one of the best F2P games ever.
NinjaLike;-;There is so much to love about this game. Everything from the controls/mechanics, the warframes you play as, and the many types of weapons to choose from. Its a 10/10 for me.
Nades;-;10/10 Would Ordis again
The Suspect;-;Love this game. Although my router wont let me forward ports, its still a great game to go solo aswell. I enjoy the aspect of gathering materials to build weapons and researching parts. I like the aspect of different "frames" with different abilities and modding capabilities. overall great game.
Lightningbro;-;Warframe is an entirely new asthetic, instead of taking cover to dodge bullets you make cover, stealth around, or even dodge bullets (and lasers) with your "mad ninja skillz". Warframe is a thrid person shooter, with emphasis on grinding, and on teamwork. If you seek to play this (amazing) game, I'd recommend a team of four (you and three of your ninja'est friends) with some form of vocal interaction such as "Teamspeak" or "Razer Comms" as I've not gotten the vocal settings figured out in game yet. If you enjoy the "grind" like in Monster Hunter, or Phantasy Star, you'll love Warframe, and remember: "Space Ninja's play free"
Rylai;-;Basically Ninja-mech simulator, lots of warframes, lots of missions, lots of weapons, and lots of ways to get yourself stuck outside of the map. One of my favorite shotter games ever!
Rylai;-;Basically Ninja-mech simulator, lots of warframes, lots of missions, lots of weapons, and lots of ways to get yourself stuck outside of the map. One of my favorite shotter games ever!
Aegis;-;10/10 would play again.
||F A U L T S||;-;Warframe is not without its shortcomings with regards to skill-gap, balance and friendliness to novice players, but it's also hugely entertaining. DE have absolutely nailed that 'just one more mission' loop. When you find a group of players who work as a team, or just a friendly player to partner up with for story missions, it can be absolutely thrilling. Survival missions where each team-member works to help others while fending off wave after wave of enemies is a total rush. When you pull off some impossible feat of sword/gun-based acrobatics, it is gratifying like few other games. On the other hand, there is a considerable skill-gap. Get beyond the initial public missions, and you will often find people playing the game at a level of skill and speed that renders novice players little more than a burden. There are also a baffling amount of systems and upgrade trees to navigate. Upgrades have upgrades. There's definitely a part of me that likes the fact that in a lot of ways it's very unabashedly hardcore, but I would certainly caution new players that it requires a level of dedication they might not be willing to give. But, if you like the sound of space-ninjas pulling off improbable feats of death acrobatics against hordes of enemies that look like they were the product of Tsutomu Nihei's fever dreams, and you're prepared to put in the hours to learn how to master the game's myriad systems, then I totally recommend you pick this up and spend a few bucks in the store. Addendum for those worried about the F2P aspect: Spending a bit of money will save you a lot of pain and grind, but you can absolutely play this game and have a thoroughly good time without spending a penny. It is NOT a pay-to-win scenario.
jjtheslenderchild83;-;This is the only "Free to Play" game i will ever play! But the recent updates have been giving me bad frame rate ):
Musuko_;-;If you guys like gunz u will love this game
amp1356;-;As long as you are okay with Farming alot of your supplies you will love this game. It is not a pay to win type of game everything that you can by can either be found or made but you have to put in the time to do so. If you want to work on patitence then this is a good game to start with.
Jackson;-;VERY GOOD GAME 10/10 Pros + Beautiful graphics + Active gameplay + Endless content + A broad range of customization + Over 100 ways to kill something + F2P Cons +Uhh..... guys, help me think of one...
Mr.McCall;-;It takes time to know that Warframe is a good game. Playing with friends often helps.
Dread Pirate Fluffyhead;-;It's free, but you'll want to spend money...
Mason;-;This game is something special. It is ACTUALLY a REAL free to play game. Everything can be earned by playing. If you want to buy something off of the store with plat, that you can only get by plat, all you gotta do is play the game, and sell the mods to other players for actual plat. The game just all around feels good, looks good, and plays good. There is a lot to do, a great community, and c'mon, lets be real here: graphics DO sometime make a difference. In Warframe, the graphics are stunning, and if you have PhysX then you will love it. I recommend this game to anyone. Shooter/RPG fan or not, you need to try it.
BananaLumps;-;This is what destiny should have been like. If you were ever thinking of getting destiny DONT, just get this, its 10x better and actually has content. Will definitely be supporting the devs as much as possible. Great game.
TOX!C;-;great third person, futuristic, assasins creed kind of game
Swan Merchant;-;I lost 6 of my respawns in less then 2 minutes 11/10 would do it again
Phailberry;-;Free to play, slightly addicting and self challenging. Can be very repetitive, but it's all in the story you make for yourself. Much more enjoyable with others to play with. I've logged over 500hrs without anyone that i knew, and it's a let down. Grab some buds and make your story as you go. It will be fun, i promise. Enjoy.
AngelStun;-;I Highly Recommend this game to all players That Like 3rd Person Shooters. This Game Isn't Very Laggy If You Crank The Settings DOwn And It's Overall A GREAT game. Try It Out!!
Eagle_Hawkz;-;This Game is Free to play, One of the best shooter game i've played, graphic is beauty and the concept is fresh. If youre a ninja like me and looking for good co-op space shooter games, this is the game for you, very recommend this game!
Sawyer;-;The best thing about this game is there is no pay to win. Weapons are gated behind mastery. You can build pretty much everything with ingame mats and currancy. colors and scarves cannot be crafted though. Very well done, I enjoy my time playing it.
Pyruvate;-;How good is this game? Well i just realised i played over 800 ing hours, go figure 10 anteaters out of 10
The Crowfather;-;This game is kindof unique,With its guns and blades,Stances and/or movements. But on the down side of it,The missions are the same. If you like 3rd person space ninja shooters,Then this is the game for ya!
Shotgun Raptor;-;Eh; get it I guess. Not really my thing.
Ozzgarth;-;Probably one of the most fun games I have ever played. 10/10 Would play again (still playing)
LightBriite;-;Warframe, is like Destiny in Third person mode, doesn't suck as bad, and is Free to play. Now before you go and think this is just another pay to win game, think again. You can get everything in the game through LOTS of grinding and I mean LOTS but that's what makes it worth it when you finally get that one warframe you always wanted. The game in total has around 20 farframes to choose from and now update 16 released you'll be sure to find even more weapons, warframes, and content to keep you busy. The game overall is pretty solid, graphic look really good for a F2P that came out in 2012. The music is also quite good, however there's not really a huge music score in the game. Movement in the game is quite fluid once you get used to it and master wall running, jumping, sprinting etc. Story is meh, it's lore is somewhat interesting seeing as it's based off an older game called "Darksector" which was the kick start toward Warframe that we now know and love. Comunnity is also probably the best I've seen in any of the FTPs I've played, very helpful and kind players that often help new players with getting through certain mission, resource farming, and finding Warframe parts. How you play this game is up to you, you can be good with anything if you have the time and patience to bring out the potential with your Warframe and weapons, Overall this game is one of the best and most unique games I've ever played, despite the minor matchmacking issues, and occasional glitches this game is a very well made game with a good developer supporting it and a very kind community that's welcoming to new comers. 8.5/10 for me. :D
[HYBRID] DELTA;-;i would like a way to start over and delete progress
Bot PizzaSlut;-;Amazing game. 9/10 The game gets repetitive after awhile. But all the weapons, updates, armor, and power.
illuxionist;-;The game without the bells and whistles is just one hell of a grindfest. But dammit it's a good one. New tutorial, constant expansion of the game, and evolving storyline makes this a great game to add to your library. The game does start very slow however and takes some time to get moving. But when it does, it'll take a while before you stop. Did anyone forget to mention it was still in beta? Best free-to-play game i've ever played.
Fury;-;I love this game !
Jargon;-;Real solid MMO shooter with great battle mechanics and fluid movement.
JohnnyTsu;-;Love this game, dont understand the official critics low scores, I would recomend this to anyone!
Oliver;-;Surprisingly good for a co-op shooter. Everything that Global Agenda should've been, in actuality. Bring three friends, blast it up. Bear in mind that everything within the game can be obtained just by playing - spending money is only a shortcut, if anything.
Moufisto;-;Good game. Keeps things interesting with events and different circumstances they constantly bring out.. And constant updates to weaponry and activites make this a very good game to play. Key features and the best parts are.. the variety of weaponry and modification, and the warframes themselves. Negative features are.. The maps themselves have clearly copied and pasted areas. Once you see 2-3 rooms in a map, you've seen it all of that template. All in all, fun game with friends, i've wasted so many hours myself on it; but what would make it perfect is new maps that aren't full of copy and pasted areas, and a new race other than the corpus or grineer and the infected. Mix it up! =) ------------------------ Well, 1,000+ hours later in the game, there are some things that need to be said. DE, the devs, have a bad habit of ignoring bugs and glitches and visually unfinished models that they implement into the game and make decisions based on how much plat they will make out of the game. If you find a farming method that is anywhere near effective, it will be nerfed. If you find a system that works, it will be changed. If you find anything that makes you feel good, they will usually take it away. I'm not speaking personally on this, but all the decisions DE has made, make it painfully clear that they are only interested in how much you pay up. I mean, fair enough, but sometimes they make one too many wrong decisions, and  a lot of people off. They don't think about their fixes, they don't understand 'repurcussions' or the what their "fixes" do to the rest of the populace. Also they just released jarjar binks as a warframe. lmao enough said there.
Rushing Wing;-;If you think space ninjas with guns is hype i recomend it. There is farming involed but the story is amazing.
Yellow Lynx;-;THIS IS MY FAVOURITE GAME EVAAAAAARRRR!!!
Cribby the Fish;-;It is amazing, it may not seem like it at first but if you get a friend or two it becomes the best co-op game ive ever played.
BlueeyesWhiteDragon;-;There is a bit of a learning curve with Warframe, but just push through the first 10 hours or so and you'll find an incredibly addicting experience. If you like 3rd person shooters and the sci-fi genre, or just blowing things up, I highly recommend you give it a look.
MTLVMPR;-;Finally feeling like a ninja with the melee overhaul. Pros + Good graphics (Some low res textures here and there though) + Lots of customization (even without $$$ as you can trade parts for "premium money") + Huge playerbase + Lots of updates + Quick loading times + Melee is a real combat option! (Feels like a different game) Neutral * Archwing is nice but needs more mixing with normal gameplay like in the first AW-mission. Cons - Only a few quests - Unbalanced weapons and powers - Still a huge grindfest - RNG item farming Warframe has lured me back with the new updates and I guess it's a nice timesink. Score: 70/100 Improved a lot over the years.
Darth Link;-;Really laggy but is a great game in all
the1216shadow;-;I have had the most fun with this game in the short amount of time I've had to play it, I can't play it right now since my laptop no longer has the horse-power needed to run it, and since its online I made a few good friends in the prosses that I'm pretty sure I probably wouldn't even know if I never played this game, this is the kind of game thats allot more fun with friends and even then this game is really fun alone, and it can spark new and sometimes life long friendships if your lucky like I was, so for anyone on the fence about downloading this game I highly recommend this game, its free it has really fun gameplay and like I said before if your lucky you will meet some cool people that you can have fun with.
Handsome Spy;-;This game is quite fun with friends
Bloodsteel;-;For a free to play game,this game has so much detail and lore within it and you can totally play it free.Its great
Jacobgame2;-;Great game, should get it and try it out after all it is free and a great game
[KSG]RapidDignifiedGamer;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING
Ioshi Mata =;-;Life-wasting machine. 11/10 would grind again
Cpt.Freddy;-;Swift and smooth this game will work in almost any computer (exceptions applied), is totaly worth buying some DLCs, the best is that you only have to pay if you want, no payment needed to win anything. 10/10
FlufferZ;-;Ok so this game will be repetitive at the start just a bit.But when you start doing void missions and start getting prime parts the game will open up more. Also i suggest installing a warframe alert app on your smartphone just beacuse you can miss a lot of good stuf just by not knowing about it. I suggest to everybody to try this game and give it a shot
rrenya;-;As a beta game or free-to-play, i would say its great overall. Bugs and glitches should be expected throught your gameplay experience and they are not hitting on players too hard though. Therefore, its not overall so bad for the bugs part. If you are like me, you will always find the bugs funny. For the gameplay experience, its a werid action game because it combines typical third person shooting games actions with magic power (especially after the upcoming update for the Parkour2.0 system). Although there is some tank type character, you still need to play the same mission over and over again aka farming, to gain rare mods or rare items to build your ultimate weapons. It is similar to how you keep pickaxing and shoveling in Minecraft just to build a dream house. And if you do not play minecraft, it will be just like how you get gold and diamond skins for your guns in COD. Of course you can pay a lot to purchase items from other players or the prime access. Another important thing is to join a clan or find some pal to play with. It is a co-op game. You may go solo but it would be too hard to level up because bonus experience points can be gained through playing with other players. Remember to pay attention to the abilities of every warframe because every character aka warframe has his/her special abilities, like Nekros's desecrate can increase drop rates. Some of the warframes may not need heavy protection too if you have built it right, like Limbo, playing intelligently will not casuse you any damage at all. Gaming experience is great but the problem is warframe should start working on creating some exclusive things for players who had hunted a lot of things. Many new players are just buying every stuff to make themselves fit in the high level or veteran(?) players community. This is kind of annoying though they are the people who are supporting the game in a financial way. And also there should be more competitive gameplay added to this game. Maybe a clan war? This can make the game more fun but I suppose this cannot be done by looking at the engine and server for now. This one will only for the new players. The missions and tutorial can be quite confusing. It is totally not a good time to start off playing this game right now as there are bunches of new things added to this game. Just remember, do not rely on your primary weapon too much. Check and try out all your abilities, every weapon you can obtain. Find your favorite set up and play. This is my opinion. It may not mean a lot but this is the comment I have on this game after playing for a year. Happy hunting tenno.
SARS;-;One of the only shooters I like, because the RPG elements are reasonably compelling. Some menu items are mouse only, but otherwise you can play with a gamepad. Just pray to the gods of RNG with Warframe. It can take a LOT of grinding to get what you want, since it's typically not a steady stream of predictable rewards, but rather a completely random chance of getting a reward based on the roll of the dice. Cash shop isn't too intrusive. You can play without paying easily, though if you don't want to look ugly or have barely any inventory space, you'll want to cough up 5 or 10 USD for some color palletes and inventory spaces.
Achilles521;-;3rd Person Action Space Ninja Dungeon Crawler 11/10
Yatagarasu;-;The game is kinda grindy, otherwise it's great.
Stellar;-;Ninjas Play Free. Those are the three words I won't forget for a very long time... Having first began playing Warframe at the beginning of Open Beta. Back when there were a handful of tilesets, the UI was simplistic, and generally the game felt so much smaller. At some point, I grew disillusioned with the game and left it for atleast an entire year. Looking back, now, it's great to see how much it has grown. I returned only a week ago. But there is still much work to be done - the title of "beta" becomes readily apparent when you realise Digital Extremes has a multitude of undocumented changes and nerfs in their hotfixes, as well as glitches, and imbalances between many of the titular 'frames. But. It is, however, a third-person shooting, hacky-slashy, parkour ninja simulator and one of my favourite games of all time, for its intuitive, fast-paced and fluid combat, which flows brilliantly as one switches from oversized machinegun to pocket laser shotgun to jet-powered hammer. The most important question is, however; "Is it fun?" Well, it certainly has its flaws; for newer players, it'll be an uphill struggle; since you won't be all too familiar with it, you'll have to really farm for some of your gear, and sometimes RNGEsus will kick you in the balls. There are some annoying enemies too, like Grineer Manics who zip around and teleport constantly, or Nullifiers who remove your Warframe's buffs when you enter their shields. My answer? Yes. Play this bloody game. Give it a chance - after all, Digital Extremes had this baby from the get-go; this is what darkSector was supposed to be.
FIRETEAM;-;And here's my book: Warframe. One of the most popular online FPS RPGs on the market today, Warframe has already collected quite the crowd. Three million is the current, last-published number for the player base of this game. With online guide support, one is never lost in this game as it is constantly changing. Created by Digital Extremes (DE), this game is nothing short of constantly updated. If you ever find a bug or that something isn't correct, you can guarantee that it won't be the situation for long. If you're not too big on PC gaming anyway, just buy it for PS4 (releasing Nov 15, 2013 in the US). Oh wait, I didn't mention that the game is absolutely free. If it's not your cup of tea, no problem. You simply delete it off of your hard drive, and your out of nothing but your time. However, if you do enjoy this game like the many others who tried it, you'll be sucked into the universe (or solar system, more correctly) of the Tenno. Now, don't think this game has some magical, gripping storyline. The missions are extremely repetitive and somewhat lackluster. However, the amount of content available is simply astonishing. I have at this current time 196 hours of time played in Warframe. I still feel as if I haven't scratched the surface. if you're worried about spending money, you shouldn't worry at all. If you want to play this game in the sub-100 hours range, then you should be fine. If not, I would say $50-$75 should complete the entire purchase of the game. Considering the fact that Fallout 3 plus all its DLC was $120+ I'm not too concerned on that price range. If you're interested of hours of addictive gameplay filled with ninja robots and a whole lot of dead people, you've come to the right place. Fight on, Tenno.
Anal Hoe;-;awsome game but im hoping they will fix some of the lag and bugs that are occasionally seen
CHAD;-;This game is a great free to play, I really insist you get it. This game is very different. For a free to play game, it actaully doesn't look like a lower resolution game. This game offers stunning graphics and glorious lighting. And after you get over the lovely graphics, you can head straight to the high impact fighting. This game has a level system and you can set your character to however your play style is. If you enjoy staffs and swords. Use the mods and make a melee build, or if you prefer automatics. Use some mods and make a rifle build. Just incase you get annoyed with your character, you can always get a new class a 'Warframe" to be exact. This game has a high replay value and I enjoy playing it. One downside to this game is that it's pay to win, but that doesn't even matter to be honest. 10/10 - Best space game ever.
STFU sloth;-;AMAZING GAME, EVEN MANAGED TO PLAY THIS ON INTEL PENTIUM!
Alborosie;-;First week i thought this game was Pay to Win because thats exactly how its set up to look, turns out its not. you can trade players items for premium currency. Pictures and videos do this game no justice at all. I woulda hated this game unless I played it which thankfully i did. No regrets so far. Also the price tag is pretty nice too, Cant argue with Free.. Sometimes waiting for gear to finish being crafted can be a bit brutal but if you dont mind being paitent then you are good.
Xariez;-;Have played this game for a while, and I must say i enjoyed it. One could say it just becomes a grindfest, but sure, after a while it does. After a while every game does! Its a great game nevertheless as long as you have the time for it, and havep lenty of unique assetts as well.
Kade;-;good game gets alot of updates to keep things interesting
[TBE] DANG-A-LANG MAN;-;Enter at your own risk.
lasercor;-;This game is awesome, it has become my favourite game in the past few days. Even took the title from minecraft in my opinion. I have found this game helps people new or advanced with the warframe starter choices, also the graphics, overall design is just amazing. so yes i'd definetly recommend this game.
caLypso;-;Warframe isn't anything special. It's not revolutionary, exceptional or timeless. Still - every time I returned to the game, it kept playing for at least an hour (without regret). Digital Extremes has made an enjoyable, engrossing, spectacular game. Especially, when you find yourself a team or - even better - invite some friends. If you need a new opportunity to slaughter aliens, you should try Warframe.
Thermal Shrub;-;Literally Space Ninjas. Is gud gaem, you download yes.
Nex;-;Nice game
Vulturio;-;Top!!!
grundlebuster;-;This is the best game ever made, and it keeps getting better.
GabeN;-;This game is great if you like running around as an alien while shooting aliens 10/10
Nurse Muffin;-;I'm gonna start off by saying I have always been HORRID at shooter games, so I was hesitant to try this out. A friend plays it extensively so I thought I'd give it a go and I AM HOOKED. This game is so much fun. The missions, the weapons, the companions, the frames. I have fun just collecting things and leveling them. I play quite a bit with public matchmaking and I have yet to find a negative person. The community overall is very helpful and patient with beginners. Also, I love the fact that you can get just about everything in game that you can spending cash to purchase platinum and buy items outright. I don't feel this is a pay-to-win sort of game which is refreshing. I highly recommend this game ^_^
KorbanGado;-;I've already done a full review elsewhere (https://k986terminal.squarespace.com/k986-games/2013/6/6/warframe), but the main thing to know here is that it is a good substitute for the ME3 Multiplayer if you don't have it for PC. The dev team is constantly working to upgrade and make their game better, all the while trying to listen to the huge slurry of player responses and generate new content at the same time. As a F2P, it's one of the more effective layouts I've seen - as you can earn everything except slots to put things in entirely just by spending the time to grind/farm/luck it out. The pricing seems to be a bit steep as is most F2P games out there, but it's also not unreasonable considering the charges are essentially just there to replace the time investment on most items. Lots of unique "classes" in the warframes, lots of different weapons, an ongoing BETA that has resulted in numerous fundamental systems being overhauled in one way, shape, or form - it's worth a try at the very least - even more so if you play with friends.
Edythir;-;This game is fun. Amazingly so. But it has it's cons too. One of the facts that i love so much about this game is that most of the features are really unique. Like you can buy a lot of stuff for Platinum (Premium credits) but you can get platinum without having to spend a cent. Got a rare mod or items? Sell them in the trading section for platinum that you can use and trade however you wish. The leveling system is fun as well, There are 2 types of levels. Weapon and Character levels. And there are also Mastery Ranks. Basically the difference is that Mastery Rank can only climb in XP. There are 17 of them and each more different than the last. BUT! How you get XP is unique as well, you get 100 Mastery XP from LEVELING UP your WEAPON. and 200 for leveling up your Warframe. And when you have enough for a level up you face a Master Rank Challenge that differs each time. First killing with primary weapon within time limit, then kill with secondary, then with Melee. Then here come the fun part, the fourth is hacking consoles withing the time limit, it is a sort of minigame within the game you can do to reset alerts. The the Fifth is sharpshooting, shooting assigned targets within the time limit. Weapons level ups don't make you weapon stronger, but it gives 1 mod capacity per level at the maximum of 30 levels. But you can use a Orokin Catalyst or a Orokin Reactor to double the mod capacity to 60. In game term this is called Poatoing due to the shape of them. Changing your mods can DRASTICALLY improve you weapons. from adding elemental damage to increasing damage to adding clip size, total amunition or increasing fire rate. The mods for Warframes are different, they give plus shield capacity, plus health and buffs such as those. But also they can give things such as loot and enemy radars, make a shockwave from your feet when you jump from high up and land. But also the adition of Aura Mods are available for Warframes and Melee weapons. Aura Mods give extra mod capicity and grants you bonuses such as energy regen or health regen, some give gun damage or extra health or extra ammo. POLARITIES are basically types of mods. If you match a Mod polarity with a weapon or a warframe polarity, it only costs half. If you mismatch the polarities, it costs 1 or 2 more. Aura mods give double plus in mod capicity if matched with the right polarity FORMA you can use on max level weapons or frames to reset their level to level 0 but it does not make it any more powerful, instead you can alter one slot to what ever polarity you want, making you ale to fit more powerful mods on it. Now enough of this pros. Lets talk Cons. This game is glitchy and sometimes has poor AI. I have seen it time and time again where an enemy is 'hiding' behind a wall and won't do anything unless you are standing in their faces. This game is unbelievably grindy. When you have played it much, even as little as i have, you start to have a plethora of resources. I have like 60.000 of everything common that drops in packages of 200-300. And i have up to 150 of the rarest resources. the game counters that with ARGON CRYSTALS. To get argon crystals, you must first grind for a key that randomly drops in survival or defence misions, then you must do the mission the key opens and hope you get an extra rare resource, i have done 4 of these missions with loot radar and not get 1 of them. So, finally you got an Argon crystal but SURPRISE! it disappears from your inventory after 24 hours. And some require to have 3 of these things. So for the most powerful and most grindy weapon out there, the Dragon Nikana, you had to; Farm for 75 OXIUM, which you could only get by defeating specific flying enemies called OXIUM OSPREY. Oh, and here is the catch, if you shoot them they suicide bomb you and you get no drops, try to use melee and they fly away. So after weeks of grinding for oxium you need to have 1 forma as well, forma blueprints are found as a login reward or in special alert missions, and making it takes 1 of every ultra rare resource (Morphics, Gallium, Neural Sensors) and 24 hours to wait. Oh. and did i mention the 3 argon crystal that are required as well? So finally you got your Nikana. But to upgrade that to the Dragon Nikana, you need to have 1 argon crystal another 75 oxium and the mastery rank of 8. that takes a long time. So you can grind and grind and grind for hours but you can't keep using your same weapons or else you won't get any mastery rank ups, i didn't figure this out so i spent 70 hours without switching weapons so i am only in mastery rank 6 now.
Microsoft Office Assistant;-;This review is split into sections, using numerals to show each section. My rating: All in all I would rate it an 8/10. Would recommend if you can deal with a decent amount of grinding and some bugs. Also this game is still in BETA! I The game modes are: Exterminate (eliminate all enemies), Mobile Defense (taking a DataMass to a Control Panel, then defending it), Defense (defending something for 5 waves at a time), Survival (survive a mass onslaught of enemies for as long as possible, rewards every 10 minutes), Excavate (defend and keep a scanner and its excavators powered to extract resources, Interception (you Capture and Defend several points from being taken over by enemies), Sabotage (Destroy a Reactor), Assassinate (all boss missions, and to kill high valued targets), and Hijack (defend a mobile target and possibly destroy it). The game is 100% Co-Op, unless you go to the PVP (Player Versus Player) areas. Graphics are good. Gameplay is very grindy, sometimes buggy, and very well balanced. Bugs well crap II The game is grind worthy, grinding through many missions to progress is slightly boring. But considering that each mission is never the same, in the sense that they will always look different from the last time you played it. All weapons can be OP if you mod then properly, and you obtain mods from trading other players, rewards from missions, or by defeating enemies. There are Warframes, which is basically your suit with magical powers that are very destructive against enemies. There are 300ish missions and more than 10 different planets/moons with 10 or more missions each, with their matching environmental art styles. Each Warframe has their own special four abilities unique to that Warframe. Warframes abilities range from being able to turn invisible, to being able to stomp the ground and suspend all the enemies in the air, to shooting spikes into every enemy within your sights. The weapons in game can range from a Jet Power Hammer, to a Pistol that shoots rockets, to a gun that shoots circular blades or bolts. The lore is very simple, and easy to remember. There are three main factions, the Grineer that are a bunch of brain washed clones, the Corpus that probably are like humans, and the infested that are infested creatures of doom. There is an enemy called the Stalker that rarely shows up if a boss curses you, and then there are the G3 and Zanuka that do the same thing. You have these syndicates that are 6 different groups, you sign up with one and then you trade this thing called standing for a mod that boosts your Warframes abilities, or a weapon, or something else. The basic 300 missions, are the normal missions, then there are Void missions and derelict missions. Void missions come in 4 Tiers, each increasing Tier number indicates increasing difficulty. There is a void boss called Corrupted Vor, he comes around just as rarely as the Stalker does, but only in the void. Derelict are basically the Tier 3 and 4 but only with infested enemies. Also customization of your Warframe/weapons is pretty good, you can change every color to whatever you want, and same for additional cosmetics. Credits are the basic currency in the game, Orokin Ducats are prime pieces (rewards from void missions) traded for special currency to be traded for Primed mods/cosmetics, and the premium currency platinum. Platinum can be earned by the login rewards, by trading rare mods/prime components, or by purchasing them. Archwing I have not done too much of this yet, as such I am unable to give 100% valid information. AFAIK (As Far As I Know), you have a jetpack and fly through space and continue your basic objectives, and you can go fast just like Sonic the Hedgehog. This is mainly unfinished structure added into the game, there have been several alerts in game using this game type; but it remains with little content. III Alerts One of the best ways of acquiring rare mods/items is through daily/special alerts. There are daily alerts that often reward with only credits or a few resources, but sometimes they have a rare mod or weapon as a reward, sometimes rare resources. Normally a weapon or some high cost item would be reward from a Tactical Alert, rarely some type of cosmetic items. Tactical Alerts are long and tedious alerts that last a week or so, in which the player needs to complete a very hard challenge in order to obtain said item(s). The Tactical Alerts are mainly for experienced players, who are looking for challenge. IV Raids Raids are very hard (in my opinion much more difficult than Tactical Alerts), they offer a rare arcane item, and require a massive amount of teamwork. There currently is only one raid in the game, it has several team based puzzles/challenges, which works well with 8 player squads. In the end you face off a very easy to kill boss, as long as you dont die. My rating: All in all I would rate it an 8/10. Would recommend if you can deal with much grinding/some bugs/ absolute nonsense.
]][[;-;I founded love in this game.PLAY IT NOW
TheObliviousPrussian;-;Beta got boring really quick.... its been in beta for quite a while now and well, I dont know if it has gotten better or worse. All I know is its very based on alot of grinding on these boring missions, that like I said, get boring very quickly.
Vanilla Bear;-;awesome sauce get it its free
drew;-;they call this game warframe because ur at war with ur wallet because everything is so damn expensive LOL why play the game when i can play my moms credit card
Benjii;-;After playing warframe for 1000 hours I'll say it definetely was a blast and still is. It never ceases to fail me that it always made me and my friends feel like were badasses. One shotting things and wiping rooms in mere seconds made me feel like a god almost. When ever it came to the hard stuff it was a bunch a teamwork and skill to output such great results whether it be survival or defense missions. Although this game is not perfect with its few glitches and grindfests (freaking rng >_<), I feel it has come along way and from its beta till now. This game is about the journey not the quest (sometimes :3).
Layo;-;UP to now, it've been great playing this game
zyronic;-;Fantastic game! Lots of gamemodes and large variety of weapons. Not those type of MMO's that is not paid to win where everything is that is exclusive is possible to get if you take the time and hours to farm for it.
Scarlet Ciara;-;Theres really not much to say when you can cleave five people in half at once
SpeedHunter22;-;well. 371.2hrs on this game isn't much for those warframe pros. i recommend this game who loves to play farming games. farm farm exp farm every single thing to get those that looks really cool. but after so much time spent. waiting for foundries... i decided to stop... just... can't... stand it anymore. lot's of new warframe shells are coming. and there are only 2 slots given by the game. need to buy with real money or sell stuff...well...uh... yeah. pretty much it. recommended... i have no life after playing this game
Mr. Smiley Face;-;Great Game. Worth putting the time and effort into. the game gives a different atmosphere of gameplay, something that you will want more and more of. theres alot of stuff to do ingame. you have Dojo's (clans) which u can customise fully however you like. you also have a handfull of great weapons to choose from and customize at will. theres a great community backing the game too. also the developers at warframe are very good, they are very helpful for whenever you need them e.g. technical issues and wateva else. They bring great content to the game every so month or season like xmas, easter and so on. while on a certain mission, its great just to take your time and look around the map, the way they design the map and have all different secret areas for you to xplore and discover is just awsome. Only down side i have had with the game would be just the lagg, some games i join might have cr*ppy internet, so it pretty much makes the mission impossible to do cause, sometimes you will not see the enemies around you or doors will not open for you but for others it will. but those are just minor things. everything else... is just awesome! plus.. you become a space ninja what more could you ask for!? :D
Atendega;-;A fantastic game that would be universes better with FAR FAR FAR more variety in it's environments and objectives.
Rastelle;-;What to say about this game...i've played this for a long time...a -really- long time, way back in the beginning of its alpha, and its really grown since then...there are consistant updates that keep everything fresh and new, and fast-paced third person shooting/ brawling that most people would be interested in...but as much as I love this game, thats sort of where the bright sides end... The game, in its nutshell...is a huge farmfest, thats it. You earn mastery rank (basically an account level) through levelling gear, which unlocks missions, weapons and gear for you until about rank 7, which, as is expected of the community, they will look at this and think how they could possible perfect this system, and they have...you farm the same mission, over and over again, usually either defense (you have an objective to defend from oncoming waves) or survival (you defend yourself from oncoming waves while keeping your oxygen supply up from drops from the enemies and capsules which drop). By the time you're about...say mastery rank 4+, you will be doing the same old thing, in the same place, the same way, and if you're not brainlessly farming xp for a warframe or weapon, your farming materials, to make another weapon/warframe to farm xp for them. On the other hand, the farming methods means you get diverse weaponry that you are forced to use, instead of clinging to a single weapon like a life-line and never leaving it...until you realise just how bad 80% of the weapons are...come on, this game has rocket hammers, glaives, chainsaw whips, lightning throwers, beam-rifles, quad barrelled shotguns and yet...almost non of these weapons can by used by the end, with the "end game" rifle being the SOMA Prime. Next up is warframes, and what a selection you get... warframes are the classes of the games, and there are over 20 to choose from, and their abilities differ from creating clones, going beserk, summoning water tentacles from the floor, balls that turn into black holes etc. etc... but again, too bad 70% of them are dwarfed in terms of useability, with most high-end groups refusing anyone who isn't on the "good warframe" list, and just to prove my point, should you get this game...just count, how many times you see a "Hydroid" warframe...800 hours and i've legitimately seen 3 hydroids. In a game with 22 different warframes (at this current time) why are only 6 or 7 are viable? The paying system is what you'd expect from any F2P app, the simple "pay to make things more convinient" take on it, with weapons taking 12 hours to craft, and warframes taking ATLEAST 3.5 days to make. They are nice to begin with, they give you some starting platinum, only about enough to pay for the cheapest warframe there is, or to increase your warframe/weapon slots a couple times. I can't complain with it, if you have the patience, then you won't have to pay a penny. Its difficult to say how I feel about the developers...yes, its good that they are coming up with updates on a regular basis, that they're trying to keep things fresh, but they have a horrible habit of releasing a new weapon, making it overpowered so everyone will buy it and items to upgrade it, then nerf it in a weeks time when everyone has got one, claiming they were fixing it. This wouldn't be a problem if this didn't happen consistantly over the time I played it. In conclusion, despite these things, the game...is oddly fun, even with its mind-numbing goals and sneaky tactics to part you with your money, and being free to play, it wouldn't hurt to try it out, and there is some joy in being an overly-powerful space ninja destroying waves of space clones/merchants or zombies. P.S. This is simply my opinion on the game, some of my knowledge on the game is slightly outdated but otherwise, this should be fairly accurate.
STFU sloth;-;AMAZING GAME, EVEN MANAGED TO PLAY THIS ON INTEL PENTIUM!
Alborosie;-;First week i thought this game was Pay to Win because thats exactly how its set up to look, turns out its not. you can trade players items for premium currency. Pictures and videos do this game no justice at all. I woulda hated this game unless I played it which thankfully i did. No regrets so far. Also the price tag is pretty nice too, Cant argue with Free.. Sometimes waiting for gear to finish being crafted can be a bit brutal but if you dont mind being paitent then you are good.
Xariez;-;Have played this game for a while, and I must say i enjoyed it. One could say it just becomes a grindfest, but sure, after a while it does. After a while every game does! Its a great game nevertheless as long as you have the time for it, and havep lenty of unique assetts as well.
Kade;-;good game gets alot of updates to keep things interesting
[TBE] DANG-A-LANG MAN;-;Enter at your own risk.
lasercor;-;This game is awesome, it has become my favourite game in the past few days. Even took the title from minecraft in my opinion. I have found this game helps people new or advanced with the warframe starter choices, also the graphics, overall design is just amazing. so yes i'd definetly recommend this game.
caLypso;-;Warframe isn't anything special. It's not revolutionary, exceptional or timeless. Still - every time I returned to the game, it kept playing for at least an hour (without regret). Digital Extremes has made an enjoyable, engrossing, spectacular game. Especially, when you find yourself a team or - even better - invite some friends. If you need a new opportunity to slaughter aliens, you should try Warframe.
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Cpt.Freddy;-;Swift and smooth this game will work in almost any computer (exceptions applied), is totaly worth buying some DLCs, the best is that you only have to pay if you want, no payment needed to win anything. 10/10
FlufferZ;-;Ok so this game will be repetitive at the start just a bit.But when you start doing void missions and start getting prime parts the game will open up more. Also i suggest installing a warframe alert app on your smartphone just beacuse you can miss a lot of good stuf just by not knowing about it. I suggest to everybody to try this game and give it a shot
rrenya;-;As a beta game or free-to-play, i would say its great overall. Bugs and glitches should be expected throught your gameplay experience and they are not hitting on players too hard though. Therefore, its not overall so bad for the bugs part. If you are like me, you will always find the bugs funny. For the gameplay experience, its a werid action game because it combines typical third person shooting games actions with magic power (especially after the upcoming update for the Parkour2.0 system). Although there is some tank type character, you still need to play the same mission over and over again aka farming, to gain rare mods or rare items to build your ultimate weapons. It is similar to how you keep pickaxing and shoveling in Minecraft just to build a dream house. And if you do not play minecraft, it will be just like how you get gold and diamond skins for your guns in COD. Of course you can pay a lot to purchase items from other players or the prime access. Another important thing is to join a clan or find some pal to play with. It is a co-op game. You may go solo but it would be too hard to level up because bonus experience points can be gained through playing with other players. Remember to pay attention to the abilities of every warframe because every character aka warframe has his/her special abilities, like Nekros's desecrate can increase drop rates. Some of the warframes may not need heavy protection too if you have built it right, like Limbo, playing intelligently will not casuse you any damage at all. Gaming experience is great but the problem is warframe should start working on creating some exclusive things for players who had hunted a lot of things. Many new players are just buying every stuff to make themselves fit in the high level or veteran(?) players community. This is kind of annoying though they are the people who are supporting the game in a financial way. And also there should be more competitive gameplay added to this game. Maybe a clan war? This can make the game more fun but I suppose this cannot be done by looking at the engine and server for now. This one will only for the new players. The missions and tutorial can be quite confusing. It is totally not a good time to start off playing this game right now as there are bunches of new things added to this game. Just remember, do not rely on your primary weapon too much. Check and try out all your abilities, every weapon you can obtain. Find your favorite set up and play. This is my opinion. It may not mean a lot but this is the comment I have on this game after playing for a year. Happy hunting tenno.
SARS;-;One of the only shooters I like, because the RPG elements are reasonably compelling. Some menu items are mouse only, but otherwise you can play with a gamepad. Just pray to the gods of RNG with Warframe. It can take a LOT of grinding to get what you want, since it's typically not a steady stream of predictable rewards, but rather a completely random chance of getting a reward based on the roll of the dice. Cash shop isn't too intrusive. You can play without paying easily, though if you don't want to look ugly or have barely any inventory space, you'll want to cough up 5 or 10 USD for some color palletes and inventory spaces.
Achilles521;-;3rd Person Action Space Ninja Dungeon Crawler 11/10
Yatagarasu;-;The game is kinda grindy, otherwise it's great.
Stellar;-;Ninjas Play Free. Those are the three words I won't forget for a very long time... Having first began playing Warframe at the beginning of Open Beta. Back when there were a handful of tilesets, the UI was simplistic, and generally the game felt so much smaller. At some point, I grew disillusioned with the game and left it for atleast an entire year. Looking back, now, it's great to see how much it has grown. I returned only a week ago. But there is still much work to be done - the title of "beta" becomes readily apparent when you realise Digital Extremes has a multitude of undocumented changes and nerfs in their hotfixes, as well as glitches, and imbalances between many of the titular 'frames. But. It is, however, a third-person shooting, hacky-slashy, parkour ninja simulator and one of my favourite games of all time, for its intuitive, fast-paced and fluid combat, which flows brilliantly as one switches from oversized machinegun to pocket laser shotgun to jet-powered hammer. The most important question is, however; "Is it fun?" Well, it certainly has its flaws; for newer players, it'll be an uphill struggle; since you won't be all too familiar with it, you'll have to really farm for some of your gear, and sometimes RNGEsus will kick you in the balls. There are some annoying enemies too, like Grineer Manics who zip around and teleport constantly, or Nullifiers who remove your Warframe's buffs when you enter their shields. My answer? Yes. Play this bloody game. Give it a chance - after all, Digital Extremes had this baby from the get-go; this is what darkSector was supposed to be.
FIRETEAM;-;And here's my book: Warframe. One of the most popular online FPS RPGs on the market today, Warframe has already collected quite the crowd. Three million is the current, last-published number for the player base of this game. With online guide support, one is never lost in this game as it is constantly changing. Created by Digital Extremes (DE), this game is nothing short of constantly updated. If you ever find a bug or that something isn't correct, you can guarantee that it won't be the situation for long. If you're not too big on PC gaming anyway, just buy it for PS4 (releasing Nov 15, 2013 in the US). Oh wait, I didn't mention that the game is absolutely free. If it's not your cup of tea, no problem. You simply delete it off of your hard drive, and your out of nothing but your time. However, if you do enjoy this game like the many others who tried it, you'll be sucked into the universe (or solar system, more correctly) of the Tenno. Now, don't think this game has some magical, gripping storyline. The missions are extremely repetitive and somewhat lackluster. However, the amount of content available is simply astonishing. I have at this current time 196 hours of time played in Warframe. I still feel as if I haven't scratched the surface. if you're worried about spending money, you shouldn't worry at all. If you want to play this game in the sub-100 hours range, then you should be fine. If not, I would say $50-$75 should complete the entire purchase of the game. Considering the fact that Fallout 3 plus all its DLC was $120+ I'm not too concerned on that price range. If you're interested of hours of addictive gameplay filled with ninja robots and a whole lot of dead people, you've come to the right place. Fight on, Tenno.
rabbi tyler;-;My computer has cancer. it cannot run this game because there is a rule about the game that says those who have cancer cannot play warframe. It was not my fault. I downloaded free RAM to increase my computer's sexual performance and it stopped working. I eventually deleted system 31 and it began to work.
malayu;-;I only played a little bit. It's alright.
KLMJ.Ghost 1611;-;nice...i really love it
Hound;-;This is a remarkable game with outstanding graphics. You get to customize your appearance and choose your weapon loadout.
AngelVenom;-;A game with outstanding diversity going from a challanging pain in the  stealth game to an all out intense shooter. Warframe has an old school approach to its gameplay style while offering a fairly unique story and artistic vision. There is enough diversity in this game to interest almost anyone looking for some action, it even blends the lines of arcade and grindathon quite nicely, meaning you get a real sence of reward for your efforts. Though many early levels are easy enought to simply blast through you'll be challanged later in game where stealthing is priceless and raw combat must be met with preparation most of which will be done using the games vast customisation options to polish your playstyle. It's not for everyone, but it's free so deffo worth the try.
YES SIR !;-;it a great game for people who like space,ninjas and guns
Kairax101;-;This game deseervise best game of the year for being one of the most unique games ever with its vast story and overal gameplay its just amazing
Yashira;-;Nice graphics for low engine, good gameplay although repetetive at times. 7/10
64M3_4DD1C7;-;Space ninjas. Need I say more?
EwokAssClap;-;This is a great game for a fun time anytime.
K9black -AA-;-;I'm a fan of the muliplayer FPS, MMO and RPG scenes. I love the idea of an FPS in a Diablo suit, but I was worried it would be too repetitive. Would the replayability be there? The answer: A circumstantial Yes. I would highly reccomend that you play this game with friends. If you are solo the game can quickly become tedious. However, with friends time flies by! Something else that is not readily apparent - There is a somewhat steep learning curve to this game. Understanding how mods interact with polarity slots, how damage is calculated, various weaknesses and strengths, and learning all the warframes (really what style of play suits you) can be a daunting task. New players will find the first system of missions easy enough, but will soon find enemies that prove a real challenge. The correct application of mods on your warframe and weapons will be essential. All in all Digital Extremes is putting in a great deal of work into making this game an amazing experience. Updates are constant. It's free to play with an ingame store for both normal currency and paid currency. Everything that can be bought with real money can also be obtained without real money (except extra inventory space and a few cosmetics) and without too much difficulty. Try it out - what have you got to lose?
feardog;-;Its pretty good. I like it.
Spreelly;-;its awesome
FLACO;-;THE BEST GAME EVER
Ornistein;-;If You Like Cooperation Play it
squiddingme;-;space robot ninjas doing space robot things 10/10 its my favourite anime
Reapers Gale;-;I Would Recomend this game for people who enjoy playing grindier games It's quite the time sinker if you like it to be, always thinking about what is the next step, what weapons you should be leveling up and modding As you get more into it, you will expand and build you own kind of gameplay with you own set of favourit warframe , and there are quite a lot to choose from , I would recomend also to be a few people playing it as a team as it enhance the experience and makes it easier to achive goal's that contributes to you own agenda
Dyliwig;-;The game is centred around a group of "space ninjas" or tenno who aim to maintain some form of balance in the galaxy. They are lead by a mysterious being known only as the Lotus in their task. Each tenno is able to equip a warframe or battle suit to use in their fight, they each have their own abilities, strengths and weaknesses. The game has a slow start but does get better with the aquisition of new weapons and warframes,most of the game is based around improving your gear and weapons and there is pvp if you want to compare with friends. The story is still unfolding in the game so it may seem very subtle but the actions you perform do have an impact, even if it is just a minor one. + Good gameplay + Varied Weapons and Warframes(Abilities) + Varied Maps and enviroments - Slow to start - Can feel "grind" heavy for free to play players 8/10 Would play for hours.
igrodol228;-;The game is a great mix of third person shooter with space ninjas and elements of rpg games like wow and guild wars(in terms od weapon and character customization). overall i will sugest this game to everyone who want to have a lot of fun with over the top shooter and doesnt want to pay a lot of money(you will need to spend some time if u dont want to spend money at all) 9/10
D3lthar;-;Similar to Global Agenda, lots of fun & something different.
Arkhive28;-;This is my first video game ever played and it's the game i play the most on my free time. I absolutely love this game! It's my favourite! I would highly recommend it!
Codyrays;-;awesome game i love a bit hard a some points but amazing
Captain Morgan;-;All i have to say is. NINJA'S IN SPAAACCEEEE! The american servers are a bit slow so be patient. other than that i give it 7 outta 10
KaoS-freakin'-Echo;-;After playing for a ridiculous amount of time, I've concluded that it's probably one of the most engaging games I have played.
Jake From State Farm;-;I would have LOVED this game if you didn't have to pay for so many things like more weapons or other characters. It would have been fine with some really great stuff that you have to pay for, but it seems like it's everything. Other than that it is a pretty great game. There is a story, co-op, choose which levels you do first. This game would have been my number 1 if it wasn't for all the money you had to pay to get stuff.
Mr. wiener;-;cool game!
ECONOMICS ESTABLISHED $  $;-;It's ok
NinjaBigBoss;-;Ninjas In Space??? Ohh Them Crazy Ninjas Getting into Mischief... Over All AMAZING GAME
Gallao;-;Game is amazing ive been playing since it was in it was a Beta and its just been growing and growing. There's all sorts of varierity of Warframe (Characters) and Weapons to chose from, there's decorations for your ship, pets as in Kubrows (Dog creatures) and Sentienels (Robots). The game is just Amazing in every way in my opinion. But i wouldnt suggest this game to players if you dont plan on being active because all though it is free to play you have to grind for you better gear unless you plan on spending money on the game.
Wasser-Chan;-;Very glitchey after update i cant even get on properly any more cool game do
ArchangelM;-;I love this game, it is fun interactive and always changing. They are allways bringing more and more into the game. There are of course faults such as an abudance of glitches but even still the dev group fixes them when the users find the glitches. The semi realism of each use of the blade upon the eneimies is well done and the bullets and arrows or even status affects are all reacted to by the enemies. Overall an amazing, criminally free game.
Moufisto;-;Good game. Keeps things interesting with events and different circumstances they constantly bring out.. And constant updates to weaponry and activites make this a very good game to play. Key features and the best parts are.. the variety of weaponry and modification, and the warframes themselves. Negative features are.. The maps themselves have clearly copied and pasted areas. Once you see 2-3 rooms in a map, you've seen it all of that template. All in all, fun game with friends, i've wasted so many hours myself on it; but what would make it perfect is new maps that aren't full of copy and pasted areas, and a new race other than the corpus or grineer and the infected. Mix it up! =) ------------------------ Well, 1,000+ hours later in the game, there are some things that need to be said. DE, the devs, have a bad habit of ignoring bugs and glitches and visually unfinished models that they implement into the game and make decisions based on how much plat they will make out of the game. If you find a farming method that is anywhere near effective, it will be nerfed. If you find a system that works, it will be changed. If you find anything that makes you feel good, they will usually take it away. I'm not speaking personally on this, but all the decisions DE has made, make it painfully clear that they are only interested in how much you pay up. I mean, fair enough, but sometimes they make one too many wrong decisions, and  a lot of people off. They don't think about their fixes, they don't understand 'repurcussions' or the what their "fixes" do to the rest of the populace. Also they just released jarjar binks as a warframe. lmao enough said there.
IrrationalPenguin;-;If you haven't played this game you are seriously missing out, guns techno-ish ninja robots, various kinds of missions weapons enemys and loot and it keeps growing, EVEN BETTER ITS FREE TO PLAY - you can get pretty much everything in the game without buying in game currency. this game is going to be HUGE so get in on the action now
Owa1s;-;This game is aweome
Excalibur Prime;-;While the game is still in Beta, clearly evident witht the lack of anything endgame esk, it still is a fun and challenging experience. The game utilizes many creative game machanics and unique character looks/powers. There is a constant update of new weapons added weekly to give players something new to build, and the DEVs are constantly looking to the community to improve the game one step at a time. This gives the game an impressive evolution that can dramicically alter the game from one udate to the next improving on the areas that the player base thinks there should be improvments.
Kithsakhai;-;One of my all-time favorite games. No its not everyon's cup of tea. The game is focused entirely on 4 player coop with an AMAZING art and design style, the fast-paced and largely enjoyable gun-play/sword-play combo all in one package. yes it can get grindy, but a large part of the fun is going out and crafting all the various weapons from a multitude of components and resources you find, while fighting varying enemies (currently, 4 main enemy factions: corpus (robots/shied focused), grineer (cloned human/armor focused), infected (bio-technocyte virus/ general zerg-ish focused), and corrupted ( a mix of the previous 3 with a few twists ). each faction has its major weaknesses and strengths, so you will never be facing hordes of the same enemy over and over... there are a HUGE number of varying enemies to fight and places to go in the solar system. the overarching storyline is slowly being fleshed out by the devs, and it's quite interesting, certainly not the run-of-the-mill, and the suppsoed protaganists (you) the tenno, are not always acting in the best interests of humanity as a whole, so the player can choose (all RP for now anyway) your role in the powder keg that is the solar system in the timeframe the game is set (thousands of years from now). TL;DR - many different space ninjas with badass guns and swords. that is all.
TOX!C;-;great third person, futuristic, assasins creed kind of game
Swan Merchant;-;I lost 6 of my respawns in less then 2 minutes 11/10 would do it again
Phailberry;-;Free to play, slightly addicting and self challenging. Can be very repetitive, but it's all in the story you make for yourself. Much more enjoyable with others to play with. I've logged over 500hrs without anyone that i knew, and it's a let down. Grab some buds and make your story as you go. It will be fun, i promise. Enjoy.
AngelStun;-;I Highly Recommend this game to all players That Like 3rd Person Shooters. This Game Isn't Very Laggy If You Crank The Settings DOwn And It's Overall A GREAT game. Try It Out!!
Eagle_Hawkz;-;This Game is Free to play, One of the best shooter game i've played, graphic is beauty and the concept is fresh. If youre a ninja like me and looking for good co-op space shooter games, this is the game for you, very recommend this game!
Sawyer;-;The best thing about this game is there is no pay to win. Weapons are gated behind mastery. You can build pretty much everything with ingame mats and currancy. colors and scarves cannot be crafted though. Very well done, I enjoy my time playing it.
Pyruvate;-;How good is this game? Well i just realised i played over 800 ing hours, go figure 10 anteaters out of 10
The Crowfather;-;This game is kindof unique,With its guns and blades,Stances and/or movements. But on the down side of it,The missions are the same. If you like 3rd person space ninja shooters,Then this is the game for ya!
Thermal Shrub;-;Literally Space Ninjas. Is gud gaem, you download yes.
JaBs;-;1000x times better than destiny + ITS FREE GIVE IT A TRY !
Umaru Doma;-;GG for anyone that like a adventrous pakour
ludibembo;-;Let me start by saying that this is a free game that has in game purchases (weapons, warframes, storage slots etc.). Let me continue with: "This is one of the best games I have ever played in my life." I am an avid gamer for more than 18 years now, and have played hundreds of games of all genres. This FREE game is mindblowing in many ways: 1. It is FREE!!! 2. It is not that kind of a free game where someone who makes in game purchases will have an enourmous advantage over you. The advantage is only in the fact that he will have more warframes and wapons (because storage is limited and you can purchase more). You level at the same speed, the Prime warframes are only 10-15% better then the normal ones, same goes for prime weapons. 3. The game does not require you to pay to get 100% out of it. You can aquire all weapons and all warframes (including prime) by earning them through playing. 4. The graphics are brilliant. A beautifully designed game. 5. Playability is 150%, at least for me. Love the mechanics, love the skillsets, love the weapons. For a free game, you could not wish for more. 6. Robot ninjas with superpowers. Enough said. 7. Awsome mod skilltree (simillar to RPG style) but here you collect mods, upgrade them and fit them into your warframes, weapons and companions (little robots with laser beams, killer hounds and simmilar). The best thing is you need to pick different mods for different misions because they are very specialized (there is no best mod for all missions and against all types of enemies). There are a few drawbacks: 1. The lore (story) is somewhat shallow, altough it is so far very well thought of. 2. The missions tend to be somewhat repetitive, but using different warframes, weapons and playing with different co-op players makes it interesting, time and time again. 3. That is all I can currently think of. All in all, this is a must try game. I have personally invested over 300 hours in it, and i haven't had enough. Cheers.
TIGHT BUTTHOLE;-;Best description of what playing warframe feels like: Take a needle full of some form of mentally disorienting drug and shoot a whole needle into your body day after day. All you can do is wonder what you are doing or if it has any meaning, but you just keep going since it falsely brings you satisfaction.
Nyirein;-;Amazing game. It constantly adds new weapons and operations. Get it if you love fun, parkour, shooters, and ninjas.
Nauotit c:;-;This is actually a good TPS. Nice weapons, nice skills and habilities. You can play it Solo or Multiplayer. But this game dude, this game... it breaks everything. Regions are weird (England connected to russia), the IA is buggy, sometimes you die for no valid reason, the voting system is actually not a voting system, etc. Still an awesome game, you should try it. P.s. : If you want new weapons, open up your wallet or spend 20 hours in farming. (Almost pay2win.)
Track_Pad_Hero;-;Easy to play, easy to get hooked. Repetitive gameplay. Not pay to win, but the reminder of what you could have for just a bit more $$ is constant.... you cant get away from it. If you ever saw the Simpsons episode where Mr. Burns is draging money on the street from behind his limo...thats a lot like warframe. Not everyone will (or needs) to put real money into the game. To some extent I hope most people pitch in a small part to support the devs as this is a good game, but be careful. I personally have put more real money into this game than what I would for preordering most AAA games and while it does pay off.... it doesnt come anywhere close to unlocking everything in the game. The upside of that is that the game keeps churning out new weapons to use, new gamemodes to play, new enimes to shoot or slice, new warframes to use in battle, and new gameplay expeirences overall. ...pretty sure they make new graphics improvements as well. Warframe is a great looking game that is constantly trying to evolve itself. The controls are solid and the gunplay can be satisfying so long as your at the right level for your frame and weaponry. Speaking of weaponry, there is quite a bit here. Everything from Sci-fi lasers to war hammers, bows, assult rifles, axes, whips, and much more. Each of these are leveled up and can be modded for increased effect. Same goes for the warframes themselves. IMO, this is there warframe hooks people. There are so many options of warframes and weapons to use it's astounding. This game keeps giving you little goodies like mods and credits for each mission and eventually you'll have enough to upgrade your equipment or purchase something new. ...which starts the process all over again. If you're looking for in depth story, you might want to look elseware. There is a backstory for sure, but it is barely noticeable compared to the addictive cycle of leveling up, fighting, obtianing new equipment, and leveling up again. What story is there, I do enjoy and I believe Digital Extremes keeps giving little tid bits of story to progress the game. The game play is fun, but after a while it gets old for most people. I do know some have kept at the cycle for a while and have came up with some very impressive builds, but I dont see myself doing that. Good thing is that there's still plenty of gameplay to be had for us more casual players. All in all I dont regret the money or time I spent on the game, but the cycle is something that needs to be pointed out.
Kenny;-;Get guns Try guns Get Warframes Try Warframes Get mods Use mods Rinse and repeat Or spend money Get Everything 11/10
Nightstar;-;A really good game if you like those Metal Gear-esqe "Gray Fox" Ninjas, except with a lot less sneaking and more slicing people into pieces. The game has microtransactions for some interesting cosmetic things and much of the unlockable content. However, most all of the equipment, from primary weapons to the warframe you play as, are unlockable via playing the game and getting the parts to build it. Its not "pay-to-win" its "pay-to-save-time". In defense of the grinding, it doesnt take long at all to get all the good stuff once you get used to the game and the mechanics.
Mass_ Effector;-;Great game and totally worth paying for yet its free, downloading this game is a win win on so many levels.
Shia LaBeouf crimson.gg;-;This game is really enjoyable and has a nice community. I have made a few friends on it already. It is very self explanitory so you can just get down to the fun stuff.
GOKUSSJ3Z;-;One hell of a game! Addicted since day one. Highly recommend it!
Vaxillian Prime;-;Great everlasting game! 9 out of 10 Full of multiple factions, characters, powers, you name it. Enough to keep one active for a long while but some can get reptitive. But with constant updates changing the game and adding content I personally am expecting the repetition to deteriorate over time. Also the fact that the community is really friendly and informing that the devs pay attention and take suggestions from too.
[Shibe] zmaymay;-;Can't believe I uninstalled this...THIS GAME IS AWESOME 11/10 Darude - Sandstorm
Esser-Z;-;This is a terrible game. I enjoy it a lot.
nicoga3000;-;I was pleasently surprised by Warframe. The best way I can describe it is a mashup between Destiny and PSO.
Kurotora;-;This is a pretty nice free game. Glad I played it.
Ohnum Grubz;-;The game that created the betapocolipse! A must try for all 3rd person shooter fans with RPG elements.
monoliith;-;This game is in the beta stages, and is one of the best games I have ever played. I'm a very experienced gamer. Can't give it up. I've been playing it for years. Now, If only someone could develop a sandbox MMORPG with this type of combat...
NBATG;-;Recommended for all people who wish to play a free to play game which can play both shooting and close combat style. The game is free so you don't need to purchase any $ to get all the weapons or warframes in game (only some unlimited items if you wish to purchase - the rest you can farm meterials to craft). Overall: I love this game, I know it is not perfect and can get bored when you get all stuffs from the game but it is the good game you can play with your friends or solo and make friend in group of region.
Sgt.Miller;-;Awsome Game and free to play and not at all a pay to win
McJayDoug;-;Probably the best free to play game on steam!
michawn85;-;HOLY CRAP THIS GAME IS EPIC!!!
pumpkinhead1979;-;Great game. Highly addicting.
LucidityMkIV;-;I've been playing this game for about two weeks, and my impression so far is mixed, though mostly positive. If you like the concept of being a space ninja, and don't mind the grinding that goes with most MMOs, then this game is for you. So far, I'm still "relatively inexperienced", and avoid the trading channel like the plague. Honestly, while a community market is always a plus, the sheer wall of text of stuff you don't care about is hard to sift through in order to find people selling/buying the stuff you DO care about. Also, the game seems to suffer from a Diablo-style "You need this gear on this class, otherwise don't bother me" mentality when it comes to high-level missions. Perhaps it's a spoiled community, or perhaps it's the apathy that comes with farming. I can't say. Apart from these two glaring, community-based problems, I'd say the game is superb. There are occasional bugs (falling through the map, not being able to interact with the UI) but they can be worked around. As a F2P, it blasts its competitors out of the water, holding its own against similar AAA titles. The weapons are varied, and most are suited for specific occasions and playstyles. Like to snipe? There are sniper rifles and compound bows! Like mowing down enemies with a hail of bullets? Try the Soma! Wanna get up close and personal? I can't recommend the Valkyr frame highly enough, as her ultimate ability renders her invulnerable with the only drawback being a restriction to melee attacks... which regenerate her health. Want to customize your frame? There are several mods which alter your abilities, as well as paint and accessory customization options at your disposal. My recommendation for people looking to try this game -- download it. Give it a whirl. It's free to play, so it's not like you'll be missing out on anything by trying it. I recommend starting with the Excalibur warframe, as it turns out quite handy even in later missions. There are lots of weapons and mods that were only accessible for certain events, but a lot of them are often sold on the player market. Most of the gear you'll need can be won through in-game missions, though it may take a significant amount of time. For those of you who don't mind spending a bit of extra cash, platinum will be your best friend in quickly acquiring equipment which would normally take days of grinding to find. For those of you who'd rather keep your cash and play entirely free, you'll spend a lot of time trying to farm specific areas for parts to craft your new toys, but it'll be that much more satisfying once you have them. I can't recommend this game highly enough. It has its flaws, sure, but for what started as an indie free-to-play, it's come a long way. The game is still regularly updated, the devs are usually quick to fix major bugs, and you can finally live the dream of becoming Space Rambo. What's not to love?
Kyouie;-;This game is really fun and enjoyable alot of fun doing missons its so cool i give it 8/10 ;3 Join in the fun ;D
Edward Scissorpenis;-;Amazing game, really fun and addictive gameplay! Great graphics too!
SkullKid;-;Its Better Then Cod. And its like halo 7/10 lol. Its like Space Ninja Police Force, Its good game lots of weapons Warframes Swords and Eemeys. But it take forever to get weapons and sword or warframe then it tkae 2-4 days just to make it.
EggcellentChicken;-;Warframe you play as a fricken space ninja with guns,bows,greande launchers,swoards hammers,axes and even more and it have very nice combat but I lost intrest quite quickly because at the later levels it become a grind fest,but there is a level cap,but then you get bored of the warframe any go farm for 5 hours to get the buildprints the fram even more for the resourcese then you have to wait 12 hour for 3 parts to build then 3 days for an acutal warframe Overall this game is fun with friends but it just gets boring after a while the score for this game is 6/10
AFuriousBadger;-;Great gime that i would highly reccomend, it has so much content so there is always something to do!
Drejzer;-;Warframe is a mix of tps and a slasher game set in our Solar System. It has great graphisc, nice music and it is fun (there are some bugs thou...) And it's free! You don't have to pay anything (unless you want to get more warframes - you get 2 spaces with one of them occupied - some decorative stuff or youre just plain lazy)
HTCpro_LovesAoA;-;one of the best FTP game ive played , but it gets a little boring after awhile
[NS] iAmEco;-;This game is simply brilliant. I think I should start of by saying this game really is F2P! Although you can buy "Platinum" (the in-game currency) and buy nearly everything with that, apart from a few cosmetics, you can earn everything through playing the game. The story is something as of the time I'm writing this is lacking, there is not much of an explanation for anything, however this is made up for by the fact the gameplay is simply amazing. Gameplay-wise, you start of on the planet Mercury, and although people can "taxi" you to much higher levels, you normally have to make your way through the planets to unlock more missions. Then, once you're in a mission, you can play a variety of styles. You can go stealthy, not being seen, and stealth attacking the helpless Corpus and Grinner (The enemies), you could go for the non-caring style, sprinting through the mission avoiding all fire, or you could go brute force, tearing your way through everything and everyone. Overral, even though lacking in story, it's a brilliant game, so considering it's free-to-play, why not download it!
Capacity3112;-;One of the best F2P Games I've ever plaid!
Yes, I'm a girl. So what?;-;Some people have been saying this game is P2W, and on a very basic level it is, but keep reading. Essentially, I could go in with 200, play 20-30hrs and have maxed out all of the best equipment in the game - OR, I could pay absolutely nothing, and have hundreds of hours of one of the most fulfilling, challenging and exciting co-op experiences on Steam. Every hour I spent grinding paid off well and I didn't feel daunted by the hours of gameplay as there are plenty of levels to choose from, tonnes of bosses and a great community. Building a new Warframe was exciting and well worth the hours of gameplay and downtime it takes to gather resources and build. I have almost 100hrs into the game and I still feel like I could play 1000 more and still have more motives to play. Devs are great and are constantly adding new weapons, missions and frames to keep the game fresh. 10/10 only problem is that it destroyed my social life.
Coffee;-;Very fun at first, can get repetive with the grind. PvP's a little akward with the conclave system. Newer updates are kind of hard to pick up if you don't stay with the game. But Overall Really Fun. 9.5/10
Nokternal;-;I left the game nearly 2 years ago when the founders pack was being sold. Came back at the end of December and to this very day I find myself playing this non-stop. Part of me regrets not buying that founders pack because this game is pretty fun. It improvised a lot and it keeps getting better everyday.
Mythred;-;(Based on ~10 hours of gameplay) + Great graphics + Ninjas + Lot of replayability + Fun, especially with friends + Fair business model +- Grindy (some people like grinding like me, some don't) - Graphics can be a bit demanding - Soloing can get challenging at times Great game, definitely give it a try!
FrosTytheNoob;-;The game has good graphics but the hosting of matches needs some major overhaul
BakedSpuds.png;-;Its rare I come across a game that makes me want to play it every opportunity i get, I have always liked games with a grinding factor to them. Graphics - Quite nice and nicely optimised. Replay-ability (Is that a word?) - Replay this  as much as you like, theres always something you benefit from. Community - Generally it has a really nice community Ninja Stealth Kills - It has plenty of those. Selling point of the game? Um, you can ing fly kick someones face in. -21/12
Visekruna;-;This game is awsome guys. You shoud try it !
Khajit;-;ive played it for a descent amount and it really addicting and amazing for a free game
I am quite good, you know.;-;I have lost control of my life. 10/bird
Tripolarpandamonium;-;Great 3rd person shooter. Has melee primary secondary slots. Very inventive game.
Metatron;-;One of the games worth spending hours and hours of time :)
[TW]NateLo;-;This is really an awesome game ! You can say that it is top f2p game for now !
$@;-;Excellent game, literally the definition of immersive. If you dont have this, I have one question... Why not?
Warfare Reaper;-;if you like shooting, slashing and dashing your way to victory then this is your game.
bizlo;-;Game is fun and looks great, but missions can get repetitive. Has a fair share of bugs. Lots of weapon options, character customization, and warframes make this game a fantastic free to play.
niGnoGs pro.;-;Warframe.... warframe... i've spent alot of hours playing this game and I can safely say that its extremely funny. Like many other games warframe is far from perfect, but its unique co-op style, combat and generally its concept makes it stand out. While I could go on a talk about every aspect of the game i'll try to keep it short. Pros: Enjoyable farm (For me atleast, I have never farmed in a single game to give you an idea I used to sell my extra epics in vanilla wow just to take flight paths, I think this could illustrate that I really didnt farm, I can vouch that warframe farming, has another element to it maybe because the combat its fun?). Great combat, warframe is a great 3rd person action shooter, you can also inflict pain by using melee weapons! Multiple weapons, there are literally about 200 different weapons in the game at the moment, all of them which you can purchase from the store (with in game cash aka credits which are easily acquired), or for other weapons, farm the components. Different types of missions, which all have specific goals, if you don't like a mission type and dont really need anything from it, its pretty straightforward: Do not do it. PvP, while unbalanced its still really funny, and by no means mandatory, it can be seen as another type of mission. Great Co-Op game, if not the best i've played (I won't compare it with games such as broforce or castlecrashers). Cons ( and I really hate saying that ) Zero endgame, if you ever get to farm all of the frames and weapons you want, max them etc... well theres really no one to use them on, the tower 4 missions are considered to be the lategame, even there, you have to wait 40mins+ or 40waves+ in order to get somewhat of a challenge, and if the whole group is skilled, you will have to wait even more. Bugs, game is not filled with, but has some bugs which grow tiresome after a while. Most common would be having an enemy that goes underground, and you having no chance of killing him if you dont have some sort of rocket launcher or spell that will hit anything close. Unbalanced, like pretty much every other game, warframe sense of balance is broken, out of the 200 weapons I mentionned above, well they are pretty much all useless, except (of course) the small list of guns that are completely OP compared to their brethren, about 15 maybe 20 guns. MasteryRank, while I really liked that system, it proved to be nothing else but numbers rising, after reaching MR 8 you can have every weapon (I think). Aside from that, well its not really rewarding, to level up you have to constantly craft new weapons and level them up, being myself rank 11, I surely like seeing the number but I feel like theres no much more to it. Future orientation, of course I do not know where the game is headed, but I started playing somewhere in july, the developpers where already saying that endgame would be included, i've seen some cool reworks being done, new aspects of the game being created, new missions that are about space combat, however end game has still not been included. Storywise, while warframe does seem to have a story line, we know very little about it, which is a shame as I even downloaded a really crappy game to get an idea of WF story. (The game was dark sector, friendly advice - do NOT download dark sector). Chat system & UI.............. I dont even know where to begin with.... Noob unfriendly, fortunately for me, I started out the game with alot of friends, and we already had friends which were high leveled and everything was explained... If I were to startout this game alone I probably would have seen only the first planet. Conclusion: Even though the Cons are important, the game is still awesome and kicks , I really hope the developers realize that they have a great game, and that they could easily make it one of the best games with the addition of minimal stuff really. I really recommend this game. 8/10. yeah.
tuccitango;-;sick af
H.T.;-;A great game. I've been playing since founder's beta (and I myself am a founder). However, I haven't been playing this as much as I used to, mostly because as time goes by I feel like this game isn't catered for me at all. Don't get me wrong. It's still fun and I still recommend it. It's mostly a personal thing. I like games where I feel like it's my character that I'm sticking into the game. I want to feel like I can build and play it the way I want. In a game like Warframe, though, you're given the characters (classes) with very little customization options and while there may be some argument, in reality there's only a few viable builds unless you're content with staying with the really low level missions. If you can get past that, this game has fun, fast action and a lot of different kinds of missions and different maps (randomly generated to some extent), a decent community, and a lot of fun stuff to buy if you're the type that likes to spend real money on games (like me).
GARGA of EVIL_CHICKENS;-;This is most likely one of the best 2014/2015 games there are.Lots of content and constantly adding more while fixing the small bugs or things theydont like along the way. Big thumbs up to the community best ive seen in years,(polar opposite of the CS Go one)people are generaly really nice and helpfull. Give it a try. See you on the battlefield
jackbray65;-;this game is so fun but challenging
Adam Jensen, Terraria Addict;-;Its becoming more and more P2W. But. The Gameplay. Is ing rad as hell.
TRYHARDMAX;-;whatever mother er, game's good like fothermucker
The Finest;-;One of the best F2P games i have ever played.
Aegis;-;10/10 would play again.
||F A U L T S||;-;Warframe is not without its shortcomings with regards to skill-gap, balance and friendliness to novice players, but it's also hugely entertaining. DE have absolutely nailed that 'just one more mission' loop. When you find a group of players who work as a team, or just a friendly player to partner up with for story missions, it can be absolutely thrilling. Survival missions where each team-member works to help others while fending off wave after wave of enemies is a total rush. When you pull off some impossible feat of sword/gun-based acrobatics, it is gratifying like few other games. On the other hand, there is a considerable skill-gap. Get beyond the initial public missions, and you will often find people playing the game at a level of skill and speed that renders novice players little more than a burden. There are also a baffling amount of systems and upgrade trees to navigate. Upgrades have upgrades. There's definitely a part of me that likes the fact that in a lot of ways it's very unabashedly hardcore, but I would certainly caution new players that it requires a level of dedication they might not be willing to give. But, if you like the sound of space-ninjas pulling off improbable feats of death acrobatics against hordes of enemies that look like they were the product of Tsutomu Nihei's fever dreams, and you're prepared to put in the hours to learn how to master the game's myriad systems, then I totally recommend you pick this up and spend a few bucks in the store. Addendum for those worried about the F2P aspect: Spending a bit of money will save you a lot of pain and grind, but you can absolutely play this game and have a thoroughly good time without spending a penny. It is NOT a pay-to-win scenario.
jjtheslenderchild83;-;This is the only "Free to Play" game i will ever play! But the recent updates have been giving me bad frame rate ):
-Baby-Skeletor[LpOol]-;-;Do you like war? Do you like frames? Well, in Frame Maker 2015 awesome mega ultra edition, you'll be making all the picture frames you could ever want, then you can fill them with war pictures, but nothing else. Picture frame weekly said 'Exebeastingtastic fun for just you, not the family!' I've stolen this quote.com said ''Exebeastingtastic fun for just you, not the family! Last time I played this is was good fun, so I'm trying it again. WooT wOOt!
xMilkyChocolate;-;It's ok. After the first 1600 hours of grinding through you start to wonder if other games should be played instead. Not to say Warframe is a bad game, But I spent probably 500$ total on the game, and played the same levels 1000 times over. It's essentially the coolest character customization and power based game I've ever played. With a very high skill cap and Timed waiting (build times for everything some reach up to 3 days) to get to late game content (unless you have some money). With the downfall of having sub par repeating "tileset" based levels. The idea of it is ok, and will not become repetitive until about 100 hours in max. But overall this is what you can expect from warframe. Pros -Amazing easy to do indepth character customization -Large amount of weapons -Large variety of weapons (seriously there's a freeze gun in this) -Solid upgrade/leveling system. -Fun and epic character abilities -Easy to play with friends -Active community forums (Devs will read posts in forums to help improve the game) -Detailed and informative wiki page -Updates from devs via stream -Everything non asthetic is available to get with in-game currency Cons -Long wait times for items (e.g guns, warframes, keys, blueprints) to build (with the exception of real money to rush it) -Repetitive levels. (you'll play the same level you did on the first planet, as you will on the last planet with the exception of higher level enemies) -Not pay to win, but if you want to look cool in anyway, you're going to be paying for platnium (paid currency) -Very Grindy (seriously if you don't like grind games look somewhere else) -Poor PVP balancing and gameplay Overall, it's worth downloading and checking out. I have been playing since patch 2.0 (almost 3 years ago) and I think this game has the potential to be AAA status if they remake the map and planet system.
Perverted Fox;-;Good game , Enjoy it very much
Creamy;-;This is an awesome game and its ing FREE! In my opinion this is by far the best free to play experience I've had the pleasure of gracing. Essentially, you can get everything in game without spending a penny of real dosh. The gameplay itself is very free flowing, smooth and lets you do a lot more like climb the environment do parkour crouch or slide around the map. Overall it's a unique and fun game to play that bears resemblance to Mass Effect. This game is still in Beta and has a lot more potential that it can muster up in my opinion. 8/10
CODISBETTER;-;At first I looked at this game and thought "ehh to much alien looking stuff for me" BUT MAN WAS I WRONG this game is amazing and i would recommend it even though ive only got 4 hours on record i can see many more coming!!!
TehRazor;-;Probably the best f2p game along with LoL in my opinion.You have to grind for your stuff and you have to do different missions all the time.Totally recommended.
flzero;-;good graphics and gameplay, plus is a good co op game so with some friends it can become the best game u have eva play XD
AlphaPurple;-;i played it before but it is still good ThirdPerson shooter..nothing to say..
gamer44real;-;Very Recomended. Amazing Graphic and it's FREE !!
Zix;-;YOU ARE A NINJA IN SPACE WITH SUPER POWERS. What else do you want??
Draenian;-;Great Game! Beautiful Graphics for a free game. If you love fast paced gameplay this is perfect for you. But some miner points if you don't have a lot of time you might not be able to get the frame you want because this is a GRINDING game, that doesn't bother me at all but if you want something you will be able to get it but you will have to wait a bit. All in All would give this 9.5/10 Because the game is still in Closed Beta and there's still some bugs (the most are minors)
greenraven22;-;Ninjas. SPACE ninjas! What more do you expect me to say?!
GoodSirSatanist;-;Its good
Destiny;-;Scavenging, shiny robots, fast paced universal combat, it'll get you hooked! I have friends who play this endlessly, and after joining all the hype, I don't regret it. If you've ever played the Borderlands series you'd get a slight feel for it when you notice all of the mods, ammo packs, etc flooding the ground. This game really immerses you into several atmospheres. For those who like to take it slow can go for stealth approaches in levels, adding a booming level of intensity. Patience is key, so be careful not to get caught! Then there is the tanking aspect, if you want to get a mission done quick, ring in your fastest and heaviest fire power, because you'll have hordes of enemies on you! Starting out though, try not to get too intimidated, I recommend tuning into the the storyline, as it can help a whole lot. Bring an experienced friend a long to help! Getting confused and put off is easy, as a lot of the game aspects fly right by you pretty quick. Overall this game is great, you have a long way to go before you end up getting bored because the variety will take you on so many experiences. 8/10
Delirious;-;What can I say? This space-ninja based game caught my eye and life. Playing with friends hasn't been more fun, running through different instances such as spaceships, devastated debris fields, ancient ruins, all with one purpose: cutting off infested zombie-like creatures, robotic grineers or energy wielding humans. And blowing everything up with each different Warframe unique and epic ability. With a huge arsenal of weapon variety, different mods to customize your playstyle accordingly for each frame, makes the posibilities endless. Although it sometimes can get repetitive, like power leveling, farming, and non stop killing, there's this thing that keeps Warframe so good over the years: the constant and non-stop updates and events from the developers, DE. Fun with friends, get three teammates and have a great laugh killing everything on sight. If you like mayhem: you got it!
[U.S.] [S.G.] Reign;-;This is one of my personal favorite free to play games on steam. Amazing gameplay great storyline and intense fights. I like this game because it isn't one of the endless mindless first person shooters but actually can maintain both storyline and hype. Recomended for anyone.
Mcceag;-;Now that over a thousand hours of my life have gone into this game as well as a good chunk of cash I can really give this a better review. In short, it's fun but doesn't feel like its going in the direction it should(or that I would like). I don't really know how to describe my feelings for it. After U.I. 2.0 it just wasn't as much fun. I was rank 16(highest you could be at the time) and had every weapon i could obtain except for 3 and then new ones came, and then more, and more. Sure this is how Warframe has been but for some reason it just wasnt as fun. Some of the new weapons now look fun but during that time I couldn't get back into it. I will say that if you come across this review and haven't played yet, get the game. its amazing when you fist start out as you have so many weapons and warframes to choose from. And of course its a grindfest so if you're into that then you will be fine. I hope you enjoy this game and maybe you'll see it finally get released.:Corpus::Grineer:
shoogs;-;I ran up a wall, backflipped, and took down 20 people with nothing but my dual axes and pistols while sliding. This game makes you Jesus. I'm pretty sure Jesus did that.
840blazeitforJeezus;-;My life means nothing anymore after spending an entire week on this game.
Bloobite | trade.tf;-;Seriously. Stop reading these things and just get the bloody game, you wont regret it + its free! 10/10 (could be 11/10 even)
Goat Ogrelord;-;It's amazing
Ran-SnichClash;-;OH! YEAH this game is a a aswome! there tons of level a lot or friends fun and the feeling is amazing look you need to build stuff to make some weapons that you can buy only in cash there are some weapens for cash to but the point here every body should play it if there was a lot of player it will be ton of fun except that warframe have clans(that you can create rare suits and weapons with it) they want you to play with friends so go now dawnload it and have fun
Bloodtomato;-;Fabulous!!! <3
Darrparrot the Dingle Dangler;-;The amount of time you can spend playing this game is impressive. It is a very well made game and I don't regret the time I put into it.
Baron;-;Space Ninjas. Your argument is invalid.
Tracks22;-;This is a great game to grab a couple of freinds and parkcore over emines ranging for high tech robots to alien like zombie creaturs, this game has a great in depth coustomation like moding your guns,player and pets. Also has a lot of color customizations opotions. This game has a great visual effects from elxploding obejsts to turning into a puddle. Over all this is one of top free to play games I had ever played.
Dasheroo;-;You play as a tenno(space ninja) killing space marines, zombies, and robots. whats not to like?
gDronning;-;10/10 this game is slowly ruining my social life
TicklishPicklewickle;-;This is good game. I recommend it. Can't believe it's free.
Yankee;-;Good development and updates still going on. The graphic is good. Nice game
UnoriginalCrab;-;Great game fun ,and fast paced
Hawkins300;-;To tell the truth I not a big ninja kind of guy, but it is a nice game and i like the co-op. They did a nice job blending the commando and ninja into one. It has a very good playibility.
Fenrir;-;Good game with nice graphic..!!
Grandma;-;An epic sci-fi action packed with supercharged high tech space ninjas, superpowers, akimbo hand shotguns and more awesome weaponry. Warframe is a nonstop, superfun game, think of it as a futuristic Left4Dead added with the capability of parkour. If this game didn't have weapon/armor/accessory blueprints, it would be almost impossible to upgrade your arsenal and would feel like as if you've been ripped off by some cheesy ipad fremium game which for me, would only be the downside of the game. I would definitely recommend this to all the players who love co-op shooters.
Yoda_Max;-;this game is free? IT ROCKS!
RGL | Neon(Myte);;-;3 Words - Best Game Ever. Additional more words - why do you still not have this game? =3= best game ive ever played BUT the bad part is the mission can be pretty repetitive but overall its amazing 11/10 :P just get this game xD
TheWelshAttorney;-;Warframe: Micro transactions that save your life. Lets all be honest here, microtransactions are the bain of all gamers, and this game takes the absolute  when it comes to them. "You want to get that class? Pay 10 and another 3.70 in individual packs to get it" When it comes to gameplay however, this game pulls back some "Good boy points" for the addictive Hack 'N' Slash aspect of running around with a huge battle-axe swinging faster than the wheels on a Ferrari going top speed. THIS GAME WILL TAKE HOURS OF YOUR LIFE AWAY!!! When crafting a new weapon or a class this game takes the royal F-. Low level weapons/ unsorted weapons: 12H Popular weapons: 24H Classes 3 MOTHERF- DAYS Timers like that are NOT healthy for a game to survive, also it forces the player to think: "I should really spend some money so i don't have to wait 3 days for this new class." Despite my constant playing of the game, (Getting a blazing +420 hours) this game disappoints me with build times. 6/10.
wilson.kyle16;-;Warframe is by far my favorite game i recommand this game to any Gamer that enjoys fast action and an insane lvling system .
The Elegant Bastard;-;All I have to say is this, if it looks fun or semi fun to you, give it a try. However, if it looks like it's not you kind of thing or that it doesn't look fun, then hey, you don't have to download it. Personaly I had fun with it. I wouldn't say it's one of the best f2p ( free to play for those of you that don't know ), but i hade fun with it.
hockeyevan101;-;Slightly repetative after a while but its a good game 7.5/10
szpil4;-;Great game 10/10
Kazemanezak;-;Best ninja themed grinding simulator ever made 10/10
Swigglesheep;-;great game :D you must try it
SKORG;-;An epic sci-fi hack-and-slash shoot 'em up with an in-depth customization and leveling system along with a myriad of locations to go to build up your character.... The movement, combat and sword play is very fluid... Enemies give just enough challenge.... This game has plenty of content plus it's free to play so there is no loss to not liking it.... XD
Mattyk;-;Basically a free to play version of Destiny, that came out before destiny. If you want a game thats fast paced & easy to play, and doesn't take allot of grind time to enjoy it then its worth the free install. BUT it is a typical console run and gun with a shinny appearance to hide the lacking of progressive storyline or variance in gameplay.
Sinister_Grin;-;The graphics r amazing for f2p.
Demoman119;-;If you love Level Grinding and loot farming, this is the game for you. can be repetitive at times, but overall very fun when you have friends to compete with.
[CRFX]The Webbliest;-;Free-to-play Cyberninja TPS? Count me in! Warframe is fun as hell, and it's an open beta which means it's evolving constantly! Update: 2 years later, still loving this game!
Naruto, #Believe it;-;Its good.
Rainbow Asis#Vaca;-;Love the realism.
./pyXedd;-;Update 5/11/2015: With over 300 hours logged, most from the beginning phases of the game in Beta, and a break in between 2/2014 to now, I can say with full confidence, that the game has taken a 360 degree turn in the right direction. The sheer amount of material that is available now, and the improvements, are not small, and are not something to shy away from. This game hold the title (In my eyes) as the Number 1 Free-to-play Co-op game and the Number 1 free-to-play TPS game. For folks who are returning to the game from back in early 2014, it will take a nice while to get used to the new interfaces, modifications, and ways of playing the game. But once you get used to it, it works perfectly, and even better and more fulfilling than before. Have fun Tenno. First Review Feb, 2014: Once you get into it, it's ing addictive. Like my buddy (morker) said, "it's mindless fun".
Hippie;-;interesting
1BuLLeTOnLy;-;Nine out of Tenno :D 11/10 I'm playing it from 2 years now and i can say this is the best f2p game atm.Have fun all !
Goldstone;-;Really good third person shooter 10/10
Teariestshadow;-;Welcome to grinding simulator! This game is AWSOME, I really recomend it, this is the best free game you will EVER find, it even beats games that cost 40$!!! GET THIS GAME
Rat;-;This game is probanly the best Coop TPS i've ever played ! Long life to Warframe !
Generic Individual;-;This is a game.
Snow Halation;-;It turned me from atheist to religious. Hail RNGsus.
You just don't get it, do you?;-;Craving for this game, Ninja kitty
lewis1316;-;grate game i love it can't wate for the next one!
Avalon;-;By far one of my favorite free to play games of all time. Yes like any free to play game it can get a bit repetitive, but at the same time it has a lot of diversity if you so choose to allow it to have some. Not only does this game constantly update, meaning you will always have a bit of new content to play around with, but it also supports several different play styles in the four man teams the game brings together. Whether you're playing with a bunch of friends, making new friends in random matches, or just playing like a lone wolf, this game will be sure to entertain you for quite a bit.
RiversOfGore;-;I...I can't stop playing. Best free to play model in existence. Probably one of the only games out there where you honestly don't have to spend any money. All the Warframes, Weapons, and Mods can be gained without spending any money at all. The community is great and there is always someone willing to help. New content is being added on a nearly weekly basis. The gameplay is what really shines though. The shooting mechanics, melee mechanics, and how you traverse the maps (parkour) are some of the best the shooter genre has to offer.
Gorilla Warfare;-;I suggest playing with friends.... trying to grind by yourself gets a bit boaring after 4 hours of game play. But, its f2p, and has one of the greatest graphics i ever saw on a f2p game. Definately worth checking out.
Avalon;-;By far one of my favorite free to play games of all time. Yes like any free to play game it can get a bit repetitive, but at the same time it has a lot of diversity if you so choose to allow it to have some. Not only does this game constantly update, meaning you will always have a bit of new content to play around with, but it also supports several different play styles in the four man teams the game brings together. Whether you're playing with a bunch of friends, making new friends in random matches, or just playing like a lone wolf, this game will be sure to entertain you for quite a bit.
Wub;-;Really fun for about 2 1/2 hours. 5/10.
Rat;-;This game is probanly the best Coop TPS i've ever played ! Long life to Warframe !
You just don't get it, do you?;-;Craving for this game, Ninja kitty
lewis1316;-;grate game i love it can't wate for the next one!
Generic Individual;-;This is a game.
SNAFU;-;Amazing action third-person game with enough content to keep you coming back for more and active developers that keep open channels to the community.
I Am The Walrus;-;Really enjoyable :)
Sensei Doctor Professor Aaron;-;I have recently discovered Warframe, but I've been completely hooked ever since. If you are uncertain what this game is supposed to be, it's very much like an mmorpg in a lot of respects, but missions are played with teams of 4. You do have your farming, grinding and classes, for example, but Warframe does a lot of things differently, and I really like all these differences with more traditional MMO's. For example, the combat has some parkour thrown into it, it has hordes and hordes of enemies you have to lay waste to and with the abilities the characters (aka warframes) have, you can freshen up the gameplay just by picking another weapon or frame. Which is another great thing about this game, there are plenty of completely viable yet different weapons and warframes, and you can easily switch between the ones you have whenever you are not in a mission. And all weapons can be farmed for fair and square, there is not pay to win there. Another thing is that instead of having a world with NPC's and quests, Warframe has a solar map you can use to instantly select the mission you want to play. That means less meaningless questing to keep you busy and more to-the-point farming for what you need. To me, that keeps the game meaningful. Although this means less story and possibly less immersion, it does prevent having to do boring backtracking and fetching quests just to progress in the questline. You are just transported to the action instantly, and as soon as it ends you are back in your ship and ready for more action. Never a dull moment. But, of course, this game is free to play, and we all know how bad that can be. In the case of Warframe, I'd say the pay to play is fair enough, but it could be better. For example, there is no way to get extra slots for warframes and weapons besides using the paid currency (platinum), and you'll absolutely need that space in order to play the game. Now I know a few players who haven't spent a penny and still managed to get the platinum by trading with other players, but with the current trading system that requires immense effort and is very, very frustrating. The trade chat is a mess and trading requires you to memorize the parts you have, try and keep up with trade-chat and then heading to a special place in order to exchange a maximum of 4 items per trade. It's needlessly complicated. So, I spend around 5 bucks a month in order to get my slots and potatoes, which is quite reasonable considering the sheer amount of updates this game receives, but be aware that actually playing for free will be limiting and frustrating. Which brings me to point three, the updates. The reason I spend 5 bucks a month is that in return, the game gets updated incredibly often. In order to keep veteran players interested it is necessary to release all sorts of time-limited offers for rare loot, events for rarer loot, expensive, time-limited hard-to-get endgame content and updates with new warframes and weapons. So, warframe gets tons of updates from the devs, and frequent updates are the core of a lively community. And that brings me to another positive point about this game, the community and the devs. Digital Extremes (DE for short) is legendary. Besides giving frequent content updates, DE keeps in touch with their community through well-watched streams on twitch every single week, one on thursday for fun and giggles, and one on friday where they talk about everything DE is working on. This transparency is why DE is very liked by the community, the streams give you a good idea of what the personal motivations of the devs is and there is a lot of respect going on between DE and the players. Which is very good, and I've never seen anything like this from a reasonably big company like DE. And because Warframe is 100% co-op, I found that the community is helpful and respectful. As a new player, instead of being kicked out and looked down upon, I was helped by more experienced players as soon as I asked a question, and when I had difficulty getting a rare item random players would sometimes just give it to me. So with the devs and players all being very respectful, the game has a nice atmosphere going on. Which I enjoy. So, all in all, my only concern with Warframe is that there is some content that is locked behind a paywall. The good news is that you can get around that, the bad news is that it's pretty hard. But nonetheless the game is hugely enjoyable, the community is one of the best I've seen and the game is very much alive and sprawling with content, more being added almost weekly. Certainly worth your time I'd say.
AStopidChimp;-;It's like Destiny, but free, and better.
Snow Halation;-;It turned me from atheist to religious. Hail RNGsus.
Jacobus;-;Warframe is in a league of it's own not only because of how good it is now but how good it will be. Everytime you look away from this game they have crazy patches and events and as such I will always recommend this game.
RaijiN^^;-;i will like to recommend this game to everyone ... this game have some reality dat i have never expected ...
KnockFire;-;this game is fun the updates takes to long and ii dont know why they would add a box after you press play cus sometimes the box freezes but gameplay looks awesome
CinnamonToast Crunch;-;This is a great game
R3venantic;-;Honestly, with it being still in BETA, I am massively impressed by the brilliant graphics, great gameplay, sick weapons and skins, the being able to not be pay-to-win and most of all; by the best community that i have ever seen in any MMO ever! I already played this game so much and I hope that I will maintain playing this amazing game!
Chikn tendies;-;Great game 10/10
Bennick;-;Literally, and without question, the most fun and intense free to play cooperative game ever.
[TU]ReD xXx;-;Fast pace game, good looking visuals and customizations, Friendly community, game is always up to date, they keep there fans up to date
Generationz_x;-;Warframe in my opinion it is just too amazing to be free and i mean for god's sake you're a space ninja whats not to love about that and another thing it have a great and helpful community involved in it plus its a really great game to play with friends.
TH1SMACHINE;-;Ok so my friend is engrossed by this game, so I got it to see what the hype was about. I got it and played about 2 hours then quit. Let me tell you at first this game is very slow and semi hard to play due to the crap starter weapons and melee options, not to mention the fact that I picked the widley excepted worst starter but after that 4 hour mark and a few missions grinding it out to get that gun I really wanted I started to have fun. The Point of the matter is you have to work at the beginning to have a great and fun game experience. As you can see I still have more hours to put in so this review is not concrete because the game is always getting updates which is a great thing, adding in new things such as the new stances that give the game sort of a fighting game aspect with the various combos. Pros: Graphics are great for a free game, If you play with friends you will have fun, so great co-op, oh yeah its a FREE GAME so why not. Cons: I would be lying If I told you the gameplay was not repetitive, You have to grind like crazy to get what you want. If you don't have fun at first try the game with friends.
KeiiLeHoNK;-;Best game in the world..... We'll....to me at least. I adore this game ; u ; <3
Yoda_Max;-;this game is free? IT ROCKS!
Parvenu Walrus;-;Please understand (before skipping this review because I only have 7 hours logged) that I played this long before I even knew steam existed. It might as well be a seperate game from the one I started playing, but it has stayed just as good, if not improved, over the years. The graphics are nice even at the lowest settings, allowing the ability to play a nice looking game without lagging. The gameplay, while slightly overwhelming at first, is fluid and makes you feel like a boss. You can play however you want, from being sneaky and evading your foes, or rushing headstrong into a horde of grineer with your sword, so every player plays their own game. Additionaly, every warframe and weapon changes that style. For example, I main Limbo on my steam, who differs greatly from my old excalibur. Instead of sword skills, Limbo can manipulate the void to his will and transport his friends, foes, and even himself into the rift between the void and reality. Every single warframe has awesome abilities like that. The customization is awesome, and once you have a clan it gets that much better. This game is a masterpiece. A blend of Assassin's creed, dark souls, KOTOR, Halo, Destiny, and god knows what else. It's free, go give it a shot. You will love it.
AssaSinLife;-;Good game if you don't mind repetitive grinding
Maou Sadao;-;I do not know why this game is free, but im not complaining. Their loss is our gain...
Tieg;-;The first F2P that doesn't bone you for not paying. Grinding for gear like old school... I love it. People say robot ninjas, I say the Gyver.
Zerothesonicfan;-;You get to be a space ninja while fighting space robots in space using space guns with space parkour. 100/10 Really though this is the best game on steam i have played with over 64 hours.
ShadeAwesome;-;Recommended! Awesome game@
Kriosasacil;-;Great F2P, all weapons and classes are craftable without spending a dime. Some cosmetics are available for free but some are exclusively Real Money Currency. Unlike other games, these cosmetics don't cost an arm and a leg to aquire. If you feel like trying it out use my referral link, it'll give you a 7 day exp booster and i'll get some  mods I already have as a reward... https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=5260e7581a4d80ec77000026
lulzmoose;-;fun game,but gets repeatative after a while. it is FTP but i dont think it is a pay to win game. they are fairly balanced with the payment system.
Dragonninja3;-;Love this game ! get it..... ill play with you
RainbowDash;-;Amazing game, but reqires ALOT of grinding and PvP could be improved upon
The Snacrifice;-;See that trailer video? You actually can do that. You play a space ninja. Third person shooty-stabby game with mmo powers on top. Worth playng especially since it's free. So it's been about a year since DE(Digital Extremes) started talking about coming out of 'Open Beta'. They've yet to do so. I still think the game can be fun for a while, but there's just no content after a certain point. What story is there is interesting, and there's a TON of -potential-. But the game itself just has not improved where it should have. The new UIs are also awful, console-ish monstrosities that make it harder to get around to what you need when. It's a solid 6/10 MMO game, with an AMAZING art group. The game -looks- very good, it even plays pretty well(bugs aside). It just has zero staying power. You'll play for three weeks, stop for six months, come back and play a week or two to get hte new shinies, then quit again.
Jaback1;-;Grinding on top of grinding rolled up in grinding, yet It is by far my favorite game in a long time. It features a multitude of weapons and warframes that suit any play style, from stealth, to tanking. Although it is a F2P game with 2 currencies, a multitude of weapons can be crafted from blueprints either purchased from the store, or from a clan lab. these weapons gain experience as you use them, and the higher you rank them, the more mods you can apply. These range from elemental mods, fire rate, damage, etc. which further enhances combat. Combat is fast paced and easy to pick up, and plays much like other stealth games with wallruns and other cool tricks. Overall, this game is fantastic for a free to play game, with many features any gamer wants. Pros- Easy to learn, hard to put down (Sorry for the cheesy saying) Matches a variety of play styles Customization Devs are funny (Poke fun at their own mistakes) Fast paced Cons- Grinding, grinding, grinding Trading proves difficult, one player must have a clan No servers, everything is from the host Stalker is an , and only appears when you have unranked stuff equipped
Tomoe Mami;-;Has some of the best hack n' slash gameplay I've even seen. The guns are all kinds of badass, the movement fluid, the graphics up to date - and to top it all, the game is completely free. And no pay-to-win crap either. Now, the platinum is pretty ridiculously overpriced, but there is absolutely nothing in the game you can't get for free (barring Excalibur Prime, and you can' t get that now anyway). May involve excessive grinding though, but still - M8 I r8 this game 8/8
Azrael;-;Fun stuff, great time killer in solo, and tons of fun with friends. Early missions are a cakewalk, but it definitely has it's challenging moments. Love how the game evolves with the player.
Rewards;-;I recommend this game.
Saboothe321;-;GREAT game, if you like 3rd person bloodbaths. Lots of choices for each playstyle, whether you're the front-line tank or the supportive one in the back. Weapons galore.
Zurek Morraff;-;This game is amazing. I'm not gonna bore you with personal ideas, i'm just gonna get right to the facts, but first, know this game is seriously FREE. Download it, give it a whirl, and if you don't like it, then move on! No harm done! 1. The Devs seriously care about this game, and its community. The do a "DevStream" ever 2 weeks, to discuss the future of the game, what might be changing, what will be changing, and it's all in good fun. 2. It's Free To Play, and NOT Pay To Win. This game is 99.9% PvE. Every Single Weapon and Warframe is able to be obtainned in-game. The ONLY things you "have" to pay for are cosmetic items (and the helmets drop every few days), and weapon/frame slots. BUT you start out with 50 Plat "in-game money" which can go towards said weapon and frame slots. Don't want to pay them money? No worries! play the game, find rare mods, or prime parts, which is easy, unless you've angered RNGesus in a past life or something, (prime parts are the "Prime" parts needed to make the Prime Warframes) and sell them to players in the community! Make Plat that way, and spend it as you please! 3. The community is 98% amazing. We love to help starting players find there way, clear nodes, and fight bosses. Can't figure out how to do X-thing? ask! we'll do the best we can to help! I need to mention that this game, obviously, isn't perfect. There is Warframes 2% of the community that arn't all hands on deck to be friendly and kind. There are a ton of bugs, that get fixed with nearly every hotfix (usually 1 hotfix every week). And RNGesus won't always look upon you in favor, but if you persist, and take up arms, and join our community: Welcome to Warframe. May The Lotus be your guide.
Jasu;-;My long time favorite game. There is so much content really well hidden from new players which is a bit sad but once you get there it it is worth it. Learning curve is quite steep and it takes a lot to understand how the game and its mechanics work. To see Voids, Orokin Derelicts, all the different map types (atleast 7 tilesets), clan dojos (duels and obstacle courses), codexes and Lephantis propably takes atleast 50-100 hours by yourself. F2P model has been improved and especially frames are now a lot easier to obtain (drop rates are good) and there are a lot events that give you plenty of ingame credits. Gameplay is solid and is improved constantly and there are updates pretty much every week.
Pie Duck;-;I don't really write reviews that often but... Install this game now , your missing out on so much! The game might start off slow but when you start getting prime weapons and warframes , and much much MUCH better things , you'll come to like this game more and more...
Solaire Of Astora;-;You can be a space ninja with a hammer and quadbow and dual wield flesh pistols, 11/10.
SnazzyNazzy;-;Garry's Mod?sure.Loadout?definatly.Warframe? YEA ES!
Tjaekazuta;-;Love this game! Massive content amounts, great with friends and solo. Any player should be welcome to the Warframe forums and wiki. Those places help you out so much to progress in the game. Its completely free (except cosmetics) and not plagued with micro transactions. Everything that costs money in the game can be acquired through time and patience or selling stuff in the market. Game developers are also working really hard in this game. Packing massive updates and fixes very often. Kudos to the sound, graphics, design, music, controls, gameplay, story and support team. My only issue with the game is that the many weapons in the game have one thing in common: they're bad. Im not talking about their mechanics or their repetitiveness, Im talking about the fact that you have to work hard for some interesting weapons with awesome mechanics, only to figure out they are rendered useless due to insanely low damage. I would love to see end game players running around with a varied arsenal. Not the same four master race weapons you have to have in order to take down high ranking enemies. In the future of this game, I would hope to see these unloved weapons such as the launchers, flamethrowers, crazy sidearms and shotguns buffed and at the side of Tenno playing in a Tower 4 Survival mission or so. Seriously, there are 217 weapons in the game, none of them are just reskinned copies or similar in any way, but the total amount of weapons even worth visiting: only about 10 generic DPS dealers. Other than that, broken / abandoned things in the game including the log in reward system, upgrade system being too complicated for new players all will be fixed as mentioned in Dev streams. They've done an astounding job at paying attention to every problem we or the game has ever had.
Jon Snow dies.;-;At first, I was like "Hitler did nothing wrong", then I was all like "Atleast Michael Phelps could finish a race"
Pyongzilla;-;Pretty good game ruined by bad host connection (unable to connect, host data migration etc). Fortunately its temporarily fixed by disabling Direct X 10 & 11 from the launcher.
[L4P] Korishiva;-;From the creators of a not so known game called Dark Sector, comes it's (spiritual) sequel: Warframe! A F2P game done right (except many bugs and problems with AMD GPU's)! Yes, there are minitransactions for more space and cosmetics, but it's a friggin' F2P game! How should they earn money otherwise..? (and you can earn this "premium" cash in-game if you grind Prime parts in the Void by selling to other players) Besides, the important stuff (like frames, weapons and mats) is aquired by doing missions etc. You just need to explore! This game is best played with friends, and tend to become really boring etc if you play it alone (but since it's a F2P game anyone kan join, which is nice, right?) I honeslty think this is an awesome game, but they could have fixed some of the very well known issues etc to make the fans a bit more happy :p
Batman;-;This game has much more to give than usual Free-to-Play games
RZ;-;11/10 addicting game
Nicais;-;I started to play this game when I got into the closed beta and I still play this game till today one of the most addicting and straightforeward games I've played so far. Only downside I do feel is just the grind is strong with this one.
[FPTS] Galakaston;-;10/10 Would eat again!
Yaikuro;-;good and addictive
Entity@Pchy;-;Hell yea! Kids, Play this game to get some SKILLZ!
SonikkuYossh |;-;This is one of the best free games i have played.
lol;-;This game...Whewh.. The deveolpers are NOT lying the "evolving" si-fi world (updates almost every week with new toys) the deveopers always listen to your requests, and everything is 100% free....EVERYTHING. Game runs well on low end and still looks awesome, on high end it looks next gen, not a year younger, but 5 years ahead of other graphics. The game engine is amazing, never lag (exept when there is more than 60 enemies on screen, thats when you drop 10-20 fps.
Ketura;-;Great grinding game. It can be a pain in the  sometimes, especialy when you want to max mods.
Milk;-;I saw a steam friend playing the game and became rather curious, so I ended up adding it to my library and started playing. At first, it was a bit confusing. Some of the controls were hard to grasp. Once I worked through it though, it became quite enjoyable. I somehow believe this is what Destiny was trying to achieve. I haven't played many hours but I have enjoyed every single hour I have played. Once you work through the mechanics of the game and get a handle on it, it becomes a whole new environment. The multiplayer aspect from what I've experienced so far, has been fantastic and the community seems to be rather friendly as well. If you have a good chunk of time to occupy, I highly recommend looking into Warframe. I still am a little confused with some of the game mechanics but it doesn't change the fact that this is a great game. Best of all, free to play :)
Vinnie;-;Enjoyable enough so you can spend a few hours.
Jenkem;-;This is a great game, I heard it was for s like you
[red][SSdS]ShaosOkais;-;great graphics, awesome campaign missions with so many different customizations (comes with your very own kubrow![sort of like an attack dog]and or a companion on missions) just annoying to get resources D:D
Limeativity;-;Played this game in the first year it went into open beta, way before it went out on steam. I had a mastery rank of 12 and a grand master founder badge. Spent about $350+ on it and I've be showcased on their stream. I've run out of platinum a long time ago just buying cosmetics. Haven't played a game in about a year. It's fun, but gets old after a few hundred hours.
El Grego Bueno;-;really great game a little buggy but the devs are really good about realeasing fixs warframe is constanly being added on to and fixed this game is really enjoyable its fun destorying wave after wave of enemies while getting rewards yeah warframe is super grindy but at least you can kill all your enemies with style while you grind im really excited to see what this game will be like a year from now
Mexican Gandhi;-;All you do in this game is farm, i have over 800 hours of farming, its ing awesome. 11/10 would grind again
affrow101;-;I admit that when I first started playing this game I was impressed with all the bells and whistles that the game had to offer for a free to play game. I played it so much at first that I got burnt out on it and the game just felt like a grinding fest. Which in essence it is, But what really helps when playing this game is to make friends. Your friends (if they have been playing for an extended period of time) will beable to give you the information you need to meet your goals of a new weapon/warframe and make the process extremely simple. If you like playing lone wolf that is fine as well you can set your misson access to invite-only and if you need information check the wiki. Simply play how you want.
FierceClash;-;this game is one of the best third person shooter games that i have ever played.
.inf;-;This game offer a new way to be a ninja.
Smug Skeleton;-;Warframe is good-looking, smooth-working and lets you be a futuristic alien space ninja. Why are you still reading this and not playing the game?
EpicxPacman;-;Amazing free to play game. A lot of things about the game are frustrating. But i cant stop playing it. If you want to play a game that makes you feel like a badass. this is it!
Teariestshadow;-;Welcome to grinding simulator! This game is AWSOME, I really recomend it, this is the best free game you will EVER find, it even beats games that cost 40$!!! GET THIS GAME
Kurpz;-;So much to to in a free to play game is amazing!! 10/10
Willi Brennt;-;space ninjas. with magic space swords/hammers/scythes/... cutting nazi zombi cyborgs in half/quarters/... best thing ever.
Samula;-;Im not a ninja, How much do I have to pay?
Dasheroo;-;You play as a tenno(space ninja) killing space marines, zombies, and robots. whats not to like?
ana;-;Takes alot of time but is really fun, especially with some irl friends. It's quite pay2win tho, unless you are extremely patient :d
CHVMVNDII;-;This game is easily one of the best free to play games out on the steam market. Very addictive, Grinding, Repetative, Always updating with new content as well as events. I strongly reccomend this game. Technically this game is still in Open Beta. Digital Extremes is the Developer, who has also developed Unreal, Unreal Tournament. see the website for more details on games these guys have developed. http://www.digitalextremes.com/games
Cosmicus;-;Superb game , 3 person RPG farm pve/pvp a time killer a super cool game + it gots space ninjas yes SPACE NINJAS ^^
Anti Hero;-;Who dosen't love a good grindfest/space ninja/ 3rd person shooter/ overcomplicated game? Luv dis game.
TicklishPicklewickle;-;This is good game. I recommend it. Can't believe it's free.
gDronning;-;10/10 this game is slowly ruining my social life
Yankee;-;Good development and updates still going on. The graphic is good. Nice game
nachtsmith;-;i can punch bullets
Deaner;-;Ninjas in space. Nothing more need be said.
toadmario89;-;free to play destiny on pc is pretty much this game but diffrent
(PrSm) Midin;-;Kill to grind. Grind to kill ("like diablo with guns") 3/4 revives
Sub-Zero;-;Special Units (Players) Must attack enemy but game is ing AWESOME!!!!!XD!!!!Download faster it cool game!!!!
fiERCeY^v^;-;Great game, lots of things to do, however gets repetitive really fast.
squid now;-;the best ps4-to-pc port ever buy immediately
SoonKyu;-;Ten out of Tenno.
Master Proton;-;Great game EDIT 1. After playing this game off and on for the last year or so atleast 11 months tops i found i at first sucked at the game and i mean that literally since it took me 11 months just to reach rank 1 in my account ( not my frames or weapons ) and only a day to reach rank 2 :/ see where i'm going here, welp after meeting ALOT and I mean alot of nice and helpful people who tought me ALOT about the game and how things work i was able to as i said above beat the rank 1 test etc and also make my first warframe after the tutorial pick which i chose excalibur i'am happy have a Rhino warframe by tomorrow which will be my first warframe i'd ever gotten :) i love the game it has a nice grind to it and also over half the things in the game you can get for free and depending the mission you go to it doesn't feel as a grind cause sometimes it starts you off at different parts of the map making it feel like your on a new map each time :D :D . I highly recommend you download and play this game heck if you need someone to help you out when starting out just add me on steam or add me on warframe my ID is ( drugfree9797 ) but with out the ( ) ya as rating go these are just beta rating right now I'll post them below, also in under a year this game has went from what it was when i started playing to a really fun graghical world full of some nice people , also the game now has a space mode which i have yet to try since i'm still in the the downlow of the game i hope by the end of the year to be better in the game. Ratings. Graghics: 9/10 intense graghics ( blood and gore ) : 7/10 audio/voice overs: 10/10 settings/options: 10/10 customization: 6/10 ( it's good i really should do 10/10 but it's limited currently right now with it in beta and all hopefully we get better customizations later on ) game mechanics/physics: 10/10 ( you can walk climb on walls and alot of others thing i don't want to spoil for you ) story: 2/10 ( hopefully we get an actual story mode seperate from what we have now in the game that tells an actual story not like they have it now ) space mode: 0/0 ( I can't right this currently cause i as of yet haven't tried it) controller support: 5/10 ( has some issues with a gamepad but you can fix that by changing the controls etc ) enemy AI : 6/10 ( most fun i've ever had fighting a computer game's ai ) BEST Warframe: I'am currently working on that but from what i can tell the best ones are Valkyr, Rhino, and Nekros. Best tutorial warframe: I'd have to say out of the 2 i've tried the best was Volt but you may like Excalibur cause he was my first choice and the only one i've successfully mastered.
Froz;-;Mass Effect and Dinasy Warrior had a baby.
Trenzlore;-;One of the best free games Steam has to offer!
Nevelix;-;fantastic game would play
Clutchberry;-;Wow this game is so fun! i recommend this to all my 'friends'
E-clips cooldown;-;Fulfill your dreams of being a ninja. Only played for 4 hours but already hooked. Nice graphics even at medium.It looks like a crysis+alien swarm game which is nice. 10/10 must have. +its free
My Little Knee-Grows;-;its okay i guess.
bloodevil;-;This game is awesome ( to me ) lots of guns, lots of missions, tons of stuff to do, can feal like a grind some times if you really want something graphicly its amazing plus nearly any computer can run this with no effort
Jemz;-;Grind to get items to grind with, to grind some more
_1389_;-;Nice game!
Jorochi;-;Its a great game with an nvidia card and friends, ive played since early beta and always end up coming back again and again! Lots of content and fresh ideas keep the repetitive gameplay from becoming stale, sad to hear most review critics gave this a harsh review without getting into the high teir content =( . The developers listen to the community and i recommend it greatly, if you dont enjoy co op games then its best to just go play COD and other generic rubbish. (thanks for reading add me if you like and ill help you out) p.s any dark sector fans will recognise a few tenno and wepons too!!
PAIR DOG;-;If you like the idea of Mass Effect's combat as an online open-ended co-op shooter with a massive amount of maneuverability and free movement control and customizability, you'll love Warframe.
Mariachi Con Sriracha;-;Warframe is a really fun Co-Op game. There are many weapons as well as several different warframes to fit your play-style (stealth, offensive, defensive, support, etc.) Weapons can be easily obtained if you really put your mind to it, people who say that the game is all about grinding are probably wrong. Yes, it takes time to build weapons. Yes, you need to obtain certain materials to craft something. But in the end, the game gets easier to obtain weapons and other items. I've gotten most of my stuff from just crafting them, there's really no need to waste money unless you're just not in the mood to craft or "grind". Overall, the game is great. The mechanics are really cool, gameplay is responsive and smooth, graphics are great, and the developers really put alot of effort into the game with many updates and events. The game keeps getting better and better. I'd recommend this game for people who like fast paced third-person shooters and don't mind taking their time crafting weapons, warframes, or making research projects for your clan.
Scrub Mcfeed;-;Fun Shooter version of Diablo, Digital Extremes is good about updates and listens to the community. 8/10 though the game is still in beta. Written as of Update 12
TabbyInBoots;-;Oh so addictive. And it keeps getting better
SigmaX;-;Real Depth, Great Game
mastershu16;-;the best game ive ever played
GRIMFIST;-;Throughout my years of gaming I've stumbled across few games that provide such diversity and freedom, we all crave the opportunity to play a game that has almost no limits. Well Warframe for one is absolutely stunning, it provides the player with the feeling of no limits even though it still has a few wich can almost not be noticed at all. Warframe is linear, fun and dynamic even for a game nearing it's last stages of beta, it's quite impressive. The mechanics in the game had blown me away at some point as it has some originallity to it, wich very few developers fail to master. The gameplay itself however makes the player feel truely apart of the whole experience as it has a mixture of realism, fun and fantasy with a twist of sci-fi, it provides the ultimate game experience. Most games have failed at the combination of these elements. The diversity of weapons is astonishing, as it provides almost every weapon type imaginable and more! Another part of the game I enjoyed was the modding system, I found it very easy to use and I also loved the diversity in mods available. There really is almost endless possibilities especially with the elemental combination of mods wich forms new elements. The customization also stood out for me, It gives the player some nice personalization options to feel even more "at one" with the game or perhaps makes them feel more comfortable with their gameplay, strangely enough. The graphics of the game is quite a pleasureable aspect even though it gives some killer eye sores, you know it's all worth it. In referral to the music I really enjoy the action movie feel it has to it and would love to see some more of it, it truely gets you in the "zone". If there is one thing I could add to warframe it'd be a bit of lore. Warframe is free-to-play and almost all in game content can be obtained by the player without having to pay a dime. Warframe is co-operative and provides a PVE gamestyle with a few PVP elements wich are seemingly still in development, and I am quite eager to see the outcome of the PVP system. Warframe also provides players the option to trade for platinum wich is basically only obtained from buying it with real time currency. In short warframe is not a pay-to-win but if you feel like supporting the developers for thier great work then buying some platinum is a good way to support them. But to sum it all up, I strongly reccomend Warframe if you are looking for something new and different and encourage some RPG fans to try it out aswell as those die-hard MMO fans. Keep up the good work I am excited to see what comes next with the further developement of this game! If I had to rate it on a scale of 1 to 10 I'd give it a 7.6/10.
Je Vader;-;Its fun to play. So many possibilities to play the game. Lots of epic weapons and warframes. No pay 2 win. Ninja's in Space! Need I say more?
The Ruang;-;Free to play, Not a pay to win game. *** Fun *** - Wall run (Cool and Very Fun) - Head Shot - Melee - Stealth (just Solo) - Grinding stuff <<<<< If you don't like Grinding this is not a game for you - Modding (Customize) -  RNG (Reward system... ;D) You can Grind for everything in this game except the cosmetic (Color/Alternate helm/Profile icon etc). You can use all weapon, all warframe (Class), all Companion (Sentinel and Kubrow) You don't need to pay for them, You need only time for craft them. (Pay for support the game) Events every month and New update every 1~2 weeks( new weapon/ new class/ new cosmetic ) Forgot about pay to WIN!, Even you have many platinum to buy stuff in market. you still need to play for mods, weapon parts, frame parts.(or just trade your platinum for them... You come to play right? Why pay for them when you play for fun and get stuff?) *** You can trade your stuff to other player for what you want.*** Forgot about hard time for newbie like the old time.(U7 maybe 2013)... Now U15 When you start playing The Tutorial will help you.(Prologue) If you need help for mission just ask in rescuit channel. You don't need to solo.(You need Clan for stuff) I hope my review help you.
Crimson Lupus;-;One of the best free to play games out there! Nicely done and tons of fun to play co-op!
THE SHREKONING;-;I went to slide slash someone and they were cut in half vertically instead pf horizontally- 15/10
Grovyle;-;Truly an astounding game. Hope it doesn't die off. Everything in the game is obtainable by buying with platinum or grinding, making it possible to earn all items by grinding instead of spending money to get in game items.
Fr0z3nflame1986;-;Very fun game as soon as you get the hang of the multifaceted interface options.
Darrparrot the Dingle Dangler;-;The amount of time you can spend playing this game is impressive. It is a very well made game and I don't regret the time I put into it.
Night;-;Very well done game, very fun to play with friends and a steady release of new content. This game has great re-play value if you like 3rd-person shooters.
Rastelle;-;What to say about this game...i've played this for a long time...a -really- long time, way back in the beginning of its alpha, and its really grown since then...there are consistant updates that keep everything fresh and new, and fast-paced third person shooting/ brawling that most people would be interested in...but as much as I love this game, thats sort of where the bright sides end... The game, in its nutshell...is a huge farmfest, thats it. You earn mastery rank (basically an account level) through levelling gear, which unlocks missions, weapons and gear for you until about rank 7, which, as is expected of the community, they will look at this and think how they could possible perfect this system, and they have...you farm the same mission, over and over again, usually either defense (you have an objective to defend from oncoming waves) or survival (you defend yourself from oncoming waves while keeping your oxygen supply up from drops from the enemies and capsules which drop). By the time you're about...say mastery rank 4+, you will be doing the same old thing, in the same place, the same way, and if you're not brainlessly farming xp for a warframe or weapon, your farming materials, to make another weapon/warframe to farm xp for them. On the other hand, the farming methods means you get diverse weaponry that you are forced to use, instead of clinging to a single weapon like a life-line and never leaving it...until you realise just how bad 80% of the weapons are...come on, this game has rocket hammers, glaives, chainsaw whips, lightning throwers, beam-rifles, quad barrelled shotguns and yet...almost non of these weapons can by used by the end, with the "end game" rifle being the SOMA Prime. Next up is warframes, and what a selection you get... warframes are the classes of the games, and there are over 20 to choose from, and their abilities differ from creating clones, going beserk, summoning water tentacles from the floor, balls that turn into black holes etc. etc... but again, too bad 70% of them are dwarfed in terms of useability, with most high-end groups refusing anyone who isn't on the "good warframe" list, and just to prove my point, should you get this game...just count, how many times you see a "Hydroid" warframe...800 hours and i've legitimately seen 3 hydroids. In a game with 22 different warframes (at this current time) why are only 6 or 7 are viable? The paying system is what you'd expect from any F2P app, the simple "pay to make things more convinient" take on it, with weapons taking 12 hours to craft, and warframes taking ATLEAST 3.5 days to make. They are nice to begin with, they give you some starting platinum, only about enough to pay for the cheapest warframe there is, or to increase your warframe/weapon slots a couple times. I can't complain with it, if you have the patience, then you won't have to pay a penny. Its difficult to say how I feel about the developers...yes, its good that they are coming up with updates on a regular basis, that they're trying to keep things fresh, but they have a horrible habit of releasing a new weapon, making it overpowered so everyone will buy it and items to upgrade it, then nerf it in a weeks time when everyone has got one, claiming they were fixing it. This wouldn't be a problem if this didn't happen consistantly over the time I played it. In conclusion, despite these things, the game...is oddly fun, even with its mind-numbing goals and sneaky tactics to part you with your money, and being free to play, it wouldn't hurt to try it out, and there is some joy in being an overly-powerful space ninja destroying waves of space clones/merchants or zombies. P.S. This is simply my opinion on the game, some of my knowledge on the game is slightly outdated but otherwise, this should be fairly accurate.
CHAINS;-;I know you guys are missing from the first time you have heard of this game? Immerse yourself in a day and it turned into was that I Surprise is a popular game. Community Simple operation Simple to play, but it really is difficult to be difficult to know if the game is waiting for hard times and lack of game sense.
Jerry;-;I played this game for 53.4 hrs on record. Was fun while it lasted. Pick it up if you got nothing to do.
Red Rock;-;very very interesting game
Kageryu;-;Basically you are a futuristic ninja in space, why would you not play this game?
Ttomiika;-;Interesting game. Lot of Good Content. If you can play it with friends!
bizlo;-;Game is fun and looks great, but missions can get repetitive. Has a fair share of bugs. Lots of weapon options, character customization, and warframes make this game a fantastic free to play.
niGnoGs pro.;-;Warframe.... warframe... i've spent alot of hours playing this game and I can safely say that its extremely funny. Like many other games warframe is far from perfect, but its unique co-op style, combat and generally its concept makes it stand out. While I could go on a talk about every aspect of the game i'll try to keep it short. Pros: Enjoyable farm (For me atleast, I have never farmed in a single game to give you an idea I used to sell my extra epics in vanilla wow just to take flight paths, I think this could illustrate that I really didnt farm, I can vouch that warframe farming, has another element to it maybe because the combat its fun?). Great combat, warframe is a great 3rd person action shooter, you can also inflict pain by using melee weapons! Multiple weapons, there are literally about 200 different weapons in the game at the moment, all of them which you can purchase from the store (with in game cash aka credits which are easily acquired), or for other weapons, farm the components. Different types of missions, which all have specific goals, if you don't like a mission type and dont really need anything from it, its pretty straightforward: Do not do it. PvP, while unbalanced its still really funny, and by no means mandatory, it can be seen as another type of mission. Great Co-Op game, if not the best i've played (I won't compare it with games such as broforce or castlecrashers). Cons ( and I really hate saying that ) Zero endgame, if you ever get to farm all of the frames and weapons you want, max them etc... well theres really no one to use them on, the tower 4 missions are considered to be the lategame, even there, you have to wait 40mins+ or 40waves+ in order to get somewhat of a challenge, and if the whole group is skilled, you will have to wait even more. Bugs, game is not filled with, but has some bugs which grow tiresome after a while. Most common would be having an enemy that goes underground, and you having no chance of killing him if you dont have some sort of rocket launcher or spell that will hit anything close. Unbalanced, like pretty much every other game, warframe sense of balance is broken, out of the 200 weapons I mentionned above, well they are pretty much all useless, except (of course) the small list of guns that are completely OP compared to their brethren, about 15 maybe 20 guns. MasteryRank, while I really liked that system, it proved to be nothing else but numbers rising, after reaching MR 8 you can have every weapon (I think). Aside from that, well its not really rewarding, to level up you have to constantly craft new weapons and level them up, being myself rank 11, I surely like seeing the number but I feel like theres no much more to it. Future orientation, of course I do not know where the game is headed, but I started playing somewhere in july, the developpers where already saying that endgame would be included, i've seen some cool reworks being done, new aspects of the game being created, new missions that are about space combat, however end game has still not been included. Storywise, while warframe does seem to have a story line, we know very little about it, which is a shame as I even downloaded a really crappy game to get an idea of WF story. (The game was dark sector, friendly advice - do NOT download dark sector). Chat system & UI.............. I dont even know where to begin with.... Noob unfriendly, fortunately for me, I started out the game with alot of friends, and we already had friends which were high leveled and everything was explained... If I were to startout this game alone I probably would have seen only the first planet. Conclusion: Even though the Cons are important, the game is still awesome and kicks , I really hope the developers realize that they have a great game, and that they could easily make it one of the best games with the addition of minimal stuff really. I really recommend this game. 8/10. yeah.
tuccitango;-;sick af
H.T.;-;A great game. I've been playing since founder's beta (and I myself am a founder). However, I haven't been playing this as much as I used to, mostly because as time goes by I feel like this game isn't catered for me at all. Don't get me wrong. It's still fun and I still recommend it. It's mostly a personal thing. I like games where I feel like it's my character that I'm sticking into the game. I want to feel like I can build and play it the way I want. In a game like Warframe, though, you're given the characters (classes) with very little customization options and while there may be some argument, in reality there's only a few viable builds unless you're content with staying with the really low level missions. If you can get past that, this game has fun, fast action and a lot of different kinds of missions and different maps (randomly generated to some extent), a decent community, and a lot of fun stuff to buy if you're the type that likes to spend real money on games (like me).
GARGA of EVIL_CHICKENS;-;This is most likely one of the best 2014/2015 games there are.Lots of content and constantly adding more while fixing the small bugs or things theydont like along the way. Big thumbs up to the community best ive seen in years,(polar opposite of the CS Go one)people are generaly really nice and helpfull. Give it a try. See you on the battlefield
jackbray65;-;this game is so fun but challenging
Adam Jensen, Terraria Addict;-;Its becoming more and more P2W. But. The Gameplay. Is ing rad as hell.
DomiSs*;-;Its very nicce game! I love it!
Preludecris;-;from what I played so far in it. it seems like a pretty solid fast paced third person shooter.
Adolf Nigler;-;Warframe is a game, a game with farming, adventuring , and endless runs in the void. This game will eat up your hours with its clash of clans like building system, I mean holy  forma.
Universal B00P;-;This is probs one of my fav games in my library. Cyborg Ninja? Check! Sneak? Check! Guns Blazing? Check! SPAAAAAAAACE! Check!
Camdex;-;One of the best games I've ever played. There is also so many thing you'll be playing it a while. AWESOME!!
Shuuzu;-;The Reason I play this game is because awesome Bow Weapon :D
Masochist;-;graphically speaking this game is tight. gameplay is nice and it is pretty much coop that rewards you for teamwork so i highly recommend this game.
Flamelord326;-;I'll be honest, i haven't really played much of this game but from what I have played so far, it is really fun! A lot of people are talking about the grind here which i havent gotten on to yet but i'm sure it is there. So far, paying to get certain items doesnt seem like a necessity and can be avoided. It's really fun and probably one of the best F2P games on steam right now. Great for Co-Op!
Khepriem;-;When you first pick up the game be ready to spend a little money. Or you'll spending many days just trying to be a high enough level for people not to avoid you! It's an awesome game if you don't care about story line or game breaking bugs that take about a week to fix. The game receives huge updates every other month or so, so you never get to bored and always have something else to rank up. But you remember those bugs I was just warning about? At least 3 of those come out each time a new update pops up. So over half the time you're playing this game you'll be experiencing very annoying glitches, for example, you might be running a survival mission(you have a time limit and the more enemies you kill the longer you last) and no enemies will spawn causing you to lose the game and that lose will always be on your record for anyone to see! Other then that its a great game with awesome graphics, not a terrible player base(people won't start yelling HEY **** YOU), and rewarding gameplay that will without a doubt make you feel like an alian Neo ninja just itching to climb a wall and kill a bad guy - death from above style!
Rubby;-;If you don't want to get addicted to a game, Don't install this game... ^^
Mcceag;-;Now that over a thousand hours of my life have gone into this game as well as a good chunk of cash I can really give this a better review. In short, it's fun but doesn't feel like its going in the direction it should(or that I would like). I don't really know how to describe my feelings for it. After U.I. 2.0 it just wasn't as much fun. I was rank 16(highest you could be at the time) and had every weapon i could obtain except for 3 and then new ones came, and then more, and more. Sure this is how Warframe has been but for some reason it just wasnt as fun. Some of the new weapons now look fun but during that time I couldn't get back into it. I will say that if you come across this review and haven't played yet, get the game. its amazing when you fist start out as you have so many weapons and warframes to choose from. And of course its a grindfest so if you're into that then you will be fine. I hope you enjoy this game and maybe you'll see it finally get released.:Corpus::Grineer:
Crazy8_boomer;-;The first free to play game that you dont need to pay to be over power
Maelstrom;-;Very good game, friendly player community, constantly updated with new things and hotfixes, good controls and awesome graphics for its size and requeriments. And the best part is that you are not forced to buy cash to get cash items, as you can easily farm them as you play (minimum 5 minutes of farm depending on luck) and sell them for in-game cash. Aside from cosmetics there are nothing that you cant get without a little bit of 30 min effort and not a single cent of money involved.
Toxic "DemonFang" Wolf;-;a great game to kill alot of time with and it does take some skill to play but other then that great game cant wait for more upsates to come..
Arxna;-;Really a teamwork effort, many open possibilities with weapon especially the mods, challenging with a satisfying result at the end. for connection, maybe it could be better to do a stabilizing connection so that everyone can play it without leaving a friend's behind who wanting to play it too.
Araminis;-;due to support and not the game itself I have to give it a thumbs down for now. The support is almost the worst I have ever had besides the first darkfall. lastly be prepared to spend lots of real money if you want stuff in game the time it takes to gather materials and then wait on crafting times is unreasonable and they know it. So what happens is you spend real money because after you have grinded for 100's of hours for much of the gear and waited days and weeks to craft it you get sick of the grind give in and pay real money to speed it up. Also the pricing of in game content is the highest I have ever seen in any game. so in essence long grinds or pay money (lots of money) and bad support.
Ammolds von Lichenstein;-;Somewhat addictive, high quality (for a F2P game) action shooter with a high focus on mobility. I highly recommend every living gamer to at least try this game once.
Alaric The Mad;-;This is a really fun PVE game. Can be a bit of a grindfest at times but it everything can be gotten from drops. it does have a pay element but that is mostly used for speeding crafting up and getting items you can grind for. Has a fun pvp capture the flag style game that is very balanced.
Dorito Bandito;-;This is an amazing game. The only problem I can see is the fact that the missions get really repetitive. Otherwise, I would recommend this game to any avid gamers out there looking for a free non-pay-to-win game.
Nikolai;-;its a game
Farseer;-;This is a real action, space-based game. VERY RECOMENDED (Please read on if you're considering trying this game out. It's got some tips on how the game works.) The game itself is slightly complicated when it comes to upgrading weapons and your Warframe, but after a while of playing it is easy to understand. Despite the market frames and weapons costing platinum(money bought with real money) you can get every single one of the weapons or frames by killing bosses(you do not have to do it alone!) or from clan researches(a Clan, which has the weapon/warframe you are seeking researched). You buy blueprints(you can buy them for game-money, credits) and, if you farm enough compotents, you start the build. The building time ranges from 12hrs - 24hrs, depending on the weapon. Warframe parts(helmet, chassis and systems) build for 12hrs, and the building of a whole frame is 3 days. In short, everything is free. Yes, you've heard me right. Every awesome weapon or Warframe can be gotten for 100% free, if you have the patience for it. Even platinum can be earned for free, by selling prime weapon parts and warframe parts in the trading chat. You make a deal, trade in the clan Dojo using the trading post. This game gives you a lot of opportunities if you don't have spare money for platinum. The only thing you cannot get for free are the sugurata(things that dangle from melee weapons, a bit of a decoration) and Warframe syandanas(cloaks/scarves) and warframe armor(armor for warframe customization). DESPITE THIS, the game IS worth trying out! You will simply love the world, the freedom in this shooter as you can fight with swords, warhammers, bladed frisbees(glaives), sparring weapons, dual daggers, dual swords. You got bows, snipers, lots of guns, flame throwers, laser-guns, crossbows, nikana(katana). Or one-hand crossbows, throwing knives, shurikens, dual pistols, one-hand pistols, gas pistols, microwave pistols! So many weapons an opportunities. And then you've got mods(something that increases damage or adds an elemental damage to your weapon. Also increases shield and health capacity in Warframes) so that you can mod your weapons and warframe to adapt to your gaming type. Each mod can be 'fusioned', making the effect stronger, consuming 'fusion cores' which you collect throughout the mission. This just adds more great options. Yet the more 'ranked' the mod, the more 'mod capacity' points it consumes in frames and weapons. Mod capacity increases as you level. At maximum weapon/frame rank, you got 30 mod points. You can double those by purchasing an Orokin Reactor/Orokin Catalyst for a mere of 20p(latinum) but you can get free blueprints from alert missions which randomly appear at random times throughout the day. You can also use formas-(Can be bought or built. More common to find Forma blueprints rather than Orokin Reactor/Catalyst.)-to change the polarities in the mod slots. If the chosen polarity matches the polarity of the mod, half the points are consumed. Pretty complicated, right? As you play along, it will be natural for you to remember all this. Ask an experienced player for help if you need it~(Just ask in Region Chat) Thank you for taking time to read this! Now go ahead and try this game out!
Gideon;-;While im writing this review I have about 150 hours in this game. This game is great. You don't have to spend money if you want cool weapons or gear. It can be all unlocked. The platinum which can be bought with realmoney can also be earned in the game (selling prime parts and moods etc.). In this game you play like a spaceninja you can either go in stealthy or you can go in guns a blazing its your choice. Hope this short review helps Pros: - great visuals - fun combat - great warframe designs - a lot of weapons - great community Cons: - repetitive soundtrack - lackluster mission objectives - some bugs - grinding
Shirofukurou;-;Great game, played for a long time. 10/Tenno
ZeroMouSe;-;Involves more grinding than teenagers in a nightclub, 10/10 would grind again
Sir Bread;-;Best grinding sim of all time 11/10
Raiden;-;I recommend this game! That's all i can say.
marlboro red;-;This game is the bomb!
Exiled Princess;-;INTRO: So, I've been around since the closed beta of this game...and ONE thing is for sure. You will hardly find any other online game that evolves as rapidly as this one and grows in size so continuously.(You can see that the devs truly love the game, and not just the money it generates) The classic space ninjas theme has over the years evolved to more of a mercenary theme with many influences. THE GAME: There is no good or bad, there is just balance. Set thousands of years in the future, you have just been woken up from your cryogenic sleep. You are a Tenno, controlling one of the many Warframes available to you and you basically answer to the Lotus, which is an organization and a "person" at the same time. Your ultimate goal would be to bring balance to the solar system again...because fact is, bringing peace is not an option. Rather than being a white knight in shining armor you will have to set priorities on who to fight and who to help...and your priorities can and WILL re-align at times...either because you want it...or because the majority of Tenno are willing it. Your tools are abilities, companions, guns, and melee weaponry. Sometimes you have to kill, sometimes to infiltrate or rescue...but what you do is entirely your choice. LONG TERM: Now, nothing is wrong with hopping onto a survival match for 20 minutes or just doing a few boss runs and logging off again...but you probably wonder:" Can I invest more than a few hours? What can I do in the long term?" And the game devs got you covered there. The first and most obvious goal would probably be to try and build/aquire all weapons and characters you like and perfect them...of course this is not for everyone, as some pieces of gear, especially for new players, can feel grindy to aquire. Once you are a veteran, this will be of no concern to you as resources come to you naturally. Then there are things like Syndicates that you can join and run missions for to gain standing. Some factions even give you goals that are shared with all other Tenno that upon completion grant you access to new bits of lore of the world or other rewards. PVP also exists...and is entirely optional. But capture the cephalon (flag) or deathmatch/ TDM all exist. And finally there are events and quests/challenges. The devs will regularly add story driven events where the entirety of the community can partake...and sometimes, due to the mercenary nature of the Tenno...will have to split to follow the path that they think is right. But do not be fooled, events can actually fail. Not every mission is about glory...and the higher the payroll, the more ruthless the enemy. THE CASH SHOP The item mall is very fair...as in, the initial prices will look very scary until you realize that you don't have to pay for any of it and can still get it at a very acceptable pace. The only thing that can't be aquired with ingame currency are some style items....for which you can still trade some items for premium currency to unlock it, anyway. Additionally there is a chance to get discounts for premium currency as login bonus (up to 75%) and the Steam packs are on sale on pretty much every big steam sale event with 50%-66% discount....at which point everything in the mall becomes absurdly cheap. So basically...if you are an impulse buyer that can not restrain himself at all, this game might not be entirely for you. But if you are a freeloader looking for a fair game or someone who either wants to do trades or only spend on games for a budget with discounts....you will do just fine here. Lastly, developers have even pulled cash shop items from the market within very short time periods whenever something was added that the community disagreed with strongly...which was never pay to win...but generally about taking it a little too far with style items. (Pay to win does not exist in their cash shop, pretty much only pay to sleep...which is something you will understand once you start playing, sort of a running gag) THE DEVELOPERS: I can not stress this enough. The developers love their GAME. It is more than just a product to them. They have livestreams every week and will directly communicate changes and content updates with the playerbase..and necessarily change it if the players dislike it. This goes as far as affecting the cash shop.(see above). They constantly seek to improve their game and they have redone entire game systems and polished the graphics multiple times. DX12 support is also announced and currently PBR (physically based rendering) is being implemented step by step. They even did things like changing the CORE multiple times in hopes to imrove it. 8 out of 10 times they succeed...and when they fail..they simply try again. It's that simple for them. As for content, they have concrete plans what they add and every 2 weeks they showcase what they are working on to players in their devstreams. Depending on feedback this will of course change...but that's why they do it. The only thing that you CANNOT expect...is anything to last forever in that game. Even core gameplay elements can still change. The devs simply try to improve the game as much as they can and follow their vision...which sometimes clashes with players' opinions. PERSONAL OPINION: I LOVED the game so far. It is true that I went on hiatus 3 or 4 times for a month or so with this game. But keep in mind that the game and all of its content (except for some style items) are essentially free...so you can just pick it up again whenever new content is added or they changed some game systems. Of course this game is not for everyone. But if you want fluent combat. This is yours.
DeVotioN;-;cool graphix
ColOfPopcorn;-;SO much farming but rewarding and fun equipment/guns/warframes
Nightshade666;-;NINJAS IN SPACE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Ati;-;If you like cooperative games, this is a really good one. Third person shooter, coupled with good progression system, and lots of random-generated missions, this is a fun game to play together. Only downside is that it's still in beta, so it has bugs, but the game is getting better with patches. :)
[red][SSdS]ShaosOkais;-;great graphics, awesome campaign missions with so many different customizations (comes with your very own kubrow![sort of like an attack dog]and or a companion on missions) just annoying to get resources D:D
Limeativity;-;Played this game in the first year it went into open beta, way before it went out on steam. I had a mastery rank of 12 and a grand master founder badge. Spent about $350+ on it and I've be showcased on their stream. I've run out of platinum a long time ago just buying cosmetics. Haven't played a game in about a year. It's fun, but gets old after a few hundred hours.
Mexican Gandhi;-;All you do in this game is farm, i have over 800 hours of farming, its ing awesome. 11/10 would grind again
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Godzilla;-;This game has everything: Ninjas - Yep Weapons - Yep Space - Yep Multiplayer - Yep Bosses - Yep Everyone who likes to play as a space ninja will like this game i guess
The Mighty Sunbro;-;This game is robot space ninjas with guns and magic. I can't describe it any better than this. Free to play, no pressure to buy anything. Only thing I'm not liking much is the real-time delays on being able to rank up and make new weaponry and such.
DurandalCorp;-;What really gets me to play this game is the controls. Everything really is based on how you can move yourself. After that, customization of you Warframe and weapons using mods. From then on it was a perfect mix. It has taken a lot of time away from me, but I do not regret it one bit.
Roger York;-;You want to be a space ninja, well, this is the game for you. The game supports many different playstyles through a large variety of weapons and warframes, each warframe has their own unique abilities which can drastically change the course of the battle. Some are designed to be support roles. whilst others work to strengthen themselves (which also increases threat generation). Either way, it is possible to play on your own, but I have had the most fun out of the game by playing with other people and talking over a TS3 server whilst we play. Only cons that I can think of are that it can be a bit of a grind unless you make a few overpriced microtransactions, but hey, it is a FREE to play game where you can go through it without paying a single microtransaction, additionally the end game gear is not available via microtransation, so even if you pump money into the game, you still have something to work towards.
Krogan;-;I killed the stalker so ing hard he actually died.
Evil Sacrament;-;EPIC 9.9/10 ................................................................................................................................................. PROS: 1) This game is what I wanted Destiny to be 2) It feels like a Mass Effect multiplayer dungeon grinder 3) You can get rep with factions and level over 32 characters, 200 weapons and many mods 4) The mods feel almost like MTG mixed with the ff7 materia system and i love everything about the trading/fusing/moving mods between all your weapons 5) You can actually play the game for free but you are not going to 6) You will spend money on more frame slots and weapon slots. but after putting hundreds of hours in it is completely justified you really get a great experience with this game 8) Doesn't feel like pay to win at all 9) Dungeons are mixed up so its not alway the same run if you go somewhere again for material 10) Ton of differient mission variants 11) Very addicting 12) making weapons with blueprints and fusing mods/adding polarity to mod slots makes the game feel like more than just a shooter. You can murder things when you want to. You can chill in your clan dojo/ship when you want to relax and paint your armor,weapons,customize dps outputs. 13) you can get companions .................................................................................................................................................. Cons: 1)If you want more than 4 characters you will have to spend money at some point but not much 2) Bosses should be harder 3) you should be able to kick someone from a group if they go afk or something by voting 4) its very addicting, like first time i played wow addicting but better Just play the game, you will have to adjust graphics and hotkey X to your mouse. The game just gets better and better I enjoy running missions solo with friends or even with randoms you have your own loot and nothing really to lose so I just leave my party open and solo levels. If others show up it just means i will get through the level faster
Riaan (^_^);-;amazing graphics for a free to play and gameplay is good. one flaw it is bound to throw you when you tri to climb walls
Force;-;The best F2P game, Any weapon you can buy you can farm for or buy the blue prints for which is great you can make money by selling things you got farming.
Heartless;-;fun with constant updates... the only downside is it gets pretty repetitive later on the game. still a good way to past the time especially regarding almost all of the games content is free
Junim DeBain;-;Fun game all in all, but would really help if they would'nt change everything every 2 months...
Cloud;-;+ Great Visuals / Colorful Graphics - The graphics are extremely well done for a F2P game. + Great Weapons and Unique Abilities! + Cool Warframe Designs + Fast-paced Combat + Customisation - There are Endless posibilities and combinations you can Achieve. + Procedurally generated Maps - Fantastic replay value even thought the missions feel repetitive. + This saved the Best for Last... Its Free to Play! Highly  Recommended
Hightech Redneck;-;its a MMO, grinding is a thing, it a good game but not a bad game. deep lore is amazing!
Moonelf;-;Alright it's time for review this game again. I really love Warframe. I play a alot 2years. Sometimes if bored, i can look at recruiting chat and join them. Any mission and any void. Warframe have tons of weapons. You can try weapon for mastery for your MMR. If you really love weapon you use alot, potato it and forma make it stronger. Best thing i like this Warframe because ninja, parkour and skills. Enemy not a dumb at all. Archwing, fly at space! Woah Ordis, most annoying Cephalon XD Lotus, space mom <3 Weapons. You can farm materials and buy BP from market. If you to lazy want to waste money. Use plat Update warframe always!. they fix anything. Any bug they fix immedietly I rate 9.5/10 for this game. Really fun to play. NOT pay to win
Sinanju23;-;really good
Flattermelons;-;Love this game yet after some time, you desire to level more stuff....but there ain't any. Fun game nonetheless ^^
BitSane;-;It's like skyrim was sci-fied!
King_Lawrence;-;this game is awesome :D
SCHD;-;A great video game for those who has the patience.
robee * skinfortune.com;-;Its like a very good b*tch who f*ck well and dont want money, and you can call her everytime when u want to sex.
grantjordaneaston;-;im not one for grinding but this game makes me want to grind all warframes and as much of the weapons so i would recommend this game to anyone who likes fast pased shoot and loot
GSYNC;-;One of the best free to play games. I highly recommend this game.
Inky;-;I recommend Warframe because it is a really fun game to play and they put logic in the game (besides aliens and stuff).
Rarr!;-;970 hours on record and counting, because this is easily one of my favorite multiplayer games on steam, and I got over 300 games The action is excellent, the customisability is unbeatable, the control of your character troughout your environment is the smoothest you can imagine, this is truely an absolutely brilliant multiplayer action shooter experience What kind of weapon do you like? Go on, make a weapon work exactly the way you want it to be, using hundreds if not thousands of mods that completely change the way any of the huge amounts of available weapons work. What kind of gameplay do you want your character to provide? There's various kinds to suit all tastes, with all kinds of different gameplay, from slow tanks with defensive powers to overpowered glass cannon mages or stealthy ones if you prefer being silent and sneaky, or my favorite warframe zephyr which boasts incredible mobility and low gravity, not to even mention the powers Getting in-game money (platinum) in this game is a shortcut and there's nothing you can't normally get without platinum, but having at least a little bit would be good for getting orikin catalysts (which are normally a little hard to get) to make your weapons more moddable, that's about it If you like smooth shooters, action and customisability, this is definitely a game for you, besides it's free to try This review may sound very positive, but that's because I honestly have nothing bad to say about this game at all, other than how hard it has been for me to find friends to play it with but I guess that's individual, seriously, it's free, why haven't you tried it yet? Oh, and there's an introduction questline nowdays, they didn't used to have that a while ago Oh, and I haven't even mentioned the breathtakingly epic space fights they added recently...
Sir Von GentleDerp;-;This game is really fun. Between firefights and kickass sword fights it's pretty neat.
Lawn Mower;-;this game makes me feel lonely because I have nobody to play it with but it also makes me feel happy because its a great game
Shuga;-;This has been a really fun game. Not without it's bugs but the devs put a lot of effort into it. 9/10
Ty;-;Good F2P It is very grindy but you can get things you want without paying. It is repetitive.
Diglett;-;Yes .. Good game Yes .
TheMXL;-;(Sorry for grammar btw) Honestly for the longest time, I have had mixed feelings towards the game and sometimes question why I even play the game at all at time. To start the game's story is nonexistent, but who cares? Youre a space ninja killing mobs on mobs on mobs. The core component is the game's combat system, which is solid but also choppy at times with glitches in animations and such. There are a variety of weapons ranging from a gas spraying pistol to a bone scythe which are for the most part fun to use. HOWEVER this is also the downfall as many weapons such as the Soma that you get mid game is extremely powerful in both stat and you literally have no reason not to use it as it trumps every other assault rifle in the game currently. The weapons are extremely unbalanced to the point of players using five or so weapons out of the 100+ weapons. The next major component of the game is Frames or your character basically. There is also an issue with this that is very similar to the unbalanced weapon problem. Some frames are simply better than others, with better abilities and all. Not much to say about it.. Next would have to be the enemies. My god, have they progressedbut in a bad way. It seems the developers just got plain lazy and decided to cheese all of the enemies by buffing the hell out of them instead of improving their AI movements or things such as I dont know? Variety maybe? You fight the same guy with a gun, same alien that blows up, same person with a rocket launcher. Fighting them will get really dull really fast for allot of people. There are many other components that need discussing, but for now Ill end it with the good points :) Warframe is really addicting, and will pull you back for more even if the mission seem like a pile of BS or an event that gives you a trashy weapon, you always come back. I cant for the life of me figure out why. I suppose its like League of Legends, you always come back somehow. The business model is also amazing! Platinum, or paid currency, in this game work allot better than about 90% of other games. The prices are fair and they often give you coupons for things like 50% off your next Platinum purchase! The best part thought is that you dont even need to buy any in the first place! Everything in this game you can get buy one method or another, given you have the patience and prowess to do so. You can also buy parts from other players with either trades or platinum, depending on what they want. In conclusion the game is by no means bad but definitely not amazing either. It has a TON of bugs that need fixing, and the combat needs to be revised. Weapons and frames need buffs/changes/reworks in order to be viable. Also please, if Im asking to buy a max mod dont sell me a half completed mod.. like common man..
Fiskerton;-;This game's awesome and kinda challenging. Really fun multiplayer gameplay.
Khepriem;-;When you first pick up the game be ready to spend a little money. Or you'll spending many days just trying to be a high enough level for people not to avoid you! It's an awesome game if you don't care about story line or game breaking bugs that take about a week to fix. The game receives huge updates every other month or so, so you never get to bored and always have something else to rank up. But you remember those bugs I was just warning about? At least 3 of those come out each time a new update pops up. So over half the time you're playing this game you'll be experiencing very annoying glitches, for example, you might be running a survival mission(you have a time limit and the more enemies you kill the longer you last) and no enemies will spawn causing you to lose the game and that lose will always be on your record for anyone to see! Other then that its a great game with awesome graphics, not a terrible player base(people won't start yelling HEY **** YOU), and rewarding gameplay that will without a doubt make you feel like an alian Neo ninja just itching to climb a wall and kill a bad guy - death from above style!
Shuuzu;-;The Reason I play this game is because awesome Bow Weapon :D
Flamelord326;-;I'll be honest, i haven't really played much of this game but from what I have played so far, it is really fun! A lot of people are talking about the grind here which i havent gotten on to yet but i'm sure it is there. So far, paying to get certain items doesnt seem like a necessity and can be avoided. It's really fun and probably one of the best F2P games on steam right now. Great for Co-Op!
Calem Knight;-;Fun, yet free. Best free to play so far in my opinion.
ArcticPhoenix86;-;Love the gameplay and general leveling of weapons and gear. You can use special items to really customize your gear and make it that much more powerful. It is definitely a game geared toward using the right tool for the job, not a bigger hammer. Cons: Crashes A LOT.
Rubby;-;If you don't want to get addicted to a game, Don't install this game... ^^
ColOfPopcorn;-;SO much farming but rewarding and fun equipment/guns/warframes
Eu4ia;-;havent played this game for a long time and just started again,well where do i start...for a free to play game its an amazing game,there is mostly PVE,but they added a PVP section aswell,the developers keep on adding new content often so it keeps the game flowing,there is no pay to win segment here,the only things you have to buy are cosmetics anything else you can find ingame by playing it,or unless you want to have something right now and you dont want to work for it,and there is also trading so you can give your blueprints for example and some other player will give you platinum (thats the real money currency) so you just have to play and ENJOY! the leveling system is pretty unique,the developers want you to experience everything in the game,so the more you "explore" the more levels you`ll get.Under the explore its intented that when you max a weapon for example to switch to a differnt one and so on and so on,this is also for your warframes,and to explore the planets and complete nodes etc,after gaining enough experience to level up you need to perform a test if you fail you need to redo the experience to level up which is kinda great,it puts some pressure on the leveling :D lets do the classical chart: +awesome graphics +fluid movement +great attack moves,especially melee +tons of weapons (primary,secondary,melee...) +lots of warframes that are really unique compared to each other and with prime ediotions (not all of them but one day all) +every now and then events to get bonus mods,credits,weapons etc +developers pay attention to the players +great community,if you`re a newbie they`ll help you +lots of worlds to explore,mostly PVE based gameplay +but wait there is also a PVP (4v4 max for now) +archwing which one EXTRAORDINARY addition they could add,if feels like the old cartoon Macros or some anime mecha evangelion maybe,who cares its amazing the manuvers are great,movement of the charts...you get the drift +you have your personal AI who`s funny +fun modes to play +you get your own dojo,lots of fun,its like a small sandbox for this game,and yes this one works better with friends -sometimes you need to grind a lot to get the resources -sometimes you dont get a normal squad to do high leveled missions/alerts/invasions etc overall rating 10/10 Its a must have game,oh wait its f2p,its a must PLAY game!
Ati;-;If you like cooperative games, this is a really good one. Third person shooter, coupled with good progression system, and lots of random-generated missions, this is a fun game to play together. Only downside is that it's still in beta, so it has bugs, but the game is getting better with patches. :)
LetterAfterZ;-;Free to play games where you actually don't have to pay are always awesome. This one is up there. Much better if you play it with friends rather than all alone. Make sure to read up on some newbie guides once you're ready, as this will give you a much more enjoyable experience if you're not planning to buy any in-game currency.
ZehSexyTurtle;-;A fun fast AND slow paced third person shooter. You can choose to play through missions with stealth tactics, or just go all-out and shoot the crap out of your enemies.
DunkstersMcGee;-;Sprinting towards ugly cloned space Nazis whilst deflecting their bullets with Space Brass Knucles, before promptly flip-kicking the absolute  out of them. 11/10 Game of the Millennium why the  are you still reading this and not clicking Install already?
Blue hunter;-;Its like playing dead Space with Assassin's creed style
OneUp;-;this game is great to play with friends and have some fun if you are loner then you probably get bored after some time Even after they have made a lot of improvements since I first played back in the beta this game lacks of endgame content. Sometimes you will find yourself a little pressured to actually put some money on this game. Yes you can get most thing by grinding and being lucky on alert mission but golden potatoes to overcharge your warframe are REALLY rare
Barrel;-;I've been grinding harder than your average stripper for 2,000 hours, someone please file a lawsuit against Digital Extremes for sexual assault.
Shino;-;It's OK, I guess.
StativeBee;-;Best free game
[MS] Cthulhu Scary Balls;-;Takes time to get into, but once done, is tonnes of fun
Ironhead;-;I play as a space ninja that murders genetically cloned evil stupid grineer, and I just bought two grakatas, 10/10
9pu;-;First off, this game IS fun. The best free-to-play, in my opinion. And by free-to-play; I mean you can get nearly EVERYTHING without purchasing. It's more fun with friends, but the matchmaking is bugged though, so there's that. But after 200 hours it just gets stale, but I can't really complain since it didn't cost me anything. (except my time)
Drain On Society;-;Looks great, the combat is great, most things are "great", one of the most fair f2p models I've ever come across, but god does it get repetitive fast. If it wasn't f2p I wouldn't recommencement it.
Ajid Lovett;-;Great game for spare time .. Cool Character and skills .. Bunch of weapons choice .. Recommended Game :D
JoshRobz;-;Cracking graphics, good overall gameplay. Really smooth playstyle. Awesome mobility ability. Good questlines! Overall smashing game!
5H3R5H3N' exgame.pro;-;Very nice,cool,amazing game!
Lordpredator24;-;Simply An Amazing Game. A Very Interesting And Creative Video Game. I Play It All Of The Time Its A Very Addictive Game.
Invictus;-;It's ok
Illuminatox (Offline to 18.07);-;It will make your  larger... yes, even if you are a girl.
{DigiWobble}{InToXiCaTeD}{NL};-;This is awesome , a nice shooter if you like teamwork and going through fights against random AI
Deaner;-;Ninjas in space. Nothing more need be said.
El Grego Bueno;-;really great game a little buggy but the devs are really good about realeasing fixs warframe is constanly being added on to and fixed this game is really enjoyable its fun destorying wave after wave of enemies while getting rewards yeah warframe is super grindy but at least you can kill all your enemies with style while you grind im really excited to see what this game will be like a year from now
fiERCeY^v^;-;Great game, lots of things to do, however gets repetitive really fast.
squid now;-;the best ps4-to-pc port ever buy immediately
Sub-Zero;-;Special Units (Players) Must attack enemy but game is ing AWESOME!!!!!XD!!!!Download faster it cool game!!!!
Eu4ia;-;havent played this game for a long time and just started again,well where do i start...for a free to play game its an amazing game,there is mostly PVE,but they added a PVP section aswell,the developers keep on adding new content often so it keeps the game flowing,there is no pay to win segment here,the only things you have to buy are cosmetics anything else you can find ingame by playing it,or unless you want to have something right now and you dont want to work for it,and there is also trading so you can give your blueprints for example and some other player will give you platinum (thats the real money currency) so you just have to play and ENJOY! the leveling system is pretty unique,the developers want you to experience everything in the game,so the more you "explore" the more levels you`ll get.Under the explore its intented that when you max a weapon for example to switch to a differnt one and so on and so on,this is also for your warframes,and to explore the planets and complete nodes etc,after gaining enough experience to level up you need to perform a test if you fail you need to redo the experience to level up which is kinda great,it puts some pressure on the leveling :D lets do the classical chart: +awesome graphics +fluid movement +great attack moves,especially melee +tons of weapons (primary,secondary,melee...) +lots of warframes that are really unique compared to each other and with prime ediotions (not all of them but one day all) +every now and then events to get bonus mods,credits,weapons etc +developers pay attention to the players +great community,if you`re a newbie they`ll help you +lots of worlds to explore,mostly PVE based gameplay +but wait there is also a PVP (4v4 max for now) +archwing which one EXTRAORDINARY addition they could add,if feels like the old cartoon Macros or some anime mecha evangelion maybe,who cares its amazing the manuvers are great,movement of the charts...you get the drift +you have your personal AI who`s funny +fun modes to play +you get your own dojo,lots of fun,its like a small sandbox for this game,and yes this one works better with friends -sometimes you need to grind a lot to get the resources -sometimes you dont get a normal squad to do high leveled missions/alerts/invasions etc overall rating 10/10 Its a must have game,oh wait its f2p,its a must PLAY game!
affrow101;-;I admit that when I first started playing this game I was impressed with all the bells and whistles that the game had to offer for a free to play game. I played it so much at first that I got burnt out on it and the game just felt like a grinding fest. Which in essence it is, But what really helps when playing this game is to make friends. Your friends (if they have been playing for an extended period of time) will beable to give you the information you need to meet your goals of a new weapon/warframe and make the process extremely simple. If you like playing lone wolf that is fine as well you can set your misson access to invite-only and if you need information check the wiki. Simply play how you want.
Trenzlore;-;One of the best free games Steam has to offer!
Master Proton;-;Great game EDIT 1. After playing this game off and on for the last year or so atleast 11 months tops i found i at first sucked at the game and i mean that literally since it took me 11 months just to reach rank 1 in my account ( not my frames or weapons ) and only a day to reach rank 2 :/ see where i'm going here, welp after meeting ALOT and I mean alot of nice and helpful people who tought me ALOT about the game and how things work i was able to as i said above beat the rank 1 test etc and also make my first warframe after the tutorial pick which i chose excalibur i'am happy have a Rhino warframe by tomorrow which will be my first warframe i'd ever gotten :) i love the game it has a nice grind to it and also over half the things in the game you can get for free and depending the mission you go to it doesn't feel as a grind cause sometimes it starts you off at different parts of the map making it feel like your on a new map each time :D :D . I highly recommend you download and play this game heck if you need someone to help you out when starting out just add me on steam or add me on warframe my ID is ( drugfree9797 ) but with out the ( ) ya as rating go these are just beta rating right now I'll post them below, also in under a year this game has went from what it was when i started playing to a really fun graghical world full of some nice people , also the game now has a space mode which i have yet to try since i'm still in the the downlow of the game i hope by the end of the year to be better in the game. Ratings. Graghics: 9/10 intense graghics ( blood and gore ) : 7/10 audio/voice overs: 10/10 settings/options: 10/10 customization: 6/10 ( it's good i really should do 10/10 but it's limited currently right now with it in beta and all hopefully we get better customizations later on ) game mechanics/physics: 10/10 ( you can walk climb on walls and alot of others thing i don't want to spoil for you ) story: 2/10 ( hopefully we get an actual story mode seperate from what we have now in the game that tells an actual story not like they have it now ) space mode: 0/0 ( I can't right this currently cause i as of yet haven't tried it) controller support: 5/10 ( has some issues with a gamepad but you can fix that by changing the controls etc ) enemy AI : 6/10 ( most fun i've ever had fighting a computer game's ai ) BEST Warframe: I'am currently working on that but from what i can tell the best ones are Valkyr, Rhino, and Nekros. Best tutorial warframe: I'd have to say out of the 2 i've tried the best was Volt but you may like Excalibur cause he was my first choice and the only one i've successfully mastered.
robee * skinfortune.com;-;Its like a very good b*tch who f*ck well and dont want money, and you can call her everytime when u want to sex.
OneUp;-;this game is great to play with friends and have some fun if you are loner then you probably get bored after some time Even after they have made a lot of improvements since I first played back in the beta this game lacks of endgame content. Sometimes you will find yourself a little pressured to actually put some money on this game. Yes you can get most thing by grinding and being lucky on alert mission but golden potatoes to overcharge your warframe are REALLY rare
DunkstersMcGee;-;Sprinting towards ugly cloned space Nazis whilst deflecting their bullets with Space Brass Knucles, before promptly flip-kicking the absolute  out of them. 11/10 Game of the Millennium why the  are you still reading this and not clicking Install already?
Blue hunter;-;Its like playing dead Space with Assassin's creed style
James;-;It's ok! Find some friends and play! ;)
ketza13;-;el juego es bueno si dejaran de desinstalar los juegos gratis sera mucho mejor no es muy graciosos tener que descargando juegos sobre todo con un gran contenido the game is good if they stopped uninstall the free games would be much better is not very funny having to downloading games especially with a large content
Capt. Levi;-;I almost got fired with how much I love this game.
WooplingBG;-;I love this game! It is just amazing! The graphics... The warframes... The weapons... Everyone must try this game.
NyxSilence;-;500 hour mark. With this in mind I believe I can make a accurate review. This game as of now (12/4/2014) is still a beta in process to be a story filled mmo. The basis is you use a character called a Warframe to runs strikes on the Solar System against arguably 10 factions, 3 races, and 3 different sets of bounty hunters. You are reffered to as Tenno. The People of the Lotus. The Tenno fight for/against others to bring balance to the system. You are awakened by the Lotus to prevent from being captured by the Grineer to be used and processed to be their weeapon/slave/resource to gain universal domination as it were. For the purpose of keeping from spoiling the game I'll get into this. This is a MMO. This is NOT an easy mmo. If you have deep pockets and believe in buying all great gear, you'll be HIGHLY dissapointed because there's this thing called XP Locked that keep people like you from ruining this game and speed running it to be "better" than everyone else. In fact the entire game is genuinly 100% free minus cosmetic items like color and skins etc. Everything in the game minus the cosmetic items can be obtained through simply playing. In-game missions give credits which are used to build bluprints to beef your arsenal up. There is a achievement labeled for having 10 Warframes "Each tool with it's own Purpose". This is true for the game. SLASH damage shreds fleshy enemies to pieces but sheilded ones left unphased. IMPACT bomards shields but armor shrugs it off. PUNCTURE (you guessed it) pierces armor but does a whole lot of nothing to shields. Sheilds save lives. All tactics should be analyzed. Rank up is broken down as follows: xp from primary+secondary+melee+warframes=pooled xp=Mastery Rank. The max rank for everything is level 30 including Mastery Rank. If you level an item to 30 you will only recieve XP that counts THAT FIRST TIME. If you use Forma to level it to zero to make it stronger later the other times after the first its leveled to 30 will not count toward your mastery rank. Every time you hit the xp cap for a Mastery Rank there is a "right of passage" type of test to rank. If you fail you will be able to try again in 24 hours. If you pass then you proceed to the next rank unlocking weapons and other new items. There are plenty of weapons I promise you will not run out. Crafting. This is easier than it sounds. Go do a mission and collect the drops. The Resources currently are Gallium, Nano Spores, Mutagen Samples, Mutagen Mass, Orokin Cells, Polymer Bundle, Alloy Plate, Rubedo, Salvage, Detonite Ample, Detonite Injectors, Fieldtron Samples, Fieldtron, Oxium, Nav Coordinates, Nurodes, Neural Sensors (last two are not related to each other), Argon Crystal, Control Modules, Golem Nav Coordnate, Morphics, Cuircuts, and Plastids. None of these are too difficult to find. All are used from time to time for different items. The more you have on hand the less (as much as I hate saying it) farming you have to do. Gamplay. You, are, a, space, ninja. Thre is no better way to describe it. You do flips, wallruns, slides, and parcour of all kinds be it rolling from a fall or vaulting to a higher spot, this is your deadliest weapon. Each Warframe has unique abilities that they use. They are described in the market or Abilities option in your arsenal. 90% of the game is PvE. Clan battles that you are/aren't apart of you may assist for fun/credit earnings. Conclave is also available as a deathmatch for a more...personal 1v1 or 2v2 fight. As a beta this game is a 10/10. ~NyxSilence
Red Lightning;-;I figured I would rewrite my review of this game completely. So allow me to start off with a bit of back story. Warframe is the hypothetical predocessor of DE's Dark Sector. In Dark Sector the main character being "Hayden Tenno", is where the "Warframes" in the game get their faction name of "Tenno". Hypothetically speaking in this universe, the reason why the Tenno are they way they are is for the same reason why Hayden is the way he is. We are human beings that had been infected by the Technocyte (in a positive way, opposite to that of the infested. Where parts of the body if not all of the body have been turned to metal) than gifted by the "Lotus" (One of the main Protagonists in the game) a suit of armor known as a Warframe to fit the contores of our infection. ---Pros--- |||THIS GAME IS FREE TO PLAY||| 1: (((NOT PAY TO WIN))): There is a real money currency known as platinum that can be used to purchase in game items down to weapons, warframes, and cosmetics such as accessories and colour pallets. However because this game is not entirely PVP oriented as much as it is PVE, you need not worry about getting bulldozed by every wallet warrior out there and their cousin. ______________________________________________________________________________ 2: On PVP to PVE: There are particular nodes specifically made just for PVP, and they are few and far between, each planet has 1 PVP node, known as a (Dark Sector). These Dark Sectors are where different Clans have at it with each other in order to control parts of the universe. If one particular clan owns a Dark Sector, they have the ability to determine the tax on the planet for all resources and credits earned by the players while participating on the objective of said Dark Sector. _______________________________________________________________________________ 3: Clans: Pretty much everyone can own one and it does not cost real money currency. As a matter of fact for the lack of time it takes to create your "Dojo" the way you want it and the time spent waiting for it to be comepleted. It's 100% free. _______________________________________________________________________________ 4: Dojos: One of the best perks to owning a clan, is building your own Dojo. Now like I said in the above technically speaking it is free for the lack of time and materials you will have to farm for to do this. However once you own your clan and start to build your own Dojo you have the freedom to make it as big as you want with no extra cost in real money currency. All it takes is the time you're willing to put into it. _______________________________________________________________________________ The above were my favorite points to the game in which I have added explanations. The rest I'll just leave as points. _______________________________________________________________________________ 5: There is a multitude of weapons, warframes, accessories to choose from. _______________________________________________________________________________ 6: Different Planets with missions set at different levels, enemies do not level with you. _______________________________________________________________________________ 7: Constant updates and hotfixes to the game, DE has done well to keep the players in the loop. As well keep good customer service. _______________________________________________________________________________ 8: Freedom of movement, this game has one of the best parkour systems I've found yet in a video game, behind Assassins Creed that is. _______________________________________________________________________________ 9: Very smooth 3rd person shooting action. With the mixture of SMART movement you have the ability to lunge forward and shoot, slide and shoot, wall run and shoot, slide and slice, jump and slice or slam, and wall run and slice. _______________________________________________________________________________ 10: The community is an alright one, obviously each have their fair share of trolls within the game on Warframes (Region) chat. However most questions are answered, and if not in game, always on the forums in a timely manner, as well with an active wiki. _______________________________________________________________________________ 11: ??? _______________________________________________________________________________ --Cons-- ((I am not awake enough to continue thinking on this review so in time I will come back with more information))
wardrobe;-;Well just to start, anything you see in the trailers IS POSSIBLE . Seriously, all the Warframes are crafted easily from blueprints and parts. Most of the game revolves around maxing out (lvl. 30) weapons to mod them, adding a range of statuses like toxin, ice, fire, or blast to the wep. Although it may seem confusing a few visits to youtube and following the tutorial basically shows you the lot. The game isn't exactly perfect and is still being worked on in terms of getting stuck in the map ( type /unstuck to get out of a glitch ) but seems to be just fine. The game just added SPAAAAAAACE to the works so now you can fly around like a madman whenever you have the requirements. This needs to be crafted D;;;;;; . If you're looking for a gory fancy graphic game then this is second to none, one of the besties best ones around.
Jaxz;-;Super addicting, Big money hole. Don't be afraid to buy Plat it's worth it!
I n s a n E;-;Awesome Gameplay ! Great game for time pass :) Lots of Fun playing it!!
The Lycanthrope;-;It's space ninja pirate wizards, steal things, save people, kidnap people, in space, as a wizard ninja. That's the best I can describe it. Good graphics, Good gameplay, Good crafting system even if I dont like having to wait. I give it a 9, Because DE like to be complicated.
87bato;-;its tricky. and its challenging fun for those who like action. Mastering different builds, using teamwork, and kicking Grineer tail really is fun. Thumbs up, 10/10
Shadow Sights;-;How Can This Game Be Free! Its Awesome!
Noobfox;-;So you play as a magical space ninja, and you just kind of... loot everything - to get more mods and resources to make new guns/warframes to mod, in the hopes of building a constantly stronger and more versatile arsenal - so you can go loot everything in new and more dangerous/exciting areas. 4-player 3rd person shooter. Best played with friends - each 'warframe' is a character with a unique set of powers. the classes can all synergyize very well, but the game can be trudged solo if you so desire. There's a lot of grind - and random drop tables. It's really very much like an MMO in that regard.
Ricebowl;-;A game about super space ninja robots who can control space and time with space magic. You can also fly through space with your space ninja wings and spaceship. There is also plenty of space to customize you and your super space robot in your spaceship. 10/10 Would space again.
MotherChucker;-;This is a cool ninja alien game ever !!
Jc3fowler;-;pretty good game
Rasya Kedua;-;cool
Puppy Fondue;-;Not terrible....as Free to Play games often are. Tons of missions, Loads of Downloadable content to customize your game experience. All in all a pretty good game.
SorenMcDuke;-;Welp. The time has come for a review! Pros- Smooth gameplay Awesome characters Customizable Tons of weapons New maps and characters added now and then(Which is cool) Beautiful graphics Cons- You need to wait a little to build a new Warframe, or a new weapon, but it's ok! It's worth waiting. And..That's all from my personal experience ._. Died from shockwave moa bug, got shot down from grineer ballista, burned to crisp from grineer napalm.. Ten out of ten would again die from all of these things, so I can revive, AND KICK THEIR  BACK! Good job.I recomment this game to anyone who likes 3rd person shooter with a lot of guns, customizasion, and gameplay.
Blamano;-;Devs are active. They give out free plat because a lot of the community loves them and they love the community back. They try to err on the side of making things harder to get rather than easier. Mostly a good community, some that are too serious and get  off if you don't single-handedly carry the team. It's a grindfest. It's also fun. The UI is smooth. Steep level curve because your weapons are upgraded with 'mods' that have to be found, and then leveled up from rank 0. E.g. Serration increases primary weapon damage. Rank 0 to rank 1 requires 1 unranked (rank 0) copy. Rank 2 requires 2, 3 requires 4, etc, for 1,024 to get to rank 10. Some powerful/commonly needed mods are rank 10, lots are lower. Some weapons are objectively better, not all weapons are generically bad. Lots of weapons have different feels to them. Lots of different warframes. If you are a completionist, you will eventually take issue with the Random Number Generator used to determine if you get a certain part of a certain weapon/warframe you want. There's a lot to do in the game. Update 17 coming soon and it will change how missions/content are available. It's fun. Eleven out of tenno. And to clarify, there is no paywall. You can buy aesthetics with money, you can buy inventory space for warframes and weapons, and you can buy stuff that allows you to mod your stuff even better. However, the stuff that lets you mod your stuff better (Orokin Catalysts/Reactors [potatoes], Forma) can be found rarely as an 'alert' mission or login reward. And there is increasing numbers of alternate cosmetics that can not be bought with money, but with in-game currency. Moreover, the paid currency (platinum) is available to trade for in-game. What platinum you can trade for is limited only by who wants to buy what and what you have to sell. There isn't a vicious cycle that prevents you from doing this unless you're hoarding all your stuff and refuse to sell anything in the first place.
IronBack | Elfein7Night;-;+Amazing Gunplay. +Great Swordplay. +Fun Acrobatics. +Constant updates, fixes, new content. +Fair business model. +Good graphics and performance. There is alot of grinding, good thing grinding in this game is fun too.
Le Meow of Rivia;-;it would be perfect if there's less guns. 8/10
tl;-;Really Nice Game :3 <3 <3 <3 100/10
AnonumusSoldier;-;I have searched for a good combat MMO game aside from the popular console Call of Duty/Halo ect. for a long time. And i have finaly found one. Stratagy, combat skills, construction, critical thinking, lore, all in one game. The devs are always coming up with ways to add to the game or expand the games lore universe/gameplay, so the game is always evolving. The user base is for the most part supportive and friendly, and unlike most games i have tried, the elitist jerk few cant set up roadblocks to the common player base and make thier gameplay miserable and unfruitful. A word of warning, becasue the game is always evolving it is natural that bugs come with that territory. Players affectionatly call it Bugframe or Crashframe becasue of it, but in my opinion the rewarding gameplay is worth it. A word on its Free 2 Play status as there is much critizism especailly after 15.0 Update. Although there are some limitations at trying to running it F2P, it can be done. Game currency can be earned thru the player trading system, game currency only items can be earned in the game although takes more time/in less quantity, and certain items can be traded for things you want but cant get. If you do decide to put some money in the game, a little goes a long way, and there is discount coupons all the time.
Scriptdrive;-;Amazing game, always evolving and makign new fun ways to enjoy this masterpeice!
ofShard;-;I've been pretty impressed with the quality of this game. The replayability is pretty high as well because of how many warframes there are and how customizable your various loadouts can be, given the many weapons, mods, and other options. It's also continuously updated and they actually fix bugs soon after I discover them, which is really quite rare for a free to play.
nahdrardhan;-;Login - grinding - log out - repeat. help.
CanGooRoo;-;My hours in-game says all :)
Moon Butt;-;Free to play, in the right dirrection. So many games that are free to play are like swimming with a lead life vest. To get it off, you have to pay for the key to properly stay afloat. WarFrame has nothing like that, they just put the islands far away as hell and you can choose at what pace you get to them. With alot of F2P games, 90% of the content is locked behind a wall of money, but here it's the opposite. A vast majority of what you see is free. Frames (Characters) are all attainable by grinding the pieces and resources needed to build them as goes with the weapons too. By default you get one of the base Frames and base weapons of your choice, with the availability to get 1 aditional frame and eight weapons without paying a single dime. With the starting free money they give you, it's possible to unlock additional frames and weapons spots to have more off the bat. The only thing you cannot get free are color chemes, some animations and so on, but those are all asthetics. It's possible to play the game end to end without spending any money. Story is a general MMO stereotype, you have control of a powerful character, grindy missions, save the universe ect. Not much more to it than that. There are very few games I get headlong into the Lore of and this is not one of them. There may be more than what I said, but I don't feel compelled to learn the in and out of every faction. There are several starting story missions to get you the required gear to play any game type and an NPC companion for free. The combat is great, controls are tight and responsive. Popping a headshot is easy the run/slide and hump feels natural after a few minutes of gameplay. The parkour/wall running is a bit buggy, but there is no penalty for falling out of bounds as it just pops you back into the level. Combat difficulty is a bit high later on into the games, making it necessary to team up with others to help ease the load, but you can jump into a game and play with random players if there are any for the selected mission. Weapon selection is a bit low, as I love having hundreds of guns to play with, but they have a decent selection of pistols, rifles, bows and ultimate (Prime) weapons and power cards to make them all better as you level them up. Standard affair for weapons: Rifles, snipers, bows, shotguns, SMG's and pistols Graphics are great, I'm running an Nvidia 750. It runs on high settings, but not ultra, even so it's a gorgeous game that looks beautiful through each planet/level. The levels are based off of tile sets and wind up being different missions constructed with the same pieces but a different lay out on each planet/ship you go through. While level designs are endless, you start to see alot of similarities over time even with the different variations of each. Right off the bat, this isn't a game I play alot and usually with friends only. I am hesitant about spending any money on it as this is more of a social game for me, play with friends and have fun. If this is your scene and you love the game to death, there's nothing wrong with dropping full game price (60$) for the extra stuff as it's a very well polished complete title that is worth that much at least. As they add more things to do, Frames to play as you can go ahead and spend more on it, I won't blame you. However be warned, there is several hundred dollars of content to buy if you don't want to grind out the supplies and Frame blueprints. Warframe is bet played with patience and friends. Everything can be built immediately for Platinum (The real money currency) or bought with it via the market or player trading. It can take up alot of hours to get the characters and weapons if you don't want to spend any money off the bat. Everything aside from the color shcemes can be recieved in game with a bit of time and some higher level friends. Even if you don't know anyone that plays Warframe, there is a chat channel that you can ask to join in on higher level missions to level and get better items and resources from the start. Breakdown: Graphics 9/10 Story 3/10 Gameplay 9/10 Reliability 8/10 Fun 8/10 Value 11/10 Quick Breakdown: Be patient, gets some friends. This is a grindy game if you don't want to spend cash. Amazing graphics, tight gameplay and 90% of the game content only costs time to get.
Judge Nolan;-;Great game for those looking to rush everything.
WhiteLineFever;-;Great game, even tho it might be a bit repetitive :)
Noobfox;-;So you play as a magical space ninja, and you just kind of... loot everything - to get more mods and resources to make new guns/warframes to mod, in the hopes of building a constantly stronger and more versatile arsenal - so you can go loot everything in new and more dangerous/exciting areas. 4-player 3rd person shooter. Best played with friends - each 'warframe' is a character with a unique set of powers. the classes can all synergyize very well, but the game can be trudged solo if you so desire. There's a lot of grind - and random drop tables. It's really very much like an MMO in that regard.
I n s a n E;-;Awesome Gameplay ! Great game for time pass :) Lots of Fun playing it!!
Red Lightning;-;I figured I would rewrite my review of this game completely. So allow me to start off with a bit of back story. Warframe is the hypothetical predocessor of DE's Dark Sector. In Dark Sector the main character being "Hayden Tenno", is where the "Warframes" in the game get their faction name of "Tenno". Hypothetically speaking in this universe, the reason why the Tenno are they way they are is for the same reason why Hayden is the way he is. We are human beings that had been infected by the Technocyte (in a positive way, opposite to that of the infested. Where parts of the body if not all of the body have been turned to metal) than gifted by the "Lotus" (One of the main Protagonists in the game) a suit of armor known as a Warframe to fit the contores of our infection. ---Pros--- |||THIS GAME IS FREE TO PLAY||| 1: (((NOT PAY TO WIN))): There is a real money currency known as platinum that can be used to purchase in game items down to weapons, warframes, and cosmetics such as accessories and colour pallets. However because this game is not entirely PVP oriented as much as it is PVE, you need not worry about getting bulldozed by every wallet warrior out there and their cousin. ______________________________________________________________________________ 2: On PVP to PVE: There are particular nodes specifically made just for PVP, and they are few and far between, each planet has 1 PVP node, known as a (Dark Sector). These Dark Sectors are where different Clans have at it with each other in order to control parts of the universe. If one particular clan owns a Dark Sector, they have the ability to determine the tax on the planet for all resources and credits earned by the players while participating on the objective of said Dark Sector. _______________________________________________________________________________ 3: Clans: Pretty much everyone can own one and it does not cost real money currency. As a matter of fact for the lack of time it takes to create your "Dojo" the way you want it and the time spent waiting for it to be comepleted. It's 100% free. _______________________________________________________________________________ 4: Dojos: One of the best perks to owning a clan, is building your own Dojo. Now like I said in the above technically speaking it is free for the lack of time and materials you will have to farm for to do this. However once you own your clan and start to build your own Dojo you have the freedom to make it as big as you want with no extra cost in real money currency. All it takes is the time you're willing to put into it. _______________________________________________________________________________ The above were my favorite points to the game in which I have added explanations. The rest I'll just leave as points. _______________________________________________________________________________ 5: There is a multitude of weapons, warframes, accessories to choose from. _______________________________________________________________________________ 6: Different Planets with missions set at different levels, enemies do not level with you. _______________________________________________________________________________ 7: Constant updates and hotfixes to the game, DE has done well to keep the players in the loop. As well keep good customer service. _______________________________________________________________________________ 8: Freedom of movement, this game has one of the best parkour systems I've found yet in a video game, behind Assassins Creed that is. _______________________________________________________________________________ 9: Very smooth 3rd person shooting action. With the mixture of SMART movement you have the ability to lunge forward and shoot, slide and shoot, wall run and shoot, slide and slice, jump and slice or slam, and wall run and slice. _______________________________________________________________________________ 10: The community is an alright one, obviously each have their fair share of trolls within the game on Warframes (Region) chat. However most questions are answered, and if not in game, always on the forums in a timely manner, as well with an active wiki. _______________________________________________________________________________ 11: ??? _______________________________________________________________________________ --Cons-- ((I am not awake enough to continue thinking on this review so in time I will come back with more information))
The Lycanthrope;-;It's space ninja pirate wizards, steal things, save people, kidnap people, in space, as a wizard ninja. That's the best I can describe it. Good graphics, Good gameplay, Good crafting system even if I dont like having to wait. I give it a 9, Because DE like to be complicated.
wardrobe;-;Well just to start, anything you see in the trailers IS POSSIBLE . Seriously, all the Warframes are crafted easily from blueprints and parts. Most of the game revolves around maxing out (lvl. 30) weapons to mod them, adding a range of statuses like toxin, ice, fire, or blast to the wep. Although it may seem confusing a few visits to youtube and following the tutorial basically shows you the lot. The game isn't exactly perfect and is still being worked on in terms of getting stuck in the map ( type /unstuck to get out of a glitch ) but seems to be just fine. The game just added SPAAAAAAACE to the works so now you can fly around like a madman whenever you have the requirements. This needs to be crafted D;;;;;; . If you're looking for a gory fancy graphic game then this is second to none, one of the besties best ones around.
i am a lesbian goat (ngip);-;Warframe... This game is so good, i cant even explain it - havelreksskrubs
Shadow Sights;-;How Can This Game Be Free! Its Awesome!
87bato;-;its tricky. and its challenging fun for those who like action. Mastering different builds, using teamwork, and kicking Grineer tail really is fun. Thumbs up, 10/10
Ricebowl;-;A game about super space ninja robots who can control space and time with space magic. You can also fly through space with your space ninja wings and spaceship. There is also plenty of space to customize you and your super space robot in your spaceship. 10/10 Would space again.
ketza13;-;el juego es bueno si dejaran de desinstalar los juegos gratis sera mucho mejor no es muy graciosos tener que descargando juegos sobre todo con un gran contenido the game is good if they stopped uninstall the free games would be much better is not very funny having to downloading games especially with a large content
Dexter;-;A game that is heavily relied in teamwork!!! thumbs up for that
James;-;It's ok! Find some friends and play! ;)
Hellslash;-;It's good
Jc3fowler;-;pretty good game
MotherChucker;-;This is a cool ninja alien game ever !!
harvista;-;Warframe, When i first started back on its inital release i was never able to get very far i forgot my account details more than once so i kept restarting, then eventaully i decided to take it up agian after wasting a good 36+ hours on the game getting annoyed that i was unable to solo missions and never seem to find a group (The finding a group problem still persists occasionally) but as of late from my standponit my current account is pretty much at the end-game level i cant get into pvp matches as easy as some my rating is just to high =p, So i started playing recently to find out that they released a new warframe the last time i played was during the Mesa update i got some nice mods from that i like the encorperation of the new pvp game mode becuase replaying a mission only entertains you for so long, things get repedative and hardly anyone did the conclave arenas Clans had their own pvp areas for taking over Dark sectors but i wasnt in a big clan just a small one that i was passed the ownership from a freind of mine so overall Warframe is a pretty entertaining game when you have the time for it the Event missions sure are intense i spent 10 hours trying to get those mods from the Mesa update group after group ether failing instantly or at the last minute id go to help a fellow player and die thus losing the chance to get them as far as the pvp goes i would say for example the weapons that i use are pretty op so i feel bad when killing under geared players but overal its rather fun.
Displeased Duck;-;Pretty fun game to play to kill some time and have some good old fashioned co-op fun. You can choose to play alone. with friends, or with strangers. The game isn't quite finished yet, but I see a lot of good stuff in it already. UPDATE: It's been quite awhile since I last played this game, and holy crap it's really grown! This game is so much better than it was two years ago. I was blown away when I returned to this game. It has a story, more tile sets, more Warframes, more everything. Bravo devs! I can't wait to see more from you guys!
Axirion;-;Warframe has become quite the the most exciting game I've ever played so far. so many things to to and the community isn't bad at all. The Dev team is quite active in fixing some bugs and are very detailed in the Hot fix. Also one that caught my attention was the bug report when you untuck or get bigged in a game, you report the bug you encounter in full detail and I believe this help the development of the game even further. One of the Most addicting game I ever played :D
Arkuroz;-;If you truly want to become a legendary ninja space warrior then download this game in an instant! If not then you're quite mad!
ofShard;-;I've been pretty impressed with the quality of this game. The replayability is pretty high as well because of how many warframes there are and how customizable your various loadouts can be, given the many weapons, mods, and other options. It's also continuously updated and they actually fix bugs soon after I discover them, which is really quite rare for a free to play.
Flattermelons;-;Love this game yet after some time, you desire to level more stuff....but there ain't any. Fun game nonetheless ^^
Hot Dog Gypsy (Frank Fortune);-;A great Co-OP Online RPG featuring Robot Ninjas that can change Character Classes by switching "Warframes". It should noted that this game is nothing but grind, but an enjoyable grind.
TheCaptainMorgan;-;Great game!
SuicidalMuffin;-;This game is totally worth your time. Go & bring some friends along with you while playing the game. This is a rare free-to-play MMO game which focus on co-op instead of leveling system based RPG. The controls are fluid and the game is surprisingly addictive. There are tons of customization for you to make your character a badass alien ninja. There are lots of content for you to explore. Go download it now! 8/10
{DigiWobble}{InToXiCaTeD}{NL};-;This is awesome , a nice shooter if you like teamwork and going through fights against random AI
Ajid Lovett;-;Great game for spare time .. Cool Character and skills .. Bunch of weapons choice .. Recommended Game :D
S.T.E.V.E.;-;This is a pretty fun game after you learn the ropes. They have been improving the tutorial system since I first started but the beginning was pretty rough. There is a lot content, systems, and mechanics that don't make immediate sense. I loved the 200+ missions that you can do, the only downside to this is that there is a set amount of missions types so they become repetitive eventually. Also when you're done with all the missions you're not left with much to do other than trying to acquire rare weapons or Warframes. Prepare for a grind. How long you can enjoy that is up to each player, I was fine for a while, but it just gets old. The dev team gives you weekly updates/patches and great support, kudos to them for that. Its a F2P game, pick it up, play with some friends. You'll have fun.
Burn;-;Nice game
HipmanSRB;-;Awesome game. Lots of stuff to do in it, farm. It's always interesting and never gets bored. Nice tennoes and abilities. There's things for everyone to like. Lots of missions. Gets better and better. I recommend this game :) ...
Ventiglondalator;-;Guns and suits are completely out of balance, either overpowered or too weak, but devs are too busy pumping out new content to fix that. Once you get to a certain point the challenge completely disappears and apparently people like it that way.
CAPTIN TBOB;-;This is a fun and fast moving game.
SorenMcDuke;-;Welp. The time has come for a review! Pros- Smooth gameplay Awesome characters Customizable Tons of weapons New maps and characters added now and then(Which is cool) Beautiful graphics Cons- You need to wait a little to build a new Warframe, or a new weapon, but it's ok! It's worth waiting. And..That's all from my personal experience ._. Died from shockwave moa bug, got shot down from grineer ballista, burned to crisp from grineer napalm.. Ten out of ten would again die from all of these things, so I can revive, AND KICK THEIR  BACK! Good job.I recomment this game to anyone who likes 3rd person shooter with a lot of guns, customizasion, and gameplay.
c wut happend bruh;-;One of the best games i played,its really fun and addicting. Especially with friends! Even when i get sometimes bored of this game i still come back to play sometime later.The combat is fun,loads of guns and warframes to pick from, tons of cosmetics to change up your character, and the devs are releasing new content quite frequently. :) There is one downside tho,there is a lot of grinding in this game. :( If you like 3rd person shooters where you have loads of classes, abilities, or if you just like space shooter games,you should TOTALLY check this game out. :) 10/10 would get bored and then play the game later again.
KubiS;-;Warframe is a profoundly outstanding game with intensive co-op action involving many strategical details, especially being that there are many different type of mission-types. Furthermore, this game has amazing developers and graphics, which go to show how shocking it is that this game is even free! Absolutely everything in this game is completely free, while there is the option to buy platnium, it is not needed due to the fact that you can use the trade market to sell/trade/buy items for platnium. All in all, this is a must-play game and in my opinion, is the best game out there, especially against other free-to-play games.
Jeady;-;Got it yesterday and i have already played it almost five hours :P Bes gem evur (Not really but i love it)
[BSy] Archangel;-;I've started to play this game and it's a great game but having a few issues in it. Overall I liked this!
seracath13;-;Love the game it is great and has much potential for the future and I really hope that they add in the ability to swim because I am a bit tired of dying in water. I want to Swim like a fishy. But this is still a great game and they can make it a lot better given time and the fact that it is free to play makes it even better anyone can get it and play just set up an account and enter The weapon variety is amazing and there is an amazing science fiction story line to it which instantly made me love this game. I wish that there was some way to earn platinum through the game other than buying it or trading for it but when you earn that platinum it should be a small limited amount not an amount in the hundreds. I absoulutly love this game.
Garnaken;-;Free to play game that is not pay2win you can get every payed item by building it. In other words it doesn't force you to pay money to get the characters you want you can just play the game and build your way up to them.
aschneck85;-;feels and plays like a destiny prototype with some minor bugs every now and then. still tons of fun. 8.5/10
Valkoor Drake;-;Great Game.
WooplingBG;-;I love this game! It is just amazing! The graphics... The warframes... The weapons... Everyone must try this game.
NyxSilence;-;500 hour mark. With this in mind I believe I can make a accurate review. This game as of now (12/4/2014) is still a beta in process to be a story filled mmo. The basis is you use a character called a Warframe to runs strikes on the Solar System against arguably 10 factions, 3 races, and 3 different sets of bounty hunters. You are reffered to as Tenno. The People of the Lotus. The Tenno fight for/against others to bring balance to the system. You are awakened by the Lotus to prevent from being captured by the Grineer to be used and processed to be their weeapon/slave/resource to gain universal domination as it were. For the purpose of keeping from spoiling the game I'll get into this. This is a MMO. This is NOT an easy mmo. If you have deep pockets and believe in buying all great gear, you'll be HIGHLY dissapointed because there's this thing called XP Locked that keep people like you from ruining this game and speed running it to be "better" than everyone else. In fact the entire game is genuinly 100% free minus cosmetic items like color and skins etc. Everything in the game minus the cosmetic items can be obtained through simply playing. In-game missions give credits which are used to build bluprints to beef your arsenal up. There is a achievement labeled for having 10 Warframes "Each tool with it's own Purpose". This is true for the game. SLASH damage shreds fleshy enemies to pieces but sheilded ones left unphased. IMPACT bomards shields but armor shrugs it off. PUNCTURE (you guessed it) pierces armor but does a whole lot of nothing to shields. Sheilds save lives. All tactics should be analyzed. Rank up is broken down as follows: xp from primary+secondary+melee+warframes=pooled xp=Mastery Rank. The max rank for everything is level 30 including Mastery Rank. If you level an item to 30 you will only recieve XP that counts THAT FIRST TIME. If you use Forma to level it to zero to make it stronger later the other times after the first its leveled to 30 will not count toward your mastery rank. Every time you hit the xp cap for a Mastery Rank there is a "right of passage" type of test to rank. If you fail you will be able to try again in 24 hours. If you pass then you proceed to the next rank unlocking weapons and other new items. There are plenty of weapons I promise you will not run out. Crafting. This is easier than it sounds. Go do a mission and collect the drops. The Resources currently are Gallium, Nano Spores, Mutagen Samples, Mutagen Mass, Orokin Cells, Polymer Bundle, Alloy Plate, Rubedo, Salvage, Detonite Ample, Detonite Injectors, Fieldtron Samples, Fieldtron, Oxium, Nav Coordinates, Nurodes, Neural Sensors (last two are not related to each other), Argon Crystal, Control Modules, Golem Nav Coordnate, Morphics, Cuircuts, and Plastids. None of these are too difficult to find. All are used from time to time for different items. The more you have on hand the less (as much as I hate saying it) farming you have to do. Gamplay. You, are, a, space, ninja. Thre is no better way to describe it. You do flips, wallruns, slides, and parcour of all kinds be it rolling from a fall or vaulting to a higher spot, this is your deadliest weapon. Each Warframe has unique abilities that they use. They are described in the market or Abilities option in your arsenal. 90% of the game is PvE. Clan battles that you are/aren't apart of you may assist for fun/credit earnings. Conclave is also available as a deathmatch for a more...personal 1v1 or 2v2 fight. As a beta this game is a 10/10. ~NyxSilence
[Pink] Butt Stalion;-;Warframe is the only game that is not a "play to win" but very much worth the money paying for!!! Only game ive spent money on besides dlc for other games.
Cresyls;-;amazing game so much fun :D[/h1]
Black Phoenix;-;Metacritic should review this game again
CrackedDood;-;It is a fun game that makes you spend hours and hours on it. I mean come on space ninjas? Hell yeah! A little paid-to-win yes but you can get the in-game currency with hard work too!
Haukai;-;Highly Recommended : What more can we say about this game, that hasn't already been said ? It's an amazing F2P, everything is obtainable through farming/grinding, even the real currency you'd buy with real money. Takes a bit of time and farming to actually get some decent stuff but it's worth the trouble! Graphics wise, it's better than some $20-$30 games out there, and it keeps on getting better! Sure, you'll have glitches and bugs, that's because the game is still in Beta, and many people seem to forget about it. Glitches and bugs get fixed over time, the devs works hard for that. =)
TSN Kami;-;HELL YEAH HAHA THIS GAME IS TOO FUN TO BE TRUE
[eTSi] Revengerz;-;This is a really fun game to play with friends. Even though its only PvE (Players vs Enemies), having a group to play with / clan, makes it alot more fun. Be warned, this is a pure farming game, of repetitive play. Hence having groups of friends to play with makes it alittle more fun~ And after the latest new changes to the game, it has become more user friendly and easier to understand, with not as much farming needed as last time. The game is still hella fun! :D
Edaok;-;everyone says this game is like destiny, i agree with that except warframe isnt
Sniper Killer;-;get this game if your even a gamer!
Gem;-;My life..It Kinda left me for a few weeks.
Alezz;-;Not bad at all, really enjoy playing it, and the graphics are amazing. Do I also need to mention that it's free?
| AF | Frost;-;an absolutly perfect game all around that everyone should try at least once.
Moon Butt;-;Free to play, in the right dirrection. So many games that are free to play are like swimming with a lead life vest. To get it off, you have to pay for the key to properly stay afloat. WarFrame has nothing like that, they just put the islands far away as hell and you can choose at what pace you get to them. With alot of F2P games, 90% of the content is locked behind a wall of money, but here it's the opposite. A vast majority of what you see is free. Frames (Characters) are all attainable by grinding the pieces and resources needed to build them as goes with the weapons too. By default you get one of the base Frames and base weapons of your choice, with the availability to get 1 aditional frame and eight weapons without paying a single dime. With the starting free money they give you, it's possible to unlock additional frames and weapons spots to have more off the bat. The only thing you cannot get free are color chemes, some animations and so on, but those are all asthetics. It's possible to play the game end to end without spending any money. Story is a general MMO stereotype, you have control of a powerful character, grindy missions, save the universe ect. Not much more to it than that. There are very few games I get headlong into the Lore of and this is not one of them. There may be more than what I said, but I don't feel compelled to learn the in and out of every faction. There are several starting story missions to get you the required gear to play any game type and an NPC companion for free. The combat is great, controls are tight and responsive. Popping a headshot is easy the run/slide and hump feels natural after a few minutes of gameplay. The parkour/wall running is a bit buggy, but there is no penalty for falling out of bounds as it just pops you back into the level. Combat difficulty is a bit high later on into the games, making it necessary to team up with others to help ease the load, but you can jump into a game and play with random players if there are any for the selected mission. Weapon selection is a bit low, as I love having hundreds of guns to play with, but they have a decent selection of pistols, rifles, bows and ultimate (Prime) weapons and power cards to make them all better as you level them up. Standard affair for weapons: Rifles, snipers, bows, shotguns, SMG's and pistols Graphics are great, I'm running an Nvidia 750. It runs on high settings, but not ultra, even so it's a gorgeous game that looks beautiful through each planet/level. The levels are based off of tile sets and wind up being different missions constructed with the same pieces but a different lay out on each planet/ship you go through. While level designs are endless, you start to see alot of similarities over time even with the different variations of each. Right off the bat, this isn't a game I play alot and usually with friends only. I am hesitant about spending any money on it as this is more of a social game for me, play with friends and have fun. If this is your scene and you love the game to death, there's nothing wrong with dropping full game price (60$) for the extra stuff as it's a very well polished complete title that is worth that much at least. As they add more things to do, Frames to play as you can go ahead and spend more on it, I won't blame you. However be warned, there is several hundred dollars of content to buy if you don't want to grind out the supplies and Frame blueprints. Warframe is bet played with patience and friends. Everything can be built immediately for Platinum (The real money currency) or bought with it via the market or player trading. It can take up alot of hours to get the characters and weapons if you don't want to spend any money off the bat. Everything aside from the color shcemes can be recieved in game with a bit of time and some higher level friends. Even if you don't know anyone that plays Warframe, there is a chat channel that you can ask to join in on higher level missions to level and get better items and resources from the start. Breakdown: Graphics 9/10 Story 3/10 Gameplay 9/10 Reliability 8/10 Fun 8/10 Value 11/10 Quick Breakdown: Be patient, gets some friends. This is a grindy game if you don't want to spend cash. Amazing graphics, tight gameplay and 90% of the game content only costs time to get.
nahdrardhan;-;Login - grinding - log out - repeat. help.
CanGooRoo;-;My hours in-game says all :)
Carlieth;-;I found this game to be a really good shooter and the parkor moves made it intresting to kill enemies in different ways. Graphics and gameplay are gorgeous and the different warframes can be easily identified by their abilities or looks. there are regular events which allow access to one time weapons and badges and make a pleasant change to the normal gameplay. The only dislike i have is the severe monetisation of everything. if you want more warframes you can grind and build them for sure but you still have to purchase the slots to access them. more guns? more swords? all good and well but you still have to pay to unlock slots to have them.
Liquid'adreN;-;good game,interesting and good graphics
Sammy Simpleton;-;be prepared to spen over 100$ for the full expireience. though it's pretty neat for free too.
Joric;-;Space Ninjas and .
"Velpar;-;This game is extremely unique, it combines elements from many genres and combines them into a mixture that fits perfectly. DE made a game with pieces of Sci-Fi, Co-op, RPG, Third Person Shooters, PVP, PVE, and a very nice microtransaction system that works well together. The store is another great thing about the game. The prices are incredibly low compared to other games with the same cash system. For example, in League of Legends a certain cosmetic skin could cost upwards of 20 dollars. In this game a skin would cost around 5 dollars. The shop allows players to access items faster, but it allows people to obtain the items through playing the game as well, thereby removing any pay to win factor. In summary, this game is a combination of elements that equals a fantastic experience that everyone should be a part of.
tree;-;no this game blew up my pc then starting a fire which burned down my house and killed my family 11/10 would play this again.
>>>SWATTZAR<<<;-;no russians here :)
Zalboas;-;Mmmmmmm, High speed shooter action. If you step into Warframe expecting to play something akin to a traditional shooter, you're going to be a bit disappointed. Warframe amps it up with the addition of parkour elements as well as make it viable by leaving a ton of shortcuts around for people who want to explore. Randomly generated levels, multiple game types, a newly revamped PvP, and constant updates make Warframe a constantly evolving shooter experience, and worth a try for anyone.
Reckless Redcoat;-;For a Free-To-Play, Warframe is a , action-packed shoot-'em-up that doesn't disappoint! With dynamic diving, wall-running, sliding and genreally traversing surfaces, Warframe lives out the experince of a space-faring, gun toting  as you fight disgusting s with no sense of personal hygeine, some cheap rip off from Mass Effect and some human/alien/cyborg/Bill Murray offspring. Warframe allows medicore co-op gameplay with millenia of Survival, Extermination, high class drug sessions, Sabotage and other mission classes. Definately a solid -58/10: MUST DIE! See you in the system, YOU ING PRICK.  YOU.
[Y.A] Rektation Station;-;Although the game does have dlcs it does not affect the gameplay at all. I still use the suit I got when I started playing the game a long time ago, and I still top the scoreboard on missions. The enemies are unique, you have the mutated creatures(I really prefer calling them space zombies), and those weird ugly faced green armor dudes. A really good game if you ask me.
zogar;-;update 14 has some major bugs with mission in game things like my screen going black bassically crashing but this is all i have to really say about it its a really good game overall
emmis;-;This game is for cringy autists
Imperfect Euphoric;-;One of the best free games i have every played
AncientLlama;-;ROBOT SPACE NINJAS!
GTO880;-;This is one of the best action packed games that is Free To Play, I'v played many hours on this game and still it gives me something to look forrward to every time i log-on.
RamonEmeterioBetances;-;Fast, so fast I might go into epileptic shock and awesome so awesome I might explode into epileptic shock
Blackpaint;-;Game is great PRETTY MUCH WARFARM ill give it TEN Os
Lazypcguy;-;IF I COULD RATE YES 10x I WOULD! BEST FREE TO PLAY GAME OUT THERE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Raiions;-;Good Game, Pro's : Very Funny Fast Pace Good Effect's Good Auido Good community Con's: A Few Bugs Needs a little of fix But their not that noticeable I reccomend you download this game it's free and defintly worth your time
SULTAN;-;Alot of fun to play with friends and its a good 3rd person co-op game
DaBawsh;-;Make sure your host has good internet.
Kida;-;Space ninjas. In space. With swords. And cool looking helmets.
Mr.W;-;Best free game out there :)
Mechislav Nikolaus;-;Such good game. Can cut people in half and vaporise their body into thin air. 10/10 Good if you have friends with you on skype playing.
Dark Sector;-;This game is awesome and truly free to play. The only thing you pay for is cosmetic items and that's about it. Developers continually listen to the community and add content on a frequent basis. Totally worth the hours you are able to put into it! 12/11 would bang again.....................
joeyleonel24;-;this is one of the best game here?
ogannago;-;I was walking around on on a Corpus gas city. I had been hired by the Corpus to repiar one of their reactors, when gunfight broke out. 4 grinner lancers ran out of the door to my left. I was with my kubrow and when the Grinner appeared, Terry (My Kubrow) started growling. As I turned my head, one Grinner lancer aimed his karak at me. He fired twice and pirced my arm and torso. As I fell I could see a lancer pull out his cleaver and buther Terry, He was wimpering. One more slice to the head and Terry went down. I can still see his body. I screamed at the top of my lungs, more lancers appeared, but I did not care. Terry, my wonderful Terry was gone. I whiped out my Lato and shot at the lancers as I screamed at the top of my lungs. Then they came. An explosion rocked the platform, and I fell. I was falling, Down, down, down. The wings wraped around me and healed me. it gave me life, it gave me air. It was a Tenno. Untill then I was a Tenno denier. They were fake, legends of the empire, of the Orokin. But here it was, in front of me. After that I lost focus and blacked-out. I woke, I was in a temple with Tenno suronding me. There was a pool with a silver liquid. I understood my fate. I jumped into the pool. The liqud clung to my skin, it created an armor. a warframe. I step out of the pool. The Tenno bowed and chanted. I was reborn. I was a Tenno. I found the Lancer captin that killed Terry. His name, was captin Vor As I rushed into battle, I screamed "FOR TERRY!" Come Tenno, you must join the war.
Krash;-;if you havent played this game yet, stop what youre doing and download it now ._.
The Anonymous Axolotl;-;+ amazing graphics large range of weapons from swords axes daggers hammers rocket lunching pistols laser guns shotguns snipers whips large range of characters with different powers and abilities and appearance like water powers fire powers power over the dead and much more fast and slow passed game play greater lvling system easy to use crafting system good clan and friend system well done free running mechanic appearance items good player trade systems well designed map many great game modes to play Mother fwooking jetpacks constant updates bringing in new weapons, game modes and buggfixs its free - constant updates bringing new bugs lots of bugs mostly small though game crashes performance issues sum up: I would most defiantly recommend this game to any third person shooter is if fan with a love of fast passed free running shooter game however this game is not for a low quality gaming rig it is a massive game and struggles to run on most pc that I've seen this has a good upgrade system with easy and customisable controls with a good and simple crafting system it has a tutorial for pretty much any mechanic in the game and you will often find a people to help with any mission over all it is a well structured game and worth trying out Ninjas play free
SSI_GrandDaddySlimer;-;<---- Look at my in game hours. Yeah, it really is that good. Chop it up or shoot it. Blast it with your powers or run away from it. The inclusion of clans make this game easy to come back to over and over. If starting make sure you get in with a good clan and get involved, you'll enjoy the game so much more as tutorial-wise it is pretty lacking.
Mynio | PSU RIP;-;Played closed beta. Played recently. This game changed incredibly. It has potential. Still a repetetive grinding game. Somewhat pay2win, but I am amazed how developers are putting work in this game. Keep it up!
Slof;-;Grinding this game is more of an accomplishment than grinding your girlfriend... in which I don't have. Ironic.
Atlas;-;It's ok
Slasher the Space Demon;-;Okay, so I was jumping into this game knowing nothing but from the gameplay trailer, and I was expecting an undeveloped story and another FPS game, but this game was anything BUT that. This game is a massive MM0 game which you play as one of three amazing classes, all with unique gameplay styles and weapons. There's a wide variety of customization, and a very wide one of weapons. Heck, the starter weapons are really good in a lot of cases. And the story was very well developed, but it wasn't like a mindblowing story, it was just a great Free-To-Play story. I highly recommend this game to anyone, no matter what you think. You'll probably be blown away. The only complaint I have is it takes some time to get used to the controls, and it requires a lot of grinding to level up and get different weapons. My rating: 8.8/10 GET THIS GAME!
=-=;-;not perfect. but definitely improved since beta which made me quit the game after a mere few hrs. picked up again and im vomiting rainbows from how much better it is now. gr8 m8 8/8
Nyss - game night;-;It's a good time, if you know what you're getting yourself into. This game is extremely grindy, but I certainly don't mind, because the core gameplay is solid and enjoyable (albeit with a few snags here and there). There are warframes to suit darn near every playstyle out there, and the 3 frames you get to choose from at the beginning reflect this well. Most importantly.. EVERY warframe and EVERY weapon can be acquired without spending a cent. This is where the grinding comes in. You have to have patience, and play the game. Of course, if you don't have patience, you can always just buy some platinum, and spend that on warframes, weapons, and various cosmetic goodies instead!
TheQuickShooter;-;Better than Destiny the game on PS4
Bukbuk.Hamburglar.;-;Always alot of fun. A must try!
Bukbuk.Hamburglar.;-;Always alot of fun. A must try!
Alucard;-;Fun game to play online. Get in a clan, run some alerts and blow sh!t up. The actual frames are fun to build. Makes you work a bit to get all the parts, but that's really what keeps you coming back. Decent graphics and the controls are on par with most AAA TPS games.
micaloda[12];-;Warframe is a third-person action sci-fi game that takes place through our solar system and more. This game is very brilliant looking and has little to no bugs. As you can see I spend alot of time playing and you should too, so download it now please because it is 0% P2W (Pay2Win) and sooooo fun. Enjoy the game.
r;-;Mother-ing space ninjas with magic.
FriendlyNative;-;Like Skyrim With Guns ~ IGN 420/10
GoldTheAngel;-;If you like space, cyborg ninjas which have special abilities to turn invisible, summon tentacles, raise the dead, mind control and more? As well as shoot enemies with bullets, arrows, fire, lightning and poison? As well as hit enemies with swords, scythes, staffs, daggers and other sharp stuff? This is your wet dream.
SSI_GrandDaddySlimer;-;<---- Look at my in game hours. Yeah, it really is that good. Chop it up or shoot it. Blast it with your powers or run away from it. The inclusion of clans make this game easy to come back to over and over. If starting make sure you get in with a good clan and get involved, you'll enjoy the game so much more as tutorial-wise it is pretty lacking.
Mynio | PSU RIP;-;Played closed beta. Played recently. This game changed incredibly. It has potential. Still a repetetive grinding game. Somewhat pay2win, but I am amazed how developers are putting work in this game. Keep it up!
The Anonymous Axolotl;-;+ amazing graphics large range of weapons from swords axes daggers hammers rocket lunching pistols laser guns shotguns snipers whips large range of characters with different powers and abilities and appearance like water powers fire powers power over the dead and much more fast and slow passed game play greater lvling system easy to use crafting system good clan and friend system well done free running mechanic appearance items good player trade systems well designed map many great game modes to play Mother fwooking jetpacks constant updates bringing in new weapons, game modes and buggfixs its free - constant updates bringing new bugs lots of bugs mostly small though game crashes performance issues sum up: I would most defiantly recommend this game to any third person shooter is if fan with a love of fast passed free running shooter game however this game is not for a low quality gaming rig it is a massive game and struggles to run on most pc that I've seen this has a good upgrade system with easy and customisable controls with a good and simple crafting system it has a tutorial for pretty much any mechanic in the game and you will often find a people to help with any mission over all it is a well structured game and worth trying out Ninjas play free
TheQuickShooter;-;Better than Destiny the game on PS4
PixGames;-;I have 3 words to say : REALLY EPIC GAME!
evilleMonkeigh;-;Gameplay is very casual, co-op fun - in a similar vein to Left 4 Dead. Only with cyborg space magic ninjas vs robots, infested alien zombies and power armoured humans. Wall run, backflip, and slide your way parkour-style through levels. Gameplay is very much style over substance - you repeatedly sprint, hack and shoot your way through somewhat repetitive levels - hopefully with friends. Where it shines is the casual-friendly co-op, and surprisingly deep customisation. The "tenno" ninja suits can be equipped with a vast array of perks and abilities, and upgrading and swapping these is a mini-game in itself. Surprisingly good for a free-to-play game.
bubbles;-;its an ok game could be better
Sollydus;-;There are some games that show that Free to Play still has something fun to offer. Warframe is one of those titles Co-op ninja beat em up or shoot em up. The downside is that the game kinda tries to push you to buy platinum (game money currency) by putting kinda of ridiculous real world Hours to build something, Besides that you can have all things in the game (Besides Cosmetic) without paying a cent.
Hackcid;-;Nice graphic and optimization for my crappy laptop 10/10.
KiinqKenan;-;Probably one of the best games I've ever played. 800 hrs on record.
Naruto Uzumaki;-;This game. Is awesome. It's free to play, it's got good graphics, I like the gameplay mechanics as well. This game is uber fun to play especially with some friends for some epic adventures and some funny moments too. I recommend this game to anybody that has ever wanted to become a space ninja :) 8/10 Would go on space ninja adventures again
XarcaneTN;-;Great game. My only Problem is that I cant Restart. If you play this make your character wisely unless you want to have tomake a new Warframe acount to restart. Plus You can only have 1 account per email. That means to restart you have to create a new email so you can use it to make an account. Other then that it a great game.You can be Sneaky or go in Guns Blazing. Probably best to chose the right build for Sneak or Guns Blazing.
Sabitsuki Chewy;-;Free to play, lots of content and developers are active with the community. Can become repetative at times, but this is a grinding game.
WolfZ;-;would grind all day 10/10 play hard grind hard
ScrapBanking;-;Great gamplay
Chocoffee;-;Always fall asleep in late-game grindings, still never regret spending time/effort in this game. The community is one of the best I've ever seen, so are the devs. Sci-Fi, ACT and TPS fans should give it a try.
Dazzzlleee;-;great game..but the grinding rule in this game sometimes makes the game become boring. this game is user friendly and newbie friendly..free to play is great and hope many others can join this space ninja thing!!
Scriptdrive;-;Amazing game, always evolving and makign new fun ways to enjoy this masterpeice!
AnonumusSoldier;-;I have searched for a good combat MMO game aside from the popular console Call of Duty/Halo ect. for a long time. And i have finaly found one. Stratagy, combat skills, construction, critical thinking, lore, all in one game. The devs are always coming up with ways to add to the game or expand the games lore universe/gameplay, so the game is always evolving. The user base is for the most part supportive and friendly, and unlike most games i have tried, the elitist jerk few cant set up roadblocks to the common player base and make thier gameplay miserable and unfruitful. A word of warning, becasue the game is always evolving it is natural that bugs come with that territory. Players affectionatly call it Bugframe or Crashframe becasue of it, but in my opinion the rewarding gameplay is worth it. A word on its Free 2 Play status as there is much critizism especailly after 15.0 Update. Although there are some limitations at trying to running it F2P, it can be done. Game currency can be earned thru the player trading system, game currency only items can be earned in the game although takes more time/in less quantity, and certain items can be traded for things you want but cant get. If you do decide to put some money in the game, a little goes a long way, and there is discount coupons all the time.
zItg;-;These so called "Warframes" look like a bunch of d!ldos, best horror game ever. 1337/69
BestiHest;-;Fun gameplay, nice graphics.
Killemajaro;-;this game broke my 2gig ddr5 video card 12/10 would break it again
Shaydwalkr;-;Warframe is all about the suit (or frame) you choose to wear, the weapons you choose to equip and hanging out with your friends or clanmates in one of the best MMO shooters to be available in years. The number of options you have with free-to-play are staggering compared to any other game I have played. The developers are always on top of hotfixes and when they aren't busy fixing things, they are truly working to expand and make the game even better. It is an awesome community and I highly recommend adding this game to your permanent library.
Kida;-;Space ninjas. In space. With swords. And cool looking helmets.
Leviathan3x;-;Fun to play with people you know. However everyone else has no idea what they are doing no madder what level they are ranked.
Patrickthespongebob;-;This game is good ! :) (y)
Adunreal;-;Grind , Grind , Grind for Good Weapons & Warframes (Primes). If u got da money , 2 ez 4 u my friend.
No Dad, not tonight |;-;Warframe is extremely fun, if you know how to spend your money well. Say youre making dough every day because you're ofc a pimp, and you decide that  this , I aint grinding to get stuff, imma buy it. Don't purchase platinum to buy weapons from the store or frames for the store. You are losing the experince for the journey towards that frame. Although once you have most of the 'good' weapons it does kinda get boring. Still extremely addicting.
The dank rider;-;Tried to be a ninja. Dream was crused by old man 10/10
nn;-;This game stoled my life, addicted 200%, 1000 hours in 3 months sush a great game 12/10, learn to play and be addicted, Free To play Ninja, recommended :D You have been playing for ever an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for ever an hour. Please don't forget to take a break. You have been playing for ever an hour. Please don't forget to take a break.
bigstevevai;-;Really awesome Game!!!! Play it, And enjoy it!!!!
PrincessAlma PW: :P;-;Alittle Bugy at times But over all fun and enjoyable
ShAzYNiGhT;-;really amazing game, havent had to spend any money yet lol but really good game
GON.Feeder;-;it really hard to play but really f2p (fun to play )game you should try
Axtem;-;Playing Warframe for 3 years. Here's how it went Start Don't know what to do Ask some friends Get dual pistols cause they look cool Get down Revived Down Revived Down Use all revive tokens Quit game for 6 months Get back on it out of boredom Realize it's much better Get into it Master it Get addicted Drag friends along They start liking it Get them addicted Have a huge warframe fest for 1 and a half years Quit game again for 3 months Get back on Play with friends again Rank up Get better items and warframes Quit once again Get on once in a while to check out what the new updates add Still a good game though. 8/10 Platinum
torikrus211;-;Great!
(DOTN)NoEntryTurtle;-;good game but very hard when u try to solo missions, especially when u have to get the collar for the kubrow i have one and its been sitting there for the past couple days because i cant complete the mission but if u have friends this game can be very fun
- Sick -;-;Awesome game! At the same time one of the games where you have to farm like endlessly! You can easily get atleast 500 hours of gameplay and even then you won't be able to have everything you want. After like 800+ hours of gameplay when you have everything unlocked it gets very boring, because you're forced to do the same stuff over and over. But still the developers constantly release new updates which unlocks new stuff into the game and gives you the chance to pour more hours of gameplay into Warframe!
Total Fuster Cluck;-;In a game where futuristic space-suited rebels called Warframes must protect the universe from the evil, you play as one of the many various Frames to choose from. The game starts out a bit confusing, and can be quite challenging, but if you hang in there and really pay attention to tutorials, this becomes what I consider to be one of the BEST free to play games ever made. With a very vast choice in how you'd like to play, as well as how you look, weapons you use, and what type of mission you like to do, Warframe is one hell of a great game. If you havent given this fantastic game a try, make sure that is on your soon todo list. And if you have only played a few hours and are having a rough time, go to youtube, there are LITTERALLY thousands of helpful tutorials, the same can be said for the website's forums.
Skipper12336;-;Ignore what people say about microtransactions. I have been playing for over 300 hours and have some of the best gear in the game. I have only spent about $10 and that was on cosmetics. Anyone should get this game, they wont regret it. :)
Club Penguin Ft. Hitler DLC;-;Warning: this game is slow at first, but it rewards the player with grinding. as long as you find a good clan, all will be well....
Princess Alana Banana Hammock;-;'Tis good, Tenno/10
torikrus211;-;Great!
No Dad, not tonight |;-;Warframe is extremely fun, if you know how to spend your money well. Say youre making dough every day because you're ofc a pimp, and you decide that  this , I aint grinding to get stuff, imma buy it. Don't purchase platinum to buy weapons from the store or frames for the store. You are losing the experince for the journey towards that frame. Although once you have most of the 'good' weapons it does kinda get boring. Still extremely addicting.
TheSchorch;-;Warframe Is a game where you beat them up and you gain levels quite like destiny actually even thought warframe has some graphics that are way to buggy with the lighting it is an amazing game four player and has raids not including it's always running nonstop bringing us new content every day hotfixes and even more stuff that people just love warframe has it's own motivations for being such a great game itself lets talk about the basics number 1 : it's a free to play game and number 2 : you can meet new people anytime anywhere warframe is amazing and I dont know what to say about it Warframe is a game where everything happens scifi from nightmare to infested goop warframe has it all oh and did i mention it's a free to play warframe is amazing and I recomend trying this game out at least 5 times if you dont like it just say it.
Nuka.imothe;-;A science-fiction, third-person shooter that blows away most other co-operative titles. This game has everything you need to enjoy hours upon hours of co-op fun with friends. That is, if you are looking for a game that offers co-op shooting, with a crafting system, and player build customization. The draw backs of this game are few but they include: some really long grinds, repetitive game-play, and a premium pay to grind-less scheme. That being said the game is truly fun and is a free-to-play so premium grind-less is something that should be obvious. The one note I will mention, which has been the main driving factor for me and my friends slowing off this game is the constant repetitive game-play that has diminishing returns. That coupled by the fact that items in-game that contribute to your overall level and progression (mastery), are often having the ability to attain them removed from the game. Which in my mind is contributing to permanent player inequality. The mere fact that I cannot receive an item that would contribute to my overall level in the community because: I either wasn't playing when it was introduced, or missed the opportunity to receive it; greatly hinders my will to proceed further based on the merit of completion. Some may not have a problem with this but others certainly do. Certain practices I don't quite agree with also include the prime access packs. Mainly in the area of pricing. So to put it bluntly this is an overly adequate game for your time, if you so wish to play it. There are things that after playing for a while you may realize you don't like, but to each his own. Live long and kill the masses.
Dancing Shark #1;-;After picking it back up again after a few months of it getting repetetive, Warframe has evolved quite a bit. Gameplay wise, it is fantastic, very smooth and many manuevers to pull off, however, it can still become repetitive after a while. The depth of the game is better, a lot of weapons and frames to choose from all providing unique experiences and evolving combat again and again. However, a drawback is it appearing 'pay to not grind as much' which puts you in the 'lategame' much faster, however, there is a huge lack of lategame content in the first place. You don't have to pay to be able to max out or anything, but paying sure makes life easier, such as more warframe slots, weapon slots, and sentinels. The game becomes a grind quickly without paying, and having to wait such a long time for built weapons and warframes becomes a drag. The lack of level versatility gets annoying, but is overseeable. Warframe is a game that may hold your attention for a few days or even weeks, but you won't be able to play it for a long period of time as the game doesn't warrant it without any lategame content or gamemode that hooks you in. Conversely, it it extremely fun to play, especially with friends. It is worth it for the simple experience of being a ninja in space alone. 7/10
Shark;-;Such a great game. Gives the feel of Destiny, but actually way better because there is a dedicated support team. Gets repetitive at times, but there is a lot to work towards in the game!
Kai;-;very fun co-op game with quite a bit of utility, also a great game to play and do stuff with your freinds
Hoofnoodle;-;Feels repetitive...but it has such good design and gameplay. I want to play it, but I get bored. Hopefully Warframe will update a bit more to change my mind. For now, I'd say it's pretty good. Pretty cool gameplay.
Arcane Azmadi;-;UPDATED: Well, it's been a long time since I last reviewed Warframe and it's AMAZING how much better the game has become since then! It's smoother and much more optimised (although me getting an upgraded PC helped) and there is SO much more content than before. It's still basically the same old grindfest (and it's still almost impossible to find pick-up groups for normal mission progression) but with so many new mission types, areas, enemies, factions, the Archwing (which reminds me SO much of Zone of the Enders) there's actually a hell of a lot to do. The game still goes out of its way to screw you if you insist on trying to play for free, but you can get around if if you're bloody-minded enough. A tentative recommendation.
()OG Storm;-;10/10 This game is amazing,graphics good,lots of weapons. Its not a P2W you just need to farm quite a bit
Damperino;-;One Sentence: Terribly addicting.
Abyssshy;-;Ive had so much fun playing this game and will continue to do so it may be repetative to alot of people but i think it is managable and you can get anything in the game for free if you are willing to put the effort in wich is great and i wish more games would impliment this.
Littlest Hitler;-;Man,this is a good game with a good graphic !!!
genstriker;-;Embrace the dark side,waste your life on this game.
Figgleknob;-;Warframe........ How do i put this? Warframe is an excellent game and that is putting it lightly. Warframe is basically about futuristic space sci fi that involves humanity becoming mutated and corrupted, the main characters you play as are called warframes, which are like awesome space ninjas. They are basically either super evolved technology that is worn to keep the corrupted humans or (tenno) stable or they are the result of mutations to the tenno. Either way they each have their own unique looks and powers, you can customise your ones to your own liking and desire. You play the game by doing missions, these involve you flying down to a planet in your spaceship, then depending on what mission type you are doing you must complete the main objective. An example of this includes exterminate missions, these missions are your typical and easier missions in my opinion. Basically the main objective is to go all space ninja on all the enemies till none of them are left standing, seems simple enough. The more harder missions can include defense or spy missions, i won't go too much into what they are as to not spoil the entire game for you new players. I've been playing this game for a good few years and it just seems to get better and better as the time goes on, the developers add new content at a decent pace and keep us the consumer interested. It really keeps me enjoying myself to fullest at every corner. However..... there is only 1 problem with this game in my opinion, this problem seems to occur in most free to play games. I'm refering to of course pay to play issue, now unlike world of warcraft and other free to play games, warframe does allow you to get the complete experience of the game for free, they allow this by letting players doing the missions and farming parts of weapons, cosmetics, even other warframes you can build and obtain for no real money what so ever YAY!!!!! and for those lazy players who can't be stuffed to put the time into farming for the things they want, we are able to buy whatever we want for real money. A tactical advantage to the devs but can be worth it for us sometimes. However... there is a catch to those of us who want to get the stuff for free and this is the problem i was refering to, that is how the game works with this. Sure put hours on end to farm the parts and make your new weapons and warframes, etc but... each warframe, weapon etc needs a slot to be placed in within your inventory and guess what... that costs real money to get more HAHAHAHAHA what a messed up catch, sure it's not as expensive as buying the thing you want in the first place but it's still really cheeky on the devs part. Letting people get whatever they want for free only to spend cash for space in their iventory to aquire this so called (free {whatever you are building} ) Oh and when you build the stuff for free it does take real hours to be made, just another set back for some people, me? im not as fussed about that as others. But besides that little cheeky issue with having to buy slots to put the stuff you want for free in I have absolutley nothing bad to say about warframe. It's a wonderful game and like i previously mentioned, it keeps getting better to some degree :D. And as such i look forward to the future sessions of playing warframe that are yet to come. Would i recommend this game? hell yeah! no questions asked i think the majority of gamers out there would love this. if you are a player that doesn't like spending real money on games you already bought then... i don't think you'd like this too much but other then that :D absolutley i recommend this !
bloodboy777;-;warframe is what you expected Halo to be. And what destiny should have been.
Fallen Ranger;-;So the reason i've dicided to do this reveiw now is because of the recent update, which has drastically changed my opinion of Warframe, but i'll come back to this later. So first off, what is warframe? Basically it's a free to play 3rd person co-op action shooter (with ninjas) with a bonus of using swords, and lots and lots of other weapons :D. But the game can also be labbled as a mmo due to its high focus on loot and grinding. But the main focus is the actual warframes themselves, combat suits with a wide variation of abilitys, ranging from invisibility, fireballs, healing and even teleportation. These suits also allows for a ton of parkour moves and melee strikes for when your out of bullets. First off things that Warframe dose well or differently than other games. Overall, Warframes combat a basically rock solid. Although new players or potential players might find it very basic (and it is very basic indeed) and boring, even repeditive. the secret to its combat however, is its versitility, especially with the new update 13 and melee 2.0, which revamps melee combat to make it more viable. It requires you to creativly use all your abilitys, weapons and manouvers. Warframe also brings this kind of variation to almost everything else, almost. Tons of enemy variations and classes and random tile sets will ensure that even vateran players keep on their toes, although ussually bullets will do the job :/. The biggest plus this game has however, is the constant update of content and special events. massive content patchs ussually come around ever other month or so, and there will be a ton of special events for those who keeps ther eyes and ears open, and they offer a ton of awsome loot. As for cons, there is only one I would mention above all else... micrtransaction (noooooooo!) For a game that lables itself as F2P, it dosent lie, almost all content in avalible to find in game, excluding even items, and most cosmetics and boosters (xp and in game currency). However, for those who are of the impatient types, you'll likely drop $10 or more. This con is easily passible, but there is a ton of upgrade materials that can be purchased with cash, and they don't come cheap, especially the pre built weapons and warframes. On the topic of building, you can expect A LOT of crafting counters, some lasting as little as 1 minute to 3 days! Just remember to be pacient and take your time :). Aslo warframe offers little in mechanic explations other than a very basic combat tutrorial, you'll have to discover everything else on your own. There is also a slight lack in mission variety, but there are new game modes being added reasonably quickly. As my final verdict, i strongly recomend anyone give this game a try, at least for a few hours, and who knows, you might like it enough to put down $60 like me (yes, i know i said it's a con, but i was worth it), and so I bestow upon Warframe, a 7.8 out of ten. It's a solid 3rd person action F2P shooter, with solid combat and great co-op and a ton of new content being added all the time, but watch out for those microtransactions, they can stack up pretty quickly :).
Swagulator;-;That moment when you get ash p sys but your host is so bad that everyone dcs except the host......... Difficulty level: Way harder than Dark Souls....
TITAN Sovreign;-;Easily Enjoyable. Easily Repeated. Not unlike playing your average Call of Duty game - very repetitive, yet still very stimulating. Except, this game is played in the 3rd person, above a space ninja with special abilities. Very scientifically fictional, but with storyline-like objectives, thus making it about 5-10x more interesting than any of the Call of Duty games combined. I recommend this piece of digital art to those who are easily stimulated by simple, combustible ranged weapon combatant violence. GUNFIGHTS + PARKOUR = SHOOTER THAT IS BETTER THAN EVER BEFORE.
Master Roshi;-;awesome game and its free to play
FrAlgan;-;Awesome game, countless hours of joyful killing. Very - very - wide range of weapons and abilities, as well as optional parkour for those who like it (who doesn't?). Awesome devs, regular new content as well as special events. Not only is it not pay2win, but the customization items can be obtained for free as the premium money used in the shop is the only currency tradable between players (so you'll make some of it simply by selling items you loot in-game).
Griffsbrown;-;It's a third person shooter featuring Ninjas in space. Do I really need to say any more? Endless weapon choices and tons of different warframes (Your primary "kit" of abilities is your "warframe" in this game) so the game never gets boring. I highly recommend it.
Zelderman;-;I would recommend this game to people who are willing to spend a lot of money on things like customization and upgrades, unless you can enjoy the standalone fun of the free game.
Slither;-;takes smoe getting used to but fun to pl;ay esp. with others
TheDemoBOT!;-;The game looks wonderful and fun gameplay, but the repetition of scenarios bores anyone over time, but anyway take a look, you won't regret it.
faze;-;This is some next level matrix .
Garwaire;-;It's a game about Space Ninjas. SPACE NINJAS. Frickin'. SPACE. NINJAS. On a more serious note, to me it seems like a perfect blend of gameplay from "Gunz: The Duel" (the original, not the train-wreck of a sequel) and the Sci-Fi epicness of Mass Effect. It also clearly hides the grindfest ... to a degree.
Schwolf;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING !!!
DuckofInsanity;-;There are a lot of free to play games out there that either feel unpolished or pay to win. If you like shooters or you like RPG's this is a great game to try out. It's constantly updated with new content so there's always something to do, you can create or join a clan and build or help a clan build your own Dojo, which is awesome. There's a currency you can buy with real money but it can also be earned in game by trading with other players, giving them some extra parts you don't need. When you craft things you can rush it with platinum which almost turned me away at first because I thought it would be as annoying as those mobile apps with rush but I got used to it short after and started to barely even notice since I passed the time doing fun missions. To get a free Affinity (XP) Booster and create a Warframe account you can get reffered by me: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=51db64511a4d80e32e000002
Script Puppy;-;Alright, I have lots to say about this game. It is SUPER enjoyable and easy with at least 1 friend. Amazing Parkour and movement features. Now. I will say this. Takes a VERY long time to collect materials for an item. And even longer to actually make the item. But its a very fun journey getting the materials. The Campain is very fun and the PvP is alright. Now the reason i say that the PvP is "Alright" is because this game IS "Pay-to-Win" Its very easy to become very successful by spending around 50+ dollars into this game. The game does have some really good graphics and I do suggest this game who is into face-pace third person shooters. 8/10
{MC}Drambilia;-;I like this game after 9001 void IV intercepts i got mag prime systems. game is good its life 15/10
caligan;-;This is not my type of game at all. I normally play Skyrim, Rogue Legacy, Miasmata-- not shooters, and definitely not MMO shooters. Doesn't matter. I've clocked upwards of 300 hours in it, because it is just that much fun. The game is not about grinding. It's not about the things you can buy in the shop for cash. Sure, you can drop a ton of money to instantly have all the things that otherwise you have to acquire part-by-part in missions, but what fun is that? Virtually every item in the shop drops in missions. The ones that don't often come up as special alerts. There's no need to spend a single dime - within a week or two you can potentially have an extremely buffed-out character that can take on anything the universe throws at it. Space ninjas! So again, it's not about grinding: It's about having a fantastic time running along walls, vaulting over enemies, and mowing them down in whirlwinds of deadly blades, bullets, magnetic crossbow bolts, explosions, and a whole host of unique powers. You can play stealth, brute force, tricks and traps. There are different warframes for pretty much any playstyle. You can run solo - there are missions that are very hard to complete that way, but I did a lot of soloing at first and had a great time. But you can also take advantage of an excellent mission-pairing system to drop into anything you want to play with whoever else happens to be playing it. Get a bad team? Yeah, you might wipe, but most missions are brief - you're probably out a few minutes' time. I've had some real horrors as runs go, but I've had vastly more good groups who'd learned the ropes and were actively excellent to work with. Get a good group going and the game helps you out - the dynamics of attack, defense, support, are highly organic and fluid. You learn what makes up a good team and how to back up the different types of companions you might have along the way. And if worst comes to worst, even on a bad team everyone gets the rewards; they're not split up or voted on, you just get what you pick up. Weaponry is elaborate and extensive, and different weapon types have significantly different impact. It really makes a difference whether you're running with a set of daggers, a long sword, fist weapons, or a staff. Sniper rifles, machine guns, and straight-up regular rifles all demand their own kind of tactical attention. Add that to an incredible array of 'mods,' a sort of in-game CCG you can use to buff and modify each weapon (and your warframe), and the possibilities are virtually endless - just fiddling with mods is its own little mini-game, one I've sunk far too much time into (and don't regret a bit). (Also: Don't want to pay for cash shop items with real money? No problem, there's a lively trade in mods-for-platinum - you never have to spend a real dime.) The controls and UI are quite elegant, and improving. Yes, you're playing a parkour-enthusiast space ninja. What's your point? When you've sunk some time into it, you start learning how to polish your own playstyle, and that's a huge part of the fun - the game actively rewards using what you can do with it. You can run on, run up, bounce off of just about any surface, and there are a variety of powers that enhance these abilities, not to mention innate differences in the warframes. Mastery of the controls is important, but not hard to get used to. Running a mission well , figuring out how to use the maps to your advantage, how best to tackle different enemy situations, are all part of the learning process. Which is why this isn't about grinding at all - if you're not having fun running missions for their own sake, rather than the rewards, you're missing the whole point. Are there bad points? Sure. Yes, there's sometimes lag; it's a natural downside of hosting on one of the participants' machines. I haven't had a lot of trouble with it, and it's just one mission - outside survival/defense, they generally last ten or fifteen minutes. It's not a big deal. Yes, there are bugs. Yes, sometimes they'll cost you a mission, your rewards, time rebooting the game. Sure, I've said some bad words when one hit me. But for the most part they're transient and as a programmer, I get it; they're under incredibly active development, putting out releases at an astonishing rate, and each new thing is a shiny new toy I get to play with. I'll take the shiny new toys over perfect programming any day of the week. Warframe is a really good game , in my books. I highly recommend giving it a try.
LtCorbis;-;I love this game so much! It's got almost everything you would want in an RPG FPS. Definitely one of my favorites for the PC.
Mentality;-;nine out of tenno
Smile;-;Awesome game! Who didn't tried game yet ,should really try it ,from update to update its just getting better and better ,be sure to try it.
Total Fuster Cluck;-;In a game where futuristic space-suited rebels called Warframes must protect the universe from the evil, you play as one of the many various Frames to choose from. The game starts out a bit confusing, and can be quite challenging, but if you hang in there and really pay attention to tutorials, this becomes what I consider to be one of the BEST free to play games ever made. With a very vast choice in how you'd like to play, as well as how you look, weapons you use, and what type of mission you like to do, Warframe is one hell of a great game. If you havent given this fantastic game a try, make sure that is on your soon todo list. And if you have only played a few hours and are having a rough time, go to youtube, there are LITTERALLY thousands of helpful tutorials, the same can be said for the website's forums.
Jon From Delocated;-;There's no reason not to try this one, it has enjoyable combat as well as an addictive upgrade system. It's a game where you get to play a frickin space ninja and it follows through perfectly. Try it out! 300+ hours later and I still haven't spent a dime on platinum (in-game currency), although I am planning on buying some merely to support the developers. You know it's F2P done right when you can play over 300 hours and not need to spend a single cent. Admittedly, it can get repetitive but as long as you don't burn yourself out by playing nonstop, this is a must-have for any steam library.
Mr. Toxicroak;-;A sci-fi fast past shooter and slasher game with ninjas but the only thing thats kind of a downside for this game is almost every thing requires real money to get the best armor and weapons for your character.
50 Shades Of Trey;-;I played it for a few hours and all I can say is. Don't stop http://imgur.com/zyqW7Sb
M3;-;Gameplay is Fun, if a little repetitive at times, but hey, they actually post updates that add a ton of new content. The way they've done their free to play model isnt  that requires a buttload of money to have fun. The graphics are nice. A fair bit of variety. You're a bloody ninja space alien killing other aliens in space. What isnt there to like?
Leevy;-;Come on and slam, if you wanna jam. Space Jam ninjas!!!
Fogo;-;Fast Farm Farm Fast Farm fastly more farm need more farm still farming 2/221
Flubbenger;-;Has 219$ in DLC and still isn't pay to win
[Boc]Teaman22;-;Getting updated Frequently apart from Avg removing it because it doesnt know what it is great game!
LtCorbis;-;I love this game so much! It's got almost everything you would want in an RPG FPS. Definitely one of my favorites for the PC.
Garwaire;-;It's a game about Space Ninjas. SPACE NINJAS. Frickin'. SPACE. NINJAS. On a more serious note, to me it seems like a perfect blend of gameplay from "Gunz: The Duel" (the original, not the train-wreck of a sequel) and the Sci-Fi epicness of Mass Effect. It also clearly hides the grindfest ... to a degree.
Script Puppy;-;Alright, I have lots to say about this game. It is SUPER enjoyable and easy with at least 1 friend. Amazing Parkour and movement features. Now. I will say this. Takes a VERY long time to collect materials for an item. And even longer to actually make the item. But its a very fun journey getting the materials. The Campain is very fun and the PvP is alright. Now the reason i say that the PvP is "Alright" is because this game IS "Pay-to-Win" Its very easy to become very successful by spending around 50+ dollars into this game. The game does have some really good graphics and I do suggest this game who is into face-pace third person shooters. 8/10
{MC}Drambilia;-;I like this game after 9001 void IV intercepts i got mag prime systems. game is good its life 15/10
caligan;-;This is not my type of game at all. I normally play Skyrim, Rogue Legacy, Miasmata-- not shooters, and definitely not MMO shooters. Doesn't matter. I've clocked upwards of 300 hours in it, because it is just that much fun. The game is not about grinding. It's not about the things you can buy in the shop for cash. Sure, you can drop a ton of money to instantly have all the things that otherwise you have to acquire part-by-part in missions, but what fun is that? Virtually every item in the shop drops in missions. The ones that don't often come up as special alerts. There's no need to spend a single dime - within a week or two you can potentially have an extremely buffed-out character that can take on anything the universe throws at it. Space ninjas! So again, it's not about grinding: It's about having a fantastic time running along walls, vaulting over enemies, and mowing them down in whirlwinds of deadly blades, bullets, magnetic crossbow bolts, explosions, and a whole host of unique powers. You can play stealth, brute force, tricks and traps. There are different warframes for pretty much any playstyle. You can run solo - there are missions that are very hard to complete that way, but I did a lot of soloing at first and had a great time. But you can also take advantage of an excellent mission-pairing system to drop into anything you want to play with whoever else happens to be playing it. Get a bad team? Yeah, you might wipe, but most missions are brief - you're probably out a few minutes' time. I've had some real horrors as runs go, but I've had vastly more good groups who'd learned the ropes and were actively excellent to work with. Get a good group going and the game helps you out - the dynamics of attack, defense, support, are highly organic and fluid. You learn what makes up a good team and how to back up the different types of companions you might have along the way. And if worst comes to worst, even on a bad team everyone gets the rewards; they're not split up or voted on, you just get what you pick up. Weaponry is elaborate and extensive, and different weapon types have significantly different impact. It really makes a difference whether you're running with a set of daggers, a long sword, fist weapons, or a staff. Sniper rifles, machine guns, and straight-up regular rifles all demand their own kind of tactical attention. Add that to an incredible array of 'mods,' a sort of in-game CCG you can use to buff and modify each weapon (and your warframe), and the possibilities are virtually endless - just fiddling with mods is its own little mini-game, one I've sunk far too much time into (and don't regret a bit). (Also: Don't want to pay for cash shop items with real money? No problem, there's a lively trade in mods-for-platinum - you never have to spend a real dime.) The controls and UI are quite elegant, and improving. Yes, you're playing a parkour-enthusiast space ninja. What's your point? When you've sunk some time into it, you start learning how to polish your own playstyle, and that's a huge part of the fun - the game actively rewards using what you can do with it. You can run on, run up, bounce off of just about any surface, and there are a variety of powers that enhance these abilities, not to mention innate differences in the warframes. Mastery of the controls is important, but not hard to get used to. Running a mission well , figuring out how to use the maps to your advantage, how best to tackle different enemy situations, are all part of the learning process. Which is why this isn't about grinding at all - if you're not having fun running missions for their own sake, rather than the rewards, you're missing the whole point. Are there bad points? Sure. Yes, there's sometimes lag; it's a natural downside of hosting on one of the participants' machines. I haven't had a lot of trouble with it, and it's just one mission - outside survival/defense, they generally last ten or fifteen minutes. It's not a big deal. Yes, there are bugs. Yes, sometimes they'll cost you a mission, your rewards, time rebooting the game. Sure, I've said some bad words when one hit me. But for the most part they're transient and as a programmer, I get it; they're under incredibly active development, putting out releases at an astonishing rate, and each new thing is a shiny new toy I get to play with. I'll take the shiny new toys over perfect programming any day of the week. Warframe is a really good game , in my books. I highly recommend giving it a try.
DuckofInsanity;-;There are a lot of free to play games out there that either feel unpolished or pay to win. If you like shooters or you like RPG's this is a great game to try out. It's constantly updated with new content so there's always something to do, you can create or join a clan and build or help a clan build your own Dojo, which is awesome. There's a currency you can buy with real money but it can also be earned in game by trading with other players, giving them some extra parts you don't need. When you craft things you can rush it with platinum which almost turned me away at first because I thought it would be as annoying as those mobile apps with rush but I got used to it short after and started to barely even notice since I passed the time doing fun missions. To get a free Affinity (XP) Booster and create a Warframe account you can get reffered by me: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=51db64511a4d80e32e000002
LeDude(Max);-;freeking ninjas in space,what more do you want?
Skipper12336;-;Ignore what people say about microtransactions. I have been playing for over 300 hours and have some of the best gear in the game. I have only spent about $10 and that was on cosmetics. Anyone should get this game, they wont regret it. :)
Hitler;-;a very good game to get a laugh with friends or to be MGL 420 360 NOSCOPE SNYPER???!!!
American Ra;-;walao it says need to update something or something anyway it says got f***ing 2 F****ing!!! missing ERROR YOU BETTER FIX IT OR I WILL FIND YOU
American Ra;-;walao it says need to update something or something anyway it says got f***ing 2 F****ing!!! missing ERROR YOU BETTER FIX IT OR I WILL FIND YOU
Un Named;-;Warframe is my Blood *_*
Zee Jay;-;In this game you get to know how it's like to be the last one in a race.
[Slator] Saints4fs;-;Best game ive ever played!!! Just started a few months and got 5 warframes now Nyx,Frost,Mesa,Mag and Valkyr. and my first prime was Orthos P which i really loved :3
[Boc]Teaman22;-;Getting updated Frequently apart from Avg removing it because it doesnt know what it is great game!
Flubbenger;-;Has 219$ in DLC and still isn't pay to win
akaminus969;-;Amazing game now that it's been updated. Started playing again after a 2 year break.
Sgt.Gunnery;-;This is a great, fast-paced game! totally would recomend it for any hack and slash gamers!
stelios.sbyrakis;-;amazing game with fluid controls and amazing gameplay!10/10!
MisterMeow11;-;if you can get past the foundry wait times its amazing and incredbly fun playing with friends.
Mike;-;The Game is really good and fu i mostly play it with my friends and stuff like that i strongly recommend the game! -Mikey<3
MikoMiko;-;it's a fast pace game and is good for hybrid gamers that like CS:GO and SMITE....
pooploser420;-;Like minecraft without blocks
omega_black1990;-;Execellent game for a Free 2 Play, since just about everything you can access without having to shell out any cash other than cosmetics. Gameplay is fun solo at times but group play is reccomended for full enjoyment. Obtaining items ingame can be done with crafting materials and blueprints which is easy to obtain, or just dropping some cash if you cant wait.
Sgt.Gunnery;-;This is a great, fast-paced game! totally would recomend it for any hack and slash gamers!
Mr Smiley;-;EVERONE NEEDS TO PLAY, its ing awsome.
Ardhi720;-;Really great game
CS:GO Elite Traders bot;-;Metacritic 68/100..... You wot m8?? 0_o
Dolton;-;Honestly a really fun game I enjoy every minute of it. Although it can get repetative I love the community and all the friends I"ve made which make it that much more worthwhile to play.
instnk;-;good game, just too many casuals
DarkToez;-;I don't want to call this a pay to win, because with any shooter, there is some level of skill involved. This however is as close to that as you can get. with that being said this game is all around fun for free players or paying players. I recommend this!
AVeryEnglishLetsPlay;-;You're a futuristic ninija super killer man. No more needs be said.
Vitaytay;-;Very fun, not completely pay to win, and have yet to see a hacker so that's good. I just wish for better level design because I get lost too often.
MentalPriest|982|;-;awsome play style
CS:GO Elite Traders bot;-;Metacritic 68/100..... You wot m8?? 0_o
AVeryEnglishLetsPlay;-;You're a futuristic ninija super killer man. No more needs be said.
MentalPriest|982|;-;awsome play style
kylie jennier;-;good graphics
Vitaytay;-;Very fun, not completely pay to win, and have yet to see a hacker so that's good. I just wish for better level design because I get lost too often.
Rumged;-;co-op/single player space ninja with guns
Vechter;-;This is an Updated version of my old Review. Introduction Warframe is a F2P Title devloped by Digital Extremes, the studio that brought us Dark Sector. This game is an direct sequel to Dark Sector, taking place in the same Universe set many hundred years into the future after the events of Dark Sector. You are a Tenno, a member of an ancient warrior race that have been awoken from their cryosleep only to find the Universe they have sworn to protect in chaos and disarray. It's now up to you and your fellow Tenno to restore balance to this System and discover more about your past for the cryosleep has stangely purged you of such. (For more information on the lore of the Tenno and the Warframe Universe please visit the wiki: http://warframe.wikia.com/wiki/Tenno) General Gameplay Review Now onto the actual review part, Warframe is a CO-OP Third Person Action RPG set in the distant future of the Dark Sector Universe and has you take up the role as one of the previously mentioned 'Tenno'. The gameplay of Warframe is similar to it's predecessor 'Dark Sector' while also introducing fast paced Parkour Elements into the game and taking many que's from 'Mass Effect 3' it's Multiplayer, giving the players access to Class Specific Powers or in this case Warframe Specific Powers. Warframes are the games 'Exo Suits' or 'Heroes' that give the players a selection of 4 Abilities per Warframe, each Warframe having a unique Art Style, Theme and Playing Style to them, allowing you to fill many different roles within your squad. While the game has satisfying CO-OP Gameplay, this game really is a Loot Based one at it's heart, you'll be picking up Mods to improve your weapons, Resources to build new Weapons, Warframes, etc in your Foundry and also leveling up said Weapons and Warframes during your gameplay. You'll be visitng many unquie Planets and Locations during your quests across our solar system, from the Icy Planet of Pluto, The Lush Rain Forests of Earth to the Floating Gas Cities of Saturn. At times the end game grind can be abit too much for some people but if you are a hardened veteran of games like, WoW, Diablo or Borderlands you'll find that this is not as extreme as said games but the fact that the grind compares favorably to these Non-F2P games is a saving grace. However, if you don't want to grind you can always hit up the Trade Chat and try to trade your hard earned mods, parts or blueprints for the things you might need or perhaps even earn yourself alittle 'Platinum' while doing so, which brings me to my last and biggest point i'd like to touch on. Business Model Review The Business Model, now Warframe has a pretty fair business model, while you can craft everything in the game in the foundry, you can also buy those items with the real money currency called 'Platinum', this currency can be obtained by purchasing it with real money or by trading for it with other players. With Platinum you buy things such as, Warframes/Weapons, Skins & Cosmetics, Extra Warframe/Weapon Slots, EXP/Money Boosters or rush the construction of items in your Foundry - Purchasing a Warframe or Weapon follows around the same pricing model as LoL has for it's Heroes or Skins so it is pretty fair as far as F2P goes. Verdict As of the time of this review i have 1300 Hours clocked into this game since its release on steam and probably about 200+ Hours in the non-steam Closed Beta and i have founded the game through closed beta with one of the Founders Packs (Master Founder). While i can't say that this game is perfect or flawless with the previously mentioned End Game grind that might get a bit tiresome for some people or the Business Model which might annoy you, i however will still say that this game is a great F2P Title and amongst one of the most fair ones at that. Overall, Warframe is a great F2P game with a loving devloper behind it who continuously reach out the community, put up amazing ingame events, host livetreams to share what is comming up and discuss recent/upcomming changes with the community all while also answering the hard questions that we ask them. So if this game sounds interesting, go and give it a look, afterall 'Ninjas play free. Also, Pink Shorts.
Rob's last officer trial...;-;My updated review to Warframe, the game has improved 110% since the earlier beta stages, there are now practically 0 errors and the steam overlay is completely co-operative and helpful. The guides available give a starter and veterans alike a sense of understanding the game, playing to your strengths and improving weaknesses. Warframe connections are much better established, although rarely you'll join an unoptimized session. But the negatives in regard to the positive are completely null. Pros -Overall great gaming experience, high fps, great use of computer mechanics -Great choice of playstyle -Amazing choice of weapons, how and what you want to play as -Expanded mission base as well as amazing replay value once mission stage is complete -Good, growing group of followers and players -Doesn't feel like it's in beta, improvements through regular updates improve the game tenfold. Would highly recommend this FREE TO PLAY, visually stunning game that deserves high scores in critical reviews :)
Dkary;-;waste your life by farming the EXACT SAME THING over and over again in hopes of actually getting it. 8/8 like farming simulator with guns
???;-;In this game people are either afraid of me or hitting my head for my precious bow 10/10 or 0/10, depends on the mood
PierrotZ;-;WELCOME TO "RUIN YOUR LIFE TRAIN"...!!!!
cya cowboy;-;It's alright.
Ceelo;-;I've had Warframe for a long time, but didn't really get into it till September 2014. There are so many things you have to learn and understand at the beginning which makes it a little hard. But once you understand everything, this game is worth your while. Good graphics, good gameplay, a whole ton of missions and planets to explore, I recommend Warframe anyday 8.4/10
SongBird89;-;Absolutely amazing! Very wide choice of weapons and warframes, each with its own individual abilities. Customization is too big to handle, that is why it is very hard to get bored of this game. With its up to notch gameplay and excellent game mechanics I still got tired of Warframe for a bit, and here is a kicker... I had few months of break from this game, I came back and there was so much new content that I felt like I'm playing a brand new game that I never touched before. New weapons, warframes, environments, new missions, enemies, everything new! The big part of Warframe is evolution and progress of its universe and gameplay, it keeps the game fresh and exciting, that is why "evolving sci-fi world" is a big thing about this game and it keeps on evolving! Recommended to anyone and everyone who enjoys TPS, action games, sci-fi and ofccourse parkour elements :D Mirrors Edge can feel ashamed by Warframe :D
ZyroHunter;-;All I can say from this game is....wait, no, I am left speechless, this game is the best game out there that I have seen in a long time, from the moment you wake up from your cryopod all the way to when you reach Outer Terminus, this game is amazing. Incredibly fast, and intense Third person shooter. One tihng this game has, and that is Teamwork, use your powers and skills of weaponry. I would highly recommend this game. ZyroHunter's Score: 10/10, Heck, make it 11/10
Xeadius;-;Addictive game so far.
GoldTurtle;-;Warframe feels like a game about grinding and leveling up. You find resources by completing missions that you can use to craft new weapons, equipment and character warframes to level up. Enemies drop mods infrequently that you use to constantly power up your arsenal. There's absoulutely sometehing to be said about Warframe's ability to continue to be interesting and fun despite the repeetition of some missions. No doubt owed to the comfortable and varied gunplay mechanics, the complicated damage system [img1.wikia.nocookie.net] , clever acrobatic techniques, and variety of end-game content. The gameplay is fast and intense, and the matchmaking is solid enough to allow seamless cooperative play with friends or strangers. The game is free to play so I'd recommend it if you want to see how a truely fair f2p business model works. Everything is obtainable without a credit card aside for cosmetics and shortcuts to equipment.
Philipp;-;its a very nice game but it s a little bit strong
Metamorphmas;-;Incredibly fun, although it is repetative, each time you play it feels like a different game.
Rezx;-;Ive only just started to play this game ---- Now Sorry for this to sound like a Paid IGN review but its how I feel about the game so far , very fast fluid Combat lots of Customization ,amazing Graphics and most importantly alot of fun its best to play with people/ friends! ((Cap. Obvious here)) on the down side the enemys are really Dull the game can get some what Repetitive with Escort quest , Defend this while wating for that, but dont let that cloud your mind WARFRAME is still an amazing game and if you have the chance defitenly check it out
Pvt. Clubby McWank Fist;-;great game but if you have epilepsy dont play this game
Braunschweiger;-;NINJAS IN SPAAAAAACCCE!!! Warframe works best as a 4 player co-op among friends. It is possible to enjoy solo with the right setups. It is more difficult to enjoy as a new player teaming up with randoms, as each mission tends to be a competitive kill rush. However, for the most part players seem understanding and helpful. There are annoying bugs, but developers update frequently with both fixes and new content (maps, items, and events). Cheating exists, but much of the game happens server side and due to the central co-op nature it seems to be rare and less frustrating. Automated banning occurs for more egregious cheating. Warframe has one of the better free to play models I have seen. New players are given some platinum currency at the start. Most if not all items are obtainable without spending, with the exception of inventory slots and cosmetics.
BlindingShadowx2;-;Good game, especially for a Free to Play, it does begin to get repetitive after a bit though.
Gurcus;-;it is a very good game and i am enjoying every minute of it :D
MikeLin;-;The best game . Great graphic,great gameplay, great people. Didn't you play it? Go for it!!!
Tawr;-;Cool!
Midashguy;-;Possibly one of the greatest games I have ever played. This is also the only game on steam which I have over 200 hours of game time. Warframe plays great and feels rewarding. This game is a legend and deserves the respect and support that it has. If you like being the ultamite space death machine, play this game.
Adobe Illustrator;-;Have you ever wanted to kill giant robots from mars with a stick you made from garbage you found on uranus? WEL NOW YOU CAN!!!!!! Space ninjas, thats all i need to say to get you to install (but its also free, so theres that too). Install or go back to your lame game that doesn't involve punching aliens in the face. This has got to be one of my favorite games!
[Speech 30] No;-;Very cool, futuristic enviorment. crippled by samey, repetive, gunplay and lots of grinding. 7/10 Ninja's Play Free
Plebeius Vox;-;I really enjoy this game. Graphicly, it's way above your average F2P. Also, paying real money for things doesn't mean much since you don't typically fight each other; this is a co-op based game. There is an option that you can duel with others but it has to be an accept action, no one will just jump out of nowhere an kill you mid-mission. There is a little bit of a learning curve getting used to the controls, and an even greater one for a controller, in my opinion. When bad guys drop stuff, everyone shares the loot. You only see the stuff on your screen but everyone gets the same thing. This game has kind of an MMO feel with some of the grinding involved but it's done in an entertaining way. As far as using your real money equivilant platinum you start with, I recommend buying an extra slot for a suit and slots for weapons. They are contantly updating this game which makes it continually enjoyable. The improvements that are done for updates can sometimes change the whole dynamics of how you play your character. Fortunately enough, I haven't seen an update yet that has frustrated me into not playing anymore but instead curious about how to utilize the new system.
KindOfExcellent;-;This game is very underrated, it deserves a higher meta score than it has, a lot of the negative reviews were back when the game was much older and offered less, they don't represent the game now. Excellent co-op, mostly bug-free, smooth controls, outstanding graphics, tons of weapons, upgrades and customization, get pretty much anything you can buy with the store credit in game also (except warframe and weapon slots I think). Oh and replayablity. I have been playing this game for a long time. They are always adding new modes that refresh the expereince. I can't recommend it enough. 8.5/10
Captain_Morning_Wood;-;can use ninja skills to troll 10/10 would play again
Darkwraith Tony;-;I cant stop playing dis !! help!
HdxCore;-;Before you decide to jump into Warframe, you must understand what the game is. It is a massive grind fest. Many people are turned off because of how repetitive it is. Most of the time you will be doing the same thing for hours at a time, leveling and farming for materials, it will get old for people who don't enjoy this type of play style. All of the items in the game (aside from some cosmetic things) are obtainable through means of farming and crafting. That is where 75% of your play time will be spent while 25% will be spent on leveling said items. That said, if you enjoy any grindfest, i recommend Warframe. Space. Ninjas. Guns. Warframe.
ManFlakes;-;I just got this game and im hooked. This is going on my top 5 list.
crowbarzero;-;Pretty fun all around. General frames and weapons are reasonable to farm with the exception of a small few. Game starts out abit slower since the mods are what will give your weapons and frame the edge. But once you get thru most of the planets and some beginning voids you should be pretty good. Only really grindy part in general are aquiring the prime weapons and frames. Game is fast paced and levels are randomly generated pre-built sections combined together that for the most part don't feel too much like you're doing the same stage over and over. Beginner tips: Roll excalibur. Generally the caster frames aren't good until you get the energy cost down on them so you can use them more often. Use your available plat to buy more warframe and weapon slots. Being able to bring a variety of toys to the party is what makes later game more interesting as each frame has a different play style to it. Also if you're interested shoot me a message and I'll shoot you a recruitment. Gives you a few days of bonus credit & xp gain which you'll need.
Xalite;-;This... Game... Is... Amazing... I don't need to tell you (the reader) to download this game. Just do it! Ok, Now to write a serious review kind of thingy. The gameplay is fluid and smooth, it feels to me (being predominantly a Xbox player) like a mixture of Halo and Titanfall, but in third-person and a lot more fast paced and energetic than both of those games. Either way, the variety between frames and weapons is great, but there are some exceptions of weapons that are just weaker versions of other weapon *cough* Akzani and Akstilettos, but other than those there isn't much in the way of simular weaponry. The gunplay is brilliant, all the guns (that i've tried anyway) feel great to use and have the "oomph" that really make them feel effective aswell as being effective. The game looks great from a graphical standpoint, the music is spectacular and the sound effects make the weapons sound "beefy" and feel great to use (aforementioned above). Since the title update 14 came out not long back, the game is more beginner friendly and there isn't a better time to start playing. Now the Bad points that need to be present in every review. The business model for the game is pretty bad: You as the player will require to buy slots for warframes and weapons to be able to build half of the things that you would want. Say that you had a set of weapons that you really like and you threw an Orokin catalyst, maybe a Forma or two on each of them and then you see another weapon that seems interesting to you or want to try it and see what the fuss is all about, but you have no slots and you can't claim the weapon until you sell one of you hard earned or you buy some slots to get more, there is always the option not to but if you don't then you will be limited to a small amount of warframes and weapons. It's the same situation with warframes and in my opinion it subtracts from the overall enjoyment of the game if you have this limitation of having two warframes and eight weapons. My next point is the waiting time for building weapons, frames and some materials like forma and fieldrons (fieldrons can also be obtained from invasions as with detonite injectors), but since it is a free-to-play game this sort of thing is inevitable simular to the buying of slots, weapons and frames. On the subject of buying weapons and frames and other accessories that can be bought with the paid for currency (platinum), most weapons and frames can be bought with platinum and this sort of thing can lead to a "pay to win" basis, but some of the best gear in the game (primes) can only be found in the higher tier missions in the Orokin void. But they can also be bought with "Prime Access" which involves the buyer spending a large amound of money for the latest primes that have been released and some other exclusive accessories that can only be obtained with the prime access. Yes I agree that this is either pay to win or breeching what is or isn't pay to win, but this is the sort of game where equipment isn't everything and skill can play a big factor in who would be the highest performing player in the mission. Some more good points and a general rap up of the review (you must be a champ to get this far) A good majority of the games weapons and warframes can be bought with platinum, but if you have mods and prime parts to sell, people in the trade chat will gladly buy those off of you for platinum or high tier mods and or prime parts. so arguably the game can be effectively played with spending any money on it at all. Having started my own clan in the game, the clan tech research is a fun thing which can be done on top of all the other things that are done in the game, also there is customizing the clan dojo itself which can take a very long time to achieve anything. In conclusion i'm 327 hours in to the game and I have enjoyed every minute of it. I have spent 30 ($50) on the game, that was enough for me to get all the weapons and frames that I wanted and some materials on top of that to help with the dojo and the construction of my Zephyr warframe. My philosophy is that if you got at least 1 hour of entertainment for for 1 you spent on the game then you have got you money's worth out of the game. Lastly I fully recommend this game to anyone out there who has the Pc to run the game (which I may add doesn't require a great pc to run). So... come join us Tenno. For further information visit: http://warframe.wikia.com/wiki/WARFRAME_Wiki or https://forums.warframe.com/
Brent;-;This is a very addictive game and quite literally half the time I am saying how much I love it because everyone can be good at this game as it is against AI rather than other players for me atleast making it more relaxing and less stressful at times. Only complaint could be the obvious repetition required to get through the game.
IronShinobi;-;best game ever i dont even need to review just download it already
RedPanda;-;grindy but pretty fun and good looking (isn't even that harware hungry either)
DrNoesis;-;If you enjoyed Mass Effect 3 multiplayer, then you need to play this. This is as close to F2P as you'll find with the current generation of games, where in game microtransactions buy you nothing but stuff that you could farm for yourself within the first dozen or so hours of play, except for vanity items and colour palettes, and the option to add additional weapon and warframe slots, if you want them. For everything else, it's just a shortcut saving a few days at most (with rushed build times on items) and really doesn't impact the game unless you're terminally impatient. Solo play is viable and fun, co-op is enjoyable and expands upon the experience, and clan play makes accessing content with friends pretty simple. The game is largely engineered for PvE, but the option for PvP on a scale that really affects the gameplay of every other player is available. The devs seem very fun and in touch with their players, and they seem to have a good feel for exactly how much to give a player at any time. Seriously, the game is free, as in, really properly, viably free, and enjoyable even if you keep playing for free. It's not the biggest download in the world, you really should give it a go.
Rendy;-;I realy like this game
kodyd194;-;If your a fan of sci-fi shooters or third person shooters you should swing on over and try warframe, with silky smooth visuals and fast paced parkour the game has lots of potential as a third person shooter that you can enjoy, but sadly its one major drawback is that it can be repetitive and the textures and enemies can feel overused and boring if you play a lot. as of 5/2/2014 I want to add that they have added a lot of things to the game since the review was first made, so go check it out! Edit: Warframe has had a bunch of really cool updates since this review was first published, I am pretty amazed at how far Warframe has come since I first got my hands on it in beta!
Harbo5;-;Best F2P I've played in a long time. Amazing graphics, enormous amount of content, hours and hours of gameplay without bordom. Even more fun with friends. Plus, now I can say I'm a ninja.
Maverick Blast the Second;-;At first I downloaded this game because KATANAS IN SPESS, and I thought I would just bust some money on it. So I go to the free2play store, to buy the katana (named Nikana in game). But, to my great sadness, the Nikana is XP locked. That's a nice free to play. Doesn't just allow you to buy all the good stuff. I ended up saving the majority money and got some Samurai Shoulder pads, and the Ash ninja frame. LAZOR SHURIKENS. Great free2play, great gameplay, great co-op, great balancing. I heart it.
Kain;-;Amazing game, and you can't beat the fact that it's free to play!
blaynedrt14;-;This is far too much fun. Best 3rd person shooted I've ever played and it still in beta.
fresh3086;-;this game puts me on maxium overfeel
eViLi$H_0MMaNdeR PuppY|;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!!!! X3 Is Wonderfull!!; Downloaded, Downloaded, DOWNLOADED!!!! XD
haloguy48;-;Absolutely an amazing free to play game. Have over 200 hours into it alone, and it's always evolving. While there can be a good amount of downtime between updates every once in a while, the amount of weapons, warframes(guys you play as), things to collect, dojo to build or clans to join, and friendly community, there's no reason not to play. I've only once put about twenty bucks into this game for some early warframe slots and weapon slots. Since then, I've made all I ever needed by selling items in-game. Great market, just gotta keep up with prices.
WorldFivestar;-;An awsome Free To Play game with lots of potential and still being updated
Nott Kahsher;-;-First you gather the seeds you want to plant. -Then plant your seeds and wait. -Then you make a ing sandwich out of the vegetables you got. -Put your sandwich in the fridge and don't forget to wait till it spoils. -Eat your ing sandwich. -Puke out of your happiness and pride. And you know what's the worst of it? I can't stop it. I must be a ing masochist.
cadenw34;-;insanely good game, keeps me coming back for more. I also love the idea crafting takes real time..... it is rare for something like that in a game and it really works well. Esp if you get all that gear stop playign for the night and tell it to craft... you wake up check it out and tadaaa!
OldWolf;-;It's a lot of fun
-pg- V3V0GAM3R;-;best Free to play out right now you can pay to win or bulid the thing's to get better gun's and warframes
MrCatInSpace;-;Warframe is hands down one of the best free games on steam. This game has amazing graphic's and is great with a controller. You can just spend hours and hours on it, the only downside is many items in game you have to buy with real money which isn't that bad since it is a free game. Over all I would recommend this game and if you have some extra cash lying around I would recommend you put it into Warframe.
4IM_Chronicles;-;metal armoured ninja's from the future with magical powers..........Sounds like fun. :)
Hatate Himekaidou;-;Warframe is so real, It got framed for War. #Logic
[Pale Horse] AFK Bot 3000;-;0/10, this isn't Gears of War.
Meltdown;-;I would recommend this game to anyone liking the idea of being like a techno version of Deadpool!
Darkwraith Tony;-;I cant stop playing dis !! help!
Braunschweiger;-;NINJAS IN SPAAAAAACCCE!!! Warframe works best as a 4 player co-op among friends. It is possible to enjoy solo with the right setups. It is more difficult to enjoy as a new player teaming up with randoms, as each mission tends to be a competitive kill rush. However, for the most part players seem understanding and helpful. There are annoying bugs, but developers update frequently with both fixes and new content (maps, items, and events). Cheating exists, but much of the game happens server side and due to the central co-op nature it seems to be rare and less frustrating. Automated banning occurs for more egregious cheating. Warframe has one of the better free to play models I have seen. New players are given some platinum currency at the start. Most if not all items are obtainable without spending, with the exception of inventory slots and cosmetics.
BlindingShadowx2;-;Good game, especially for a Free to Play, it does begin to get repetitive after a bit though.
Gurcus;-;it is a very good game and i am enjoying every minute of it :D
Vault Boy;-;I could have had friends, but I found this game. I could have gotten high, but I found this game. ANND KNOW I KNOW WHY! (Why man?) Cause I found this game, cause I found this game, cause I found this gaaame! I could of got laid, but I found this game. I could of moved out, but I found this game. I could of gotten a job, but I found this game. Now I know why! Cause I'm livin' with me mum, she's paying $200 every week!
Makoto;-;It's a fun grind with friends. I wouldn't recommend it if you'd want to mostly solo though.
433;-;A spectacular journey into the space with the combination of guns, bunch of guns, melee weapons, different perks & skills, various bosses and maps. You also can't deny the effort on graphic quality and the character concept. In a list of Free to Play games, this is one of the musts. 9/10.
Necrovayne11;-;one of the most emersive games i've ever played, being new to pc gaming, i highly recomend this game as a source of seemingly endless run and gun looting fun.
Mr.L;-;Nice game :)
Redemption77;-;The year is 2005. The gaming world is awaiting the dawn of a new era. The Xbox 360 and Playstation 3 have been announced. A well known developer, Digital Extremes, best known for its collaboration with Epic Game's on Unreal Tournament, has just taken the stage at E3 to show off it's new concept, Dark Sector. For months and months, it is the talk of the town. It was the first real " next gen " footage https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u3jw2-xKqjA shown before next gen was even a thing. Unfortunately, the project known as Dark Sector took a very drastic and unwanted turn. As Lead Creative Designer Steve Sinclair told me last year at PAX East, " There was this thing called Call of Something Duty? ( chuckeles ) and everyone wanted World War II games and so our Sci-fi Dark Sector idea got shelved which caused allot of pent up frustration" However, as time passed and WWII games became less popular and with the emergence of this thing called " Free To Play " Steve and company thought this would be a good time to really focus on their original idea, expanding on the original concept, Warframe was born! You are an Ninja, Tenno to be exact, fused with this ancient armor known as a Warframe. The Lotus, a being responsible for waking you from your cyro based slumber awakens you with the task of waking up fellow Tenno in a on ongoing war against the Grineer, a savage race whos soul purpose is to conquer and enslave anything in their way, including the Tenno. Warframe is a PVE game with some PVP elements which take place in what are called Conclaves. Again Steve talked about why they went in this direction. " We were looking around and there were just so many PVP hard core death match games that we decided we wanted to take Warframe in a different direction and make it co-op" You team up with other fellow Tenno to take down waves of Grineer, Corpus and the havok causing infestation among the constellation. There are tons of planets to fight in and objectives to do. To be fair, at the writing of this review, There is allot of " wash,rinse,repeat" because the game is still in Beta. However, from the time I spent with Steve and Rebecca ( Community Manager ) at PAX to the most recent Update 11 patch. This game has gone through huge changes and improvements. The Story is slowly but surely being developed and the abilities that you can attach to your warframe called Mods have been tweaked and improved. The game plays much like Steve said " Borderlands meets Mass Effect". There is also a Foundry where you can use blueprints to make new Warframes, weapons and item components. You can even have you own clan with a Dojo that you can decorate, train in and build weapons, items, and blueprints at a discount price. In all, Warframe is an amazing game from some truly amazing developers. This is not just another game thrown out there to be a " Farmville" cash cow, but a well thought out Sci-fi shooter with a deep honor system and a great community of players from all over the world! Most of the conversation with Steve was fun and light hearted but when I I asked him this question, it became a little more serious ( if that is possible for Steve.hehe) I asked him where he saw Warframe 5 years from now? He said " Wow, 5 years??? I can't think past this month and this upcoming update! I can say this though, the whole team is very dedicated to this game. It is our baby. It is not just another game, It is very personal." I personally have clocked in well over 120 hours and can tell you that it is the F2P game of the year! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ihdXuqQxA9Q&feature=c4-overview&list=UUSonhuuU663e_GSGB3iazbw So, hopefully I have awakened you from your sleep, Tenno, and hope to see you on the battlefield! We need you! Score - 8/10
GrimNanners;-;It's a very fun game indeed. You just want to level up, kill and get better guns and characters. Some may say its pay to win which isnt true since you don't have to buy the items to get them. Like some other games in the genre, you can build your new weapons and more using credits and components recieved from missions, which keeps the game interesting even after you have gone through all the planets. Also, unlike some other dev teams, DE updates it frequently, fixing bugs and actually doing things to keep their players happy and satisfied.
Slavic Varg;-;Awesome CO-Op
argonlyzard;-;An excellent First Person Shotter. Its biggest problem are the early game grind and the late game grind, as long as you have the patient you can have all the weapons in the game without paying a cent.
Cheeky Talamofucker;-;A nice 3rd person co-op shooter. Has interesting mechanics and "classes". Every "class" and weapon can be acquired by simply playing. Definitely recommend giving it a try. Only thing you might want to spend platinum (purchasable currency) is catalysts. They are basically mandatory for higher level play and aren't normally obtainable. But as of now alerts and event which reward catalysts and catalyst blueprints are plentiful (I have 20+ blueprints from last greneer vs corpus event) and will priobably be enough for most people.
Aronwk;-;One of the best games ever, great community, awesome dev team.
Major Damage;-;10/10 would bang
nazee zamby patriarch;-;the best free to play game in the history of all free to play games and video games in general. yea, even better than tf2. SUCK ON THAT.
Ryan;-;Best graphics ever in a free-to-play game. Great weapons and gameplay. Strongly recommended.
Hammonsters;-;Such fun, very review, wow
Firefly;-;I hope you like grinding. You'll be grinding alot. Did I mention grinding? If you love grinding, try playing Tony Hawk games with infinite balance. But then again, grinding in this game is more prominent. Even paying requires you to grind (can't get powerful sniper until lv. 3 mastery). Everything costs either a million credits or a rather unsatisfactory amount of premium currency... Other than that and sometimes clunky controls making your Tenno flail around on walls, and the lack of 1st person option, it's a very nice F2P game.
Midashguy;-;Possibly one of the greatest games I have ever played. This is also the only game on steam which I have over 200 hours of game time. Warframe plays great and feels rewarding. This game is a legend and deserves the respect and support that it has. If you like being the ultamite space death machine, play this game.
Adobe Illustrator;-;Have you ever wanted to kill giant robots from mars with a stick you made from garbage you found on uranus? WEL NOW YOU CAN!!!!!! Space ninjas, thats all i need to say to get you to install (but its also free, so theres that too). Install or go back to your lame game that doesn't involve punching aliens in the face. This has got to be one of my favorite games!
Come get some grains friend.;-;This game is very hard to get good weapons but that pushes you to play with your friends. Also once you get a new warframe or weapon you have this great feeling of winning or knowing you did something PLAY THIS IF YOU AND YOUR FRIENDS ARE BORED also jaret ing RHINO stomped the  out of everyone
BMonies;-;Space, robots, aliens, ninjas, guns and swords... What more could you possibly ask for in a game?
|DotaKu;-;this game is good
BioMad;-;Addictive, stress-relieving, and only occasionally frustrating. Updates occur regularly, and the developers seem to listen to the community. New content and bug-fixes are released frequently, and ninjas play free. Some content can only be purchased with platinum, but platinum can now be obtained via trading with other players, so the possiblities are limitless! It is based on Dark Sector, and the warrame-weilders are the spiritual descendants of Hayden Tenno (the protagonist of Dark Sector). If the idea of being a futuristic semi-robotic space ninja led by a mysterious (Canadian) female of possible artificially intelligent origins is appealing to you, get ready, Tenno!
ComradeWinston;-;Ninjas, in space, with guns.
Goddamn Pansy;-;LIKE MY ANCESTORS BEFORE...I AM... A WARFRAMEEEE!
Rilious;-;I've played this game when it was in early beta. At that time, Warframe wasn't really something that's as awesome as it is now. Limited tilesets, limited enemies, repetitive missions and unpolished mechanics here and there. Even I myself have stopped once in a while, usually spanning 4-5 months, only to return because a friend was playing. And almost each time I return, new things are added in. And this currently is my 3rd replay of the game, and I have to say that although Warframe isn't a totally perfect game (there are flaws, bugs, glitches and connection issues running around wild), but the Digital Extremes team has evolved the game to a point where it has become a much more complicated game than what it was a year ago. Yet they are still polishing things, making new overhauls to certain aspects of the game and coming out with new stuffs to greet players old and new. What I love about Warframe is pretty much that almost everything that can be bought using money, can be obtained normally through farming as well. All that the free players loses are cosmetic items that does not affect gameplay (other than the owner's satisfaction and pride). One of the new updates since I've stopped also included into it a new Trading System which allows players to trade certain items for the platinums and other stuffs, which even boasts the game's value. For me, Warframe is simply the no.1 F2P game that I have ever played, and I find myself amazed over and over every time I go back to it. Kudos to Digital Extremes! This is a must play for any gamers interested in some sci-fi shooter action.
pascalcph;-;Shooting stuff, slicing stuff, being ninja n' stuff. If you like to do things like these, this is a game for you. Become an awesome individual who uses special abilities, customized weapons to achieve victory in a variety of game modes; gather resources and frame / weapon components to unlock further more gaming potential. WARNING: Grind fest. If you don't really like working *quite* hard towards what you want, there's always the pay option BUT everything except the cosmetics CAN be aquired through f2p gameplay. So take a look, you might put it down and look around instead, but you'll never know what will hook you in!
TheKingPixel * KUKU;-;The only thing in the known universe that works with dubstep.
[DM]:INFECTION:{XF};-;Pretty damn cool and free to play. What more could you want in a game?
Klaxon159;-;Best free to play game. It's a great game to play if you are looking to play cooperatifly without much PVP. It's Free to play aspect is awesome, with little to no exclusive pay only items. Not a pay to win game.
Chris Hansen;-;An absurdly good game, although I have barely played it as of now. Although teamwork is not nessicary it is probably the best part of this game and what makes it so fun.
TSirDiesAlot;-;This game is a very fun game and the game has all kinds of weapons!
KalKeegan;-;A lot of fun, especially if you can play with other people.
Madoriens;-;This is one of my favorite games! The graphics are spectacular, the game quality is superb, and the x factors of all the weapons and AI are awesome and very detailed and thorough. The game its self is outstanding and the campaign and multi player are awesome. Some of it is confusing but really easy to catch on and learn. Once you have a grasp of it, its one of the best games ever. I would suggest this to everyone and when you play it, the game has so much content that you wqant to spend money on the game to get it fast, but if you dont want to you can get everything for free, but it takes longer and its very difficult to find the items you need. 10/10, two thumbs up, 5 stars, whatever other rating system there is all the way up. I like it a lot and it is one of my favorite games, but that being said thats my opinion you should get it and find out for your self, trust me you'll wont regret it.
I | M | M | O | R | T | A | L;-;space ninjas boiiiiiii I have started Warframe the day after it was released. The game was in it's first update (Update 7) after Closed Beta. The game looked so awful. After a year and some magic, this game looks great! Sure, some mechanics are funky, there is a vast amount of bugs/exploits/glitches, but just give the game some hope. It's 50 grinding and 50 gameplay. After a few months or so, the game may get boring, but DE, (Digital Extremes) is working on, and adding more content every once and a while. It's quite frequently now-a-days. The community is a great one. You might encounter some pretty rude people, but overall the players are kind and are willing to help everyone. Just visit the official Warframe forums website and look around or so. https://forums.warframe.com/
Sklain;-;My favorite free to play! Controls are awesome, graphics are great, gameplay is fantastic. It's like a combination between Gears of War and Ninja Gaiden, games that form a big part of my gaming childhood (I know, playing GoW at 9 years old isn't the way to go.) There's many levels to play! And they all progressively require a higher level out of you, so you might have to replay many missions again. However, the game has a small twist, every area of a mission generates differently, it's still the same objective, but the area or asset itself, is never the same. One time you'll play this way, the next this other way. This gives it a big bonus, so you'll feel like you're playing a whole new mission, as opposed to playing the same repetetive gameplay. Which leads me to my next point, the gameplay might get repetitive at times, but I have lots of fun with this game. Hacking and slashing with a sword and gunning someone to pieces gives me a very good feeling (only in games, of course). I really have fun in this game, there's no doubt it's my favorite free to play. As you progress through a level, you might get some mods. These can be for your Warframe or your weapons. You can combine mods to make a bigger tier of that one, or leave it like that. Using mods is a great way to level up and enhance your Warframe's skills to your liking. Maybe you're more of a shotgun fan? There's a mod for that! A very very very well made F2P, if this ever becomes a paid game, there's no doubt it will be heard about around town. I highly recommend it, and it's free, so you don't lose anything :D
briman426;-;Pretty good robo ninja space marine slice n dice free to play fast paced almost nonstop katana weilding button mashing 47 Ronin in space looking game. 8/10, Like Star Wars in space.
FoxerBoxer;-;Ok, I really like the game. Its fun to play and it feels really epic! The powers and all are nicely balanced and the gameplay is epic. I dont really understand why this is free to play, because this game is to cool for school!
tv2dschof;-;I entered the world of Warframe with a lot of confusion. The menu was full of options and customizations for me to choose from and I honestly had some trouble figuing out where to start. Eventually I got a few missions under my belt and found the color customization screen and from that moment on I was hooked. This game is repetitive and grindy but if you let yourself get sucked in you will find yourself playing countless hours on it. The one gripe I had is that it seems to lack an overall objevive. However, it really hit home for me after my fourth mission that this really is all about the spectacle and enjoying it. You beat missions to acquire better weapons and power ups only to use them to repeat the process. But when you eventually find yourself flying sideways down a hallway scoring headshots with a weapon you have built and colored yourself while impaling other enemies on an equally personalize sword you have no choice but to stop for a second and say: "Yes. This is why I enjoy playing this game".
Solitare;-;one of the most kick  games iv ever played
MikeLin;-;The best game . Great graphic,great gameplay, great people. Didn't you play it? Go for it!!!
Tawr;-;Cool!
RocsRoxa;-;,        Mass effect 3                +            pvp.                !!!   !
Minmus;-;Ninjas. Shooting aliens and robots. With tech and . 11/10 Proper review, pardon my english : This game is fully free to play with slow and steady pace towards full geared. With many different ninjas that you could get for free by grinding bosses. Mostly content for premium users is costumes and , but wait, you could half of those by some random event in-game and premium users items is just for a quick Good Game. Therefore i conclude this game is fully free to play by an exception, you couldn't get all of those cool looking ninjas and weapons in your inventory because you could only add slots with microtransaction. The community is great i think, dev is supportive too, i got a quick responses for wanting to change my e-mail id. So i have been enjoyed for about 300+ hours of fun smacking the enemies with so many interesting abilities. The missions could be repetitive and boring but random generated map negates it a bit. Therefore anyone who enjoyed tps-games should give this a try, nothing to lose.
The Master of Unlocking;-;An f2p with space ninjas. 'nuff said
Moozy;-;A fun co-op shooter that doesnt feel like its solely out to gouge its players wallets. Solid third person shooter mechanics and some fun swashbuckling. Co-op works well with four invested players, and an interesting upgrade system. Play with your friends to enjoy the game to the max cuz there's no fun playing this game on your own. I would give it 9/10 because it's really enjoyable when you play with friends.
goldenningas;-;Very fun with friends. Still fun with random people.
Havoc;-;Space Ninjas chop  in half
Plebeius Vox;-;I really enjoy this game. Graphicly, it's way above your average F2P. Also, paying real money for things doesn't mean much since you don't typically fight each other; this is a co-op based game. There is an option that you can duel with others but it has to be an accept action, no one will just jump out of nowhere an kill you mid-mission. There is a little bit of a learning curve getting used to the controls, and an even greater one for a controller, in my opinion. When bad guys drop stuff, everyone shares the loot. You only see the stuff on your screen but everyone gets the same thing. This game has kind of an MMO feel with some of the grinding involved but it's done in an entertaining way. As far as using your real money equivilant platinum you start with, I recommend buying an extra slot for a suit and slots for weapons. They are contantly updating this game which makes it continually enjoyable. The improvements that are done for updates can sometimes change the whole dynamics of how you play your character. Fortunately enough, I haven't seen an update yet that has frustrated me into not playing anymore but instead curious about how to utilize the new system.
KindOfExcellent;-;This game is very underrated, it deserves a higher meta score than it has, a lot of the negative reviews were back when the game was much older and offered less, they don't represent the game now. Excellent co-op, mostly bug-free, smooth controls, outstanding graphics, tons of weapons, upgrades and customization, get pretty much anything you can buy with the store credit in game also (except warframe and weapon slots I think). Oh and replayablity. I have been playing this game for a long time. They are always adding new modes that refresh the expereince. I can't recommend it enough. 8.5/10
Helitak;-;Like Dead space but gay
The True Yellow Hornet;-;Oh my god. I started playing this game in the update 11. We are in the 14 now. So many things have changed, And for beter! The original warframe game (early version or vannila) IS NOTHING compared to what it is now. Hope the keep improving, I cannot not reccomend it. PS: Start playing this game NOW.
Nicki;-;A fantastic, unique game. Wish it was a little cheaper on the cash shop, but there really isn't anything wrong with this game.
[Ti] NekrosMancer;-;What do you play when you have played every game in your library and are bored with replaying them over and over again? Play Warframe! This game, at first, will look like just another great looking game with bad gameplay. But it isnt. The great thing about Warframe is that 1. It is still in early access so you get updates which adds new things to the game 2. It has great graphics and gameplay 3. You never get bored replaying a mission and 4. YOU GET TO PLAY AS F***ING HIGH TECH NINJAS!!! For a Free to Play game Warframe has the feel of a game that youd normally have to pay $60 for. I hope you like this review and find it helpful. Now if you exuse me, I have an assassination mission to complete. :)
White Death;-;WOW I've just only started this game and I must say it's the best Free To Play FPS I have ever played in my life!! 11/10
Zerathos;-;Warframe is, simply put, a great game. It's continuously updating with new content and that combined with its relaxed yet exciting gameplay will keep you playing for a long time. I personally love every aspect of Warframe, but there are two things that put me off, and I felt I should make people aware of it. For one, the game can get a bit repetitive, more specifically the grinding part. Although it does not do so to the point that it makes the game ridiculous and/or not fun, it still remains a bit of an issue. Second is the presence of the in-game trading, more specifically the ability to trade things for the ingame currency Platinum (which you usually buy with real life money). This function, and how extensively it is being used, might as well change the name of Warframe to WarTrade. However, other than those two things I find this an awesome game, and I definitely reccommend it to other people. It's graphics are definitely appealing, the customer service has been really good, and its gameplay is very addictive, at least to me. Not to mention Warframe is essentially completely free-to-play! You can unlock and play all content by just playing the game. Using money in this game only unlocks purely cosmetic stuff and allows you to get gear and weapons slightly faster. You get 50 free Platinum when creating an account to boot, which I heavily suggest you spend for Warframe/Weapon slots.
Aimed2kill;-;Awesome graphics, good team play and massive customization.
EchoDang;-;Great game if you love going melee and FPS. May seem like COD games, but much better.
chiefcraft666;-;nice game to play
Ellie;-;Cool game
obliterate;-;stole my life. brilliant game 11/10 would play again
Dr. Zer0;-;An awsome free to play action game that is constantly growing and adding new content.
Kai;-;I played this game in the early open beta and thought it was a lot of fun, and after a year+ of updates and hotfixes, it has turned into a wonderfully crafted world of Space Ninjas...Yes...SPACE NINJAS! The game is probably the best Free-to-Play games, and even one of my favorite shooters, on the internet. Play this game! It is epic!
Ruxxz;-;Great Game. Short maps for fast game play. Lots Of Fun
Meijin;-;Nice but repetitive, easy to play
Lance;-;This game will blow your mind. If you think it's just another 3rd person shooter then you are rong. It is so much more. you play as a ninja. only with guns (and swords) and just to put it out there! IT FU**ING AWESOME!! If you dont download it then what ever. I'm not here to make you download games. I just recomand it for you. If you want to download it then go ahead. =3 ~Laffen
Cocoa Butter Kisses;-;This game is breath taking, that's all I can say.
Lord_SwagPirate02;-;10/10 Ninjas play for free
Goonkers;-;Super upgrade version of Mass Effect, and with more customizable options. Nuff said! ANdddd did i mention free to play! WHATttttt?! Why wait? Its free to play anyways!
get quarter pounded;-;Warframe is one of the best co-op games that you could play with your buddies. You are a badass ninja that can parkour everywhere and you get to kill all these random enemies. (   )
Meri;-;I generally don't like shooters and oftentimes this type of game gives me motion sickness. However, I'm having a lot of fun with this game and it doesn't make me feel ill. Also, it's third person, rather than first person, so that helps. There are quite a few classes to choose from, though you do have to hunt down your parts to make them. But that's half the fun! Pretty much, anything in the cash shop, you could just as well hunt for it. Cash shop is more of a convenience and not really necessary except to unlock slots if you want more warframes.
BattleMech64;-;really fun game, though it is slightly p2w. players who dont pay can still get really far thoug as all items you can buy you can also obtain in game generally.
Xivnag;-;A fun way to spend time with friends.
RoastedCharizard;-;Warframe is a free to play, fast-paced, third person shooter that can be best described as space ninjas. Developed by Digital Extremes, Warframe follows the adventures of the Tenno during a war with the Grineer, a race of militarized humanoid clones. Tenno soldiers bear a Warframe  effectively, a futuristic and alien combat suit  into battle, as well as a primary weapon, a sidearm, and a melee weapon. The game is, essentially, a sequel to Dark Sector, taking place about a thousand years after its events. Its a game built on two very solid features: exciting gameplay and awesome gear. At its heart, Warframe is all about the action. Combat is intense, and blazingly fast. The Tenno can sprint, slide, and dodge out of hairy situations, as well as being able to run along walls and displaying quite a fair collection of parkour motions. Players can sneak around a map and melee an enemy from behind for elevated damage, but its nowhere near as fun or as easy as running into a crowded room, guns a blazing. Theres a much heavier focus on staying agile in a gunfight rather than being sneaky. Each warframe has its own set of unique abilities and stats, giving each one a diverse feel from the other. A wide array of weapon types keeps the combat fresh and gives the player a multitude of ways to play. Guns feel impactful, but melee weapons tend to feel a bit floaty. With an astounding amount of different enemy types and bosses, levels can produce a variety of challenges. Theres even a one-on-one PvP feature in which players can duke it out. These are called conclaves and are limited by a point scale to keep players of relatively equal skill fighting against each other. While it is nice to see a human player react with unpredictability, a lot of the AI in the game is very predictable in its actions. Theyre still difficult, but it takes away from any sort of surprise if youve already squared off against that enemy before. Also, it is highly recommended that you play this game with friends and a common goal in mind. It can get stale quickly without those two things. Despite that, theres still an immense amount of fun to be had in Warframes fast-paced shooter action. Warframe is visually stunning. And I dont mean just for a free to play game; this game is gorgeous for any type of game. Theres a great attention to detail. Lighting effects are cinematic. Environments are vibrant with color. However, youll see many of the same settings over and over again. While they are pretty to look at, seeing what seems to be the same map several missions in a row gets very tiring. The slight blur that is created from constant movement will distract from any minor visual flaws  flaws that youll have a hard time finding to begin with. This is actually one of the few games in which Ive fired my weapon solely for the purpose of hearing how it sounds. The guns sound incredibly real and impactful. And even though each gun has its own distinct sound, most of them manage to sound pretty good. It certainly outdoes the gun sounds that are apparent in more successful shooters like Call of Duty. Warframe is just full to the brim with varying types of gear. Warframes, essentially character types, are plentiful and number well into the double digits. Each player has three weapons: a primary, a sidearm, and a melee weapon. There are a multitude of primary weapons, such as rifles, shotguns, bows, and snipers. Sidearms include full auto and semi-auto pistols. Available melee weapons are swords, staves, axes, and more. These weapons can be bought with platinum  the equivalent of real world money  but are also easily obtainable through the in-game currency known as credits. Weapons must be built by first purchasing their blueprints and then having the items required to build it. Items are scattered as drops throughout the planets, and while theyre entirely useless on their own, they can be used in unison to create some really interesting weapons. However, items have build times. Weapons generally take twelve or twenty-four hours, while warframes take a lengthy seventy-two. This can be a bit bothersome to those without patience, but items can be rushed to completion by spending a certain amount of platinum. This gear can also be modded with a plethora of upgrades depending on how the player see fits, resulting in a huge amount of customization. A single weapon can be made to play several different ways depending on the mods the player has installed on it. This creates an experience that truly is different for every player and item. While most free to play games suffer in terms of story and narrative, Warframe actually does a very successful job at this. Well partially. Its narrative is weak and lacks integration into the gameplay. The average player will just plow through the missions without even realizing theres a plot going on. Most of the plot will be found in the Codex, a menu in which players can read up on the lore. It takes a while to uncover, and quite honestly Ive only scratched the surface, but its chock-full of science-fiction goodness. There are questions of morality and the Tennos purpose in the universe. There are references to Dark Sector, proving that the two games exist within the same universe. Its certainly very interesting and easily dominates in a market where story tends to be an afterthought. Another strong point, one where it stands above its competitors in the free to play market, is the incredibly fair balancing of real world and in-game currencies. Almost anything that can be obtained through the cash shop can be found as loot or created via a blueprint. Most of the items that cant be obtained without spending some cash are purely cosmetic, such as color palettes and weapon skins. However, in a game that is so gear-centric, its a shame to see so few free inventory slots given to the players. Even still, prices are pretty reasonable. Shelling out cash doesnt put players too much ahead of others, and the small gaps that do exist can easily be closed by player ability. Its nice to see a free to play game that doesnt put a huge chasm between its paying and non-paying players, and that certainly is a huge advantage for Warframe in its market. One of the biggest drawbacks of Warframe is its perpetual state of open beta. Things can change from patch to patch, whether they be minor updates or huge ones that drastically overhaul something like the UI. This results in a large amount of bugs. Theyre not common and prevalent in every mission, but youre bound to run into them. Fortunately, they tend to stray far from game-breaking and are usually just minor annoyances. Overall, Warframe is a great addition to any collection as it is able to balance fantastic gameplay, gorgeous visuals, impactful sounds, an interesting story, stellar optimization, and a fair currency system. And its free. Did I mention its free? I would like to see more integration of its impressive lore into the gameplay as well as more free inventory slots, but apart from those setbacks it is a great game that should be given a try by anyone who enjoys some fast-paced action. And the reload wheel (as of Update 12) is pretty awesome.
Nickens- be back sunday;-;Not a bad game. Once you get into it, its difficult to stop. lots of rolling ;)
zzzz;-;You need to play this game or you can go to hell. 25/10
Rhapses;-;Good game but found it slow to level and had to re-do a lot of areas I was playing. Also found it rather repetitive. Graphics are quite well done. Score: +5 - Average Recommend: To those enjoy these style games, definitely.
3noby;-;Good Game and free
Reza;-;It is awesome! Constant new updates and everything else. Must play
Grizzly Warhorse;-;Hydroid is my senpai. Really fun game, Everyone should definitely give it a few hours of their time and see where it takes them.
Soul Imbue;-;A bit of a grind at first, but still very fun and addicting.
Ghoster5000;-;play warframe. it is fun. i like it. you will be happy.
Retro050;-;Warframe...Where to start... First of all, this is the only game I've spent more than 700 hours on in all of my 20 or so steam games. There are many reasons for this, and I shall describe all the pros and cons of this game in this text. PROS: -This is the only TRUE free to play i've seen in my life. EVERYTHING in the game (weapons, characters, cosmetics, etc) is avaiable to f2p players, but requires some grind to compensate. -Cosmetics (colors, shoulder pads, chest pieces, "capes" etc) can only be aquired with platinums (the currency you have to buy with real money), but guess what, you can get platinums for free by trading stuff with other players! You dont have to pay A SINGLE CENT to play this game and get everything, if you have a bit of time to invest in it. -The coop experience is present and intense, a great game to play with friends. -the graphics are good and will run smoothly on any decent computer, and if you don't have a such computer well you can lower the graphics and you probably wont even see the difference exept for the FPS boost! -The game is updated VERY frequently, and gets a huge update every 3 months or so! Digital Extreme is very commited in making Warframe the best F2P shooter out there. -Very developped movement system. You can run on walls and do some epic tricks, you can roll while airborne, you can slide on the ground and so much more...You are a space ninja! -Many Warframes to choose from. All warframes are different, and each one has some cool and unique superpowers and roles/playstyles. One is a slow tank with crowd control. Another can place shields that block bullets. And my favorite one, Zephyr, can even fly! -RANDOM ENCOUNTERS: sometimes you will get messaged by special mini bosses that will try to assasinate you in a near future when you are in a mission. Rumors say they drop epic loot on death, and are particularly deadly... CONS: -As you progress further in the game, lower level missions tend to get way too easy (but they are still enjoyable). The opposite is also true, a low level player trying to take on a level 30+ mission will get wrecked. -At current times, the late game content is somewhat poor, as the only thing left for vets to do is progress through mastery ranks and max out all their gear. But again, the frequent updates keeps the veterans playing as more and more content is added. I also heard rumors about some "lenses of power" that will add some serious late game content for all the accomplished players upon their release. -Enemies are a bit stupid, their AI needs more polishing. But that is far from making this game boring. -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- In conclusion, this game is a model for all the F2P out there. It stands on the top of shooter games list, and it's definitely the best F2P steam can offer you! -By Retro050
7inful;-;It's ok. Now seriously, the game is only good if you can deal with a bunch of farming and grinding as it mostly focuses on leveling up your equipment and aquiring new gear. Most warframes and weapons are really easy to obtain, while others require you to do special missions which are time consuming and require dozens of runs to obtain what you need. That's pretty much what you'll be doing most of the time. Currently, the game lacks end-game content, so when you max out your favourite weapons and warframes the only thing to do is farm stuff that you don't really care about. There's also a glaring lack of story to the universe. The developers give us larger story-ish based events every once in a while, but all we learn from those is what's currently happening in the game's universe. The origins of both your enemies and warframes is completely unknown. Speaking of devs, Digital Extremes (devs of Warframe) communicate with their players very well, there's livestreams every week where they talk about upcoming changes to the game and such. As for the gameplay itself, it's quite good. There's new mechanics introduced every few months, the game runs smoothly, gameplay is really enjoyable and diverse(you'll still be farming, but you have a wide variety of equipment to use when farming). The game is really enjoyable with friends, clan mates, ect. Another thing to notice is the lack of dedicated servers, so if you have a  connection - tough luck. TL;DR Like farming and grinding? This game is for you. Have friends and wanna play something together? Right here. Enjoy immersive storylines? Look elsewhere. Like co-op? Bingo. Like going solo? Well, you can, but it's really boring and repetitive that way.
Dr.Leonardo;-;Well, well, well... A few months back a wrote a reivew about this awesome game. It was a perfect combination of gameplay and customization. Now several updates later, It has improved and grew. Heh, I didn't know it was possible to be better than Perfect. Warframe is the best game of 2013 for me. I started out as the only person to play Warframe and I now influenced over 10 now dedicated players. (sounds small but that's like half of my friend's list -3-). The game has complete character and weapon customization. Every Warframe suits different types of gameplay and its up to you which one that is. You can find whatever weapons please you, and upgrade those weapons uniquely through mods. Even the color schemes can be altered to your cup of tea. And nothing in this game is Buy-to-win. Everything can be crafted and built for an equal gameplay for everyone. Warframe has randomly generated maps for every mission for replayability. No two missions are the same. And this game is designed for Co-op, not Pvp. So its a game to make friends, not eniemies. And Digital extremes is constantly having in-game events and new items for a better game. And lastely, the graphics are amazing. I personally have a great computer and it's like seeing a work of art just for the loading screens. This game is beautiful, and you arent restricted to the graphics so you can numb it down if needed to remove lag. Warframe is Amazing. I don't know why you haven't downloaded it yet. Its free!
Witty Euphemism;-;Its an amazing game. Graphically, animation, gameplay, design. All amazing. A little grindy, yes, i admit that. But its insanely good for free to play. That being said, dont go into this expecting to reach 'end game' within a week. Metacritic is on drugs or something, its heaps better then 66/100.
Zirchonium;-;Very good game, only problems are majorly over powerd pay-to-wins joing your game(you can close your game), and bit of a button masher until you get into it but otherwise All the diverse enemys and warframes to fight them with make it very intresting, iwth enough gameplay you can out kill those pay-to-wins.
CLERK01;-;Came into this game pretty blind to what it was about, Only been playing it for a few days now and it's by far one of the best games I've played in a while. Fast pace and action packed. I would recommend this to anyone looking for a good way to spend some time! Very nice community and comfortable game play. 11/10
Flamingax;-;Great game for people looking for an online shooter game
Koco1111;-;Warframe is a good F2P game on steam, but as time goes by the game gets dull but in the start its a really fun game to play with your friends.
Doctor Moon Shine;-;This is a fun little game to play if you havbe the time to play it and make it good.
i love star gazing;-;Assassins creed meets halo
Zzz Zzz;-;ME 3 online with ninjas in it.
Yuriqa;-;Great game and a lot fun :)
Briggs;-;I've been trying to compose a review that truly shows all the experience I gathered while playing Warframe for so long. And it is still hard to put in words. I am a player that is filled with joy when a F2P game launches or is available as an open beta. I enjoy gaming, I really do. F2P is an attribute linked with many positive and many more negative aspects. In my humble opninion Warframes F2P aspect with real money currency and what you spend it on is probably the most balanced in all of F2P history eventhough the prices are pretty steep. This review will mostly cover the "F2P or P2W" aspect. I am too lazy to write a review for the gameplay part which is fine and steadily evolving to be better than before. Let's get the important things out of the way first, shall we? -Pay to win (P2W)? Warframe is a Coop game at its core nobody loses when a TEAMMATE is stronger but not fun breaking stronger. -What makes him stronger? A weapon or a warframe (character) that has yet to be build by you or your clan. - Can you build it or are you restricted as a F2P gamer to never play with such glory yourself? No. All it takes is time and resources. - So I grind to be able to grind more? It is not an prehistoric asia mmorpg where you spent weeks in the same spot to kill the same enemies just to upgrade your wood dagger to a copper one. Resource drops have been raised and are at the moment laughable high. No shortcomings whatsoever. - Then why should I spend Platinum (real money ingame currency) in the first place? If you are a lazy bum with a lot of money but nearly to no time to play you can buy warframes, weapons and (various random) mods (used to upgrade warframes and weapons etc.) directly from the store to support Digital Extremes in their efforts to please the community. There are even a ton of cosmetics to make your warframe and weapon look like you want it to look like. _ Wha..? Have you spent money on this piece of carp? No, I have not and I doubt I ever will. I am a real money pincher and I like to test out the limits of every F2P game out there till I see either a huge paywall that blockades content or whatnot. Or a F2P turns out to be a real Pay To Win fest where gamers who do not wish to spend money on it are getting their gamer souls squeezed out. - Can you acquire Platinum in another way except spending real money? Yes, you certainly can and I encourage all of you to do so. There is an economic system in Warframe. You can trade anything of value and anything tradeable (there are some restrictions for every player) be it mods, parts for weapons and warframes (Prime variants of weapons and warframes only) or other stuff open to trade. I obtained my Platinum by trading mods with a fellow player. Now I have enough platinum to spend it on the real essential stuff I would only spend it on. - What did you spend it on? In theory you have acess to every weapon and warframe in the game problem is you do not have enough space to fit all of them in your arsenal thats why you have to unlock additional slots for your inventory. 20 Platinum for 1 Warframe Slot ; 12 Platinum for 2 Weapon Slots. (Used to be 20 Platinum for 1 Weapon slot if I remember correctly but they changed it for the greater good. - But what about Platinum exclusive purchases? They exist, but are mostly cosmetics and booster (XP, Credits or Resources) nothing you will feel left out of. Cosmetics are fine, so are boosters in this case. There is no gambling aspect where you can burn away 100$ worth of Platinum and get nothing in return. The sanity level of the devs is too damn high to allow such things. tl;dr - Warframe features an exemplary use of microtransactions in the F2P genre. No shortcomings for gamers who do not pay. - platinum is obtainable through trading i.e. not spending real money. In fact you even get 50 platinum for free as a new player. - the essential purchases are indeed the most affordable. Warframe and weapon slots (20p for 1 / 12p for 2). - you are not hard pressed to spend money or get a constant reminder that you should. Such marketing harassment does not occur in Warframe. - as the engines name suggests : this game is evolving and you can expect a major update every month (Update 14 being the latest) and hotfixes like crazy. I do not know what else to say I'm getting tired. I just hope some of my thoughts are reaching your ears properly and have answered some important questions. If not feel free to ask in the comment section and I or someone else will answer them. Best Regards
TobiBoss;-;its verey good and so fun with friedns
SouthBi4ch;-;great game
VRSC;-;I love this game!I It's amazing. Thx developers for great game.
Waswat;-;Love this game. It looks gorgeous if you have a decent pc (otherwise you can play it on a PS4). It has its flaws with the amount of grinding you will have to do and is missing a proper endgame however the way the parkour is done, the way the weapons handle... The gameplay melts away the tediousness of the grind. I would say that overall, this game is a great game.
Mr.Plague;-;I've been following this game for a while, since it was in early stages of closed beta. And I can tell you this: *It is constantly being updated with awesome new content and fun events. *The community is one of the better ones I have seen in any online game. *The crafting system is done well. *The only thing you can't get without spending some cash is cosmetics (additional color pallets and scarfs etc) Of course there are bad sides to the game too: -First the game seams bugged alot, but the developers are working hard on fixing those issues and the changes in the past few updates have improved the overall performance of the game -The game doesn't focus on PVP, so it's almost non-present (which isn't necessarily a bad thing, just don't log in expecting some grand PVP action...It is a co-op focused game)... - The missions can get a bit repetative... Well, those are the barebone "traits" of the game. I loved it, it has a huge community so why don't you come and join us ;)
Morokt;-;I absolutely love this game. The movement's nice, the grinding isn't as awful as other free to play games I've played, and the customizing on the weapons/characters is fun. There's also hidden areas in some of the levels and I love things like that. I personally recommend playing it with friends if you can.
Just Another Guy;-;one of the most addicting and beautiful free-to-play games out there i highly recomend it. it's kind of like a tps-mmo because of the powers you get on each warframe. the wepons are ok some of them are terrible,but on the bright side you can get great a huge longsword (galatine) and bladed boomarang (glave) sadly you can only get a glave by using platinum (real life money) and login rewards.so all in all i totaly recomended it
Crimson Ghost;-;Cooperative Cyborg Space Ninja Third Person Action RPG. Do I have your attention yet? Having witnessed the evolution of this game from its infancy I can say that it has grown into a unique peice of gaming that will certainly garner its place in the hearts and minds of people. Coming from just a handful of "Warframes", this games version of character with pre-made stats, to an abundence such that there is almost always one to suit any playstyle within the third person market. In terms of graphics it has come a long way. The lighting and animations have come to a crisp smoothness that a lot of other free-to-play titles simply haven't gotten to. The bio-metal, or whatever the suits are made up of look organic but have the deflecting power of metal which makes for an interesting change when you're sliding across a metal surface and hear the suit grinding against the ground. Combat is almost always fast and fluid with hoards of enemies attempting to do everything in their power from keeping you from your objective with varying enemy types. Going head long into a wave of enemies can be fun, but the unprepared should be ready for a quick death. Finding your niche is easier since there are plenty of people in the community who are willing to pull you along to get the Warframe of your choice by getting you the parts to build it. Crafting is simple to learn and essencial to maximizing your arsenal as well. Getting the right gun could just be a matter of getting the materials to build it. If it turns out to not be that great, sell it off and craft again until you find that one you're willing to put money down to get a Orokin Catalyst and enhance it further for a fraction of the cost it would have been to purchase the weapon outright. Who knows, you might even find an event and get the Catalyst completely free. The final and most important element of the game is the mods. These can completely alter the way some of the warframes play out, even some of the weapons get an extra kick. Current personal favorite is the Kunai throwing knives with a 170% chance of an additional shot at the same time. That's right, I get the possibility to throw a third with each toss of a blade and deal massive damage. Finding this kind of combo for your weapon is just a download away. Enjoy.
Koala;-;This game has some amazing graphics for a free-to-play. Game mechanics are nice, too. Although it's an open beta, there is very little content in the game though, and it's definitely not worth spending any IRL money on, and after a while there isn't much to this game that brings you back to it: the missions, despite the levels being somewhat randomly generated every time you play a mission, get extremely repetitive after a while. 7/10
lord8464;-;Extremely fun i love all the graphic and how its not a pay to win game
Suoh Mikoto;-;Gameplay: 9/10 Sound: 8/10 Graphics: 9/10 Multiplayer: 7/10 Amazing game that is F2P. Highly recommended.
Rhapses;-;Good game but found it slow to level and had to re-do a lot of areas I was playing. Also found it rather repetitive. Graphics are quite well done. Score: +5 - Average Recommend: To those enjoy these style games, definitely.
3noby;-;Good Game and free
Awesome Possum;-;Yep, pretty good!
[ J ];-;Game GG , Recommended.
Ewwdairy;-;Super Sweet 3rd-Person Shooter! Controls and Systems take time to get used to. The Damage System has got a big learning curve, but once you do get it you're basically a god. Almost everything in-game you can build, but there are some things that are exclusively Pay to get. Plus they give you some in-game premium cash when you start up- so all good (it's dirt cheap if you want to buy some more). Online Interactions are pretty O.K. You get a squad most of the time, but you never truly stick with them cause of connection issues. Without a good internet connections, your ethier lagging from your connection or someonelse's. NOTE: You actually need to join a clan to do crap in this game 0.0. Probably cause some weapons are exclusive to clans. The Gameplay gets repetitve after a while, due to the tidous farming and the same mission types over and over again. Though there are a few random events that keep it fresh. The shooting mechanics are....well...... generic shooting mechanincs, nothing really special. Unless of course, you count the warframe abilites. Overall Score: With its fun and social gameplay, and a few minor bugs and problems I give Warframe a 9/10.
Permafrost;-;Very fun Online Co-Op, very difficult for singleplayer. Its alot more fun when you're playing with friends as opposed to strangers though. Concept-wise/story-wise, its pretty unique and fascinating, as alot of the backstory is left for the player to interpret. Gameplay wise, its a very cool third person shooter and thirdperson melee experience, with special abilities for each individual warframe. Although it uses microtransactions, these are non-essential, and more or less just allow easier/faster access to items you could get through gameplay otherwise. I've been playing since closed beta, and I've watched the game grow and change but have yet to see a change I cannot stand. They seem to update frequently and patch as needed, and have yet to come up with a solid reason to be disappointed by the game or anything in it.
click1234;-;love it awseome game
click1234;-;love it awseome game
Maxord;-;Gradually gets worse after awhile. A lot of farming for materials. Ok gameplay but gets stale quick.
SkrFireFly;-;Warframe changed the way i thought of [free to play Games] (Well Sort of), Having friends who play together using team speak is really Fun & Funny! have to buy blueprint to build your items might take up to days but its worth it! (Unless you wanted to use real money on getting the items fast while supporting the dev to update the game and keep it going) Well, give it a try and play to free up some stress from the real world, Add me up if you need a friend on steam :sfhappy:
{Brony} Lock Copperbrain;-;I whole heartedly reccomend playing this game with friends, mainly because this game consists of massive amounts of grinding to get anything done! Seriously, this game is an endless grind, buts its actually pretty damn fun if you enjoy over the top space ninja action! I give it a 6.5/10.
Nokteus;-;Time consuming and addictive game, although its pay to win for some players its still fun to play and kill your boredom.
Cpt.Pootis the Communist Pyro;-;problem:free account heavily limited...thats the only problem everything else is ing awesome its like every sci fi game ever combined with directed with michael bay 9.5 out of ing 10!!!
FireLord334;-;I have to say. This is the best free game on steam. Such a great game. Download it now!!!
Videogamek1ng;-;Great game.
Rivent;-;Hundreds of action packed four player co-op missions without having to spend a penny. Generated stages with 10 different mission types, all of which play very differently from one another. Character upgrading and weapon crafting is done through drops during levels, which is nowhere near as grindy as people make it out to be. There is a big character and weapon roster allowing play styles of every kind as long as they include a good bit of mindless shooting. Updates are plenty, well optimised while still looking good and the Warframes just look too cool to turn down.
HenitalGerpes;-;this game is so awesome it gave me implosive
drsmith2002;-;Great game. Great communiuty and a lot of fun
T-MAN;-;Its a very funny and entertaining game.Not quite easy but really addicting.I highly recommand this game for coop third person shooter players.
GinGo;-;More enjoyable that i first thought it would be.
zzzz;-;You need to play this game or you can go to hell. 25/10
Batty McFart;-;After 100+ hours on this game, I think I'm more than capable of writing a review. First of all, this game is the best Play to Win model in Free to Play titles out there. You need not spend a cent to get anything! You just need to play and get stuff in-game to build things in-game using in-game credits! That's it! Secondly, this is an awesome game. You'll never get bored here. It's rewarding and fun. And you don't have to play alone at all. There will always be three random people out there who will join you in a game. Or you can invite your friends. The missions are fun, and you can specialize your weapons for different types of enemy factions. It is rewarding when you send an arrow flying straight towards an enemy, and the arrow impales it to the wall, or decapitates it. What's more? You can play as a trigger happy freak or a careful and silent ninja. Your choice! Thirdly, if your pocket is itching, and you are not one of those patient types, then you can spend money to get platinum, the premium currency, and buy new frames or weapons. Although, since that would defeat the purpose of Play to Win, I'd recommend buying platinum for $5 or $10 and using it to buy weapon slots or Warframe slots. That way, when you make more weapons or Warframes in game, you'll never run out of space. Fourthly, the login rewards. Now this is realy interesting. You can get the following type of rewards: Credits (in-game currency) Weapon XP (Primary/Secondary/Melee) Warframe XP Warframe Blueprints Rare Materials (for crafting) Discounts on Platinum! Yes, you read that last one right. Discounts. And they are heavy! Ranging from 50% to 90%! Unbelievable, eh? Makes it so damn cheap to buy platinum! Fifthly, you can create your own playstyle. Stealth or trigger happiness, everything is yours. There are plenty of mods available in the game to get your hands on, and you can mold your weapon to your will. If you are not satisfied with the weapon you crafted, sell it! Sell it and get some credits! Sixthly, there are various Alert missions and Operations going on every single day in Warframe. Alert mssions give out credits and some rare materials, or blueprints. You can use them or sell them (the blueprints, not the rare materials. They're needed for crafting, right?). And the operations give out rare materials and credits too. Operations can be Infestation outbreaks or Invasions. They give out credits ranging for 10K to 35K. Still not drooling? Well, I'll only say two words: Space Ninjas! Now if that hasn't watered your mouth, then I don't know what will!!! Scroll up and GET IT NOW!! YOU ARE WASTING VALUABLE TIME!!!!!!
VRSC;-;I love this game!I It's amazing. Thx developers for great game.
Waswat;-;Love this game. It looks gorgeous if you have a decent pc (otherwise you can play it on a PS4). It has its flaws with the amount of grinding you will have to do and is missing a proper endgame however the way the parkour is done, the way the weapons handle... The gameplay melts away the tediousness of the grind. I would say that overall, this game is a great game.
Mr.Plague;-;I've been following this game for a while, since it was in early stages of closed beta. And I can tell you this: *It is constantly being updated with awesome new content and fun events. *The community is one of the better ones I have seen in any online game. *The crafting system is done well. *The only thing you can't get without spending some cash is cosmetics (additional color pallets and scarfs etc) Of course there are bad sides to the game too: -First the game seams bugged alot, but the developers are working hard on fixing those issues and the changes in the past few updates have improved the overall performance of the game -The game doesn't focus on PVP, so it's almost non-present (which isn't necessarily a bad thing, just don't log in expecting some grand PVP action...It is a co-op focused game)... - The missions can get a bit repetative... Well, those are the barebone "traits" of the game. I loved it, it has a huge community so why don't you come and join us ;)
Morokt;-;I absolutely love this game. The movement's nice, the grinding isn't as awful as other free to play games I've played, and the customizing on the weapons/characters is fun. There's also hidden areas in some of the levels and I love things like that. I personally recommend playing it with friends if you can.
Just Another Guy;-;one of the most addicting and beautiful free-to-play games out there i highly recomend it. it's kind of like a tps-mmo because of the powers you get on each warframe. the wepons are ok some of them are terrible,but on the bright side you can get great a huge longsword (galatine) and bladed boomarang (glave) sadly you can only get a glave by using platinum (real life money) and login rewards.so all in all i totaly recomended it
Crimson Ghost;-;Cooperative Cyborg Space Ninja Third Person Action RPG. Do I have your attention yet? Having witnessed the evolution of this game from its infancy I can say that it has grown into a unique peice of gaming that will certainly garner its place in the hearts and minds of people. Coming from just a handful of "Warframes", this games version of character with pre-made stats, to an abundence such that there is almost always one to suit any playstyle within the third person market. In terms of graphics it has come a long way. The lighting and animations have come to a crisp smoothness that a lot of other free-to-play titles simply haven't gotten to. The bio-metal, or whatever the suits are made up of look organic but have the deflecting power of metal which makes for an interesting change when you're sliding across a metal surface and hear the suit grinding against the ground. Combat is almost always fast and fluid with hoards of enemies attempting to do everything in their power from keeping you from your objective with varying enemy types. Going head long into a wave of enemies can be fun, but the unprepared should be ready for a quick death. Finding your niche is easier since there are plenty of people in the community who are willing to pull you along to get the Warframe of your choice by getting you the parts to build it. Crafting is simple to learn and essencial to maximizing your arsenal as well. Getting the right gun could just be a matter of getting the materials to build it. If it turns out to not be that great, sell it off and craft again until you find that one you're willing to put money down to get a Orokin Catalyst and enhance it further for a fraction of the cost it would have been to purchase the weapon outright. Who knows, you might even find an event and get the Catalyst completely free. The final and most important element of the game is the mods. These can completely alter the way some of the warframes play out, even some of the weapons get an extra kick. Current personal favorite is the Kunai throwing knives with a 170% chance of an additional shot at the same time. That's right, I get the possibility to throw a third with each toss of a blade and deal massive damage. Finding this kind of combo for your weapon is just a download away. Enjoy.
Koala;-;This game has some amazing graphics for a free-to-play. Game mechanics are nice, too. Although it's an open beta, there is very little content in the game though, and it's definitely not worth spending any IRL money on, and after a while there isn't much to this game that brings you back to it: the missions, despite the levels being somewhat randomly generated every time you play a mission, get extremely repetitive after a while. 7/10
lord8464;-;Extremely fun i love all the graphic and how its not a pay to win game
Zahlfire;-;A great F2P Space Ninja game. Not pay too win, and not much of a grind if you enjoy the game. I recommend it too anyone!
Humblee PidoBear;-;Clearly I recommend this game to anyone who wants team-based PvE Action, with loads of characters(WARFRAMES) and weaponry to chose from that are unique in everyway and that varies differently from each other with their own advantages/disadvantages to even the playing field. Fast intuitive action team based or stealthy solo missions, its L4D ninja's in space at its finest.
Neco the Sergal Chef;-;Don't let the Awkwardly-low Metascore fool you. This game is addicting, fun, fast-paced and has a LOT of replayability. I would consider it also containing great mixtures of nearly every type of genre out there(Except for FPS or RTS course) - RPG? MMO? Card Collecting(Genre?lol) Action, Shooter/TPS, Adventure, you name it! Try it out!
**~Preda~**;-;Every time I come back to Warframe it's a little better. I loved the look of the game from the first day (Keith Thompson's art design SHOWS and it is AWESOME), but it was bug-ridden and sluggish. I come back six months later and here is this immersive, action-parkour gem packed with gorgeous particle effects and set in an interesting universe. Come back a month later and the interface is all cool now and they have customizable everythings. The latest iteration is almost perfect! I think we finally have a successor to Team Fortress 2, and it only took 6 years.
Umbra;-;Fantastic parkour system, melee combat, gunplay, and ability system. Impressive graphics and style. Can be a bit repetitive level-wise, but has enough variety to keep things interesting, and the gameplay itself is just so damn fun it's nuts. The 'mod' system is also fantastic and makes for hours and hours of customization and upgrading. This game recieves constant updates and slowly keeps getting better, larger, more varied, and more polished. If you're looking for an action packed thrill ride full of badassery and deep satisfying player progression, and don't want to spend a penny, try this game for sure.
NyanCat1101;-;A beutiful game,well-organized and has great mechanics that pretty much match the gameplay you see in the trailer.
Human Inreaction (Zulu 7);-;Chop Everything in half should be the name of this game :D
George "Talis" Bakk;-;Absolutelly fantastic!!
Syntiel;-;Amazing game. Free to play makes this game worth trying, but is easily good enough I would have paid for it.
angelpenyk;-;Amazing game, you will find yourself investing many hours trying to find the best weapons. The guys at DE did a great job and are constantly updating it and fixin every single thing in it. Definitely one of the best games of 2013 and Metascore is full of .
[APOC] Dirksade;-;For being a free-to-play game, there is a lot to enjoy with this game. The combat is fun, the community is decent, the amount of grinding to get items and frames is not nearly bad as some other games, and the crafting system is fantastic. Grab your friends, create a guild, and have a blast :D
Best Dzik;-;Warframe is a game that you can either love or hate. Before you start playing it, you need to at all times keep in mind that this is still a Beta. Huge and growing, but only a Beta. Various bugs are a common sight, but developers try to patch them all as well as they can and sometimes even release hotfixes on the run to fix the most annoying ones. Big packs of new content also come every now and then, so the gameplay doesn't get too "stale" and players find something new to do all the time. Warframe is a TPP shooter taking place in a futuristic Solar System. Mysterious race known as Tenno are cleaning the planetary system from the influence of various factions and the player becomes one of these "protectors". There are many classes (called Warframes) to choose between, each with their own set of skills and statistics, but the player gets to pick only one at the start and unlocking other ones might take some time, as it required materials and credits. Although the game is very dynamic and it doesn't take much time to finish a mission or two, the game is clearly targeted at players who want to stay for longer. The large amount of weaponry and warframes means it will take A LOT of playing to unlock and master. In addition to that, there are mods used for modifying both the weapons and classes, resulting in countless combinations where every player can customize his/her equipment according to own taste and preferred gameplay. The F2P system means of course that there is a virtual currency (in this case Platinum) available for purchase for everyone willing to spend their hard earned money on the game. It can buy weapons, materials, warframes, some visual customization elements etc. Fortunately, unlike many games of this sort, it never feels like you absolutely need to buy something because you are too weak comparing others. If you have enough time, you can spend that instead of real money to acquire desired equipement (except visual elements, but they do not affect gameplay). Personally, I recommend the game to everyone who likes sci-fi and/or shooters and has a lot of time to spend on this game, because it will not let go easily and it will suck you in for at least few dozens of hours. For the rest, you can always try it. After all, NINJAS PLAY FOR FREE!
Swag-Nii-sama;-;Warframe isn't one of those, run-of-the-mill free-2-play games you often see nowadays. Yes, there are microtransactions and yes, there is bought currency. However, that's where the line is dropped. Warframe is a game revolving around 1 versus 3 fight with you, the Tenno against the Grineer, the Corupus and the Infested. You, and three other players in your squad must eliminate these enemies by completing missions and events that are present throughout the game. You are given a vast amount of customizability with not only your loadout, but your cosmetic appearance. Weapons are either bought using Platnium (microtransactions), credits (achieved through missions) and building them using blueprints. Warframes also occur the same way, but may require more work. There are around about two hundred different missions ranging from about 10-11 planets of our solar system, in which each mission has a certain faction, tile/map set and objective that is to be accomplished as you challenge this mission. However, missions with the same objective may seem almost identical, which I'll explain later. Frames, otherwise known as your "character" holds completely unique abilities that will aid either you or your allies. Each frame also has a seperate set of statistics and can be used to suit the needs of the mission. You can also enhance not only your weapons, but your frames with mods or artifacts. These artifacts are obtained through missions and building frames. Effects of these mods can range from addition armour, to enhanced firing speed, to poison or elemental damage. Frame mods can boost attributes such as speed or ability power. Warframe is completely different from most F2P games, as they don't necessarily require you to spend money to get further in game. Most things can be aquired through playing and gaining levels. Somethings however, that may affect you would be the fact that you can't get more than 2-3 frames at once unless you buy a Frame slot, or you can't surpass a certain amount of weapons before you need to buy weapon slots. This is not necessarily worrisome in the beginning weeks, but it will get to you once you get some more powerful weapons and you'd rather not have to sell them in order to get a new weapon. Same with the frames, which is probably the only problem with the microtransations present on this game but they still maintain a fairly reputable system which isn't hogged with this. Now, this may not be early, but the game is largely grindy. In order to amass a decent chunk of money in order to build or buy, you'll need to do quite a bit of missions. This is another bad downside to the game, which can cause boredom once you get past a certain point, where fighting and completing missions has become basically worthless. Also, missions of the same gametype may seem extremely identical. However, the fact that the game is Co-Op makes the game much more enjoyable along with the fact that teamwork is actually needed at times in order to successfully complete a misiion without error. The graphics in the game are really well made, possibly the best graphics I've seen for a F2P game. Not only this, but the graphics are fairly scalable, allowing lower-end computers to run it at the cost of lower graphic fidelity. A couple mistakes that don't make much of a different is that the bloom can be massively impairing if you view it at a certain angle, the physics engine is a bit derpy as well, but it doesn't make any significant difference. Finally, the community of this game is probably one of the better ones I've encountered. Most people are helpful, relatively kind and because it's not a competitive game in most aspects, insults and such aren't flung very often. There are some who refuse to work and can be a massive nuisance. With this, I finally end this crappy review of a decent game personally. I suggest you not take my word on this to heart, and try the game for yourself. Now, Go Tenno!
Coolcat OG;-;Warframe is a good game but it can feel like your doing the same thing over and over again. The Combat is fun the card system is nice and the guns and meele really make the game what it is graphics are good but if this isnt the game for you you'll know right off the bat however its is really fun for players that like this genre
Xariann;-;Fun, action-packed game. Really nice graphics. If you like ninjas in space and shooters, this is the game for you. Fast paced game play, dungeon crawler co-op game with many weapons to choose from. It could do with more strategy as most games with a full team of 4 wind up being a huge zerg and the final kill count seems to be related to the person who run the fastest. Game can get grindy and repetitive, and the store items can be a little pricy, but if you want to just have a blast and shoot anything in sight for a while, this will get you hooked.
mayonnaise;-;This is an absolutley amazing game. Everytime I open It up I can't believe that I'm playing a free game! If this game was priced at ten dollars I would still buy it. Awesome game.
Cryptichobo;-;This game is awesome nuff said.
Smiles, The Jester;-;Its a great game. Along with co-op you have get to have neat player abilities, which if paired up with other Warframes you and your friends can be devastating against your enemies. Its free, the gameplay is fun, and for a free-to-play its very pretty. So Space-Ninjas... Need I say more? 8.5/10 (8.5 because its takes so long to get new weapons and other Warframes! >.< But hey, all the more reason to shoot stuff right?)
Kitten (Oatmeal);-;Great game, I've logged loads and loads of hours on it, for quite awhile you can solo it too but on most bosses and defence missions you'll need a helping hand. It's a good blend of melee and shooter, filling the enemy full of lead (or tiny metal darts) then hacking them to bit with your melee weapon of choice, collecting and building new items can be a grind at a start but after a while it soon eases. Plus it's free, give it a try
DasMudkip;-;Since I last played this game in closed beta and left it due to it lagging on my computer along with choppy movement, the amount of updates that the developers have put forth is AMAZING! Warframe's premise for the game is unique and is continuously being built upon. There's a learning curve to the game, but once you learn it, it is a lot more enjoyable. Also, playing with friends and making new ones is always good! :D
GrD Sabu;-;this is a great game away from the normal things i play. graphics are great only complaint is how there arent many differences in the maps. all in all though its a awesome game to get with friends co-op it up and kill stuff!
Danta69;-;good game to play with freinds ^_^
=GP=Something |KFC|;-;Absolutely amazing game all around. I love it. No life it almost every day :)
Dick Reborn;-;This game is unbelievable. When I first heard about it, I thought it was just going to be another generic FPS game, but oh was i wrong. It got me hooked only after a few minutes of playing, the characters, the enemies, the world, all aspects of the game are awesome. If I had to rate this game, I would give a 10/10
Abaddon;-;Suuuper addicting great game for free. comes with strings tho. time equals money in this game. 12-24-72 hour craft times. and you can tell who spends money and who does not. but it's optional. you can do just fine without spending a dime. i've spend bout ten bucks and am happy where i ended up. so yeah next gen kinda game FOR FREE. duh download the  outa this
~ Bread;-;Play this game like how I played with your mother.... No, really, its a fun game.
meon.;-;Absolute gameplay, great graphic, and it's free to play!
Attack Kitty;-;Really really good combat mechanics. Not a lot else, but that alone is worth a number of hours of fun.
Dailyblogspot;-;Warframe is a fun and exciting third-person shooter. Leveling your "Warframe" and playing through its missions is super fun when you first start out. Although end game can be a bit grindy, there is always something to do and work towards. There is online mode as well as private, so you can play by yourself or with other people. But it's definatelly more fun with friends. If you're looking for an interesting action oriented game with some challange, pick up Warframe and give it a try.
(+Kasumi);-;Space ninjas in space with space guns. That's basically what I say the game is to people that have no clue about it. And I love this game. Sure it has it's fault, suich as "F2P" meaning nothing, you still need to spend at least $20 on it eventually. But other than that, the devs are nice, the community is good. And it's all in a ll fun to play. The gamer itself is really neat, even though it's a beta, it's still a very decent game. A lot of fun killing times, granted it's not very heavy on the lore, but it's still a good game. It's sort of like minecraft, you dont understand it, but you still get addicted to it at some point or another. The weapons are cool, and the fact that you put on a different "suit" and it gives you these awesome abilities, makes it fun. You can customize the play style to however you want it to be. Stealthy, bum rush, magic. It's all there. So check it out. It won't cost you anything to start, but if you get into it, a little investment to help out these awesome devs is totally worth it.
Oscar;-;Warframe is a game which puts you in the shoes of a Tenno aka, "A Mother ing Space Ninja", where your job is to kill a bunch of people who look kind of like the emporer from star wars or people with shoe boxes for heads. The gameplay is pretty standard for a third person shooter but adds a few unique mechanics that makes the game flow together quite nicely and makes killing waves apon waves of crude clone nerd guys incredibly satisfying. The game consists of you doing a bunch of missions that are kind of made obselete as the game is focused - very heavily - around obtaining parts for weapons and warframes. This is a good thing and a bad thing because obtaining a new gun or a warframe can completely change the way the game is played, but I wont go into that, the reason why this is bad is that it makes the game very "grindey" and passively forces the player into committing to grinding for something to spice up the gameplay as the starter gear is -poor and uninteresting - alternatively they can invest their hard-earned coin into the game and just get most of the fun stuff through the micro transaction store. This sort of "forced commitment" has lead to a lot of people I know disliking the game as they came in and joined to play with other people who were higher as they felt that the gear they started with was more under-whelming and it put them off the game a little. Although this isn't much of a review as more of just throwing some thoughts onto Steam without using Spellcheck, I wanted to say something about the game as I have poured a lot of my time and money into it because the game is so satisfying and fresh when you invest your time into to it in the way I have. I'd like to say to anyone that picks this up as a try for a free to play game that it's a game where you may love it from the start but you may also have to invest you time or money in to get the same amount of enjoyment as others.
Domis;-;This is a solid beta. It provides great fast paced action. Expansive leveling and customization. You can play solo or in groups so you aren't strong armed into one or the other. I will say it again though, it is a beta so there are bugs but the flip side to that is a continual stream of updates. I am taking place in the first big operation and it is a lot of fun. Basically it has everything I could want in an Action shooter; big levels, different types of missions, many environments, lots of guns, lots of leveling of gear etc... Just a great game for 20mins or 20hrs.
Domis;-;This is a solid beta. It provides great fast paced action. Expansive leveling and customization. You can play solo or in groups so you aren't strong armed into one or the other. I will say it again though, it is a beta so there are bugs but the flip side to that is a continual stream of updates. I am taking place in the first big operation and it is a lot of fun. Basically it has everything I could want in an Action shooter; big levels, different types of missions, many environments, lots of guns, lots of leveling of gear etc... Just a great game for 20mins or 20hrs.
Solma;-;Four words... Space Ninjas in Space!!! Warframe is awesome the unique style and fast pace gameplay really make for a good time. It's F2P and you really do not need to put any money in to the game to enjoy it to the fullest. You can buy the warframes and weapons but they are are easy enough to obtain given a little time.
sand0r;-;It's ok. Not great but ok. I've really tried to like this game but I just haven't been able to get there, yet, and I find myself going back to Mass Effect 3 (it's a shame Bioware has pretty much blown off it's multiplayer support). I really dislike the fact that you can't earn platinum by just playing the game. Instead you're either required to shell out money or need to grind for ridiculous lengths of time to unlock new stuff. Regardless, for what it's worth, it's pretty good, especially considering it's free-to-play. If they were to change the purchasing systems and leveling system in the future, I'd most likely donate cash toward it's development. Addendum (2013/12/13): It's actually a lot of fun. I've been playing the crap out of it the past couple of weeks and, now that I've picked up on the resource farming and have a better idea on the forging, I think it's pretty entertaining. I still like the overall feel of Mass Effect better but ME has become pretty stagnant compared to the continuous evolution of Warframe. I will continue to dislike the purchasing system and the inability to get new equipment in an acceptable amount of time without paying for it. I also find it appalling that DE put in the option to pay platinum for credits. All-in-all, fun
Gamzrok24;-;This game is possibly the best game I have ever played. Mixing creativity, building, fighting, magic, abilities, and all sorts of fun, this game is just stunningly amazing. I would recommend this game to absolutely everyone, and would like to ask them to give it a chance, considering it is free anyway. Overall worth the download, and fun as hell. Definitely get it.
Vox_R;-;I can't stop... playing this game... Help me. For a more substatnive review, a lot has already been covered in other reviews that I can echo; the gameplay is fun, it's got some grinding aspects but you never feel a lack of what to do, the co-op aspects are spectacular, and abilities start to synergize with each other as you start to work together... The reason I got so wholy sucked into it, though, is that it feels like an amalgamation of a lot of my favorite aspects of gaming; a compelling leveling system, great customization options for gameplay style, reasonable grinding for new equipment and warframes so that each acquisition feels like an exciting accomplishment... The sum of the parts makes the whole incredible. It's clear that the game is still beta, that's certain, but if it's already at this point in its beta stage and still getting updates, it has a LOT of potential. HIGHLY reccommended.
bogialata;-;Surely everyone has already very familiar with the topic of outer space ninja ninja but the only competition in this game - WARFRAME, 3rd combination of RPG and shooting will give players the feeling rambo extremely , besides being able to build dojo (for members of the clan) improve interoperability between players with each other... however game modes in the game are few and the environment in a few short game species and terrain changes automatically every time you play on the game's special Uproot game engine. found a thousand words, or experience the feeling of watching one ninja in space is like, and if you still is one lone warrior in this macrocosm, or join my clan WFO -IGN: bogialat123
Cory Baxter;-;Addicting. Once you get all the OP items, you're gunna want more. Each new release of a warframe or gear encourages you to farm and build it. Overall, this game requires a lot of time to farm, just to pay off -- or you can buy plat.
Dreams and Wishes;-;So far this game is ok or interesting. Maybe me, more then likley. Trying to figure out what they want or need me to do. But again maybe it is my age. But trying to figure out is challenging lol
Genocide;-;great game tough grinding for parts can be a pain in the
ZeroXephon;-;350+ hours so far. If you like ninjas, and you like space then you will love warframe. Best of all ITS FREE.
Minmus;-;Ninjas. Shooting aliens and robots. With tech and . 11/10 Proper review, pardon my english : This game is fully free to play with slow and steady pace towards full geared. With many different ninjas that you could get for free by grinding bosses. Mostly content for premium users is costumes and , but wait, you could half of those by some random event in-game and premium users items is just for a quick Good Game. Therefore i conclude this game is fully free to play by an exception, you couldn't get all of those cool looking ninjas and weapons in your inventory because you could only add slots with microtransaction. The community is great i think, dev is supportive too, i got a quick responses for wanting to change my e-mail id. So i have been enjoyed for about 300+ hours of fun smacking the enemies with so many interesting abilities. The missions could be repetitive and boring but random generated map negates it a bit. Therefore anyone who enjoyed tps-games should give this a try, nothing to lose.
The Master of Unlocking;-;An f2p with space ninjas. 'nuff said
Moozy;-;A fun co-op shooter that doesnt feel like its solely out to gouge its players wallets. Solid third person shooter mechanics and some fun swashbuckling. Co-op works well with four invested players, and an interesting upgrade system. Play with your friends to enjoy the game to the max cuz there's no fun playing this game on your own. I would give it 9/10 because it's really enjoyable when you play with friends.
RocsRoxa;-;,        Mass effect 3                +            pvp.                !!!   !
4IM_Chronicles;-;metal armoured ninja's from the future with magical powers..........Sounds like fun. :)
Pvt. Clubby McWank Fist;-;great game but if you have epilepsy dont play this game
Nicki;-;A fantastic, unique game. Wish it was a little cheaper on the cash shop, but there really isn't anything wrong with this game.
imsecretlyjesus;-;On a scale of 1-10 this game is a Jesus. I've been playing this game since closed beta. It's come such a long way and with update 12 this game looks polished and official. Awesome work for a smaller studio. You can tell they love the game, and the constant push of new content is awesome
TheRealFactoid;-;Warframe is practically the computer version of Clash of Clans, figuratively. It will addict you with hours of gameplay that keep you coming back with the "just one more level" feeling. The graphics are amazing. I play on low graphics settings, for quality's sake, and the game looks comparable to Halo 4 on the Xbox 360 in terms of detail. Your eyeballs are in for a treat. The levels are all the same structure, you move from room to room murdering everything in your path with guns to bow and arrows to shurikens, etc. There are different level types, Exterminate, Spy, Assassinate, Defense, Survival, Sabotage, and Mobile Defense. Each of these levels has a different objective that I am not going in depth of(mainly because the title says it all), but they last 10-15 minutes usually. The length of the mission really depends on how far you are willing to push yourself. Are you going to murder an entire army, or just the standing garisson? The choice is yours. This game has full clan support, trading, friends, text chat, and even a PvP multiplayer duel mode where up to 4 people can duke it out to see whose ninja skills are superior. All in all, it's a great game for being free, and even though repetitiveness sinks in quickly, the tutorial doesn't give a lot of info, and the storyline is non-existent, it's fun. And that's all games are supposed to be. For the few gigabytes it's worth, I give Warframe a 8/10.
Beer0clock 24/7;-;My fave coop shooter at the moment,gets better the more u play,read the guides to help u out.More to this game than meets the eye.Leaves mass effect 3 multiplyer for dead
Horse Power;-;A very fun game !!!
Cory Baxer;-;Warframe is a game to never let go of... It is different from other shooters, a lot different! I can play this for hours and hours! With a leveling systems that gives you a challange but isn't too hard. Every update new guns and warframes are added to the game making the gaming experiance everlasting. All I can say is get this game. 10/10
Slocknog;-;This game is very fun (and free) although it is mostly just grinding non-stop if you don't play extremely often it is usually fresh again.
CountX;-;Warframe - kinky space ninjas!!! Here's my Tenno Tune: https://soundcloud.com/xtian-1/tenno-tune
Silent Walrus;-;For a free open beta game, I have found myself continuously enjoying this game. It's unique, it's fast-paced, and keeps getting better with every update! DOWNLOAD IT NOW! You will not regret it!
Dr. Zer0;-;An awsome free to play action game that is constantly growing and adding new content.
Kai;-;I played this game in the early open beta and thought it was a lot of fun, and after a year+ of updates and hotfixes, it has turned into a wonderfully crafted world of Space Ninjas...Yes...SPACE NINJAS! The game is probably the best Free-to-Play games, and even one of my favorite shooters, on the internet. Play this game! It is epic!
Ruxxz;-;Great Game. Short maps for fast game play. Lots Of Fun
Meijin;-;Nice but repetitive, easy to play
Lance;-;This game will blow your mind. If you think it's just another 3rd person shooter then you are rong. It is so much more. you play as a ninja. only with guns (and swords) and just to put it out there! IT FU**ING AWESOME!! If you dont download it then what ever. I'm not here to make you download games. I just recomand it for you. If you want to download it then go ahead. =3 ~Laffen
Cocoa Butter Kisses;-;This game is breath taking, that's all I can say.
Lord_SwagPirate02;-;10/10 Ninjas play for free
Goonkers;-;Super upgrade version of Mass Effect, and with more customizable options. Nuff said! ANdddd did i mention free to play! WHATttttt?! Why wait? Its free to play anyways!
Taco-Kun;-;Pretty Much, Ninjas with Space Guns in Space Suits, fighting Space Zombies with Space guns in Space. Everyones Dream Game.
Swisher Sweets: The Wild Blunt;-;Its okay but very repetative. All the levels look the same.
gan soo doo (bb)...;-;Warframe ;)
Pando.;-;It's good.
Feam;-;Warframe is a pretty interesting game. If you're reading this, you probably already know that it is a "Co-op Shooter" from somewhere, and that it is in Open Beta. The first thing I want to let you know is that these two categories are not seperate at all. The core of this game is as much a Shooter as it is a "game in development", a game that experiments and teaches both the community and the developers, and of course a game with many unfinished features. There are upsides and downsides to Digital Extreme's decision of developing their game like this, but I am without a doubt that the impact of saying: "Let's release it publicly in Beta and develop it as we go with our players" on the end product of this game, will be even greater than when they said: "Let's make a Space Ninja Co-op Shooter F2P Game" I could write about the stunning visuals that easily outmatch any F2P game to date, I could write about the constantly evolving storyline and setting that seem as basic and simple as it is limitless, or I could even write about the gameplay that easily combines a dozen different styles of games into one fast-paced, progression-filled insanity... But I won't. These aren't what keep me in this game. What keeps me in this game is the development itself, the slowly building community and the potential this game has. The developers themselves clearly learn a lot with every hotfix and update they release, and it makes progressing through this game all the more interesting - seeing as the game is progressing alongside you. A normal company would learn quietly through data and attempting different things internally, but Warframe has by far the most community-involved development team I have ever had the pleasure of interacting with. This game is an experiment, and so far it looks like it's a successful one. It's still pretty far away from completion, though. You can choose whether you want to participate now, or maybe you'd prefer it as a more refined product. You could choose any amount of time, focus, and interest that you would like to invest in this game and its' development, and it will adjust itself accordingly. So, yeah... I recommend you try out Warframe.
The Happy Soul;-;I love this game sooo much, but it's a little too fast paced, it's a co-op based game definetely, but everybody can solo it without really any consequences besides being over powered which doesn't happen in tis game too much. The game has amazing features such as mods, i was once playing with a new bow and thought: You know? They really need to buff this thing, and then i thought: I really need to buff this thing, because you can do that! You can apply damage bonuses and different reload times and all these awesome things to you're sentinels weapons and warframe that makes them really unique! You dont have to pay to get cool weapons and warframe, sure it takes 12-32 hours, but in the end you dont pay real money for 2 weapons you may or may not like. This game is so amazing, it's free 2 play so if you're trying to decide whether or not to get it, GET IT! It's F2P and friggin' awesome! Good work Digital Extremes, you did good, -Waffle
Highmax;-;Free to Play Shooter, but not Pay to Win. The game will hook you on. Register at https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=5264908f1a4d801521000161 for free booster.
hkl;-;Very god gaem. Oenly bad think is money needed.
xWxUnforgivenxWx;-;Warframe is pretty tight
Maligkno;-;Best coop shooter game out there, i dare you to say otherwise.
Loki;-;Very poor f2p model as getting things that cost money are very expensive, HOWEVER if you do put the time or money into this game it is easily the best free to play game out there.
elmmoBunny *{ST}*;-;i ing love this game. no one will understand except those who ing also love this game. its epic. more plz. more creative expulgence into radiant game playable.
=MLT=St3vo42;-;i deeply love this game... and if you wanna be freinds on it freind request me on it!!!!! st3vo42
Mawile;-;Thouroughly enjoyable from start to finish (although there isn't really a finish), Warframe offers the kind of addicting gameplay where you know what to expect, and are still enthralled by it at the same time. The game is constantly updated with new content and fixes for some of the game's glitches and gameplay issues. The staff are very responsive to the wants and needs of the community, and they do a great job with it. Overall 8/10
Sheath;-;The mobility in this game is insane. The ability to flip around, wall run, climb, jump over, and jump off just about every object in the game is awesome. Good for all play styles. Whether you're a stealth player, or a run in guns blazing player, Warframe can accommodate.
LEMON CHICKEN (Tommy);-;For me, Warframe is one of the best Free-2-Play Games in Steam. By the way, it is a Sci-Fi Third Person Game which offers a lot of entertainment. Not only featuring a lot of different missions it has also a unbelievable big number of different weapons. You don't even need to fight with guns, you can also use many different swords, bows, crossbows and a lot of other weapons. And as I said, it's Free-2-Play, so take the time to have a look! 7/10
Bread;-;It's ok for burning a little bit of time. Faceted enough to hold your attention.
TheBeardedBat;-;Needs more explosions and lasers. Would vomit out of joy again. 69/10 IGN
Rouge;-;(    ) It's pretty good.
Vanguard ON3;-;I highly recommend this game... If your looking for a stratergy game with teamwork or a 3rd person shooter with a difference. This is it! In my opinion this is the best F2P mmorpg out there. With beautiful graphics (even on lowest settings) and little to no lag you will be able to wall jump over fire and headshot Grineer in the face while idk its raining and theres a huge background with an endless horizen... If your looking for weapon customization then theres plenty. from cosmetics to upgrades you can change the dps the accuracy and other weapony stats with mods you pick up from the environment. While you can buy weapons with in game special currency you can build your weapons with blueprints which require materials. This game is not P2W as it requires stratergy, guile and teamwork (unless your lone wolfing it) to complete any level, not just the biggest gun. For some though they may find stealth dull, so you can enter a room guns blazing! with a multitude of different playstyles accompanied by Warframes wich is you as a character. there are a few (20ish) and each one different in size background and abilities! I recommend this game and would give it 21/20, 11/10, 70/69 topmarks!
[HG] BlueSammy!;-;I do recommend this game for people its a fun game that you can play with friends and just have fun and also ITS FREE!
Sidiaku;-;Warframe? Love this game! Combat techniques are flawless and easy to learn with some combos on the way. Shop system is easy to browse and wonder through to buy anything you want. And all weapons are unique in their own capable way. Same with characters, they have their own abilites and can do whatever needed in your desire if you can play them well. Gameplay is not as repitive as their are different; Enemies Maps Gamemodes Any much more. Already starting loving this game when I started playing the tutorial. Has a seamless story line that is fun to hear through and you don't want to skip any cinematics because the voices for Lotus and many other characters are so well organized and thought out. The developers did an amazing job making this game, outstanding performance for a 'Free To Play' genre. As I'd love this as many other people who have commited more time in Warframe, there is only ONE problem that I've seen. The shop system is a bot overpriced. Don't you think the same? Well something that I shouldn't be complaining about. Play this game, and love it
Drunk Jesus;-;This game has had me hooked on 3 seperate, 3 month long occasions. The only reason I ever turn away from it is because the friends I play with stop playing. You NEED to be with friends to fully enjoy this game althought a cheeky farm run when no one's looking doesn't do any harm. With a metric ton of customisation, weapon types and upgrades, this game fulfills my every desire. Many people bash it for the slightly glitchy moments but I really respect the devs for how far they've gotten. If I had one issue it would be that plat (bought currency) is too damn high in terms of price and they really need to bring that down and the F2P elements up if they want to keep the majority interested. Last little thing, if you do get Warframe god damn add me as I've got no one to play with.
Gamem;-;(Psst. While you read this, Start downloading this game!) The amount of fun you can have with this is rediculous. It is free to play. 99% of the items you can "buy" can also be crafted instead, so you can be 100% free to play, but with limited inventory space. Its still really really fun to play, with it even being BETA! The graphics are amazing, as is the gameplay. The devs for this game are the best, as they know exactly what the gamers want when it comes to updates. They actually listen to suggustions. Even thought there are a few bugs, It is a very very good game with a ton of potental I plan to see happen! EDIT: A while now since trading has been added, you can be 100% free to play with max space and all cosmetic items. You can farm for parts and sell them for plat in game, thus allowing you to buy everything cosmetic, and inventory space.
Nozomi Ai;-;Warframe aka bugframe. The game where bugs are everywhere and and a place where you will grind a lot material for equipment. You will spend lots of time trying to do the same level, the same boss just to get that one freaking ITEM TO GET THAT ING EQUIPMENT! I strongly recommend this game for the people: who have lots of time willing to invest doing the same thing over and over just to get that one item that is so special until when you get it, It's not even special anymore. But not for the : who have a life have something else to do will not get bored doing the same stuff over and over again.
RaZe200$ to spend on tf2;-;Great game for ninja lovers (like me) The Parkour system's a bit glitchy but ok 80% free 20% p2w Good weapons 9.1/10 keep up the good work
XelaA.J;-;A very slick third person shooter. The gameplay is smooth and very well done. Graphics are excellent. The story (if there is one) gets rather repetetive but the extent of the character customization seems to hold a lot of promise. Somewhat lacking in cover mechanics although overall a very nice game.
Let Me Sleep;-;Not Bad
Skipper;-;This game is just awesome, check my hours played (and still counting). If you want a FREE boost register at this link: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=54e49007384632934934b7bd It will give you 7 days affinity (experience) boost.
Zamolxe;-;You are supposedly a space ninja but the fact that stealth is optional and using high explosives and wide area explding skills is a way of life you think the game might loose some points. Guess again ! :D
Raptor;-;Basically the best F2P MMO shooter nowdays with decent graphics, original design, fair donation politics(everything apart from cosmetics can be farmed without donations) and regular updates with new contents. p.s. game about space ninjas in distant future, what else did u ever want?
FuckBoy_Green;-;It's so good i can't even sign in
[nWo] Sidro;-;Oh, so I heard you want to know the definition of insanity? Well... play this game. Don't forget your real life, by the way.
yuehuanyu.ok;-;A very impressive free game
Crimreaper;-;Love the graphics, gameplay and story! Plus with being able to play with other people that are not a&#holes makes it even better! I recommend this game to everybody I know and more!
TRIPL3 CATS;-;its better than any other free game
Neko-Kun!;-;the game is not as exiting in the start... but when you get further, then it's really good in my opinion.
Ownchip;-;warframe best frame
Vault Boy;-;I could have had friends, but I found this game. I could have gotten high, but I found this game. ANND KNOW I KNOW WHY! (Why man?) Cause I found this game, cause I found this game, cause I found this gaaame! I could of got laid, but I found this game. I could of moved out, but I found this game. I could of gotten a job, but I found this game. Now I know why! Cause I'm livin' with me mum, she's paying $200 every week!
Makoto;-;It's a fun grind with friends. I wouldn't recommend it if you'd want to mostly solo though.
433;-;A spectacular journey into the space with the combination of guns, bunch of guns, melee weapons, different perks & skills, various bosses and maps. You also can't deny the effort on graphic quality and the character concept. In a list of Free to Play games, this is one of the musts. 9/10.
Shiron;-;It's ok
The Betrayed;-;Dropped out of the world through an elevator while some edgy prick was screaming bloody murder at me. I have been falling for hours and have yet to even glimpse the bottom of this world. Please send Help.
Zeonic;-;This is one of my favorite games, it could easily be sold instead of free to play. Amazing graphics, good controls, good gameplay make this game absolutely amazing
Dawn Of Fallout;-;Warframe is alot of fun best played with friends. 3rd person shooter with powers and a good melee system (well now anyway). This game is awesome the things i like best are the amount of warframes to pick from the melee system and the devs they update alot and release hotfixes as soon as they can.Warframe is free to play but i see it as pay to have more fun in the end though you support a great dev team and show them you love the work they are doing. 9.5/10 Best free to play game IMO
ALI;-;I Have Oberon And Enjoy The Game Because Is Easy For Me When I Use My Ulti wave Or Map Is clear :D I love WARFRAME & DOTA2 Notice = > :::::(Dont go phobos planet more because , 3 brother come and ing u )::::: GOOD LUCK
jmed;-;so it's like you jump around n  and you're a ninja but really you are a robot so 2\10
[Speech 30] No;-;Very cool, futuristic enviorment. crippled by samey, repetive, gunplay and lots of grinding. 7/10 Ninja's Play Free
SolarContract;-;Great game, very enjoyable whether with friends or going solo. With tons of planets to visit and weapons to obtain you can put many hours into this game. Having a great community and amazing developers that are always adding new things it's hard to loose interest. I highly recommend this game.
Nakamura Yoshitoki;-;Very enticing game. I enjoy the gameplay and customization. It is a little lacking in the story, but that was helped somewhat in the latest update. strongly recommend for people looking for co-op fun with friends
ChaosHybrid;-;Command a highly armed and extremley dangerous Warframe as you cut, shoot, and leap through a variety of levels and enemies! Take on the overwhelming power of the Grineer! Cut down the poweful legions of the Corpus! Fight off the rampant Infestation! With a variety of Warframes ranging from Sonic Abilities to Gravitational Control, the possibilities are limitless!
SouthBi4ch;-;great game
Cozy Pyro;-;Great game. Though it's RNG galore, it perfectly combines the space 3rd person shooter that mass effect had and adds parkour skill for a fast paced high action game. 9/10 EDIT: And if that doesn't sell you, Valkyr has a nice booty.
Tiger;-;Oh God. Great game. You come in, you do NOT come out.
#Happy Eid;-;The game has beautiful and explicitly to the thing I liked is the stealthy , moving, graphics and stages
Dhan;-;Its a great game. Nice Graphic & no need high spec PC U Must play this game !
toast;-;This game is one of the best free to play games I've played. Get it.
CommanderHusky;-;Although it says I have barely played 6 hours I have clocked in 100+ hours of gameplay but only recently started using the launcher from Steam. I recommend this game for people who like 3rd person sci-fi shooter MMOs, but prepare for grinding, grinding and more grinding to level up your mastery which in turn allows you to wield and use amazing weapons such as a laser rifle. You don't really need friends to play this game although it's largely co-op, you can just press play and enter a squad on the level you want to play or just solo it! I do recommend though that you have the required hardware especially returning users since they have revamped the graphics requiring a stronger pc (but not really anything past mid-enthusiast level builds are needed)
drey;-;Fun game with friends but super grindy and repetitive. Eventually got burned out on it.
AIDS;-;The game is alright for people who like PVE. You can play in a squad of no more than 4 people. There is a fair variety of missions Large ammount of guns and customization options Everything than can be purchased on the market with real money can be found and crafted in the game with hardwork and luck. There is even some things money cant buy. PVP lacks something fierce. There is literally no point to it. The PVP in this game lacks the feeling of just completely obliterating your oponent. There is no real strategy and it just feels like a cheap CoD arena. If youre looking for a PVP game. turn around this is not it.
Near;-;Warframe is game that makes other FPS look inferior, it's supposedly set in the future, where Tenno Soldiers fight Grineer Marines, for absolutely no unkown reason ; possibly the soverignity of the solar system. The game is also supported by microtransactions via steam. DLC from the game is ridiculous, the more you pay, the more stronger and better you are, but unless you actually put in time and effort to get the same results as the p2winners. Overall, Warframe can be naturally seen as a fps and p2w game, this game actually seemed more new, unlike the other modern-day fps like black ops. Although the game can be seen as a p2w, rarely any time and effort needs to be put in to acquire better eqiupment since materials for blueprints are fairly easy to get. I rate this 7/10 or 70%
BerserkingAce;-;Can be a very grindy game but the artstyle is amazing. Definitly give it a try if u want to be a space ninja!
BerserkingAce;-;Can be a very grindy game but the artstyle is amazing. Definitly give it a try if u want to be a space ninja!
Squilliam Wallace;-;Best Farming Simulator i've ever played. 10/10.
LOLzeeto;-;Ruined my life 10/10
The Timmigrant;-;Brock the Rock approves
[PTGH] Goofyman;-;If you like NInja, Sci-fi games then get this
Dange3z;-;ninjas in space and stuff
Orbifold;-;TLDR is included. Here's what happens to you in Warframe in chronological order: 1) WOOOOW the warframes' designs are so cool! The game must be just as cool! Hyped! 2) Um... ok? The enemies seem to have no brains... Why are they bumrushing towards me? Are they suicidal? 3) Oh, so I have to drip-feed XP to my gear so I can lvl up? Does this mean... 3) Yep. I have to obtain and rank up everything- warframes that don't fit my playstyle, guns which are hilariously unbalanced with the least fun to use weapons being the most powerful, melee which seem to serve as either cosmetic or utility and not damage unless I feel like grinding with atrocious RNG for certain stance mods which are for certain types of melee for days/weeks/months depending on RNG, sentinels just to get their weapons to mix and match, sentinel weapons, and four different types of goat-looking pets that cost ridiculous amounts of in-game currency for upkeep to sustain their lives if I want to reach the highest mastery rank I can. Well, screw that! I'm just gonna lvl up whatever I like only. Wait, things are MR-locked? Devs are planning to release MR-locked perks system? **** 4) Ok... I did it. I became a slave to this game and have ranked up all these things. What now? What's the endgame? Players: "Fighting endlessly stat-scaling enemies using OP gear with clan people. I think." Ok... it's not like the enemies get smarter or the gameplay becomes innovative... Is this it? Is this what I grinded for? I ranked up all those garbage so I can fight braindead enemies until the numbers become too ridiculous? And just wait for new mediocre weapons on Wednesdays? Is this really it? Yes. At this point, you are either: - A broken white knight with Stockholm's syndrome shilling out for Digital Extremes. See a thread on the forums containing even remotely negative statements about the game mechanics? They are immature whiners/complainers who need to just shut up and fall at the feet of the devs. Defend the RNG grind. Defend the point-and-click easymode slaughterfest of brainless hordes. Defend the mediocrity that bless this game. or - A confused or once-confused player wondering to himself/herself, "What was I thinking? What am I doing with my life?" TLDR This is a game that looks extremely cool (concept wise, not graphics) but has very little else. RNG (Random Number Generator service) based grind, cancer-inducing AI, the worst level-up system ever to be invented in the world of videogames (obtain and lvl up equipments for you to lvl up, most of which are utter garbage), no endgame (unless you like playing point-and-click slaughterfests with clan pepole) are just a few things that will inevitably make you question yourself "what am I doing with my life?"
Xmus Jaxon Flaxon-Waxon;-;I want to start out by saying that unlike a lot of reviews, this will be a critical examination of the game and its mechanics. I do not wish to bathe it in praise, nor cut it down at the knees. I wish only to be critical. It will be long and unlike all these joke reviews (lol I cut a guy in half 10/10) it will hopefully clarify just what this fairly complicated game is all about. I recommend this game, but let me say that my recommendation comes with many qualifications. It is these qualifications that have caused me to form a very strong opinion very early in my gameplay experience. Luckily, the developers of this game are quite intelligent and responsive, and are always looking for ways to improve the game. Warframe is a free to play, co-op, third-person action shooter on the Evolution engine, and it looks really pretty. That's about everything I need to mention about the engine, or it would be if the game wasn't so buggy. Fortunately, the developers have decent priorities when it comes to supporting the game and they fix their bugs about as often as can be expected. Some people will have really bad luck getting Warframe to run. When I started playing, I was not one of them. First impressions were good. Combat was reliably fun and the wall-running flippy combo movement serves to improve combat flow rather than feel arbitrarily shoehorned in like many other games with this kind of movement system. The premise is simple, do missions to unlock more missions to do, and while you're at it, experiment with some of the hundreds of unique weapons. How you go about this is my first huge qualification. Playing the game solo can be near impossible at times. You will want to join up with friends or random players on most missions because solo play has been specifically balanced to be un-enjoyable for players just starting out. Luckily, this isn't a deal-breaker, but it might make your first dozen hours a little frustrating. This brings me nicely to my next point, which is that the community of players is far too small. Most of the time you will be unable to find a squad willing to do your missions as most players are too busy farming specific bosses or events. Once again, this can be remedied by having friends who play with you, but a majority of missions are often ghost-towns in public matchmaking. The game isn't really driven by quests. There's only a few real quests in total, and they mostly serve as story expansion or advanced tutorials for mechanics you probably couldn't figure out without some outside intervention. In fact, the game is so poorly explained sometimes that I found myself guessing what interface buttons did on occasion and being completely surprised when they did something else entirely. Luckily, the developers are making large stride in improving the quality of life in this game, and unlike most free to play developers *cough cough, Planetside 2, cough* they actually listen to their playerbase and make attempts to assuage the largest complaints. You also don't level up in the traditional sense. Leveling up only increases your pool of available mod points for the piece of equipment that leveled up. You place mods on your equipment, keeping in mind the limited capacity, and you try to be efficient about it. Upgrading mods is yet another process whose intricacies are lost on anyone not paying careful attention. You'll want to keep a few good weapons and make them even more powerful through special items completely earnable without need of real life money purchases. Regardless, all equips cap out at level 30, and you'll want to swap out to another weapon once you do because leveling up weapons is the fastest way to level up your profile's mastery rank which unlocks further items, weapons, trades and other things. So once you've wrapped your head around all of that, recall that this is a free to play game, meaning the developers have to make some money somehow. Aside from aesthetic purchases, the marketplace sells additional slots for weapons and warframes, meaning you start out with very few slots. This isn't unreasonable, but my logic is they wouldn't limit the amount of slots you could have if this was a pay up front 60 dollar game. So where the free to play model loses me is where it costs more in the long run to get the same amount of gameplay from a free to play game versus a pay to play game. Luckily, any decent player can earn additional slots by trading uncommon and rare items found in-game. But you won't need to constantly buy slots, you get your weapons very slowly anyway. Most weapons have to be crafted, and after you grind the needed ingredients, the weapon takes 12 to 24 hours to assemble. My biggest complaint lies in the current mechanics of Kubrows. While playing, you'll get a quest to get a space dog bat thing to assist you in combat. When you pay out the nose for the required blueprints, grind the materials, grind more money to make the items, grind until you get an egg, wait 4 to 5 days for the thing to mature, you will be rewarded with a companion that literally slowly dies. No, you read that correctly. While it sits in your spaceship, your space doggity will slowly die, and the only way to reverse this is to buy health injectors for 75000 credits for a six pack. This is nothing short of space highway robbery. Most players who find this out immediately regret getting the dog thing, and when a majority of players regret a gameplay element, you know something has gone horribly wrong. The worst part is they also sell robot companions that are armed with guns, don't require upkeep, and cost less in the long run. It really hangs a giant question mark over the point of owning a bat-dog. This isn't the only poorly-received mechanic. Sometimes, you'll attract the mark of an AI controlled bounty hunter by killing a high-value target. They have a slim chance to show up in the middle of one of your missions and fight you. This sounds good on paper, but in order to even have a chance against them you need to have multiple high level players with maxed out weapons with very specific kinds of damage. It turns what could have been a thrilling raid boss into an arbitrary mission failure most of the time. So yes, play this game. Play through the prologue and if you're liking what you see so far, continue playing it if you can do the following: - Ditch your space doggity in cryo sleep - Pretend the bounty hunters do not exist (just alt + F4 your game when they show up and you have no possible way of combating them) - Find reliable friends to help you with the most difficult mission modes and events - Seriously, the bounty hunters will just ruin your fun 90% of the time, when you get in-game emails from them just hit the delete button while making a dismissive farting noise - Handle the grind, yes, there's going to be grind, but at least it's more fun than most
Toastaroony;-;Would recomend for those lookign for a casual but challengeign PvE fights. Although it does turn into a grind-a-thon later on, First encountering the stalker and the G3 for the first time is scarey and exciteing.
Cool Pup Gaming;-;very cool game definetly better than cod in my opinion but for some reason when I downlaod it the next day it disappears from my library.
Ludditz;-;So. Warframe. It's pretty good. Hence the ~200 hours I've spent on the game. I'm going to do the lazy-man's review: PROS AND CONS! :D Pros: The game looks pretty damned nice Fast and responsive controls Most weapons have a good feel to them A LOT of content to explore A handful of mission types to try New content is being added pretty regularly A fair cash-shop model, for the most part (will address it at the end) Cons: Some have had performance issues, usually around patch-time I've heard A few weapons do feel incredibly underwhelming to use Most of the levels do looks relatively same-y, with environmental variations on later planets Grinding is the name of the game Grinding for materials can be a complete chore early-on Grinding gets mentioned again because grinding So, despite the game being relatively grindy and repetitive at times, I've spent hundreds of hours playing the game. Why? Because I can drop-kick a guy in the face, spin around with my sword, and make his arms fly into the sky, then blast his friend in the face, while lighting a guy in the distance on fire, all in one fluid attack. YEAH. Those moments happen with such an absurd level of frequency, it's almost like the most bizarre anime and kung-fu movies tied together with a sci-fi film.. and it works superbly! I will say, some people are put off when first starting the game, because they see all these cool items in the cash shop and when I tell them how it'll take probably a few hours of grinding to make it, I usually hear "but I want it NOWWWWW!" It happens. Even so.. it's a fair model, in my eyes. You can spend time, save up, and make it yourself.. or spend time, earn money at your job or however you earn money (I'm not judging), and spend that to get what you want. So yeah, that's my meandering review. Give the game a shot if you get the chance and want to be a badass break-dancing cyborg-ninja in space, who is more or less a cyclone of death and destruction. What have you got to lose? The game IS free, after all! (I'm too lazy to come up with a good segue to finish my review. So uh... REVIEW, END!)
Ashiq;-;Played a little. It was fun and it still is (^.^)/
[Razgriz Leader];-;Very good for free action sci-fi. you can farm item and sell it to another player for Platinums.
Dexstiny;-;Probably the best Free-to-play game I have ever played. It's nicely balanced and in all the time I've spend playing, I never really felt like paying for additional features. It may take some time, but you can get (I believe) everything by just playing without having to ever pay a cent. I highly recommend playing with friends, but playing with randoms can also be fun for some time (especially for leveling.
Deathstroke;-;Best Destiny simulator on PC 10/10 AS
iceNEZZ;-;i cant play it  this game
The Doctor.;-;Well, here is my recommendation i guess.... "This game is amazing, it ... unlike most games I've recommended , actually deserves it's game title.It's so much fututistic war rather than a "Moder Warfare" type dealio." So theres my recommendation to this here awsum game!!! :D ENJOY IT!!!!!
AnTH | Proxiyyy go fuck urself;-;Warframe isn't like every FPS or Third Person Shooter Game, Its based in the Future or whatever the  its based in with some aliens or mutants or Something, Where you can use your sword to cut ppl in Half, Slice and Dice, Or shoot peoples heads off, Pew Pew. P.S Hugs 5$
Mad Moxxi;-;The game is interesting after 100 hours u play, and it gets extremely boring after 1000 hours. First 100 hours u getting acquintance with game. After all these years, game still suffers proper training course or sorta. I actually didnt realized that thing, before my friends started to play that game. And they've asked so many questions from me, i'd barely could answer all of them. In first steps the player have extremely helluva lot of guns, and they can't even decide what gun to test. Problem is, 95% of them are all useless. But nobody tells that in the end there is only 2-4 guns usually used. The question is - why bother adding crappy guns? After 1000 hours u realize the only thing that holds you - new guns and warframes. All u can do - level up yer waframe profile rank via exping all of these  guns and frames. They've shoulda call the game FARMFRAME - cuz that is all u do in here. All those -launchers and -shooters are crafted with many many resourses, and they need time to build. Reallife time. I aint talking about guns wich are 12-24 to build, but about warframes, which are 3d 12h to build in extremely good timing, and when ye have all recipes and ingridients. There is a kinda a lil storyline, but it's completely untracable for newcomers: "who da hell are tenno, why earth is overwhelmed with grineers, who are those creepy/funny corpus boys" nobody will tell. Anyway i would give "thumbs up" it got me interested for more than 1k hours, but i am very dissapointed in that game... after 1k hours =D
Westy;-;Ive had this game for a day and can hardly put it down. The game mechanics and controls are very good and allow for a emersive experience into the game. If you like third person action adventure shanking gameplay, get this game
();-;5 Reasons on why you should play Warframe 1. Ninjas 2. Explosions 3. Guns 4. Its free 5. ITS FREE
Suringfire;-;this is a good game for me because i like the combat system on it, the graphics and the animations of both the enemies and the warframes are good.
Winter Wonder Lulu;-;Atleast it's better than destiny :D
Haydos;-;One of the best free to play games
Nic The Legendary Drug Dealer;-;The new update is amazing. Play it and your world will forever change.
The Blue Salamander;-;Nice story a like it, but obvious you gotta play the whole game for the rest of it... anyway my stuff towards this game. Now it offers you some PvP, PvE co-op,(tons of missiosns on different planets).. and intense shooting, I mean EVERY mission has got plenty of waves to keep you entertained, VERY fun. *SOME complaints and bugs/things that need to be fixed* ------------------------------------------------------------ Yes i understand this is a BETA game its bran new, and they've done a good job, gameplay is perfect right now for me (I need to play more if i want to find any faults in gameplay). So cuz its BETA its got some unfreindly  going on. A BIG problem i find is that you cant play from steam, (when I try to, play from steam it downloads and on finishing says, some content of  cannot be downloaded on our servers) ANYWAY it only works if u download from website. Can anyone report that if YOU experience it, BETA games need YOU to report problems so then it ends from BETA. AAAANYYYYWWWAAAYYYY, so thanks for reading this load of  i just wrote, i wasted my time but at the end i hoped anyone will benefit somewhat(?) from this. comment is always appreciated! ........... ...................__ .............//'...'/` ........../'/.../..../......./\ ........('(.......... ~/'...') .........\.................'...../ ..........''...\.......... _. ............\..............( BRO... NO REALY I MEAN IT TY FOR GIVING A  ABOT DIS TEXT! .........:*.. ....................DAMN i added too much  for a JUST ONE review 9this is my first too! Dx9 ....
[mR] Axehacker32;-;Pretty much one of the best games I've ever played, but that is LARGELY due to personal preference. This game is extremely grindy, you will spend loads of time grinding for rare parts and resources. Keep that in mind. For actual gameplay, it is very smooth and the graphics are beautiful, All the races are well designed with plenty of variants (some really annoying, like nullifiers). There is a tactical advantage to stealth, depending on what frame you play as. Some frames are weak in terms of tankiness but can kill pretty much anything in the way if they don't get hit. Others *cough Trinity cough* can take literally any amount of damage and not die if you play it right. This is advanced modding though. See below. The upgrade system is really well done, using these special drops called mods. They essentially upgrade the stats and powers of your frame and weapons. You have 8 mod slots, and a polarity system so you can make your slots more efficient if they match up with the mod. When you first craft a weapon or frame, it will have no mod capacity, which you need to install mods. As you rank it up by using it in matches, it will gain mod capacity, allowing it to become exponentially stronger. The current strongest weapon in the game per shot is the Paris Prime, which through the polarity system, very rare mods, and lots of time, you can basically one-shot any enemy. I recommend finding the parts for one as soon as you become comfortable with the thought of using a bow against massive amounts of enemies that can, late-game, oneshot almost all players. The advantage to it is that you can do the same to them. The trading system is good, but needs some changes I think. The in-game currency that players can buy or trade for from other players is Platinum, which is used to either trade players for items you want, or to buy things from the official market. The problem with this is that players can essentially get any Prime gear they want if they pay, when really it is meant to be as a last resort if that one item you simply must have isn't dropping for you. There are loads more things in the game, because DE does actually add a lot of content every couple months. Companions, Archwing, Tactical Alerts, Boss fights, and even more. Expect large updates every 1-2 months with bug fixes and lots of new content to satisfy you. If you have no patience and no time, don't play this game. You will either rage quit from not getting the things you want quickly, or become addicted and then lose control of your life. I put 100 hours into this game over the course of 4 months, and took a break from gaming. When I came back.. I put another 400 in 6 months. I do recommend this to those who enjoy playing with friends though. Teamwork is one of the most major aspects of Warframe, and without a good team it is guaranteed that you won't make it far.
Cloaker;-;Did I ever tell you what the definition of insanity is? Insanity is doing the exact... same ing mission... over and over again expecting...  that you want to drop/show up... That. Is. Warframe. The first time somebody told me that, I dunno, I thought they were ting me, so, I keep farming. The thing is... He was right. And then I started seeing, everywhere I looked, everywhere I looked all these ing , everywhere I looked, doing exact same missions... over and over and over and over again thinking "this time is gonna be different" no, no, no please... This time is gonna be different, I'm sorry, I don't like... The way... ... you are reading this review... Okay, Do you have a ing problem in your head, do you think I am ting you, do you think I am lying?  you! Okay?  you!... It's okay, man. I'm gonna chill, tenno. I'm gonna chill... The thing is... Alright, the thing is I reviewed this once already... and it's not like I am ing crazy. It's okay... It's like pressing 4 in Draco, Ceres. Did I ever tell you the definition... of insanity?
wartec77;-;NINJA OWN THE GALAXY GO!!! NINJA GO!!! THIS IS WARFRAME!!! AWESOME!!!
SoulPunch;-;Play Ninjas for Free,! Enough Said.
Obey!;-;This is the best Scify game i have ever seen, the graphics are awsome, i really recomend it, and it's free. It just take 3 gbs, but is still awsome, i don't think anybody could give a negative to this game, YOU SHOULD GET IT NOW.
Crvsad3r;-;This game is awesome, free to play, explosions epic powwers what more can you want?
Test 123;-;I downloaded Warframe, now look at me. 6 hours into the game, I'm already grinding harder than coffee beans in a grinder.
Wackerel;-;I barely played this. Good fun though.
MA347612890GT4078579132R74;-;Warframe: The game about rocket launcher wielding space ninjas. So much potential for awesome. Unfortunately this game just constantly shows the problems in random number generators. Hunting for specific mods, weapons and Warframes for months on end that you may never get does get irritating after a while. Currently all there is to do in this game is grind. Then grind some more after that. There isn't really any end game, nothing to do once you've sunk 500+ hours into the game and have your preferred loadout. I really like this game but until it has that something to keep you going once you have everything you want, it's hard to keep playing it. Grinding the same missions on the same tilesets over and over or attempting to aim for leaderboards that refresh every week on Defense or Survival gets old quite fast. Also try to find people to play with, grouping up with randoms will lead to frustration quite fast. That being said, it is space ninjas with rocket launchers. RNG is a thing in nearly all games, though some have ways to guarantee you'll get what you need, and hopefully adding some meaningful end-game isn't too far off. Might as well give it a try.
Dragon Guardian Vincent;-;Love it Rate it 10/10 Fun To Play alot of Action In Co-op and Single Play You Sould Come Join me ! :D
KragTheDark;-;A unique take on FPS and stealth gampelay. Highly reccomend to fans of either genre!
XedoK;-;Progressing through the game by doing same  over and over again, expecting you'll get some rare mod. When you get that rare mode, you do the same  over and over again to get more rare mods. It sounds linear and boring but it's not. They update the game pretty ofter, and when they update you can do same   over and over again expecting you'll get that new rare mod. 10/10 Would do over and over again.
FranLegon;-;i have 250 games in my library and i'm playing a free to play. that's how good this game is
INTERROBANG;-;This game has given me so many hours of fun. The co-op campaign is lengthy and exciting but at limes can get repetitive. The keys add replay-ability and the mastery ranks of each weapon give me something to aim for. I'll probably play this game for many more hundreds of hours before I'm done.
lxMattAranxl;-;If you want a game that's close to Dead Space (without the jumpscares), shooting & slashing enemies to pieces (yes... all in good gory fun), or just want a good excuse to raise hell, this game will fit the bill! Many weapons to choose from, even if you don't want to spend a cent, you can build premiem weapons and warframe with blueprints found in levels. Plus the many modifications to choose from (found in drops), can can create a deadly weapon to blast a enemy's head off (literally)! Though, if teaming up with others Online mode, expect to run... a lot, considering they rush through levels. Happy hunting! >:)
I Wish I was vvvortic;-;So much depth and great community/Developer support,
[FALC] WhiteYAKSHA;-;Download it now !!!!!! The game is awesome the graphics the missions everything till now is awesome . It has some bugs but no problem ,
DRG Conker;-;This Free To Play game is a very nice and well done game that has a nice story and' clear cut' gameplay with the diffeent ways to play the game i am finding it a very enjoyable experience. The only problem I find is the importance of microtransactions to get the best weapons and warframe but the game is very enjoyable non the less. I would recommend this game to anyone who likes any shooters because this has almost everything a diverse shooter needs.
MikeTheMugger;-;A mind numbing 3rd person shooter with rpg elements. 6.5/10 watch my review for more: http://youtu.be/Bvf5cGHMLnE?list=PLaFOFuH1JWgLCwi0LGyHpSn1tnNB3Ceol
#SirJr175 [TTT];-;"Do I reconmmend this game? Sure." was my original "review" of this awesome game. If you like good PvE, RP, and Flight-Sims then this might just be for you.
Zeronium;-;It's pretty good.
Logress;-;Fantastic. One of the best F2P shooters I have ever played, and one of the most rewarding.
Sandman;-;Space Ninjas..what else could you need? 10/10 on Space Ninjas 10/10 on Ninjas in Space 10/10 Ninjas Space in 10/10 In Space Ninjas \m/>.<\m/
Captain_Morning_Wood;-;can use ninja skills to troll 10/10 would play again
Solid Snake;-;Pretty in' cool for a free to play.
Red Smep;-;I could be doing better things with my time.
Mr.Mixxx;-;Well i saw some rule 34 of this game. Was pretty good so i installed the game after my friend no injustice stated,"I will suck your  if u install warframe." soooo he did i made him clean up the mess. Than i started to play it. I did not expect it to be good but was pleasently mistaken. This is a real fun game a must have for steam casuals like yourselfs. 10/10 all female warframes have nice asses
Crimson Heart;-;Good day guys. Here is a quick review for warframe. The game is a 3rd person shooter/hack and slash game. Its gameplay is fun and fluid, especially the ability to ninja run on walls. The game's graphic is pretty good. Only thing i dislike about this game is its grinding but thats because its an mmo game xD
SHAZAM!;-;Warframe is a F2P third person action shooter that succesffuly destoryed myself and the friends around me lifestyle slowly and it was worth it, instead of studying and doing homework at our school's cafe we decided it would be more fun to play warframe on our crappy college internet connection. I'm thankful that somehow i passed all my college courses barely....... Steps to ruin your school life and life in general 1) Download Warframe 2) Play warframe 3) Don't Study or do Homework 4) Become a "NEET" 5) Dont leave the house unless its for food This method of ruining your social life and your life and general works it happened to me and my friends. P.S I promised my parents I would study this semester
SHAZAM!;-;Warframe is a F2P third person action shooter that succesffuly destoryed myself and the friends around me lifestyle slowly and it was worth it, instead of studying and doing homework at our school's cafe we decided it would be more fun to play warframe on our crappy college internet connection. I'm thankful that somehow i passed all my college courses barely....... Steps to ruin your school life and life in general 1) Download Warframe 2) Play warframe 3) Don't Study or do Homework 4) Become a "NEET" 5) Dont leave the house unless its for food This method of ruining your social life and your life and general works it happened to me and my friends. P.S I promised my parents I would study this semester
Lucifer Qen;-;i love this game when im bored i go right to warframe
Waifu Trash;-;Warframe is an amazing free to play that bends the regular free to play model by allowing you to get literally everything free in-game, even cosmetics that you would expect to pay for with real world money. Quite an amazing game with a great story and lore too!
Matrixmuse;-;Awesome co op Third Person Shooter. Note : Think of warframs as Mech suits.. just for this review.. there is a rather tangled lore behind this game I am not going in to for spoilers sake. Quick over view.. Space ninjas. Yes that picture is actually what they look like in game! Pros, OMG it looks awesome for a space game, All the Warframs and weapons look like they could be 3d printed right now. Co Op is very fun, Almost like Borderlands 2 but less of that slap stick humor Some what customizable You can change colors for your warframe and your weapons, Though the color choices are small to start with and unlock more as you level you will still have to spend real monies to get more colors. This being the only thing you can't unlock in the game. Play style flexibility So far it has your basic flexibility, until you unlock other warframs. So close range, mid range and distance. My current load out is Bo staff, shrunken, and bow and arrow. Three starter warframes.. Tank / close range Distance long range with lighting and a jack of all trades. This will expand in to a wide range of warframes including one that is support and one that is Healer. Pyro / frost / gravity driven warframs Exploration This game rewards you for exploring.. doo it .. free running is your friend ninja run up walls and across gaps.. find the thing. Con's FTP, Grind to win.. Or you can just PTW. yes it is a PTW game. This can be a real turn off for a lot of people. But being in Beta maby they will add a way to earn currency in game Its in Beta.. Bugs, incomplete animations, but hay its in beta it is free PS4 vs PC So far it is sported on two platforms but they can not cross play yet. Just like ESO it is not yet ready to talk cross server. Difficulty scaling may be a tad harsh. I am playing Solely with Kit, so we are 2 manning it ( can up to 4 man it) I think if we were soloing it it would be much harder. This may be to nudge people into paying for upgrades with currency, and make grinding harder. Playing coop we are fine, just noticing my bow (sniper weapon) is no longer 1 shooting mobs. Learning curve This game has a bit of a learning curve... the in game tutorial doesn't really tell you how to do things it mostly just point and says figure it out. This only make a HUGE difference with the mods. Fusing the right cards, can make some unbelievably powerful mods.
Hayzen;-;A game about Space Ninjas, Weapons, Powers and, of course, Parkour! Totally reccomended if you wanna have some good time One of the best things about this game, is that it's COMPLETELY FREE Yes, there is microtransactions, that you can use only if you want to, because everything can be obtained without wasting 1 penny! 10/10
Tau22;-;It's space ninjas, does more need to be said? Fluid combat with an emphasis on awesome acrobatics and hyper-cool weaponry. More than a dozen different warframes, each with their own play style, await you within. So what are you waiting for? Grab your space katana and go cut up some nasties!
Moonman;-;Like Destiny and Mass Effect 3 rolled into one, except it's good. 11/10
I kiss Goats;-;In the grim future of the 41st millenium there is only Grind! This aside it's quite a fun game, beautiful and stable, and the devs regularly add new things. I liked it.
Taco-Kun;-;Pretty Much, Ninjas with Space Guns in Space Suits, fighting Space Zombies with Space guns in Space. Everyones Dream Game.
Yuriqa;-;Great game and a lot fun :)
[NG]Mama_Baer;-;One of the greatest free-to-play third person ninjas in space shooters you'll ever get your hands on. Although still in beta from the time of this recommendation, this game has tons of potential and will leave you wanting more. I strongly advise you also find a group of friends to play with as well, seeing as how it makes the whole experience that much more fun and entertaining for everyone.
Matrixmuse;-;Awesome co op Third Person Shooter. Note : Think of warframs as Mech suits.. just for this review.. there is a rather tangled lore behind this game I am not going in to for spoilers sake. Quick over view.. Space ninjas. Yes that picture is actually what they look like in game! Pros, OMG it looks awesome for a space game, All the Warframs and weapons look like they could be 3d printed right now. Co Op is very fun, Almost like Borderlands 2 but less of that slap stick humor Some what customizable You can change colors for your warframe and your weapons, Though the color choices are small to start with and unlock more as you level you will still have to spend real monies to get more colors. This being the only thing you can't unlock in the game. Play style flexibility So far it has your basic flexibility, until you unlock other warframs. So close range, mid range and distance. My current load out is Bo staff, shrunken, and bow and arrow. Three starter warframes.. Tank / close range Distance long range with lighting and a jack of all trades. This will expand in to a wide range of warframes including one that is support and one that is Healer. Pyro / frost / gravity driven warframs Exploration This game rewards you for exploring.. doo it .. free running is your friend ninja run up walls and across gaps.. find the thing. Con's FTP, Grind to win.. Or you can just PTW. yes it is a PTW game. This can be a real turn off for a lot of people. But being in Beta maby they will add a way to earn currency in game Its in Beta.. Bugs, incomplete animations, but hay its in beta it is free PS4 vs PC So far it is sported on two platforms but they can not cross play yet. Just like ESO it is not yet ready to talk cross server. Difficulty scaling may be a tad harsh. I am playing Solely with Kit, so we are 2 manning it ( can up to 4 man it) I think if we were soloing it it would be much harder. This may be to nudge people into paying for upgrades with currency, and make grinding harder. Playing coop we are fine, just noticing my bow (sniper weapon) is no longer 1 shooting mobs. Learning curve This game has a bit of a learning curve... the in game tutorial doesn't really tell you how to do things it mostly just point and says figure it out. This only make a HUGE difference with the mods. Fusing the right cards, can make some unbelievably powerful mods.
Cozy Pyro;-;Great game. Though it's RNG galore, it perfectly combines the space 3rd person shooter that mass effect had and adds parkour skill for a fast paced high action game. 9/10 EDIT: And if that doesn't sell you, Valkyr has a nice booty.
#Happy Eid;-;The game has beautiful and explicitly to the thing I liked is the stealthy , moving, graphics and stages
Dhan;-;Its a great game. Nice Graphic & no need high spec PC U Must play this game !
Tiger;-;Oh God. Great game. You come in, you do NOT come out.
trendy.scrumpy;-;It's like Farmville with guns
Arceus;-;first person game like this, not bad to play with your friends or even your girlfriend aint gonna hurt if you try this have fun with it
Moontouched-Moogle;-;It's ok
#1%hitcrit;-;Mesa takes 1 year to farm. Plez nerf. (Aside sometimes absurd grind the game is cool)
KingJak;-;Warframe is simply a TPS where you grind to get equipment that will let you to grind faster for even better equipment, etc...
landwhale;-;Combine Mass Effect with Diablo, add some ninjas, and Warframe is what comes out. Structured around 4-man instanced missions, Warframe has a large variety of map objectives with random secondaries being added during the mission. Overall, the randomization is pretty strong, piecing together gigantic levels that are easy to get lost in. Exploration is rewarded with rare mats, bonus cash, and EXP for all your equipment. The leveling system doesn't increase the stats of your gear but instead how many mods you can slot into your equip (and how strong); combined with a low level cap of 30 (for each gear piece), it's easy for new players to jump in while veterans are rewarded with stronger mods. Everything in the cash shop, apart from skins & colors, are purchasable in game or are craftable. My only major complaint right now is that the environment variety is a bit slim. Overall, Warframe is a well balanced third person shooter with tons of customization and replay value.
Lisol;-;Bought platinum, got banned till 2024 for hacking 10/10 would buy platinum again
No.;-;Let's be real. This is a review board, and you're here because you're trying to decide whether or not its worth your time playing this game. In any case, in terms of gameplay and graphics, it's pretty clear cut. This game has both bases rather covered. Great graphics and great gameplay, while not at AAA level. It's a free game, after all. But before you get this game, consider these points: 1. Are you an MMORPG fan. As in can you sink hundreds to thousands of hours into a single game, live with the blessings and the curses of RNGesus, and grind the same dungeons over and over again for hours on end to achieve the sweet taste of progress? 2. Are you interested in going in and asking for help from strangers, joining a clan, providing for that clan, and overall being an active player? Furthermore, do you have friends that can play with you? 3. Do you have tons of free time? 4. Are you fine with not ever being close to achieving endgame? 5. Do you realize that nearly everything within this game can be received for FREE? (It's rather hard to discern this when your Arsenal shows all these weapons that have cash prices on them, and I made the bad assumption that this game was going to be a P2W game, which it isn't) 6. Are you looking for an MMORPG with Shooter elements rather than vice versa? If you can answer yes to these questions, then jump right in. I've sunk 300 hours already, and plan to sink more. The community is one of the greatest if not the greatest, and the people you meet are almost always helpful, as long as you're not in the Trade chat where everyone is trying to make a profit and may be rude as hell. If you can't really say yes to the pointers above, I would suggest you look elsewhere and move along.
[NG]Mama_Baer;-;One of the greatest free-to-play third person ninjas in space shooters you'll ever get your hands on. Although still in beta from the time of this recommendation, this game has tons of potential and will leave you wanting more. I strongly advise you also find a group of friends to play with as well, seeing as how it makes the whole experience that much more fun and entertaining for everyone.
[NG]Mama_Baer;-;One of the greatest free-to-play third person ninjas in space shooters you'll ever get your hands on. Although still in beta from the time of this recommendation, this game has tons of potential and will leave you wanting more. I strongly advise you also find a group of friends to play with as well, seeing as how it makes the whole experience that much more fun and entertaining for everyone.
rsscourge;-;Good, but instead of pay to win, it is pay to get anything cool.
Trusty Patches;-;You grind for items, so you can grind more 10/10
Pixelshady;-;This game is soo good that destiny ripped it off
Eisotopius;-;its..its a ..woah good game man
Staid;-;There's no anime in this
Taylor Tots  Trading;-;This game is a third-person, pvp, pve, shooter type game where you develop your character, max that character, get a new character, max that character, find the most op character, max it out, max your weapon, find the most up weapons, max those out, then make a doge (kubrow). I can easily say doing all that takes time and effort, Or you can pay for it like a little . I would give this game an 7.5/10 due to the content it provides. -You can farm for items, which gets really repitive, but they put different maps in for the same mission so you can never really get to tired of it. -You can trade which makes somethings easier to get than others. -Characters are easily customizable as well as the assortment of weapons you can get. -The variety of missions always keeps things interesting. -The variety of character can satisfy everyone, there is a tank, a medic, a stealth character, and many more that fit the type of gameplay you want to have. -It is fun and exciting an think everyone should try it out. :D *Some of the bad things about the game are that you can pay to win, but you can get those items through time so I won't complain about that.
Samantha;-;alll i could say is that this game is worth the time downloading if you love WOW DIABLOIII or any RPG game like WOW this is the perfect game for you
Xafron Chi;-;Great game and it is free so give it a shot! You play as one of the Tenno and you use a Warframe (there are quite a few, but you get to choose one out of a few for free from the start). You take on various kinds of enemy factions (Grineer, Corpus, Infected) in different kinds of missions given to you by Lotus, more or less the leader of the Tenno, across many planets. You can unlock more planets as you accomplish certain goals. On top of that there is a place called the Void that is quite difficult and requires a key to enter (4 tiers of difficulty). In the void you have the potential to unlock special items only obtainable there that both look better and function better than their normal counterparts. These are "Prime" items. The combat is quite good and fast paced, and it's all in third-person. Though fairly straight forward, it isn't necessarily easy. You'll want to move around a lot which can take some getting use to (as a Tenno you can be very acrobatic). You have a health bar and a shield bar, as well as energy which is used up when you use your Warframe's skills. As you play you gather materials which allow you to build new weapons of which there are many types (primary, secondary, melee, and subtypes of those), as well as companions (sentinels which are floating little weaponized creatures, and kubrow which are a lot like dogs), and new warframes (basically your battlesuit) for you to use, which each have their own unique appearance and skills. There is also something called an archwing that allows you to do an entirely new kind of mission where instead of running around in a ship or on a planet, you can fly though space killing your enemies. Spaaaaaaaaaace. In addition to building things, you can get a lot of drops called Mods. There is a massive amount of different mods out there. Mods can be used to improve your Warframe, all of your weapons, and your companions. As you level your gear up you can equip more mods. You can also sell mods, fuse many mods into one to increase it's effect (best of the three options), or fuse many mods together to gain one random better mod. In addition to all of that you can buy quite a few cosmetic things as well. For your Warframe, your weapons, your companions, and even your ship Liset. Your ship Liset is quite important. It's your hub for access to the market, codex, syndicates, foundry, arsenal, and more. The game allows you to join or create a clan which gives you access to a clan dojo, where you can gain access to many useful things over time (there's even a sentinel, the Djinn, that can only be gained by owning a clan dojo and building a bio-lab). You build various rooms with materials, and anyone in the clan can contribute. There also are factions you can join that are either broken off from the Grineer, Corpus and Tenno, or are something entirely unrelated to them. These factions are the Steel Meridian, Arbiters of Hexis, Cephalon Suda, The Perrin Sequence, Red Veil, and New Loka. They all have different standings with each other (Allied, Opposed, and Enemy) and you can join as many as you want. By helping them, you can gain special rewards only obtainable through them. However be aware that be helping some, your reputation can go down with others. And by joining syndicates, there is a chance that very difficult enemies can spawn in and attack you. There is also another powerful enemy that has a chance to spawn in and attack you called the Stalker. This enemy is attracted by killing bosses. The more bosses you kill, the more of a chance it has to spawn in future missions. Great game. Download for free and get your friends in on it. There's much more I could discuss but I've already written a massive amount, so find out for yourself!
better off dead;-;I like it thats why I recommend pls
better off dead;-;I like it thats why I recommend pls
Demon Sakana Kasai [TC];-;too many weapons! awesome warframe styles! and many things you can do with your friends. ^^
Kartan_ing;-;grindy, but nice
|LocalRetard_;-;There are ninjas Its free What more could u want
Katzumoto;-;This game needs your wallet.. And you must feed it your wallet....
TacTical NightFury;-;nice, but needs a graphics preset to make it no more graphicly intense than TF2
Swegbegs;-;This game is sorta like a roller coaster. You start playing and the majesty of the whole lays before you and you want to continue playing to watch it all pan out. Eventually however it comes down to you solely looking forward to playing with a new weapon so you farm for it, pretty decent farming that doesnt get too old, but the mobile-game style wait times on builds for weapons, gear, and warframes make it rapidly annoying. So you stop playing, you peaked quite some time ago now youre just done. Wait a few months, a year even, and all of a sudden you decide "hey I havent played this game in a while, why dont I see whats new?" Well good for you, you have some fun but you realize all the new warframes are like 10 times worse to get than the previous ones. However new game mechanics and flashy physx effects pull you back in after that little warframe hurdle. Even after a year the game manages to hold the same aesthetic of ninjas in space, but constantly expanding both the ninja and space mechanics. The only true downside I could find is that after recent updates the game runs worse for wear, but upgrading some computer specs and using a half decent computer can still make this game look a hundred fold better than other common games out there, If you're looking for whether or not you should try this out, I'd say go for it. Worse thing thatll happen is you waste an hour or two downloading and your computer just can't handle it. If it does work, you'll get more fun out of this than you will with 99% of other f2p games. Theres a reason this has sat at the top of the best f2p games list for so long. Go give it a shot if you haven't already.
[MPW] ColTeH;-;Do i recommend this game? Hell yeah i do. Great combat and movement. large selection of weapons and characters (frames) to build and/or buy. NO PAY TO WIN, Everything is obtainable from playing the game. though you can pay to skip and just have the items.. wheres the fun in that? Great Co oP game for 4players, lots of things to progress towards keeping you busy for hundreds of hours. THE VERY BEST SUPPORT OF ANY GAME I HAVE EVER PLAYED.... Any problems are VERY quickly patched out unlike alot of devs taking weeks to fix something they mess up these guys generally sort it in mins/hours sometimes a day or so and support tickets are always answered. for a free game... there isnt a better choice at the moment.
Icefrog's Personal Kappa;-;Awesome Shooter
Adam;-;This is a great game. Kind of boring by yourself, but if you have a few friends, get ready for countless hours of slaughter! Sweet abilities, sweet weapons and upgrades. I keep reading reviews where people whine about the cost of platinum. I have yet to spend a dime on this game and was able to get all the top end warframes, weapons, and mods. Selling parts for plantinum goes a long way. Every single thing in the game is achieveable with a little patience.
youruncleben;-;You have lived unitl you play this game
Nickstarship;-;I like stealing Platinum from little kids using their mom's credit cards. 10/10 Would Trade again. >Be me >Have Frost Prime Set >See someone buying Frost Prime Set >Say "Bruh I got chu 100% All American Frost Prime Set 200p" >He says "170p" >Say "Bruh I can do 170p But it would be 75% All American Frost Prime Set" >He Says Ok >Go To Trade >Put Up Frost Prime BP >Put Up Frost Prime Helment >Put Up Ember Prime Systems >Put Up Frost Prime Chassis >The Other 25% was a Chinese Ember Prime Systems >My face when I basically scammed a kid out of ~140p (   )
MMO--Gaming;-;> Is bored > Downloads Warframe > Plays Warframe > Abandons friends in a firefight > Gets a ship > Gets a gun > Grinds for 4 hours > Gets 5 XP 11/10 would grind all day for 5 XP again
Frillin;-;Warframe is among one of the best free to play games you can get...if you can run it. Even with my high end gaming laptop it still has lag issues. But besides that it's really fun to play. New content and updates/fixes are administered quite frequently and it has gotten more content since I first tried it when it came out. There always seems to be an event going on which makes it more fun to jump in and play. A word of advice...do not go and buy the weapons and Warframes. Why? Because it's more fun to gather the ingredients to make them. You can basically make any of the items (weapons, Warframes and sentinels) with blueprints...if they aren't on the market you'll eventually collect them. If you always wanted to know what it feels like to be a parkour ninja...this game is perfect. Otherwise...it's definitely worth a try anyway!
Totally Lemon;-;The general gameplay and experience was fun... while it lasted. The whole game gets tedious and players can easily buy their way to success, but that takes most of the challenge away. I've lost interest in this game, and so have many of the people that I personally know who played this game. My clan is dead and many more have gone quiet. Generally, Warframe now has a lackluster feel for me. I got used to the grinding, but DE just added more, and then buffed the grinding with little annoying paywalls  that honestly generate more challenge. Unfortunately, they nerfed across the board, so it became more difficult for non-paying players to effectively play. I can't imagine this game having any longevity. Im serious. I used to love the  out of this game, but now its just complete crap. As little money as I did spend on it (after 300+ hours of play) I feel cheated. Longtime players, founders, and vets alike have been leaving and/or disapproving of the game's recent turn of events. Discontent is all over the forums. DE has become heedlessly distant from their fan base and gamming community. I implore you to seriously consider NOT downloading this game.
Rachael;-;Cut a guy in half with an arrow... in space. 11/10
bilzerian for president;-;I absolutely love this game. Amazing graphics that run on my crap computer. If you're looking into a game to become addicted to, this is the one.
SkullDead864;-;Freakin' awesome game,ing incredible,awesome graphics,awesome characters,NINJAS!Again,freakin' awesome.20/10
Nub_Sub-Scorpion;-;EPIC Game being a assassin and a hunter and killer preety good iz gud play it naow or die in hole like Mine
LaiN;-;This game is probably my second favourite Free-to-play game, first one being Lord of the rings online but anyway, the thing I like about this game is that you dont have to pay for stuff in order to get good gear and get good at the game. If you dont pay, then you gotta grind, but to be honest, this game is all about grinding, and that's what makes it fun. The grinding is not too boring, and there wil be random alerts popping up every now and then and having good mods or blueprints as reward. This game also has modding, you can mod your warframe and weapons and make it stronger than ever before. Mods can be acquired in missions. This game also features a very good clan system, you can make a clan and start making your dojo(Your clan's hangout place) and then research weapons and what not. This game also features Pvp which i dont find too fun but yea this game is about Pve. It's a good third person shooter overall and the best thing is its free. AND the game's graphics is just epic. Play it play it play it play it
Fames Jranco;-;you can dropkick people
Abathur;-;warframe is an insanly fun third-person shoot based in the future. i am likely going to get months of gameplay into this game
WilliamSwagspeare;-;I used to have a life like you then i took warframe to the pc
Greed;-;Weeee this is alot of fun, but i veiw it like new age armored core...though this with actual online game player base. still not quite armored core hell nothing really is. but free to play dont be a weenie give it a go bet you have some fun.
Johnleth;-;If you are going online with friends this might be up your ally, because matchmaking is just painful in this game. A bunch of Software on your PC, even your internet provider, might collide with this game. And it can inhibit the player joining a game or volunteering as a host. That is even worse, when the host changes during a long pve-mission and some party-members are no longer compatible with the host; they are lost to the group and they lost their loot. Perpetually grinding for new gear. That or you'll have to open your wallet. This results in P2W. PVE, with it's repetitive missions and absent story, mostly exists to get you equipped for PVP, which on the other hand can only be beaten with a good non pug. It might be fun if you have good collegues, a very good connectivity and the best gear you can buy. Then the other players are just prey in PVP, or a nuisance in PVE. This leads to the paradoxon that the l33t wouldn't team up with n00bs but won't get decent matches either, because there is no satisfying matchmaking system. I strongly recommend playing with ingame-friends, then you might have fun, not because of the game but regardless of the game.
[SNF] Vlef;-;This is the end game https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yh7E6nT8vj0 Also it needs a new concept how to get prime parts https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hXn5dK4gYwA
Dr.HjGunter;-;This game is very fun! But i dont think its for everyone, it starts a little slow and to really have fun you would need some friends to play with! The game can also be a Grind fest but a good one at that! Some people may say this game is Pay2Win but they are very wrong! Every thing you see in the store, you can get in the game with a exception for the cosmetic items. There is several different Frames (Characters) to play as and many different weapons to fit any play style! Lastly Warframe is a game where you may never run out of things to do, im 1000+ hours in and there is still so much i need to get done! I recommend this game to everyone! Just play it! It's FREE!
PUNDUNGBOIS;-;day 99 still crashing randomly while doing void mission. DOGE/10 would crash again.
-BLR- R3L3N7L3S5;-;Praise RNGesus or die farming 9 out of 10 formas. Would waste platinum on them again.
ZFF-Skullcrusher;-;This is one of the best 3rd person games i have seen.It has got everything.Guns,swords and even powers.The only bad with these games is that you have to use real money to buy ingame stuff.If some games didnt have that then they would be THE BEST.
;Pro[ph]eT__;-;Review of Warframe: 1/24/2014 - {56 Hrs} Key Ingame Features: -Free To Play -3rd Person Shooter -Online (4p) / Solo / Co-op -Available via PS4 / PC -200+ Gameplay Hours -3 Factions To Kill / Help (Think of Starcraft [Zerg (Infestation), Terran (Gineer), Protoss (Corpus)]) -Revolves Around Space -Multiple Planet Systems To Complete -Daily Events +-Depending On Planet System, Different Factions Provided Missions Randomly Spawn +-Login Rewards -Human VS AI (Player vs Player? Not sure) -No Lock-ON system (So not TERRIBLE like GTA5) -Different Control Systems, User Defined +-Mouse and Keybaord ofc +-Controller Support -Crysis esc Visual Stimulations In Game -Rendering At Beginning Of Round Start (oogle effect) -Different Gameplay +-Kill Everything +-Defense [Moving datapads] +-Capture [Killing Specified Targets + Capture] +-Minor Brain Teasers ("Hacking" Terminals) +-Waves (Hoard Mode esc) +-Destroy Equipment (Mining?) -Item System +-Purchase Items With REAL Money (Most of it is a waste, aside from colours for your suit) +-Diablo esc drops (Randomized but others can NOT steal your drops [D3 , not D2 real]) -Card System +-Upgrading weapons +-Combinations (Upgrading (IE:2 of same = 1 of higher rank)) -"Pets" (Companion System To Minorly Help) -Sandbox Random esc Gameplay (IE: Not always the same level (Schemes May be similar, but multiple variations)) -Boss Battles -Clans -Minor Bullet physics (IE: Better than COD, Not as good as CS / Red Orchestra) -Security Cameras -Option For Stealth (If you can) -Melee Weapons, Magic & Guns (Elemental Effects (All in Cards)) Synopsys: The game is a 3rd person shooter based in space and you are a freelancing agent (alien? Robot?) that has landed on a shuttle and have to complete the mission assigned. Missions have a chance of changing part way through, based on performance and / or if other characters join in game / you merge into THEIR games. This game is more based on the fact that it IS multiplayer and has NO campaign attatched. Does this game suit your needs?: If your looking for something that has a COD esc feel for gameplay (online; averagely repetitive maps) and are looking at killing loads of AI with friends, strangers or alone then this is probably a really good game for you! Future Development: -More Guns -More Suits -More Planets -Actual Space Exploration / Battles -More Game Modes -More Users -Steam Workshop (IE: Guns / Levels / Bosses / Suits) -Campaign OR Some kind of lore.. even if it's hidden like in "Dark Souls" -Bullet Physics -Space Physics -More Mind Puzzles via Hacking or Other -Destruction of Computer sytems that AI use too alert hoards (IF/When you fail @ stealth) -More Boss Battles -Steam Inventory (Trading cards after X level | Suits | Guns | Items) -Space Shuttle Flight -Mech's -Bosses that require specific areas (IE: If it's mechanical, rather than just shooting it a million times, shoot the joints rendering it useless (IE: Quad-Walker, shooting out a leg making it struggle with 3) -Different Crossairs (Dynamic / Static / Colourized Schemes) All in all though, amazing for a "Free To Play" game. 8.3/10
SwipZy;-;Badass 3rd person game. If u like crafting game/farming game u would like this.
Sauron_RoL;-;Brilliant game. It's free, but if people so desire they can pay to advance further; or not. You'll still enjoy it. A mixture of tactical third-person shooting and fast-paced free-running and melee combat, this game has community-minded features such as clans and alliances, and gamewise it's got a huge number of varied mission types, playstyles and gear. Aesthetically, it's beautiful. You don't need a diamond encrusted Alienware to run this at top graphics settings. Almost everything looks good, and it runs very smoothly on most systems. An excellent plot, voice acting and mission selection, modding and inventory system. Add the fact that it is still technically in development, meaning that there's constantly new content coming in, and you've got a masterpiece in the making. I've enjoyed this game since Beta, and have done so with spending a very little amount of money as a Founder to support the development. I would advise anyone who can get this to do so. You've got nothing to lose, and a lot to gain.
Toul.exe;-;holy  kind of nice game
Gandalf Pryme;-;One of the best games I have ever played. Constant updates and developers who listen to the community makes games like this even better. I strongly reccomend this game, as long as you don't mind grinding and a little RNG hassle. Although there is not much mission diversity, customizing your warframe and getting new weapons is where this game really shines.
liam6995;-;realy recomend it to anyone who likes grinding games
Ivana Mishkov[Sleep/Work];-;Be a Space Ninja and planet hop a dystopian Solar System while grinding your face to the ground to climb the Mastery Ranks! Be warned as this is a game which IS BETTER WITH FRIENDS. You're gonna have a bad time running Solo, so get with some friends and play this game. If you dont have any friends that dont play it/dont want to play it, then you're ed. Overall, I very much approve.
NerdyNazi;-;Great graphics, fluid gameplay and a variety of weapons to use! a great free to play game!
AshSparkle;-;It's called Grindframe for a reason. The cake is a lie, but not the grind. The grind is true. Who does not want to be a space ninja jumping around, wall running, doing cool acrobatics and slicing enemy fodders to half? Played it since closed beta, stopped for a few months when the grind got unbearable. Returned when there's major updates, stop again. Rinse and repeat. Started playing again and this time I put the platinum and my trading skills to good use to get those cool gold Prime weapons I never gotten in the past because I never ran any void with random people. Game's been more mindlessly enjoyable with the ability to do Void now and get some Prime weapons, whether to farming or trading. Other than that, there's nothing much to this game, you grind, you wait for events, wait for Baro Ti'Keer the swindler, wait for rare alerts. That's about it. An Eight out of Tenno.
Dodge Charger;-;Think about all of the fun you had back in 2013... I would expect people to argue back to a negative review, but there are plenty of negative reviews. Now? The game has turned into a grindfest game, as there's future updates and patches to make this game become pretty much a grindfest game. Back in those good old days where you actually do missions co-operatively... It's not like that anymore now. To summarize, it is still a good game played, but on the inside, there's grinding and repetitive missions to make this community almost unbalanced. It's certainly not fair for new players or players who want to come back and play this game.
Some Guy, you know?;-;A buggy Grindfest made by developers with no idea what they're doing or how to balance anything. 10/10 would grind for hours again.
CHAPPIE - 113 days left for FO4;-;In my opinion, it's one of the best F2P games i've ever seen, daily events, fully customizable equipment and a mod strategy to make your own weapon the best on the whole universe! As I said before, it's one of the best because you can get the 90% of EVERYTHING by just playing the game. On graphics side? You'll puke from the high quality, but remember, REMEMBER tto turn of the motion blur, or you'll feel dizzy the first 5 minutes of gameplay. On gameplay side? Well, on the beggining it could be a bit annoying, boring, but once you get blueprints, new weapons, clans and know the game mechanics (which are easy to understand), you'll love this game. I sometimes think i have way too much hours on this game. I'd give a 83/100
Serenity .;-;9/11 would bomb again.
Micbran;-;Farming Simulator 2014, but with guns and swords.
Soup2504 the garage girl;-;BNM,KLUYHTGDFSVBNM,KLLKFTDRFSDAZCXVBNM,.-POIUYTSDZCXVBNM,.POIUYTRESADXCVBNM,.LPPOIUYTRDSACXVMLNB,MKJIOEPRLTY,MKOPLDFS,CVKMJBIHGKOPLSD,CVKJIBGHOPLE,ADKSOXVBMKGJHOYTREXVGJPHGD
DURANDAL-1707;-;Oh god do I love this game. It's intuitive, it's creative, it's easy to get into but rewarding and hard to master, and so, so unbelievably fun. This game is free2play, but it's not pay2win. Yes, it's grindy, grindy, grindy, and a lot of reliance on RNG, but there is basically nothing in-game that is off limits without paying, with the exception of various cosmetics. And yes, of course, if you're lazy you can buy all your favourite things with real world money, but where's the fun in that? TL;DR: This is one of the best games of all time.
Deynarian #ayywill;-;Man, considering I've pumped almost 500 hours into Warframe; a game I originally did not enjoy, I'd say its worth your time. That is, however, dependant on your viewpoints regarding both third person shooters and also science fiction themes. It also may require a bit of patience, so if that's not your thing, or you can't enjoy something for the sake of enjoyment, please, try something else. Warframe is at core, somewhat of a grindfest at current, but for some people (myself included), this can be made fun with a little imagination, and a simple appreciation of the way the game handles and looks. You play as a Warframe, whom is tasked with various objectives and goals in missions that you select from a series of nodes you unlock as you progress across a map of our galaxy. These range from Capture - wherein you chase down, and kill and then absorb a capture target, before extracting whilst being shot at by mutlitudes of enemies - to things like Survival and Defense, which involve trying to keep your life support system above 0% by slaying foes and collecting the life capsules they drop and defending a Warframe pod that contains a cryo-frozen Warframe soldier inside respectively. There are more missions, which I will not go into detail about, but they can all prove fun. The game is primarily free to play, although has a micro-transaction system in place that allows boosters, weapons and Warframes themselves to bought outright. This balances out toward people who dislike grinding to achieve things. The only things I would consider pay-to-win (and they aren't truly, as they can still be attained - though rarely - freely through alerts), are Orokin Catalysts and Orokin Reactors. These items are one-time use, and boost a weapon or Warframe's modification capacity respectively, allowing you to change and add more to the ojbect in order to increase its power or to make even cooler builds. The game up to this point was not entirely user-friendly, and much of its mechanics and nuances had to be learnt via friends or guides, or just by simply asking in game, but recently a new addition - the Codex - was added to the main menu UI that allows tutorials to be accessed freely. So that's cool. Now onto the cool part, the Warframes. They appear as exo-suits or armour that encompasses a person, and they grant mysterious and awesome powers that pertain to each different frame. Volt, for instance, has abilities that let him control and manipulate electricity in the level, killing enemies and shielding allies with it. He is just one of plenty unique frames and all are acquirable for free. Your only restraint will be slots in your inventory to hold these frames (and weapons too), though this can be increased via buying platinum - the paid currency (or trading for paltinum, if you find a rare item). Story is a bit limited at the moment, and so is the end-game. But this has been slated for fixation by the end of this year, or even earlier. To conclude, Warframe is cool.
Retribution #116;-;An Awesome game to jam with your friends i love it swords,bows and all techy stuff for a free game its a bargain!
Morgan Freeman;-;Warframe addresses the issue of the racism back in 1960s in America. Warframe does a wonderful job compelling the player to explore new adventures with nothing but African descendants in his mind. Saryn is a great addition to the game, showing that reptiles can also have fun with nothing more than a whim on a stick and 13 platinum. I would rate warframe 16.3/20. Great game that is totally worth the 60 bucks.
i;-;Yo went on that steam' downloaded this game'. Pretty good you got a team' and a great name' . Just cus its free' don't mean anything' . -Warframe. Great graphics' great quality' . Better than bi-o-logy. You needa beast call me. Rather than that follow me . You'll see me slayin. Its a game . But nah im not gamin . I aint playin. This is real life , real skill, real war. No gears. Just Warriors . Fightin' through every interior . Fightin to survive! We are the Grineer. Be a Lotus , download this.
J. Singleton;-;Been here since the Alpha, and even still I believe this to be the best free to play game concept on the market. Some growing pains as we test new theories and practices but all in all the game is truly coming to be something that will set the standard for all the future games of this Genre to follow. Well done Warframe.
[THC] MrMustache;-;Before I even begin my review, Warframe is still an open beta. There are always glitches, bugs, and issues that accrue the ire of many players, but DE (the company behind Warframe) is next to always on top of releasing patches. Warframe, in a brief nutshell, is a space-age, sci-fi ninja hack-and-slash with an intriguing storyline (the "prequel" to Warframe is Dark Sector) where the Tenno - the race every player is - has been pushed back into the Void, and has only recently come back to find the Sol System in the middle of a three-way war between the militaristic and brutish Grineer, the greedy and technological Corpus, and the overwhelming numbers of the Infested. The Tenno's role in this game is to bring balance back to the Sol System by assassinating key personell from all sides who threaten galactic stability. Gameplay-wise, Warframe is - at the time of this review - very "grind-y", such as other MMORPGs. To level up, one has to fight the enemy, collect resources (a drop from enemies or by releasing a Titan Extractor to systems), collect modifications (a drop from enemies) and clear planetary systems (usually by defeating the boss). Weapons are unlocked via purchasing blueprints and crafting them with one's gained resources, and one must also have the appropriate "mastery rank" (on paper, your overall player level separate from weapon levels, Warframe levels, and sentinel levels), which is leveled up by leveling up Warframes and weapons. Weapon-wise, combat feels visceral and satisfying, for the most part. Some weapons have become outdated while some have begun to shine. The Warframe you control determines how fast, how well-armored, and what powers the players has, with a general rule that caster-classes have low shields, health, and armor, but possess potent powers, and fighter-classes have high health, shields, and armor, but have less powerful abilities than casters. There IS a real-world currency market in place, but 99% of the items sold there can be made/found by playing the game itself. The 1% of items not found are purely cosmetic, such as color schemes and syndanas (capes). The real-world currency to game currency ratio, in this author's opinion, is quite unbalanced, however. 75 platinum (the game currency) is $5 USD, with bonus platinum being awarded depending on how much one purchases in one transaction (for example, 180 platinum is gained from $10 USD; 150 being from the $10, and a 30 platinum bonus). Warframe is able to be played alone, but is much more enjoyable and beneficial with friends or a clan. With a moderate amount of startup resources, one can start their own clan, or can simply join a preexisting clan to save resources. Clans offer clanmates to join games with a player, clan technology (which offers high-end weaponry), and miscellaneous activities, such as 1 v 1 PvP in a dueling arena, trading, and obstacle courses. Finally, Warframe has a dedicated forums page to report bugs, meet with potential clan members, introduce yourself, make suggestions, offer feedback, or generally just shoot the breeze with fellow players. PROS: +Multiplayer with clanmates or friends is enjoyable and practical +Everything save for cosmetics can be obtained without real money +Solid swordplay, gunplay, and Warframe powers +Complex damage system which promotes a well-coordinated squad and a variety in weapons +Many side activities +Many graphics settings can be changed, so lower-end PC users don't have to worry as much +Forums have a decent, active community CONS: -Prone to glitches and bugs after major updates, but are rectified quickly -Playing solo can be tough at higher levels and bosses -Real currency to game currency is at an uneven ratio -Damage system can take some time to learn and master -Grinding for resources can be a bore at times
Miktar;-;Ever wonder what happened to Digital Extremes, the other half that worked with Epic Games on the Unreal franchise? Theyve been having a rough time of it, it seems. Their third person shooter Dark Sector was met with mixed reviews and quickly forgotten. They helped 2K with the PS3 version of BioShock, and were then tasked with creating the tacked-on multiplayer portion of BioShock 2. From there, they developed the ill-fated Homefront, the underappreciated The Darkness II, and then the rushed and buggy movie tie-in game Star Trek: Into Darkness. After such a long and rocky road, its no surprise to see them seek refuge in the untapped frontier that is the Free To Play market. Warframe is a kind of spiritual success to Dark Sector. You play as a Tenno, an ancient warrior awoken from a very long cryosleep into a universe at war. The Grineer - humanoid clones with degenerate genes - want to rule it all. The Corpus, being a mega corporation with robots, wants to own it all. The Infested, infected with the Tenocyte virus that turns them into biological weapons, want to be everything. So the Tenno are tasked with saving the universe from this crapstorm. The game has been in open beta since early 2013, but Update 14 has finally brought it into what I consider a reviewable state. Keep in mind free to play games update frequently, and so change dramatically often. Update 14 brought a much-needed tutorial prologue chapter and the entire user interface has been overhauled. The core game is mostly unchanged, but there was very little wrong with it to begin with. After selecting a mission, you (and friends or strangers) are dropped into a procedurally generated map. There, its all third-person action combat with wall-running, sliding, shooting while sliding, leaps, backflips and sweet melee combat. As you earn experience, your frame, weapons and companions (like a combat-capable space-dog pet you earn via a quest) level up, gaining more slots for Mods. Mods add various effects to your attacks, like fire damage, more ammo, or give you special moves. There are many mission types, and missions may have random effects added to them like fire damage across the map, or a sudden Infested outbreak so youre fighting them along with whoever is supposed to be there. Special effects randomly trigger around the solar system, which give you an opportunity for bigger rewards at higher risk. Warframe follows the Monster Hunter formula of farming specific bosses for the plans to craft certain weapons or frames. You can buy frames or weapons with real money, but everything can be earned in-game if youre patient, except for fancy cosmetic items like space-scarves.
DURANDAL-1707;-;Oh god do I love this game. It's intuitive, it's creative, it's easy to get into but rewarding and hard to master, and so, so unbelievably fun. This game is free2play, but it's not pay2win. Yes, it's grindy, grindy, grindy, and a lot of reliance on RNG, but there is basically nothing in-game that is off limits without paying, with the exception of various cosmetics. And yes, of course, if you're lazy you can buy all your favourite things with real world money, but where's the fun in that? TL;DR: This is one of the best games of all time.
Yngvar Hjalmarr den Larshaug;-;Warframe is a fast paced third person action shooter with decent RPG and adventure elements mixed in to create a very, very enjoyable free to play experience. I cannot fit every aspect of this game into this review, so I will be highlighting what are, in my opinion, the most important key features of the game. The general plot and setting of this game takes place in a sci-fi themed perspective of our solar system in the distant future, where two factions, the Corpus and the Grineer, compete for territory and power while avoiding hazards like outbreaks from the Infestation and Tenno intervention. The world is ever changing; maps you play are procedurally generated with different tile sets and themes depending on what planet you're based around. The Corpus and Grineer are constantly invading each other's territory, allowing players to pick sides and decide who will occupy that territory until the opposing faction is ready to invade again. Infestation constantly plague regions of the galaxy, allowing Tenno to help thwart them with enemy factions for the greater good. Warframe offers a very fast paced, smooth, yet gritty and meaty combat system. Players are able to find a wide assortment of weapons, warframes and abilities to play the way they want to play, ranging from being a stealthy hunter able to execute your enemies from behind cloak and dagger style, sneak through patrolling squads to quickly reach your targets without sounding the alarm, or test your bowmanship or sniper skills picking off enemies from afar; or, charge in guns and swords blazing, dismembering anything that stands between you and your assignment. And you think support classes in most games are boring? Warframe's support and utility classes offer very fun abilities and play styles that not only give the player an enjoyable experience, but greatly help out your team or offer for very leisurely solo gameplay. On top of combat, movement in this game is one of the best in the genre. Often joked for being a game about space ninjas, you will find yourself running along and up walls, leaping and flipping through the air over and on top of the enemy, and sliding about skillfully through levels, making traveling something to actually look forward to. Weapons, Warframes, Sentinels, and miscellaneous gear are obtained through a very fair and balanced crafting system. Blueprints are obtained by purchasing them in the in-game shop for in-game currency or found through various mission styles, while the materials are obtained through different areas in the solar system. While many pieces of equipment are available to buy through microtransactions, almost everything can be crafted in game, with the exception of a few cosmetic items and discontinued event items. The game is designed to allow players any type of experience they want, whether you want to play alone or with up to 3 other people. Although certain level types are obviously easier with a friend or two, almost everything can be done alone, and difficulty will scale to your current gear's progress. One thing I find is a double edged sword with the current game is level design. The game is primarily procedurally generated, with preexisting rooms arranged in different orders and different themes depending on the level's location in the solar system. While the tile sets themselves are very well designed, you will find yourself going through the same rooms over and over again throughout different missions and sometimes within the same level. However, because of how fast paced the game is, it is not an issue for most players and does not affect gameplay whatsoever. From what I've seen and experienced, there are only two very minor vices to this game, microtransactions and clans. Platinum is a currency that can be purchased by players to either buy gear or cosmetic items. However, warframes and weapons themselves cost ridiculously high amounts of platinum, encouraging players to craft them from scratch in game (which may be time consuming, but isn't difficult in most cases). Additionally, prime gear and other alert/event related items are not purchasable, and using microtransactions will not necessarily give players an advantage over their friends. One of the main reasons I personally buy platinum is for cosmetics, like custom color palettes, and aesthetic attachments for weapons, warframes, and sentinels. However, considering how much content you get in this game for absolutely free, I would argue that they are more than worth investing a little bit of change into if cosmetics are something you enjoy in games. The other issue, although not nearly as significant, would be clans. Specific warframes, weapons, and other gear are only obtainable through clan system crafting in the Dojo, which forces players to join one if they want to have access to all the content. However, you can get away with having a personal clan or with a couple friends, as research and crafting scale to clan size. One of the things that stands out to me the most for Warframe as an MMO is the developers and the community. As an overall, it is extremely community driven, and the developers are closely, closely involved with their game, adding hotfixes for big and minor issues almost daily to ensure the best experience for players. New content is added almost weekly, and large scale events happen every month or so. Something pretty insignificant that I make a big deal out of is that the in game developer messages for patches or hotfixes are absolutely hilarious, and they do listen and respond to general chat channels often. Warframe is definitely worth investing some time into. I have yet to find a free-to-play game that offers as much content as this game without pressuring microtransations. The combat style is extremely unique and fast paced and allows players to play exactly the way they want to. Good luck, Tenno.
Peleliusion;-;Great game! A lot of fun and very creative! Plenty of options and a huge variety of places and missions!
Fiplo;-;Jumpy slidy ninja simulator with parkour elements, where you can slice humans. 10/10 Would play again.
AsH;-;Fun game, but the downside is that you have to put in a lot of hours, and the repetitiveness of the levels would eventually dull one's senses. Yes, there is a PvP game mode, but rarely are people logged in there, plus, you don't get to use all your abilities and items obtained from grinding in there. You play with a skeleton warframe. Defeats the purpose of getting abilities and items in the first place. There should be more of a storyline too. One of the perks is that the community is friendly and players are always willing to help one another progress through the game.
Jules;-;2 words download now, this game is badass you can use guns and blades this game is free and cool so why would you not get this game, why the hell are you still reading this go get the game !
Retribution #116;-;An Awesome game to jam with your friends i love it swords,bows and all techy stuff for a free game its a bargain!
Morgan Freeman;-;Warframe addresses the issue of the racism back in 1960s in America. Warframe does a wonderful job compelling the player to explore new adventures with nothing but African descendants in his mind. Saryn is a great addition to the game, showing that reptiles can also have fun with nothing more than a whim on a stick and 13 platinum. I would rate warframe 16.3/20. Great game that is totally worth the 60 bucks.
i;-;Yo went on that steam' downloaded this game'. Pretty good you got a team' and a great name' . Just cus its free' don't mean anything' . -Warframe. Great graphics' great quality' . Better than bi-o-logy. You needa beast call me. Rather than that follow me . You'll see me slayin. Its a game . But nah im not gamin . I aint playin. This is real life , real skill, real war. No gears. Just Warriors . Fightin' through every interior . Fightin to survive! We are the Grineer. Be a Lotus , download this.
J. Singleton;-;Been here since the Alpha, and even still I believe this to be the best free to play game concept on the market. Some growing pains as we test new theories and practices but all in all the game is truly coming to be something that will set the standard for all the future games of this Genre to follow. Well done Warframe.
D4RKEST;-;Toooo many hours spent and as much as i want to leave the game i can't help but come back for "one last fight" but it seems no matter what i do there is never a last fight. sure it can be repetitive - it can be annoying - it can suck all of your time up but hey its free, and pretty decent so go pick up yor sword, ninja up and go kill somethin.
HAMMERINYOURFACE;-;Good if you want to waste some time, but a warning : it really depends on it's premium currency.
Lastshado;-;this game is full of color and freedom things like this you dont get in a T.P.S
shadowknight45;-;Great fun! Bring's the player to new world, where running around and shooting stuff doeasn't make you win. You have to use your chracater's (Warframe's) abilities and accesories here to go through a map or you don't even have a chanche if you don't have a tactic with your specific Warframe and other part's of the loadout.
.HighEndd;-;Really fun PvE Shooter. The ammount of content in the game really surprised me. A lot more features than I was expecting and you can enjoy every single one of them without spending a dime. Wanting to collect all the Warframes and upgrading them really keeps you hooked. At the very least this is a game worth checking out.
Hooride;-;Great game with a good community.
Bendy Straws;-;all around great game, played it a bit too much
Aluraine;-;(Developer to be purchased by Perfect World Entertainment, I do not recommend this game if that is that case.. avoid it.) Gameplay- (A+ The main attraction) It's got fast-paced gunplay and swordplay mixed in with parkour and sci-fi, eviscerate your enemys in violent bloody explosions and shoot guys legs off or chop them straight in half with your sword - Warframe is a hell of a lot of fun but the downside to it right now is the repetitive stages and missions. There's still a lot of bugs right now but this is excusable because this game is still in Beta. Story- (Not much of one currently) Not much going on in the story department right now for Warframe, all you really know is that you've been woken up from cryostasis to fight these guys called the Grineer and these other guys known as the Corpus, so you just wake up and start slaughtering literally hundreds of people because some lady with a funny hat told you to. More recently they've begun doing more story related events and improving on this aspect of the game so there's probably something to look forward to in that regard. Crafting- (It's ok, but there are restrictions) A little overwhelming to new players because crafting looks and seems like it's impossible, but once you start putting some time into wiki and unlocking stages it becomes simple to find the right resources and craft the weapons and warframes you want. Just set a goal for yourself, play and you'll have the items you desire at no cost except for some time and effort. The wait time for crafting in Warframe is a huge turn off when you're a brand new player because you're itching to get away from the god awful starter gear and onto something more FUN, so that can be quite frustrating but later on once you've actually got some stuff for yourself made and you're more comfortable with your gear the crafting wait becomes more.. exciting? You start to look forward to the completion of your new gear once they're finished and while those are building you start hunting for more resources to make the next thing on your list. (The biggest mistake in this game is limiting the number of items you can have and only letting you get more space by spending real world money - this is  and you should be able to use your credits to purchase more inventory slots, If it werent for this I'd have given this system a thumbs up) Clans- (Time consuming but very rewarding) Clans are sort of like the hidden second half of the game. Start a Clan to work on building up your Dojo with some friends it's a lot of fun, you have more things to work towards and gives you more reasons to actually do missions for materials other than making guns and armor + You'll be able to access weapons and research not avaliable from the basic store pages. Visuals- (Stunning in most right places, very lackluster in others) The Corpus ships are gleaming and sleek while the Grineer ships are grimey and industrial with dim lighting, Void ships are decorated in shining gold with flawless white walls and have glass pipelines with flowing water in them that you can see into, but the desert tileset is extremely ugly and the game uses a random color correction filter to try and make the stages seem a little different each time but they end up just making the stages look strange and unfit most of the time. The character models are packed with detail and the weapons are sexy however if you want to customize your warframe with a full color wheel you'll have to dish out some cash and unlock them with platnum. Music- (Nothing special) The music in Warframe is inspired by Japanese drums and that's about it. Just drums, and some metal clanking. Hopefully the game gets a real soundtrack someday. (Will update review as the game gets updates)
PaladinLuster;-;For a free to play game, it's beautifully crafted and very entertaining. With descent difficulty for all types of players and nice grind/farm system for those that love to farm for best gear. Give this game a go and try not get addicted XD
TheLag.zip;-;Despite it's mediocre score from metacritic, this F2P Online Shooter - It really isn't an MMORPG so if you're looking for depositing skill points in strength or whatever this game isn't for you - is above average in everyway. Solid musical tracks, BEAUTIFUL graphics, awesome gunplay, and devastating sword attacks make this game one of the best free to play games on steam. Yea I guess you could say it is P2W but everything that you can pay for to make yourself great, you can get in game. On top of that it's free, how could you go wrong? I enjoy Warframe and if you give it a shot you will too that's for sure. Unless you don't like awesome swords, robots, killing, shooting, awesomeness, cool stuff, more cool stuff, bullets, cyborgs, drones, Astronomy, The Milky Way Galaxy, amazing graphics, and even more cool stuff. That is all.
CookieCrumbz;-;Great game with co-op story mission modes which is kind of hard to find in FPS nowadays. The PVP has serious balancing issues but overall the gameplay is fun and reminds me of Uncharted 2 combat. Would be nice if they eventually explain the lore a bit more.
Shadow/A/;-;Very Cool game
Yngvar Hjalmarr den Larshaug;-;Warframe is a fast paced third person action shooter with decent RPG and adventure elements mixed in to create a very, very enjoyable free to play experience. I cannot fit every aspect of this game into this review, so I will be highlighting what are, in my opinion, the most important key features of the game. The general plot and setting of this game takes place in a sci-fi themed perspective of our solar system in the distant future, where two factions, the Corpus and the Grineer, compete for territory and power while avoiding hazards like outbreaks from the Infestation and Tenno intervention. The world is ever changing; maps you play are procedurally generated with different tile sets and themes depending on what planet you're based around. The Corpus and Grineer are constantly invading each other's territory, allowing players to pick sides and decide who will occupy that territory until the opposing faction is ready to invade again. Infestation constantly plague regions of the galaxy, allowing Tenno to help thwart them with enemy factions for the greater good. Warframe offers a very fast paced, smooth, yet gritty and meaty combat system. Players are able to find a wide assortment of weapons, warframes and abilities to play the way they want to play, ranging from being a stealthy hunter able to execute your enemies from behind cloak and dagger style, sneak through patrolling squads to quickly reach your targets without sounding the alarm, or test your bowmanship or sniper skills picking off enemies from afar; or, charge in guns and swords blazing, dismembering anything that stands between you and your assignment. And you think support classes in most games are boring? Warframe's support and utility classes offer very fun abilities and play styles that not only give the player an enjoyable experience, but greatly help out your team or offer for very leisurely solo gameplay. On top of combat, movement in this game is one of the best in the genre. Often joked for being a game about space ninjas, you will find yourself running along and up walls, leaping and flipping through the air over and on top of the enemy, and sliding about skillfully through levels, making traveling something to actually look forward to. Weapons, Warframes, Sentinels, and miscellaneous gear are obtained through a very fair and balanced crafting system. Blueprints are obtained by purchasing them in the in-game shop for in-game currency or found through various mission styles, while the materials are obtained through different areas in the solar system. While many pieces of equipment are available to buy through microtransactions, almost everything can be crafted in game, with the exception of a few cosmetic items and discontinued event items. The game is designed to allow players any type of experience they want, whether you want to play alone or with up to 3 other people. Although certain level types are obviously easier with a friend or two, almost everything can be done alone, and difficulty will scale to your current gear's progress. One thing I find is a double edged sword with the current game is level design. The game is primarily procedurally generated, with preexisting rooms arranged in different orders and different themes depending on the level's location in the solar system. While the tile sets themselves are very well designed, you will find yourself going through the same rooms over and over again throughout different missions and sometimes within the same level. However, because of how fast paced the game is, it is not an issue for most players and does not affect gameplay whatsoever. From what I've seen and experienced, there are only two very minor vices to this game, microtransactions and clans. Platinum is a currency that can be purchased by players to either buy gear or cosmetic items. However, warframes and weapons themselves cost ridiculously high amounts of platinum, encouraging players to craft them from scratch in game (which may be time consuming, but isn't difficult in most cases). Additionally, prime gear and other alert/event related items are not purchasable, and using microtransactions will not necessarily give players an advantage over their friends. One of the main reasons I personally buy platinum is for cosmetics, like custom color palettes, and aesthetic attachments for weapons, warframes, and sentinels. However, considering how much content you get in this game for absolutely free, I would argue that they are more than worth investing a little bit of change into if cosmetics are something you enjoy in games. The other issue, although not nearly as significant, would be clans. Specific warframes, weapons, and other gear are only obtainable through clan system crafting in the Dojo, which forces players to join one if they want to have access to all the content. However, you can get away with having a personal clan or with a couple friends, as research and crafting scale to clan size. One of the things that stands out to me the most for Warframe as an MMO is the developers and the community. As an overall, it is extremely community driven, and the developers are closely, closely involved with their game, adding hotfixes for big and minor issues almost daily to ensure the best experience for players. New content is added almost weekly, and large scale events happen every month or so. Something pretty insignificant that I make a big deal out of is that the in game developer messages for patches or hotfixes are absolutely hilarious, and they do listen and respond to general chat channels often. Warframe is definitely worth investing some time into. I have yet to find a free-to-play game that offers as much content as this game without pressuring microtransations. The combat style is extremely unique and fast paced and allows players to play exactly the way they want to. Good luck, Tenno.
Mr. Smith;-;Warframe is love, Warframe is life.
Torchy;-;It's ninjas, in space! This is the ultimate free to play game for anyone looking for a great 3rd Person Shooter!
FredZho;-;If you enjoy parkour, stealth, mass destruction or just like to decuoate a clan hall then play this game; it's really fun ive been playing it a lot - me and my friends have been starting up a clan, and our clan hall is starting to look amazing!! you can even decide if you wanna be a big guy with alot of health and shield, or a sneaky ninja like me! Have fun playing one of the best Free-to-play games in your life :)
IceHawk252;-;Alright, Playing warframe is like having a daughter. You HAVE to give her money, or else she starts throwing glitter in your face. You love her so much, but she asks for money, and you have none. So you get a face full of glitter. It gets old after a while, but gets fun again with each phase. 11/10, would play.
Jussty;-;i played this years ago it was a fun simple thirdperson shooter totally worth it!
Behold the Robes;-;Warbros still #1 from the grave Game isn't as bad as it was before, if you want to have some mindless fun farming while going fast you should try it. If you are a returning player, nothing changed.
Farsia;-;My issue with this game is one word: GRINDING! You have to do it way to often to craft weapons and stuff.
ColorExplosion;-;This game has some great ideas... that were executed poorly. I better just make a list. Pros: Nice AI The enemy AI (and friendly, if you happen to be playing Invasion), is pretty good for the most part. Enemies take cover, and will retreat if you get too close. Varied enemies Enemies come in all shapes, sizes, and roles. Some are offensive, while others are defensive or provide support. Decent Visuals Not the best looking game out, but definitely not an eyesore. Crafting System A double edged sword - the crafting system can be a blessing and a curse. All Warframes and Weapons must be crafted unless you are willing to spend real money buying them. While this is a great idea, the costs and production times make this game into a massive grind. Mods Mods add functionaility and bonus stats to your Warframe and weapons. Wonderful idea. Unique abilities Every warframe has it's own special abilities. Each has it's own role. Abilities add variety to the game, and keep it interesting. Loads of weapons Every warframe is equipped with a primary, a secondary, and a melee, weapon. There are so many different types of weapons. Playstyle Options This is one of the few games that allows for a stealthy approach as well as a guns-blazing approach. Cons: Bugs So many bugs go unpatched that are reported. The devs obviously don't care about the players. Endless Grind The main reason to hate this game. To do anything fun, it takes hours, and lots of patience. Terrible trading In order to trade, you need to use a trading post. Which has a lot of prerequisites to build. It will be a while before you have your own. Obnoxious wait times In order to build a warframe, you need to find the blueprints for the three parts, spend resources you probably don't have on hand, buy the main blueprint after the parts are completed, and wait 3 days for your new warframe. This is complete garbage. Weapons take 12 hours. Rooms in the dojo take hours as well, and so does destroying a room. Limited color selection in appearance panel Sure, it's nice having the ability to color swap weapons and warframes, and it is a good idea to limit the free colors, but the selection available is too limited. Conclusion: This game has some nice features and ideas, but the devs have a lot to fix before I can consider this game worth a shot again. After bugging through walls, and having to restart boss missions because they glitch out, I am done wasting my time.
hymer;-;fun game, takes time to master
iMadnixx AFK Until August 1;-;Downloaded it 2 days ago played more than 24 hours.
|WTF?| viper;-;This game is good try it out
[THC] MrMustache;-;Before I even begin my review, Warframe is still an open beta. There are always glitches, bugs, and issues that accrue the ire of many players, but DE (the company behind Warframe) is next to always on top of releasing patches. Warframe, in a brief nutshell, is a space-age, sci-fi ninja hack-and-slash with an intriguing storyline (the "prequel" to Warframe is Dark Sector) where the Tenno - the race every player is - has been pushed back into the Void, and has only recently come back to find the Sol System in the middle of a three-way war between the militaristic and brutish Grineer, the greedy and technological Corpus, and the overwhelming numbers of the Infested. The Tenno's role in this game is to bring balance back to the Sol System by assassinating key personell from all sides who threaten galactic stability. Gameplay-wise, Warframe is - at the time of this review - very "grind-y", such as other MMORPGs. To level up, one has to fight the enemy, collect resources (a drop from enemies or by releasing a Titan Extractor to systems), collect modifications (a drop from enemies) and clear planetary systems (usually by defeating the boss). Weapons are unlocked via purchasing blueprints and crafting them with one's gained resources, and one must also have the appropriate "mastery rank" (on paper, your overall player level separate from weapon levels, Warframe levels, and sentinel levels), which is leveled up by leveling up Warframes and weapons. Weapon-wise, combat feels visceral and satisfying, for the most part. Some weapons have become outdated while some have begun to shine. The Warframe you control determines how fast, how well-armored, and what powers the players has, with a general rule that caster-classes have low shields, health, and armor, but possess potent powers, and fighter-classes have high health, shields, and armor, but have less powerful abilities than casters. There IS a real-world currency market in place, but 99% of the items sold there can be made/found by playing the game itself. The 1% of items not found are purely cosmetic, such as color schemes and syndanas (capes). The real-world currency to game currency ratio, in this author's opinion, is quite unbalanced, however. 75 platinum (the game currency) is $5 USD, with bonus platinum being awarded depending on how much one purchases in one transaction (for example, 180 platinum is gained from $10 USD; 150 being from the $10, and a 30 platinum bonus). Warframe is able to be played alone, but is much more enjoyable and beneficial with friends or a clan. With a moderate amount of startup resources, one can start their own clan, or can simply join a preexisting clan to save resources. Clans offer clanmates to join games with a player, clan technology (which offers high-end weaponry), and miscellaneous activities, such as 1 v 1 PvP in a dueling arena, trading, and obstacle courses. Finally, Warframe has a dedicated forums page to report bugs, meet with potential clan members, introduce yourself, make suggestions, offer feedback, or generally just shoot the breeze with fellow players. PROS: +Multiplayer with clanmates or friends is enjoyable and practical +Everything save for cosmetics can be obtained without real money +Solid swordplay, gunplay, and Warframe powers +Complex damage system which promotes a well-coordinated squad and a variety in weapons +Many side activities +Many graphics settings can be changed, so lower-end PC users don't have to worry as much +Forums have a decent, active community CONS: -Prone to glitches and bugs after major updates, but are rectified quickly -Playing solo can be tough at higher levels and bosses -Real currency to game currency is at an uneven ratio -Damage system can take some time to learn and master -Grinding for resources can be a bore at times
Miktar;-;Ever wonder what happened to Digital Extremes, the other half that worked with Epic Games on the Unreal franchise? Theyve been having a rough time of it, it seems. Their third person shooter Dark Sector was met with mixed reviews and quickly forgotten. They helped 2K with the PS3 version of BioShock, and were then tasked with creating the tacked-on multiplayer portion of BioShock 2. From there, they developed the ill-fated Homefront, the underappreciated The Darkness II, and then the rushed and buggy movie tie-in game Star Trek: Into Darkness. After such a long and rocky road, its no surprise to see them seek refuge in the untapped frontier that is the Free To Play market. Warframe is a kind of spiritual success to Dark Sector. You play as a Tenno, an ancient warrior awoken from a very long cryosleep into a universe at war. The Grineer - humanoid clones with degenerate genes - want to rule it all. The Corpus, being a mega corporation with robots, wants to own it all. The Infested, infected with the Tenocyte virus that turns them into biological weapons, want to be everything. So the Tenno are tasked with saving the universe from this crapstorm. The game has been in open beta since early 2013, but Update 14 has finally brought it into what I consider a reviewable state. Keep in mind free to play games update frequently, and so change dramatically often. Update 14 brought a much-needed tutorial prologue chapter and the entire user interface has been overhauled. The core game is mostly unchanged, but there was very little wrong with it to begin with. After selecting a mission, you (and friends or strangers) are dropped into a procedurally generated map. There, its all third-person action combat with wall-running, sliding, shooting while sliding, leaps, backflips and sweet melee combat. As you earn experience, your frame, weapons and companions (like a combat-capable space-dog pet you earn via a quest) level up, gaining more slots for Mods. Mods add various effects to your attacks, like fire damage, more ammo, or give you special moves. There are many mission types, and missions may have random effects added to them like fire damage across the map, or a sudden Infested outbreak so youre fighting them along with whoever is supposed to be there. Special effects randomly trigger around the solar system, which give you an opportunity for bigger rewards at higher risk. Warframe follows the Monster Hunter formula of farming specific bosses for the plans to craft certain weapons or frames. You can buy frames or weapons with real money, but everything can be earned in-game if youre patient, except for fancy cosmetic items like space-scarves.
Aurino;-;Welcome to doorframe, a competitive farming simulator. Your goal in this shitheap of a game is to test your button mashing skills (particularly the E key) in order to cut down swathes of enemies that range from L4D2 zombie ripoffs to giant ing armoured behemoths. The real test of skill comes in when you reach the crafting system after completing what not even a non-functioning autistic could call a story. Be prepared to sleep on this game (as I have for about 100-200 hours of my gameplay time) because if you want a fancy new weapon you're going to have to wait at least two ing years. Building a new doorframe is entirely out of the question, taking at the bare minimum 3 and a half /days/ to complete. All in all, my rock hard boner for this game is slowly dying like my will to live. Someone kill me.
Nicolas;-;Fap material, nuff sed. 10/10 would fap again.
[M]ikage;-;Recomended game, have many mode to play. many weapon u can build. i like it score 8/10
Abyss;-;In a market full of "Pay to Win" free to play games Warframe really stands out from the rest. Go play it.
(   ) Fury (   );-;Only played for a couple hours, got bored of it. 3/10
(   ) Fury (   );-;Only played for a couple hours, got bored of it. 3/10
Spooks McGee;-;It is a fun game with friends, but may cause fights because if your teamate chooses loki, he sucks lol
\.-. SkullKing;-;This game is boring. You do a different quest on the same map. Waste of time. Better off playing Planet SIde 2, or something else that's
Flow3R;-;SPACE NINJAS in MECHANIZED SUITS with MAGICAL POWERS struggling againts dangers of vast space in order to uphold balance! It's free to play, you have no excuse to not try it.
Xzor70;-;Very Good Graphics And Quality. I Really Do Recommend Playing With A Friend Or Other People, But It's Still Fun Playing Solo. I Recommend It To People Who Like Third-Person Shooters And A Very Large And Long Campaign.
Mashakosha;-;Warframe is pretty, cool, and with the more recent updates including a more advanced melee combat system, it's even better. There's always something that keeps me coming back!
Reinhardt90;-;For anyone that loves a high, action packed game.
Alucard;-;did a flip 10/10 would flip again
19216811;-;love it and f2p try it out thrid person shooter with lots of missions
SirWubbly;-;in this third person co-op sci-fi butter-me-up-scotty developed by my bowls knicker doo ca chu i es the walrus hue hue hue;is an incredibly apple-y taste-er-ing-est-ter-moo orange-est made of AAUUEEGHH WITH THE TOP HAT engine.fueled by the tears of orphans,but it's okay because they are jewish orphans. in the end i must say that PENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENISPENIS
Mr.Famous;-;Extremly addictive, fun and original. The gameplay and combat system are very fluid. The variety of weapons, waframes and mods lets you chose the play style you like ; straight up in your face, stealthy, support or tactical are some examples. Getting the components to craft items takes a while. It really is a grind to get better weapons or warframes. Wich personally i really like. In my opinion this game has the best pay to win system of any F2P game. Instead of having to pay cash to get extremly good gear that you coudn't get without paying (like most F2P games), Paying just lets you get the item immediatly instead of grinding to get the components to craft it. Or you could buy colours or different heads and such to customize your character. An extremly great F2P game, that I would gladly pay 60$ for.
MSATB;-;I love this game
Marky;-;This needs bigger bosses and new people to be shooting at and more custom modding/other thoughts needs more dogie
Domino;-;http://puu.sh/awQhl/badfc64594.png http://puu.sh/awQm5/728a4e61e1.jpg 10/10 best crash simulator
Mashakosha;-;Warframe is pretty, cool, and with the more recent updates including a more advanced melee combat system, it's even better. There's always something that keeps me coming back!
ForsakenByAll;-;this game looks and feels so bad  i dont know why anyone would dislike this game
Quality Banter?;-;I like pressed play right... and my mum told me i had to put the washing out and i was like....... so i started playing the game and it was like super crayz doriotos... but i only said that cause my friend was getting doritos.... but i havent played the game yet because like its downloading.... so uh yea.
Exe CUTE able.;-;Eh pay 2 win cosmetic  grind fest korean piece of  game.
D3LLY;-;Amazing graphics, amazing gameplay and the 4 player mode is awesome also.
Sarfal;-;Great game for people with alot of time.
Sarfal;-;Great game for people with alot of time.
Giorno Giovanna;-;Why the  is this free to play? This game should at least be 40 dollars, at LEAST, if not full retail price. It's ninja gaiden, metroid prime series, and star trek all combined in one. If that wouldn't make you play it, what will? Oh yeah, there's also little to no grinding, it all happens naturally, and, you WANT to grind if you want to grind, there's nothing saying you have to. But the grinding is fun in this game, start playing it.
Ircza The Prophet;-;Warframe is the best PvE Coop FPS i have ever played. No exagerration, pure fact. Active developers, many events. A lot of different weapons and frames. Every big update brings something new and epic.
KOOLAID;-;it be aight
L3th4lG4m3r;-;Warframe has great graphics, good controls for doing lots of parkour, heaps of levels and tons of  to find. These things make it one of the best free to play games I've ever played. Although.... It trys to prromote teamwork,but finding a group is can be a nightmare sometimes and then once you do there is hardly any co-ordination, communication or teamwork involved. It seems that you just go with other players to finish harder levels because their really hard solo. There is also an extreme variety of warframes each with its own play style and powers and lots of weapons with different stats. However almot all of these require premium credits which can almost never be found in the actual game, which makes it all seem pay2win and then buying the blueprints requires you to spend hours searching planets for all the parts and then extra time to actually craft the item.
Flapjack;-;There's some [known] issue with the launcher, where it can not or will not connect to the content servers to inniate a download of updated content, which renders the game completely unplayable. I've downloaded the game twice and have been unable to even get past the broken launch frame. Unfortunate. At least I didn't pay for this game.
HM02;-;After the general fun of the combat wore off, I started dedicating a lot of time to "min/maxing" my warframe and sentinel with mods - however, the developers repeatedly changed the game mechanics (stamina change, frames and sentinels sharing mods change) in ways that screwed me over or left me far behind in progress from where I was right before the game update. Now that the game is a stable release, this may not be a problem anymore, but it left a strong sour taste in my mouth. Even with this fact aside, it takes an extraordinary amount of time and luck to get better gear/items. In many games, you get small stat increases at relatively frequent intervals, or relatively frequent gear drops. Although I think the weapons are supposed to be sidegrades, the expensive and high-rank weapons are much better, albeit somewhat more situational, than the defaults. It takes a lot of materials to build weapons, and a lot of luck to get certain blueprint parts to drop from missions. These add up to a very grindy game with very slow progression.
Sjukob;-;Listen to my advise , DON'T PLAY THIS  . It might look like a pretty ninja style action game , but it's actually about farming stuff repeating same things over and over and over and over again and that's it ,after you worthlessly spent 9000 hours of your life you can have new  to kill more enemies to gain new shinier  to kill more enemies . This game has nothing to offer to player besides farming . I've been playing this game since open beta started and some problems like stupid amount of grind you have to deal with to get stuff and lack of content were here like forever . Developers stick their heads up to their asses and make some really dumb decisions that even  people would find stupid , don't expect them to listen to the feedback or something . If you care , community is bad , but not the worst . Oh and add ridiculous amount of bugs and glitches to this , a lot of them weren't fixed since closed beta , broken RNG system , horrible balance with things being broken since closed beta , overpriced crap in store , well you can guess how competent developers are . Just stay away from this abomination and don't repeat my mistakes .
YO MOMMAGEDDON! [PT];-;The game is great. I've spent several hours in it but jesus christ the grinding is way too much. It becomes repetitive over a while. I got to a point where I literally could not stand it. The character designs are very good the environment desings as well. Its a very nice game for a FTP But I would not recommend, unless the devs give you something do do in-game ( plot-wise) besides grinding on levels that look exactly all the same. I still have hope for it
Joy;-;if you like grinding, ninjas, bows, kunais, and swords then play this game pls
AutumnWhite;-;I was going to complain about the unclear level layout, the need to pay for customisation and repetitive feel about the game But then again, it is free, so it was well worth the 0.00 I payed for it
RainBow AL;-;Ok, so let me start off by saying, No this is not a pay to play game you can get almost all the items in the game for free in the sense of federal funds. Ill decide to start with the bad news oabout this game. Bad Things~ 1.Map systems are TERRIBLE -half the time you wont even know where the exit is on an infestation level . 2.Wait time for the RIDICULOUS amount of time it takes to make practically anything. -Basicly explains itself but its cheap way how they get money [get ready to empty your wallet to speed up things] 3.Its a GLITCHFEST -you will run into at least 10 glitches in one week of playing I would let this pass since its f2p and the fact that il lt constantly updates it to fix them but they are countless and its going a while till they perfect everything. Good things~ 1.Beautiful Graphics (given you've got a good enough pc) -The graphics and colour variations are great epeacially with colour correction on. 2.Gameplay -this is definatly a given since you probably know by now a game with space ninjas and guns each with various powers and customizable looks to boost morale and overall expirience is very good. 3.Constant Updates -This game recives tons of updates so many that you should never really grow bored with the game (given you arent still starter and dont know what to do like i was i reccomend looking at Mogamu and some of the guides are very helpful) http://www.youtube.com/user/mogamuTV Overal this is a decent game but it definatly could use some work add me if you want to discuss it further in depth.
Shorty;-;too big difference between those people who are paying money for game and playing for free\
Bp0w4 holiday;-;I was only thirteen years old, I loved warframe so much. I had all the Weapons and Frames. I prayed to Warframe every night before bed thanking it for the life I have been given. "Warframe is love" I say, "Warframe is life." My dad hears me and calls me a . I knew he was just jealous of my devotion to Warframe. I called him a . He slaps me and sends me to go to sleep. I'm crying now and my face hurts. I lay in bed, it's really cold. A warmth is moving towards me... I feel something touch me... It's Nyx! I'm so happy. She is my favourite Warframe She whispers in my ear "This is my ship." She mind-controls me with her mind-control ability, and puts me on my hands and knees. I'm ready. I spread my keyboard and mouse for Nyx. She penetrates my TV screen. It hurts so much, but I do it for Nyx. I can feel my screen cracking and my eyes start to water. I push against her chaos, I want to please Nyx. She absorbs my love, and roars a mighty roar as she fills my screen with physic bolts. My dad walks in. Nyx looks him straight in the eye and says, "It's all chaos now." Nyx leaves through my window. Nyx is love. Nyx is life <3 10/10 Ruined my life
Majestic PANGOLIN;-;This game is a highly addicting game. As you progress onwards into the game this F2P game becomes more and more P2P with the fact that you will realize that you do not want to spend another week farming the same one type of enemy, boss, or mission to get that item that you want. It becomes very repetitive very fast. If you like losing money and wasting your time or love grinding for 8 hours every day for 3 weeks just to get one upgrade, part, or item, then this game is for you! If you are not a crazy person who wants to play this game then here are some other suggested factors that will soon come into play once you embark on this horrific adventure... : You will start to loose free time in your day :You will start paying for a F2P game : You start to shrug off friends to play a computer game :You start to become an isolationist : You start getting in arguments with your wife :You get a divorce with your wife :You skip your court date to ensure that you get to ever see your kids : you block out all interactions with the outside world: You forget to pay your bills : You loose your car : You forget to pay for your house loan : you loose your house : You then revert to public libraries and coffe shops to set up your computer in : you get kicked out of coffe shops and libraries : You still go back to coffe shop and libraries : you get your computer confiscated :You then sleep out side inside a tree hut : You think you are a space ninja and practice jumping and running from tree to tree : You fall and break your legs : You goto hospital : You sneak on hospital computer during the night to play Warframe : You are then sedated by security gaurd : You wake up in jail : You remember that you couldnt pay medical bills : You can't resist the urge to play Warframe so you try to escape from jail as a Space ninja : a man on Meth helps you escape : you get out and then buy Meth from that man : you are now addicted to meth : You think you are a real space ninja : You jump from car to car : You then jump from bridge to car : You are on meth so you dont realize that the car is moving : You get hit by the car : You loose all Limbs : You cant play Warframe or be a space ninja : You revert to eating dirt to stay alive : You then get  on by a homeless man who is on meth : You realize that you are now below a man that is on meth : A giant Eagle picks you up : You are then carried to the Eagles nest : You then are eaten alive : Then you are puked back up by the Eagle : You then are given to the baby Eagles as food................ Don't Be A Limbless Man Who Has Had Their Life Ruined By WarFrame..... UNINSTALL OR DELETE ALL TRACES OF WARFRAME NOW AND SAVE YOUR SELF BEFORE THE METH KICKS IN!!!
Ninja Nub;-;grindframe artificial difficulty galore, hack and slash with crap weapons,  guns, pre-render trailers that don't show how the game works, come all, come on, for a grindfest of unparallelled proportions, with crap voice acting,  designs, and flashy animations and effects, if you're shallow and want to grind, this game is for you, if you want something tasteful with an actual story and challenge, this is not for you stay away
Roxyn;-;Mass Effect 3 multiplayer with a cash shop. If you enjoy grinding the same thing over and over for days, weeks or years on end then you might enjoy this game. For me it was about as engaging as being force-fed a bucket of pickled dingleberries.
92982;-;Minimum viable product. It's gameplay reflects this quality. What gameplay is there you might ask? Oh just some grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind, grind. I forgot to mention the developers of this game are utterly inept. The sky is blue, water is wet, code is sleek, scott is fat, and this game is garbage. There you go. Edit: posterity
AG-w^(o.O)s;-;Grind To Win that's all
Viking;-;Good game, shame its pay to win, good shooter.
Extremely Handsome Sniper;-;This game sucked up all of my time, and is pretty much the defining game of my college experience. Anytime I play a game, I play Warframe. Super addicting, but in a good way. Time is definitely money in this game, and often the majority of your time is spent in crafting sweet new weapons and Warframes. Updates are constant, with new content being released often. If you love fast-paced ninjas sprinting around with superpowers shooting and slashing everything in their path, this game's for you.
Zadrave;-;Third person TF2 with more grind than a cheese grater in switzerland.
Henoctus3112[Trading];-;Pretty much you are Sam(or Dean) Winchester and you are tearing through space demons(or EA representatives) one sword slice at a time and you are quite efficient at it with the only problem of grinding for materials such as the dreaded morphics.
Third Reich Mike;-;So....I see you've finally come.....brother.....I've been waiting for you, I wanted to avoid you until you understood the true meaning of your existance, but your truly a fool to confront me with that.....power. Not only have I obtained the Masamurasame Demon Blood Mitsubishi katana of legend, I've also increased my abilities to a plane above you'res. You don't stand a chance against me the way you are, my steel folded one trillion times will slice through you like butter.......let our duel....begin! *Teleports behind you* You're too slow! *Performs the hidden lotus with the secret 9th chakra gate unlocked briefly so that it doesn't hurt me* Time to die brother! *Shoots the Mega Bigbang Kamehameha Flash Finale at you* It's....Over! *Picks your body up off the ground and raises my sword to your neck* You could have joined me, Giyo.....Goodbye....*Cuts your neck* *GASP* a hologram?! *I get stabbed from behind* You:All according to plan....Yu. Looks like my Instant Flash Dance Manoover was a little faster...huh? *I slip out of your attack* Your not the only one with tricks, Giyo! *runs behind you at fast speed* It's finnaly over! *Grunt* DIE! *You disapear* You: I'm sorry, Yu, I was never hear, you're already dead....
=C0C= Goose;-;This game is awesome! It made my eyeballs explode.
Peanits;-;Update 14 has really made the beginning of the game more playable. I would absolutely recommend it now. Pros: Lots of customizations You get to feel like you earned your new gear Plenty of variety Interesting gamemodes Great opportunities for teamwork Each update brings a brand new UI Cons: Crafting new stuff *sometimes* requires days of grinding Crafting things also takes time (i.e. 12 hours, 24 hours, 3 days, etc) You only get a limited number of weapon and character slots People can pay to buy pretty much anything with real money, which sort of kills the sense of accomplishment for people who earned their gear
lqlas;-;Amazing game. It migth have micro transactions but most items are obtainable in other ways.
Zaldlum;-;The greatest Free to Play game ever thought of. Update after update Digital Extremes delivers great content, And it rewards those who work. Reguardless if you have money to put into the game or not, You can in the end get pretty much any item without money. Highly recomend this game to any person.
Mystery The Furfag;-;Great game. Play in a world where large security forces are always the Grineer. A world where even organic Corpus somehow leave a heavy robotic signature. Warframe...A game about Ninja Robots from another dimension. Tenno/10 would frame wars again.
TensorialAtol55;-;its an ok game
Crazador;-;I Really Like This
eurobufu;-;This is a greate game wen u are bored and want to shoot somthing
Aetrem;-;A good game, but you have to grind for alot of stuff.
Mite Bejerkenauf;-;You can change the colour of your weapon.
Grapes of Rat;-;You shoot the exact same bad guys over and over. Your only real goal is to get better gear to kill said bad guys. Somehow, this game is still beautiful in every way.
fall;-;Great game, friend no like, he say no play more game, I say why? game was fun, we laughed, we cried, we didnt win, but we played, friend said no. I said yes.
Rain;-;This game is like playing Left for Dead in the Year 2131849148. Zombies are mechanical O___O
FBER;-;A rather nice game for a F2P and you can still have quite allot of fun on it without buying anything with real cash. Would say it's a good game to try. I my self spent over 200 hours on it and would say that quite allot of people play it. Not to mention updates and events are rather offten and the game get's new content ones a month or so.
Loafs of Bread (in a box);-;I <3 this free game
Rocko;-;Fun cooperative experience with very fluid and friendly controls, wrapped in beautiful visuals powered by nicely optimized engine.
Viki Ransorate;-;The game is a lot of fun but repetitive so it can get boring fast. Its a lot more fun if you play with friends so that its less boring. At a certain point progressing does require you to pay for more weapon or frame slots. If you don't then you will have to trash , remake and lvl up what you already have to continue progressing your rank. Lucky the slots aren't expensive.
Bandai Namco Games;-;Dis game is fun. Lyke minecraft but more better than sd
JIGGLYPFF;-;Warframe grows on you the more you play...
[wh4t]cg3214;-;I r t3h ninja. 11/9 Scratch that. This game is really fun but its a free2pay game (not play, pay!) You can't get anywhere unless you are either playing with friends or you spend a bunch of money on weapons that you don't need! Like seriously people, spend your money on something wortwhile like a slurpee. Even though it's a pay to win game, it still has fun mechanics and gameplay and surprisingly good graphics. Overall I give this a 7/10
I am Holo;-;Has guns with ballsacks 10/10
E-Pain;-;you guys, this game is great
I can't find you in the dark;-;Gets me almost as horny as Ariana Grande's Break Free.
Lord Satan;-;Play it, and join my clan :D ( The Cult Of Satan )
Nep Nep Expert;-;Fun at first... Then it proceeds to get VERY VERY VERY repetitive...
GoldPlease;-;An extremely satisfying blend of RPG/MMO progression and satisfying 3rd person action based gameplay, Warframe is definitely a game worth picking up for the low cost of free.
Addry (FIN);-;If you have a pack of friends to go with you, this game will be a blast. Everything is simple enough so you don't need to worry too much, but still complex enough so that you have room to learn to improve your gameplay and character build. Movement is very well done and flows nicely. Though, don't dive in expecting a grand story behind the game. Warframe is a solid 8/10 game. For a F2P game, it is very well done, and has a lot for you to do.
Crackleking;-;Warfram is a solid co op shooter. The shooting is fun but the it takes ages to unlock anything and the ai is . but with amazing combat and cool aesthetics i can over look some of these flaws 7.5/10
(  `);-;Dont forget your visa if the Grineer come around. Ignorance is no excuse for an expired document.
99james9;-;This game is a fun game that links with the Xbone and PS4 and is kinda like destiny in a way, overall a good game
Freaky Tah;-;Proof that metascores don't matter. Like roger ebert's opinion on movies. You can choose to play the game and enjoy it, or like the critics you can give it a 67 without even recording 1 hour of playing time.
FurankuBldySkywalker;-;This game has a great potential, not the best game out there but a very good one! 7.5/10
Midnight_Entity;-;This game is amazing for a free to play and the only bug that i have found is that once in excavation the scanner stayed at 100% power and the drill wouldn't spawn, but apart from that and a few clan dojo glitches the game runs really well 10/10.
Stryker;-;Warframe is an amazing game for emphasizing your playstyle, each weapon is suited to a specific playstyle, or adaptive to MAKE it fit your playstyle, this also can be said about the Warframes themselves. Mods further enhance playstyle to the very elements you want to fire out of your gun! While it is a grind, after that first loadout is bought and you have a new melee, primary, and secondary weapon, it becomes a game of using awesome mods and unique effects for each gun to mow down hundreds of enemies in different ways, using abilities let's you master the flow of combat. Another thing great about this game is the animations, while they are triggered by player use on some, which can be a bit sudden, all animations look so smooth, and each weapon even has unique combos, stealth kills, finishers, and so on. I would highly recommend this game to anyone, and it's FTP, but not necessarily PTW, the developers themselves said that everything in the game (besides color packs and Excalibur Prime, the donator frame) is obtainable for free. Grinding to get a new weapon can be fun with friends, and the combat is so satisfying most of the time.
Spectre;-;If you like endless grinding look no further.
POTATOTOTOTOTOTOTOTOATOTOTOTOTOE;-;excellent co-op, lots of updates, packs are a bit over priced though.
Anon;-;In Warframe, you play as a Tenno, a member of a species of ancient warriors that have reemerged to lay waste to the various nefarious species populating the solar system. Your foes include the Grineer, a jackbooted army of deteriorating humanoid clones; the Corpus, a mix-and-match crew of robotic and human parts; and the Infestation, a bunch of shambling organic creatures that vaguely resemble the Flood from the Halo series. While your enemies are visually uninteresting, a lot of the Tenno suits and weapons have a great sense of style that imbues Warframe with a spark of personality. Each species has a cursory backstory, and there is some lore to be found buried in the menus, but there's no narrative thrust or intrigue to speak of. And so you run mission after mission, moving outward from the sun as you level up your loadout and become a more proficient killer. The core combat of Warframe is straightforward. This is a third-person action game in which you wield two primary weapons and a melee weapon against foes who are largely content to come right at you. You also gain suit powers that allow you to dash and slash through a bunch of enemies, or stun all foes within a certain radius, though these abilities can change drastically depending on what suit you equip. You could unleash fiery maelstroms, turn invisible, create a decoy, use teleportation to switch places with an enemy, or manipulate your foes to fight against their allies. Acquiring new suits, however, requires a significant investment of time or money (more on this later). Regardless of what powers you have equipped, you can often wage effective war against your enemies by firing on them from a distance, then slicing up the ones who manage to get close. This tactic grows tiresome after a while, however, and doesn't serve you well as you take on tougher levels. Fortunately, you can combine your ability to jump, sprint, and crouch into an acrobatic array of slides, flips, jump kicks, wall runs, leaping slashes, and more. Though there's a certain rigidity to your movement, your mobility is one of the most interesting and enjoyable things about Warframe, and it's fun to zip around your enemies, slashing and shooting until the only ones left standing are your fellow Tenno. 7/10
Anon;-;In Warframe, you play as a Tenno, a member of a species of ancient warriors that have reemerged to lay waste to the various nefarious species populating the solar system. Your foes include the Grineer, a jackbooted army of deteriorating humanoid clones; the Corpus, a mix-and-match crew of robotic and human parts; and the Infestation, a bunch of shambling organic creatures that vaguely resemble the Flood from the Halo series. While your enemies are visually uninteresting, a lot of the Tenno suits and weapons have a great sense of style that imbues Warframe with a spark of personality. Each species has a cursory backstory, and there is some lore to be found buried in the menus, but there's no narrative thrust or intrigue to speak of. And so you run mission after mission, moving outward from the sun as you level up your loadout and become a more proficient killer. The core combat of Warframe is straightforward. This is a third-person action game in which you wield two primary weapons and a melee weapon against foes who are largely content to come right at you. You also gain suit powers that allow you to dash and slash through a bunch of enemies, or stun all foes within a certain radius, though these abilities can change drastically depending on what suit you equip. You could unleash fiery maelstroms, turn invisible, create a decoy, use teleportation to switch places with an enemy, or manipulate your foes to fight against their allies. Acquiring new suits, however, requires a significant investment of time or money (more on this later). Regardless of what powers you have equipped, you can often wage effective war against your enemies by firing on them from a distance, then slicing up the ones who manage to get close. This tactic grows tiresome after a while, however, and doesn't serve you well as you take on tougher levels. Fortunately, you can combine your ability to jump, sprint, and crouch into an acrobatic array of slides, flips, jump kicks, wall runs, leaping slashes, and more. Though there's a certain rigidity to your movement, your mobility is one of the most interesting and enjoyable things about Warframe, and it's fun to zip around your enemies, slashing and shooting until the only ones left standing are your fellow Tenno. 7/10
!nstinkt;-;Yeees the best 3rd parkour ninja game i have been looking for this game like 3months aND I finaly found it EPIC !
Doom9ra;-;Best FTP game,no PayToWin system,just PayToGetItFaster. Must play.
Niggachu;-;There's a part in the game where you need to get a kubrow pet ( Dog kinda things) and you need to kill them, destroy their home, take their egg, and then hatch that egg until that kubrow becomes youre sex slave. 10/10 Best Game Ever
Legatus Ignatius;-;Dead Space meets samuris with superpowers. Best in co-op.
Goldust-;-;Warframe is a cooperative online third person free to play action game presenting wonderful gameplay, graphics quality and action involving space ninja-bots.This game is currently in beta but it is generally a PS4 game.It is becoming more wonderful game on steam with every updates and it is an addictive game..So, I will recommend this game to every player on steam.. :)
Richguy;-;Its looks like a P2W game when you play at the middle but its okay as long u have friends to accompany you. and i think every mission feels too short, and then the price of items is too expensive for a low budget gamer. the graphic is okay, and add more weapon. 7/10 Gameplay 8/10 Graphic 7/10 Equipments
Hijacki (  ) Master;-;ausome u can uhhh... revive yo self so cooh right? ya yay shut up mr mackey...mkay anyway ya u can revive yo self and ninjas play free good job im a ninja im freakin JEBUS I HAD SEX WIT YO MOM YO THINK DAT AINT OWSOME WELL IM MARRIED TO JENIFFER LAWRENCE well i used to till i killed her dad cos he borrowed my destiny and lost it so i 360 triple noscoped him and thats why im single again wait was only like a quarter of that about the game? damnit! WHY MOM WHY oh ya uhhh if u want to be my stripper add meh then we has a lap dance see ya!
Mata2Londo;-;7 hours per day, im okay
ganibattlebear lf dank memes;-;11/10 graphics card died
scnerd;-;The only reason I don't have thousands of hours buried in this world is because I like seeing friends in the physical world once in a while. Brilliantly designed, tons of fun, and endlessly expansive... built by people who love games for people who love games. Go forth and dominate.
SoulHate;-;Very fun and addictive
aeyman301;-;never get bored to this game.if bored,craft a new warframe and level it up.
ReaperzSkull;-;It is a really good and well made game but playing with others could be better like adding a survival
IamJoogle;-;it's okay though it gets old pretty quick
Durzo Blint;-;10 - 10 stars. great communit great developers i would definatly recomend this game
shepherd;-;realy good game
JoJohann;-;Awesome game.
DaGamarh;-;* Puts on horsemask*** * "I LOVE IT!" 10/10 ***NB: There is no horsemask in game, 1/10.
Salted Pretzle;-;If you like shooting guns, slashing aliens in half, throwing kunai in their face spliting it in two which is only about 99% of the male population like doing. and if you havent started downloading warframe by now did i mention it's free? So lets recap slashing aliens, shooting guns, throwing kunai like a boss, and doing all that with your friends for free. Sounds good to me. and did i mention there are a tons of weapons i havent even seen 10% of them
jordonhewerdine;-;this game is epic i coudnt imporve this.
Kaboom0;-;Amazing... The time I have spent is evident of that... The movement system is awesome...
Carter;-;Greatest game on Steam I've found
LongDanzi;-;do you like ninjas? how about space ninjas? would you like to become a space ninja and kill everyone that hates space ninjas? if you answer yes to the questions above, get this game. if you do you will: -Become a space ninja -Travel across the galaxy -murder anything and anyone who isn't a space ninja -make some weapons -level up said weapons -parkour -Parkour to hard and over shoot where you wanted to go -fall off the level -get placed where you started parkouring -tame a space dog -murder some bosses -have the bosses send you hate mail -have the bosses call a space ninja to come murder you -sees the space ninja -*Dies* -"Insert any swear word here" -rinse repeat so sprint+slide+melee your way to victory
Captain Whiskers;-;Pay to win, too much of a boring grind to unlock anything free. Lost my attention before I wanted to spend money on it. (I have spent money on F2P games before.)
Sion;-;Endless grinding to no real endgame  Bugs the devs refuse to fix and instead mask with more weapons and warframes  Pay-to-win mechanics that EA would condone  Horrible rank-up mechanic  AI is awful I would have rather paid $20 for a game just like this with devs that weren't Jews and gave a sht.
Divine Darkness {A};-;one of the best free to plays i think i have ever played including demos and mods. And to those who say its pay to win. dont listen to them they are just trolling the review its actually quite balanced. first 3 free classes are some of the most powerful ones. Now if you want to spend $10 usd than go ahead get a new class. But all you are buying is a completly diffrent skill set. All classes have their own uniqe play style so do you're homework and look them up on the warframe website.
Randinator;-;Its very fun, also good for waisting time. But after a while you start to wonder what kind of drug the team was abusing when they decided their prices for platinum.
E.P.I.C[LV];-;Realy cool game !!!
onion italiano;-;Warframe is a Free to Play construction simulation game here you and your team of "Tenno Home Improvement and Weapons" must complete a vast array of timed contracts for your many customers. The game features some unforgetful characters, such as Captain "Charles" Vor, a retired Navy captain from the Grineer Naval school, and Alad "Whats in the bag" V, a board member of the Corpus Lumber Yard. The game's name refers to the WarFrame, a special tool the Tenno use to beat their competition in contracts, it is a special tool belt and vest that surrounds it's user in high tech grade A tools from harbour and freight. 8/10 really fun game but lots of grinding, but fun enough that it doesn't matter. F2P and not P2W so that's good.
Van Baza;-;It's the kind of game which you either love or hate. Depends on how well you take grinding. Also big thumbs up for the community.
Ecalla;-;You can fight yourself in the dojo 10/10
Felupi;-;Ninjas in space?  Yeah!!! Back to 90's.
somechick_73;-;I love this game!
Lobstopus;-;Spouting profanity once every 5 seconds continuously for 2 hours straight once a day. ...simulator.
Treble Clef;-;Freakin Ninja Gaiden meets Deadspace. But better. And it's free. 11/10
{FaZe}sergsniper6;-;it was amazing but never really let me get on so i suggest when this is fixed
Weeaboo;-;Infinite "Checking for update" screen. 10/10
Jairo Castro JR;-;I love this game that is why im coming back to it x3
Rehan;-;Great Game
[RGG] ICEKINGEXTREAME;-;it is fun but very challenging then I thought It would be
Malvarose;-;gud graphics
Paxter;-;Very good game! :)
Vordoz;-;This game in my opinion is astonishing...
ProGamerKing;-;This game is great but i have some problems i cant play please help.
Fading Kindness;-;I do wholeheartly recommend this game, spent a good few hundred hours on it off of steam. Tis all i can say.
undrasha;-;you need a pretty good computer to run this game smoothly
KennyF;-;one of the best games i have ever played....
Kommerad;-;i want the apple support@
Broken;-;Warframe may be a bit grind-heavy, and waiting for your items to build is a pain, Warframe is a really fun F2P third-person shooter MMO. Thankfully, unlike most F2P games, almost every item in the game can be obtained in some way, permanently, without use of any real cash if you are willing to invest the immense amount of time to do so. No real pay to win  here, just pay to speed things up. This is a pretty good model in comparison to  you see in Nexon games for example. Aside from rushing items or getting rare orokin catalysts/reactors and forma (3 very important items to leveling up) outside of events that give them out for free, the only things you necessarily need to pay for are costmetics such as color palettes and armor decoration. When you get your first bunch of platinum (the in-game real-money paid currency), hold onto it, and don't waste it on guns (get the blueprints instead, those can be retrieved with normal credits which are free by playing), or anything that isn't necessary. Use your plat for cosmetics, or Orokin Catalysts/Reactors (but only if you urgently need them then and there and there isn't an event available). As for the game itself, Warframe's gameplay is fast-paced and frantic. There's a huge emphasis on both ranged and melee combat, and the Melee system is really neat, kind of combining typical TPS melee combat with a God of War-style combo system. There is also some parkour in the game, allowing you to run along and up walls, vault over objects, and do slides, spin-dashes, etc. The guns in the game are for the most part satisfying to use, and feel beefy (such as the Latron), and leveling them up/modding them is surprisingly deep and complex. Mixing damage types depending on what faction you're fighting is very important and something you'll be doing regularly, same with applying mods that build on a weapon's strengths (such as fire rate, damage, mag size, etc). The Enemy Ai, while it definitely isn't the smartest, it is coordinated and different enemy units will try to flank you, take cover, and some brave units may try to hunt you down and find your position if you've run out of sight. However extremely rare, if a fight is going south for the enemy, they'll flee which is also interesting to see. You progress through the game by playing various missions of different types, some involve simply killing everyone(extermination), defending an object of interest from destruction (defense), defending multiple hackable terminals (mobile defense), and much more. There's a lot of variety, and almost every mode save for extermination requires some level of teamwork. With the Archwing update coming out soon, the game will be a lot more diverse, adding full space combat to the mix as well. This is one of the most anticipated updates to the game thus far, and with good reason... It's a big game-changer, literally. The biggest downsides to the game are that the Voice-chat sucks and has horrible quality, the game can be very buggy / freeze prone at times, the netplay can be bandwidth intensive, you can only have parties of 4 players on a mission, and there's a lot of older weapon mods and warframe abilities that are currently becoming less viable as new content rolls in and other elements of the game get new features/improvements. The new stuff ends up leaving older stuff in the dust, in short. Digital Extremes, the developer, plan on rectifying this soon thankfully. In short, it's a great game, it still has issues, but those are quickly evaporating. If you like fast-paced cooperative action with some RPG elements thrown in, plenty of loot, decent AI, satisfying guns, and lots of blood/gore, you'll like this game. As a slightly off-topic note - Digital Extremes (who made this) also made one of the best games of all time; Unreal Tournament 2004, alongside Epic Games back in the day, so give that a look too.
My_Monkey_Balls;-;Not the biggest fan of multiplayers, mobas pvp and all that stuff.. But this game has MOJO
Obama Bin Laden;-;You can do all the stuff in the trailer if you can do all the stuff in the trailer then that mean the game is awesome. PERIOD. PLUS. You play as freaking space ninjas...
FriendlyMan;-;Much Doge, very play
Cato;-;Great game, played it on my other Steam account heaps :)
IndigoJam;-;This game is cool, BUT is a resource hog to be sure, I know it's still in beta, but it takes a monster PC rig to run it in highest settings, but it still looks nice enough in lower rez + medium settings if you turn a few things off... It controls nice enough with an X360 for Win pad + it lets you remap the buttons... it's a "photo realistic" game so it looks awesome, since it's F2P D/L it, & give it a try.
ZAYZO;-;please help me i couldn't update it!!! please i really like this game!!!
mrfundimentals;-;Amazing Graphics!!! The mechanics and whole game is amazing! Though the funniest thing there is....is the GLITCHES XD
()_NeOn_GeNeSis_;-;This is an awesome game... You Guys need to play it.. You will enjoy this game
Saiensu;-;Game ruined my life. 10/10
Gulie;-;This game stole my life , i played it almost naked because i didnt even have time to shower , totally recommendz
FoXxXoT;-;Very Good game indeed, hours of fun alone or in co-op mode
BraveDude8;-;I'm going to sum up this game as simply as possible. It is a repetitive, grindy game. You should know this going in. Do not expect a massive variation in what you do. NOW THE FUN STUFF A PARKOUR SYSTEM - WALLRUNNING, SLIDING, FLIPS, VAULTING, ALL THAT COOL STUFF WHILE FIRING GUNS 4-PLAYER CO-OP (It's not an MMO.) A GOOD F2P MODEL (Only stuff that you HAVE to spend real money on are cosmetics - weapons can be crafted using resources gained from missions and blueprints bought from the market for credits.) GUN MODDING AND STUFF (Customise your gun to make it more effective against specific enemies, or just make it set people on fire. CLANS (Guilds, armies, whatever you want to call it. You share a dojo, a communal map that you all build which allows you to unlock exclusive clan-tech weapons. ADORABLE SENTINELS (They fly around above your shoulder and shoot stuff. They are adorable.) 9.6/10 - Not bad (IGN) GOTY
Nyanners;-;If you can't play Destiny because you're broke, this is a game similar to it.
FiveNine IV;-;Great game! One of the best free to play game out there. Nice graphics and excellent gameplay.
Ekzarcun;-;Awsome SCI-fi action hack\slash; Run\Shoot game where the rule is simple 100% play to win 0% pay to win
[GM] Dicey Dsy;-;Slice. Slice. Slice. What better way to demonstrate this game? 1000000000000/10
HIV360;-;(Im not very good at posting comments, but meh just give it a helpful review)>>> Warframe is very awesome, for a ninja play, si-fi, and a third person veiw. (LoL)> . I can picture if its first person but that prob decrease xp of you playing it. Making a Warframe tip: It will prob take a long time to make,a lot money to spend, and a lot time to collect. But I think that way is more effective than just wasting your 'real money' to buy plitanium. Well, its a very> very> very awesome game and I give it a 10/10. I will prob update this review again if I want to and shred some darkness into the light.......
iamtyphon;-;One of the best graphics an online RPG can offer.
Sparten 117;-;Awesome but should tell you more information and needs more story
Origin388;-;For a free game its not too bad, of course all the best stuff is bought with currency that can only be acquired by Real money but eh, you don't need it to play through the game! Pretty good game i'd say a 7/10
+SifuRed;-;fast paced spaceninja action.
Reyane;-;Fast phase running gunning/slashing affair!!! 7/10
Microsoft Excel;-;Good fun game that isnt pay to win
FriendlyMan;-;Much Doge, very play
Cato;-;Great game, played it on my other Steam account heaps :)
IndigoJam;-;This game is cool, BUT is a resource hog to be sure, I know it's still in beta, but it takes a monster PC rig to run it in highest settings, but it still looks nice enough in lower rez + medium settings if you turn a few things off... It controls nice enough with an X360 for Win pad + it lets you remap the buttons... it's a "photo realistic" game so it looks awesome, since it's F2P D/L it, & give it a try.
ZAYZO;-;please help me i couldn't update it!!! please i really like this game!!!
mrfundimentals;-;Amazing Graphics!!! The mechanics and whole game is amazing! Though the funniest thing there is....is the GLITCHES XD
()_NeOn_GeNeSis_;-;This is an awesome game... You Guys need to play it.. You will enjoy this game
Hamaworld;-;Very fun and great game , Recommended :)
MeoWHamsteR;-;A great sci-fi TPS co-op alien ninjas (you heard it, alien ninjas!) Game thingy... Aliens.... Yeah, so, as I said, it is a very VERY fun game, with very friendly players, youtubers and devs, very cool events and weapons (there are a lot of weapons in this game, and some of them aren't the ones your'e thinking about...). It is FREE, and has THE best graphics for a F2P game I came across. Yes, it do need to watch some vids 'bout this game to get the hang of it, and if you are going to play this game and invest a lot of time into it, you pretty much HAVE to spend money on it (unless you found some rare stuff, which you can trade for Platinum, which is the "real money" of this game), and, of course, let's not forget the awful amount of farming, but, WORTH IT. If you DO decide to play this game, please add me ingame, my name is, of course, MeoWHamsteR7. I'll invite you to a very nice clan, and just help you overall. See ya in yo' fancy Warframes!
colordeaf86;-;The new updates are just making a good game even better!
xElieazar;-;I've been a member of this community from when it started and i can say that is one of the greatest i've seen.And that is given by the fact that the developers are in a really close relation with the players and they give them what they want and more,like they said "the company is in the player's hand". When i first saw the teaser to the game i knew it would be successful. And i don't regret a single hour spent playing this game,the gameplay it's amazing and it's designed by you,your choice of Warframes and weapons build your experience,you can definately find a warframe of your taste but my proposal to everyone is to try them all because every single one of them offer a different experience. Sometimes it can get repetitive because you will need to farm for resources but get 3 more friends to play with and you won't even notice the time flying.
Vidleo;-;When I first started playing this game a couple of months ago, I was definitly confused with the mechanics, the mission menu, almost everything basically except the gameplay itself. I ended up learning how to do the things that were initially only understable if you tinkered around, self teach yourself how it all wokrs. But with one of the updates that make the mission menu simpler to follow, a more comprehendable control tutorial, and most of all, it teaches you what you need to do outside of the game that I only knew when I self taught it or looked on wikipedia. This game is coming along nicely. Only thing I'd ever have to complain about to this point is the "Play to win" catch. I feel inferior playing against those who buy crazy armor and weapons, or even the simplest designs. But that's not really something that makes me hate this game. I love it
MistaStealYoAK;-;Fast paced, third person hack-n-slash/shooter. Not your everyday free-to-play hack and slash game. Different warframes to choose and unlock depending on how you like to get down. Plenty of upgrades and mods you can apply to your weapon or frame to match your playstyle. Space ninjas. Space Nazis. Recommending it.
The Magician;-;Great game.
HomicidalToast;-;It's about space ninjas and lasers and aliens and it isn't made by EA. Such worth.
Mastafroggy;-;I got banned for 25 years lol
tysaa123;-;great game!!!
Bubbles;-;Fun, fast pased, badass gameplay. I reccomend this game for anyone who likes shooting stuff.
hawklands;-;It takes a little getting used to, it can be a little daunting, but overall one of the most orginal games, I can see its early art in dark sector a pc,ps3,360 orginal. I hope the game continues to grow. I enjoy it.
Nuise;-;A pretty interesting Sci-Fi shooter with a little bit of story that get easily lost after the tutorial. Different ,Warframes' (charakters) to build and play, lot of missions and respawning events.
Yuno;-;veri gud, space ninjas with powers n enemies with bunny ears n oversized legs
h4ppy.j3d1;-;Basically it's a fast paced super sentai game. You are a badass in spandex in the future slicing, punching and shooting at bad guys at super speed (if you are decent) or trying to avoid death (git gud mango). Bosses are -easy and you'll enjoy this piece of software (at least 30-50 hours) until you are forced to grind forever to acquire a new pair of metal breasts for your space waifu. PLAY ALONE OR WITH ONE OTHER PLAYER, NEVER JOIN 4 PLAYER MISSIONS BECAUSE IT'S A CLUSTER! Grafixx 8/10 Sound 3/10 Gameplay 7/10 P2W Ratio 6/10
Boris Johnson;-;Totes mlg. Much wow.
BurningArk;-;While fun, the game has three free "classes" to pick in the begining. The other "classes" are avalible with by use real world money to buy in game points to obtain the other "classes"; with the most expensive ones being about 20$. Wareframe plays exceptionaly well, and is just plain fun; especially with other players/your friends. However, because Wareframe is free the majority of the gameplay is essentially pay-to-win due to the better items and other "classes" being available through the use of real world money. That's not to say that Wareframe is a bad game, because it's not, but this one aspect is enough to be a huge turn-off for some people.
NiNjA_ShIfTy;-;This game is amazing by visuels graphics everything about it is awesome, a must get now!
Homeydaclown;-;Game is just like dead space+mass effect=Warframe
cx-obi;-;Youtube game footage does not look as nice as the actual game. If you have a high end machine, just try the game out and you wont be disappointed.
Emerald;-;Warframe is a good sci-fi co-op mission game which has promising potential to be a great game but right now contains many annoying bugs which need to be fixed for it to be great. There is still much more room for improvement such as the user interface and animation set. If the developers can fix some basic issues, they will potentially have one of the best game's of its genre. Right now, I give this game in September 2014 a 7/10.
MLGB0Y;-;It's like mass effect 3 but good
Hasitte;-;First ever online Multi-Player game that made me to play for hours. This game delivers smooth game-play with enjoyable game modes.
poop;-;yeah space ninjas. Confusing at first but fun game nontheless
Zanek;-;Is a nice game after you get the way you need to play it ...
K.D.K.D;-;i well give this game new page and hope for the beast
Drew;-;I Highly Rate this game, It is the best fps game i have ever played 10 out of 10
GiantGoomba;-;Great game, great community!
Squeegee;-;buy this ftp game you ing loser you have no excuse
AWhoradToRemember;-;If you like fighting space ninjas then you sould totally get this game it has insane parkour and insane awesomness, And the best part is that its free.!
8-Bit Pixel;-;Warframe, in my opinion, is an underrated game. For being a Free-to-play game, it is pretty good! It's a fun, challenging, single or multiplayer game! I would recommend it to any Sci-fi fans!
<font face="forte">PouBavui_;-;Wow..Nice Game.
Euphoricaa;-;I absolutely love this game. It's very versatile and open to pretty much anything you want to do with it; whether you put money into it or not. It's a third-person shooter, which is probably why I love it so much. I'd definitely recommend this as one of the best free-to-play games available on Steam.
Wolf;-;it's a very good game
DeMoN;-;Great game, awesome graphics , good story line the game moves at the pace you want it and the game will teach you the basics of how to play the game youll get easily caught up playing with friends for hours at a time 10/10 score from me.
[] ElysiumLeoSK;-;Ninja aliens? This game made my day :)
Tom;-;This game is amazing! Have played for a while and will continue to play! Every update brings new, fresh content in a unique style of play not found in any other game! The one problem is learning to play the game. The tutorial could use some inprovement, but aside from that the game is flawless! 10/10 Side Note: If you are struggling to learn something there is a lot of support provided on the games forums and within the game in various different chat channels.
CLWH :D;-;This game has everything that a person wants. Fricken ninjas in space, dogs killing people, swords, guns, badass Warframes and for the guys, sexualize Warframes that will probably give them rageboners. I'm just saying.
King Julian;-;So here is the deal. Warframe is aweful. Honestly 0/10 would not play. Maybe... MAYBE 2/10 cuz swords. Other than that this game is lame. You force yourself to play a few hours, however, becuase it has gotten higher ratings than some of your favorite games. So you're in around ten hours, and you get to your first level 30 weapon. You have since then purchased and/or found other weapon parts and intended to build a superior weapon to the weapon you currently have. You give it a shot and holy dear lord is it good. And it felt pretty satisfying coming out of the 12 or 24 hour oven (foundry). So you play with that for a while and have a decent amount of fun. So okay, games not great, maybe a 5/10. At least it's free. But, becuase this new weapon is pretty good, you want to see what else is on the horizon. Rinse and repeat until about 40 hours when you realize that you've covered most of the starchart and have a few good weapons. Rinse and repeat until you can take down anything in the starchart VERY fast. Rinse and repeat until you can take out the stalkler in one hit with a meelee weapon. Rinse and repeat until you can last to 45 mins + on T4 survival. etc., etc., ,etc. 10/10 God Tier Game. Would Recommend (EVEN DROPPING CASH ON TEH GAME) TL;DR Graph of y = x where x is how much you play and y is your desire to play
Luxury Items;-;quite good and a gr8 co-op game!
Sprayo'snickers;-;very fun and you can slice people in half
Doc Xero;-;The Badass Simulator. 9/10
BellBellBellBellBell;-;Not even Captain Bright made me this happy.
the.mystical.warrior01;-;I have a positive opinion of WarFrame. You can have access to missions thanks to higher level players, an there is a huge range of customizations for your avatar/Warframe. I also want to point out that u can have multiple Warframes in order to experiment which is the best for your kind of playing style. It's really good and I strongly recommend it!
SergeantSerk // Serkan;-;Completely rehauled game, and to top it up, it's optimised too! Love the graphics, the gameplay and fighting experience too. Recommened for ones with Sci-Fi Fighter feel.
<u>[Sy]RynnX3;-;It's a really great and awesome game! :D Problem is, you still need to register at the original website.. :p But to those who are having doubts.. I tell you this........ DOWNLOAD IT! >:3
Demonpotato3;-;if you want to be a freaking space ninja with guns, and have stealth elements this is the game for you
Elzzar;-;Its a amazing and wonderful game, full of action, adventure, and that splash of violence that just makes it great. Though in the first few days or months (depending how much you play) it is difficult, mainly in money and resources, but that will soon end, and best of all, you don't have to worry that much about upgrading, since all warframes have unique abilities and traits to decide on! So I would definitly recomend this game, but for people who don't like 3rd-person view, space travel guns, lazers, swords, bows, robots, and NINJAS!!!, turn your head and find a different game.
Wagoven;-;Grinding and Running Simulator Space Ninjas with energy guns so much HATE with laggs and crushes with weak notebook why love this game? qooo~
Alexander Roth;-;- Story - "They were called Tenno. Warriors of blade and gun: masters of the Warframe armor. Those that survived the old war were left drifting among the ruins. Now they are needed once more. The Grineer, with their vast armies, are spreading throughout the solar system. A call echoes across the stars summoning the Tenno to an ancient place. They summon you. Allow the Lotus to guide you. She has rescued you from your cryostasis chamber and given you a chance to survive. The Grineer will find you; you must be prepared. The Lotus will teach you the ways of the Warframes and the secrets to unlocking their powers. Come Tenno, you must join the war." I think in my opinion is one of the best F2P games I ever played.It has: weapons, space ninjas, Archwing, character costumization, santinels, your very own pet (called Kubrow) and more. The best advice I can give you is: take your time and don't buy everything you see on market.Almost everything you see there can be created/optained through hard wark and patience. I definitely recommend this game to anyone that is looking for this kind of games...That's it, now excusie me, I need to get back and save the humanity.
The Dastardly Boned Bastard;-;Want Destiny? Play this instead, save yourself $60
Donchovi;-;Most graphicaly detailed mmo ive ever seen. love the game play. having a sword and bow in space is a fun new spin. I found that the mouse sensitivety is more sensetive than a menstrating teenage girl who was just dumped on prom night, even after i turned it down almost to zero. this gives the illision of extreme lag which can  you off. everything is also shaped weird, as in enemies and such. like there armor is plated over bursting tummours which have serverly deformed them, but this keeps the game interestin and fresh. runs pretty smoothly.
NicaDeX;-;Game rocks :D Maybe the best ninja game ever
Mangus;-;I heard this game was repetetive and even early on I can see how people say that, but it looks like there's a lot of depth to it and it's interesting enough I'm gonna keep playing for a while.
PRIME;-;Warframe is the best game i played so far on STEAM ! IT has amazing graphich and the best gameplay that is evolveing every day.But it has repetiv ad that is its only downfall.But when you surpass that its amazing.You can chose betvine 100 weapons(fireing and meele) and dosens of sutis with their uniq powers!!! SO LOG IN AND HAVE FUN
Alexhangar;-;well... after more than 400 hours of playing this on steam and another 200 of playing on their louncher, I can say that the game got me. Though it gets repetitive, if you can look over that and become part of the community, you'll never get bored of it.
illogicalblock;-;This game is the greatest. It's like halo, assasin's creed, and destiny had a child and it was an mmorpg.
jjwhatup;-;i think this is the best game i have ever played i usally finsh a long game in a about 300 hours but this game i have nearly got 400 hours into it and im not even a quater way through it is a great game for users that like sci-fi third person shooters well you dont even have to be into sci-fi to play this game.
Shmickel;-;Really fun and graphic are amazing.
Zimrak, Fearless Zee Captain;-;Amazingly fun, consistently interesting, looks and feels fantastic. At the same time, not for everyone. Its the sort of game where you will need to change to progress, without the gameplay changing. Simultaneously, it does require a great deal of farming to get around paying for the cool stuff. If you're the kind of person who enjoys taking on the same challenges from different angles and in different ways, warframe is the best game possible for you. The multiplayer is great, allowing you to have a ton of fun with your friends
[ACCUsers] Noble!;-;this game is not free .
Eternal Silence;-;Seriously the best free to play game ever
Trava;-;Great game to play with friends! Very Diverse character builds and awesome animation!
I AM GUNDAM;-;This game is massive amounts of fun. MAny unique, and familiar art styles blend seamlessly and are seperate enough in their theme so players can recognize different factions with ease. The crafting system will not appeal to casualgamers so much, but dedication is well rewarded.
Eckkse;-;You just have to play this game, it's pretty addictive, and have space ninjas, what else do you want? Well there is more, infinite farming map's plenty of bosses, plant of customization options, if you like ninjas and stuff, you just have to play it :)
@Dd!CT3D(ZFG);-;good game and its free
FataL [LOS];-;Highly addicting game! Everything can be earned in game without spending money! This is a true "free to play" game and I recommend this game to EVERYONE! Come and become a Tenno!
Vero Zero;-;game is
ABRAM;-;HEY ALL OF U I T WAS A SUPER B GAME WITH SUPERB GRAPHICS I HAD BECOEM A HUGE FAN OF THIS GAME..ALL ONE SHOULD PLAY THISGAME ...... I DON'T HAVE MORE SUPERB DOOPERB WORDS TO TELL ABOUT THIS GAME MAY BE PLAY THIS GAME AND U WILL KNOW IT WELL ......IT WAS A SUPERB GAME I HAD PLAYED BEFORE :) DDD
No Fear;-;The awesomnes of co-op
Fox;-;Best f2p game ever, play it now :D
SirGeneralMajor;-;Best Free To Play Game Ever
Metal Cap;-;Warframe is a great game. For some people. I am one of those people. This game is very innovative, because of the way it takes mmo, and mashs it with a single-player game. The controls are nice and accessible, and are also easy to learn. I myself, use a xbox controller for many games. The xbox controls for this game is also nice and feels good. The special effects is phenomenel. It looks amazing if you have a good computer. I love the wayu you can slide while shooting, use a sword to decapitate and how eye-popping it looks on my monitor. So yes, I would extremely recommend this game to another.
Sharia Law;-;An interesting game so far.It's based on teamwork,which is crucial in this game.You can't simply go Rambo on enemies like Call of Duty,'cause you would get gangraped.You also need tactics,such as sneaking and covering behind objects.I reccomend it and wait more people to come play with me.
WinRARgh The Pirate;-;This game is really awesome. Like Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer without the redundency and the headaches. I don't want to say too much or all about the game because that ruins the fun. the plastyle Is Basicly a Co-Op shooter Grinding fest. So go grab a few buddies and kill some . Click here to get started! [warframe.com]
Daizy;-;You have to try it!! I can't get enough of it!!
seakr1948;-;Even though it is a grindathon for resources, the gameplay and unique mre than make up for it
RedXTI;-;i recommend this game to all my friends its very fun
just a boy abusing techies;-;An awesome game for everybody. The game is getting updated frequently, and has lots of content. It's free to play so I dont actually know why you are reading this review, just download and try it out, I'm sure you'll love it!
consideratedong;-;This game, my God, This game. It's the best free game I've ever played. It's just absolutely amazing.
lqlas;-;Amazing game. It migth have micro transactions but most items are obtainable in other ways.
Zaldlum;-;The greatest Free to Play game ever thought of. Update after update Digital Extremes delivers great content, And it rewards those who work. Reguardless if you have money to put into the game or not, You can in the end get pretty much any item without money. Highly recomend this game to any person.
Mystery The Furfag;-;Great game. Play in a world where large security forces are always the Grineer. A world where even organic Corpus somehow leave a heavy robotic signature. Warframe...A game about Ninja Robots from another dimension. Tenno/10 would frame wars again.
TensorialAtol55;-;its an ok game
Crazador;-;I Really Like This
Sensation Sn00py;-;Nice game:D
Speaker of Darkness;-;Once you get into this game you will find it riviting
The fabulous scrub kings;-;this game is good its a nice little third person shooter with absoulotly stuning graphics and really good detail but that doesent mean it is without its problems so to cut this review short should you downlaoad this game yes
Pie God;-;Such a good Game
sssrai;-;This game is fun at first but each level is basically 1 of 4 maps and it gets really boring
La-Bibbida-Bibba-Dum;-;excellent game, i totally recomend this for players that look for an gmae with lots of action and new combat systems and a lot of diversity within all clases.
HVK Snoipur;-;The Best Free2Play game today. 3rd person shooter with amazing graphics and gameplay. It is not pay2win unless you have money to buy things instantly but you can still have the full experience without paying. You must try this game out if you dont have it or never tried it. I would rate this game 9/10, because the only thing I dont like about the game, is that its all about grinding and sometimes feels repetitve. If you play with friends, its more enjoyable. You dont even need a gaming computer for this, my laptop with intell 4000 graphic card can handle this game on low settings. Dont look at the Metascore, it does'nt deserve below 70/100.
Yung Yojimbo;-;DID YOU REALLY BELIEVE IT WOULD BE THAT EASY?
Garigato-kun;-;Great leveling system, nice combat and movement tho a little repetitive
icegoten;-;The purpose of this game is to grind so you can use whatever you grinded to get, in order to grind towards something else just to repeat the cycle.
Hyunpaca;-;best f2p game u can get in steam
rumple;-;this is a awesome game
Rakanishu Senpai;-;I quite enjoy this game. I have fun nailing my enemies to walls with my Attica and ripping things in two with my Nami, Breaching lines western bandit style with my revolvers and sending many to Davy Jones' Locker under the guise of a pool of water with my Hydroid frame. Care for a swim?
Kagdama;-;I really enjoy this game, it's not pay to win but you can purchase pretty much everything in game with real money (for those of us who can't spend all day playing) Update 14 just released and overhauled the entire UI and added player ships and a new companion. Give it a try.
Mr Black;-;Ninja Shooter...whats not to like?
Buckeye Burl;-;Catch Up to your Teammates Simulator 2014.
[1134]Jacks Spur;-;You play as a space ninja mercenary in space flying around and wreck stuff with other ninjas! now w/ pets!
Cman724;-;realy good
SweetBubble;-;Very good,but some paywall action is going on,other than that it is a grest game.
King of mangoes;-;If you like farming sims, you will love this game.
Interrogator;-;This game ruined my life 9/10
AleXAndRU;-;So cool. Need to play this game!!
Admiral Doujin-Stalker;-;This is the Best TPS Game
The Legendary Guanaco;-;Fun, Simple, I didn't but, I recommend paying for ingame money cause it will make the game 100x more fun. I think the only flaw is how much the P2W money costs.
DonkTheDonk;-;Expect to pay for EVERYTHING. Can't make it through this game without using your money. Overall, great gameplay.
m4s2firestorm;-;Super good game would strongly recommend this game. I would give it a 9/10 Score.
CJ5331;-;This game is one of the best F2P games I've ever played and even on low settings, the game still looks awesome.
Yog-Sothoth;-;Ignore that metascore, it's a stupid number. This is fun. You should play it with me.
XxXMLG_Quickscoping_DoritoXxX;-;My favorite game to play!!!!!
Siffy;-;Warframe offers a fast-paced* third-person shooter experience with a large variety of weapons to choose from and decent controller adaptation. Movements are absolutely fluid; you can slide, climb, wall-run, and all sorts of fantastic things, all while shooting your gun. Alternatively, using your melee weapon will also have different moves based on if you are in the air, sliding, etc, and you can even charge up for a massive swing. On top of that, each 'warframe' (class, if you will) features 4 unique(ish) powers that help you to manipulate enemies and survive combat. These aspcets combined make the simple act of killing enemies highly satisfying. Oh and did I mention you'll be levelling and upgrading your weapons and armor? Missions are between 10 and 20mins usually with randomized levels using a decent number of chunks, and a number of different mission types, and you will progress across stations on each planet which will eventually branch out and give you a lot of paths to work with. Now on to the critiques; You will only find 3 different types of enemies in Warframe, and one will only appear from time to time. However, each of the enemy factions feature a decent variety of units to engage which keeps combat lively, with the variety increasing as you progress across planets. Still, you may get tired of fighting the same units over and over, and the gameplay you experience from day one will essentially never change, but simply become more difficult. This is a problem for some, but not all. Some missions feature essentially endless gameplay with ever increasing difficulty, so depending on what you are after it may appeal. Also you can build everything you need in the game without setting foot in high-level missions, which is both good and bad for obvious reasons. Next are weapons. Yes there are many, no they are not all viable. Some are infinitely better than others, but have a 'mastery' requirement so you will have to level other weapons and frames to obtain the best weapons. There are many ways to modify your weapons however, and testing weapons becomes a critical part of the gameplay. Next is community; some players like to run through the whole level without killing things (when possible). You may find yourself doing this as well at times, but as a new player it can be extremely difficult to learn to keep up without dying, and solo play to set your own pace can be frustrating for the new player (running out of ammo, mobs from behind, etc.). Those who can adapt and play through to challenging difficulties however will not have an issue with this as they will quickly assimilate to the game's culture. Some levels are flagged (informally) as farming zones in which players will use their warframe powers to decimate massive amounts of enemies, which may be disheartening to some players but you will still get experience for these kills (if in range). Still, many players are belligerent and will refuse to cooperate with others in the team environment, making the most aggressive player the one to set the pace. Note that these players do not tend to appear too often, but they will from time to time. That brings us to powers; great at low-medium levels, supplements at high levels. Because there is little motivation to play high levels, many players choose more fragile warframes with AoE powers to decimate mobs quicker and ones to quickly traverse the levels and attempt to get every kill (there are kill leaderboards). This can cause problems for players who are levelling as experience has a very short range on it, as well as consistent enemy spawning since spawn points move throughout the level as the players do. Here are some nice redeeming qualities however about the game; you (technically) never have to spend a dime on this game to play it and do everything the game has to offer. You can build every weapon and warframe, and even construct your own 'clan dojo' (guild hall) and unlock the 'guild only' weapons in this manner individually, without purchasing the for-money currency, and many players will buy fully upgraded mods for said currency. My opinion overall is; it's free, so try it! You may not get into it at first, but it is worth playing. The skill base is limitless, and while it may take a little extra time to get the hang of some aspects properly it is an excessively fun game, especially with friends. Also, this game is still actively being updated and added to which helps boost my rating. 78% approval; lacking in variety of gameplay, but still high in excitement
[C.G.S] Black Knight;-;Nope
Carpeandvich;-;Still addictive after sooo many hours of gameplay.
Reverend Adam;-;Fun for those that just want some mindless shooting fun and good for those that want to spend time tweaking their characters, fun for all!
My grog is stronger...;-;Run. Gun. Rinse. Repeat. Hope your team isn't idiots.
La Raptor Jezus;-;Free to play game. Fun time with friends online.
Tom11HD;-;its awsome
frozen.Samurai;-;In my opinion the best free to play game. They are adding even more stuff every now and then.
Ethran;-;what can i say....? NINJAS WITH FREAKING GUNS!!!! now im not huge into shooters, but the ninja & playstyle of the game is what snagged my attintion. very fluid combate & ease of controls makes this a swell game for hardcore & new comers alike! a muct have if youre looking for something fun, diferent & very entertaining!!
RangerRivet;-;Is good I like it but the problem is a total lack of african american warframes
A1i3nKiTtY;-;LOVE IT IM ADDICTED
jacksmacked;-;Space Ninjas. Need I say more? Great game all around. Third person shooter game with a decent selection of weapons across all types. Shotguns, rifles, lasers, grenade launchers, pistols, akimbo pistols, needle guns, flamethrowers, and more. Oh, and did i mention you can melee too? Everything from katanas and broadswords to dual axes and polearms, and a freaking glaive. A melee weapon that you can charge and throw that returns to your hand. How awesome is that? Add to all this a super fluid parkour/acrobatics system, a deep engaging crafting system, and ongoing updates and events. A+ all the way. Also, one more thing... it's free.
Suki Yamamoto;-;Game is amazing. That is all.
That Nerdy Frog;-;Absolutely amazing and well done. Love it!! <3 :3
Vancelle;-;Space Ninjas play for free. Free to Play defines this game extremely well. The fact that most FTP games are pay to win, this game is the exact opposite. This game is Play to Win. Sure you can spend money and buy things, but you can literally unlock everything (except for colors, slots, and aesthetic features) in game. There are items in game that you have to play to unlock, you can't buy everything. The play style of Warframe is amazing, it's PvE with groups of four. Sure you can run solo, but it's a lot more fun to play with groups. The beginning is somewhat slow, but once you hit around the third planet and you figure everything out, this game is simply amazing. The graphics are breath-taking, I could go very in-depth about this game, but I'll let you decide if you enjoy it or not. Just think about this one phrase, "Space-Ninjas".
Rev;-;Who dose not want to play as a space ninja killing creepy looking bad guys? Oh... You? Well... Go away then.
Dr. Crazy;-;Warframe Review This game can be very fun, I personally give it an 8/10, and I believe it's pretty damn good ADVANTAGES - Has great graphics, better than alot of games out there - Has interesting factions and interesting weapons, and Grineerish is just pure awesome - Most of the game can be accessed for free, by crafting or as login rewards - The whole Solar System is free and can be done with any warframe - Every warframe and weapon have advanteges and disadvantages, this makes them fairly well ballanced - The game is Free to Play DISADVANTAGES - Some items cannot be aquired for free, they must be bought for "platinum" - The game has microtransactions which is never a good sign, but they don't give any overpowered items - Colors are not free, palletes cost 75 platinum each, along with most cosmetic items - Platinum is very hard to get without paying money - Ridiculous crafting times starting at 12 hours to 72 hours Overall I think this game is worth a shot, I have been playing for almost a year now (since the early beta) If you are willing to pay real world money for platinum, I recommend waiting until you get a discount as a login reward, I also highly recommend doing research on the wiki before craftin/buying items Happy hunting Tenno! - Crazy
Daemon;-;just call me fred durst cuz im rollin rollin rollin rollin
Lucifer;-;Space Ninjas with magic. do you really need to know more? this is a really good game and I love how anything you'd need to better your play style be it mods, warframes, or weapons, you can earn. where as the only thing you have to spend money on is asthetics like color pallets and syanadas. but of course if you're market savy you really don't need to spend money to get plat :P
Havokk07;-;best co-op game I ever played!
Kahlan Nyx Parx;-;10/10 I love this game. It's more suited to play with friends, but you can play solo if you want to. There are also clans you can join and have your very own dojo. With the newer updates, it's a bit harder, but everyone likes a challenge right?
Ass Slapper;-;The most boredless game :D
S|R DOOM;-;Big recommendation: Warframe is a bad- 3rd-Person Co-op Shooter and Hack & Slash game offering an amazing (and refreshing) variety of play-styles, influential & fluid skill builds, challenging game mechanics, randomly generated levels, hordes of foes that will test your metal and spectacular graphics (surprisingly highly optimized). This game is literally an amalgam of the best elements of the FPS and RPG genres, all in one tightly bound package. FFS WHO DOESN'T LOVE SPACE NINJAS!!!
Quagsire;-;This is why they cancled fez 2
Kaii (The Big K);-;This game ruined my life. 5/5 stars
Isotope2602;-;Warframe is a fun and busy game. Never a dull moment once you are in a mission. One of my favorite things about Warframe is the foundry. The Foundry is where you can make Warframes and gear with the materials you have found throughout the game. Makes you feel like you have accopmplished something and you get to show off what you made.
MrBlackCat;-;This  be off the frame.
PolemanRR;-;Overview: Ok, so Warframe is an over-the-shoulder shooter developed by Develeoper Extremes. It takes place many, many thousand years into the future, with diverse Warframes whose users are called 'Tenno' and a whole arsenal of weapons. Gameplay: Gun/Sword fighting is fast paced, enhanced by Warframe 'abilities'.Different tile sets with predetermined rooms organized differently make each play-through of a level unique. Players have a shield that will absorb damage, and while regenerate over time, as well as health that does NOT regenerate and causes the player to die when it hits 0. Enemies have 'levels', with higher level enemies having better stats, such as damage, armor, health, shield, etc. Warframes: This is your character. You can team up with three other players. This group is often known as a 'cell'. Each warframe has unique abilities, movement speeds, health, and shields. The starter warframes are :Excalibur, a warframe balanced in health, shields, and speed, with powerful blade abilities, a sword flashbang, and super jump, making him able to fill any position in a cell. Mag, a warframe that moves slightly faster than average, and with increased shield but reduced health, manipulates magnetism to restore allies' shields, as well as magnetise enemies so that bullets are pulled towards them, as well as pulling enemies to her, staggering them. She also is able to magnetise enemies' bones to break themselves. The third and final warframe is Loki, an advanced warframe that is the equivalent of a twig when compared to other warframes, but is able to easily avoid enemy fire with his amazing speed and abilities. His abilities allow him to create a decoy to draw fire, to swap positions with enemies or allies at range, make himself invisible, and even jam enemy electronics so that they are forced to resort to melee. These are only the starter warframes, and will serve you very well, even into late in the game. More warframes can be created by finding blueprints of warframe parts from each of their corresponding bosses. You must craft these parts of the warframe with resource, then buy a rather expensive warframe blueprint (the actual blueprint to the warframe), and use those parts to craft the warframe. Construction of a new warframe takes three days, but is very rewarding once you are in a completely new power suit! Weapons: Of course, you need a weapon in order to dispatch enemies. You will start off with a Braton Mark I, a FAMAS-looking rifle, a Lato handgun, and a Skana one-handed blade. As you progress through different planets, which all drop different resources, you will find enough resources to start making new weapons, whose blueprints may be bought from the store. Construction of a weapon will either require 12 or 24 hours. Weapons range from a plasma-firing minigun, to a saw-blade launcher! Sentinels: Sentinels are robotic pets that follow you and aid you in combat. Each sentinel has a specific ability, such as the Dethcube with a machine gun and 'vaporize' ability, that is the equivalent of a taser, and the Dethcube with a semi-automatic shotgun and 'vacuum' ability, which collects nearby items for you. Mods: Essential to the survival and combat of a warframe, mods randomly drop from fallen enemies. They are organized into 5 categories: Common, Uncommon, and Rare (Nightmare and Corrupted mods are called rare quality) .They can be applied to warframes, weapons, and sentinels, and will uniquely enhance the items they are applied, to making a single weapon unique with different mod builds on the weapon. Enemy Factions: The direct enemy in this game is the Grineer, a vast army of warriors who have been cloned repeated and seek to take over the world with sheer numbers. Men and women with completely destroyed bodily appearances and strengths caused by cloning degeneration, they rely on armor and shield-tearing weapons to defeat the warframes. They have a natural hatred of the warframes, being the only people able to stop them from their goal of world domination (But I just think they're jealous). Another enemy is the Corpus, a faction based off of economy and profit. They have high-tech laser and plasma weapons, able to shred warframe armor, and equip themselves with powerful shields, but lack bodily armor to protect themselves once their shield is down. They only want to kill warframes to dissect and salvage them, selling the pieces to the highest bidder. The third and final main faction are the Infested, a manifestation of the virus that infected the Tenno and gave them their powers. They charge and kill the Tenno on instinct, and can be considered the zombie infection of the future, with enemies being evidently infested versions of the previous two factions mentioned. Maps: The players starts at Mercury, and will eventually unlock other planets, going outward from the sun. Almost all planets have their own unique boss. New, unheard of planets have been added to diversify and increase the amount of gameplay. The player may find and build keys to access lost and forgotten parts of the Solar System... Bosses: Each boss is different, and will require teamwork and coordination to defeat. Early-game bosses require brute force to eliminate, but bosses from mid-game and on require tactical movement and attacks in order to be defeated. Assassians: As you have taken from the world, the world will take from you. Upset a faction, or a dark, angry tenno whose lore is unknown, and you may find yourself killed or maybe even captured by extremely dangerous assassians, as the lights blink as if Slenderman were there. Remember that your actions have consequences... Gamemodes: The game includes gamemods such as extermination, sabotage, capture, rescue, spy (intelligence gathering), and so much more. The games revolves around PvE, but a poor PvP system called 'Conclave' has been implemented. Clans: The implementation of clans in this game is unique. In the clan dojo, players may research into each of the enemy factions' technology, and create weapons and devices out of them to use for themselves in combat! Graphics: Excellent, but rather taxing on the computer, even on lower video settings. Now, onto your questions: Q:Will this game run on my low-end computer? A:I'm sorry, it probably won't. But it wouldn't hurt to find out yourself. Q:I HATE PAY TO WIN GAMES! A:...That wasn't even a question. However, this is one of the most fair games I have ever played. 97% of content in this game can be unlocked free of charge. The cash currency, known as 'platinum', is rather used as a trading currency used to trade with other players. Free to play players could easily earn themselves 20 platinum or so in the trade market if they tried, which is about $1.25. Very few players spend platinum in the game market. This is a complete list of platinum-exclusive items: Color Palettes (to customize the look of your warframe, weapons, and sentinel), and Extra Inventory Space, so that you can have more guns and warframes without having to sell old ones. Other than that, there's nothing that a paying player can have access to that a free player can't. Q:Will I have to grind for resources/parts of a warframe or weapon? A:Yes. But, warframes only have 3 parts whose bluepints drop from bosses, all with an equal chance of dropping, and 1 part will ALWAYS drop. This also applies to weapon parts from bosses. Resources are relatively easy to farm, and you will find yourself loaded with all but the rare resources by mid-game. Q:Are weapons balanced? A:I'm afraid not. Weapons are usually categorized into 3 tiers by players, and tier 3 weapons will absolutely crush tier 1 weapons. But almost no one plays the broken PvP in this game. Summary: When I speak highly of this game, I mean it. This is a beautifully made game, and I definitely suggest that you should give it a whirl. Stop reading this, and install the game!
ALIN147;-;is good but not very
Zega;-;This games has swords... swords are cool and stuff so yeah get this game. if you want to, i really don't care either way.
|FP| Ghost;-;IT HAS SWORDS! Nothing else to say about this have other than that its AWESOME. Although it is a free to play game its not pay to win, the vast majority of items in game you can get without spending a cent or a penny in real life. It just takes a little time and determination. Exceptions are ofcourse items that make your warframe look better and colors (if you play it youll see). It is worth at least a try and if you get hooked on it dont blame me :D Its certainly not a game for all, but for those that like melee weapons, this game is for you.
Jhoh shotty chooker;-;My favorite free to play game. Third person run and coop and shooty stuff. Excellent controls, lots of free form wall running and ledge climbing built right in seamlessly.
Simple;-;Good game to play as if you're really a ninja in the world. -Good graphics (Not a graphics person but this got my approval) -Good gameplay. -Good Accuracy. -Good Animations -You see bugs sometimes but it doesn't bother you. i would rate it 9/10
keehocklim;-;I like how the game was designed. 10/10
Transpose;-;I get to be an alien space ninja who kills alien space terrorists 11/10
Niko1387;-;IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO IMO Warframe is a third-person hack&slash game developed by Digital Extremes. It features combat which, easily master throws a twist of interesting game play. Warframe is great when handling lore, people that lore such as myself will love Warframes background story. Game play is broken into parts. First the casual, at-times boring missions, these tedious missions are to grind for Credits (In-game currency) and other Materials to build weapons and warframes. Warframe's true prime is shown in High level defence or survival; this is the bread and butter of Warframe. Challenging in either the sheer output of the enemies or the tactical play of your oxygen supplies or defence positioning. Warframes absolute best attribute, its strong community scene and a strong relation with the Developers such as Steve, Scott and Rebecca to name a few, consistent bug, content and other updates/patches with weekly live streams with four-five lead developers talking about Warframe and the upcoming updates and ideas, taking question, all live on twitch. Warframes payment system runs by something called Platinum or Plat for short. Weapons range in prices but very few weapons are locked be hide a pay wall. Warframes are also in the same handled similar. So are Sentinels. Warframe has a trading system. Many player trade Platinum that they traded for or bought for in-games items not available on the market such as specific mods. These can then be traded with the use a Trading post which you must be in a clan which has built one otherwise you will have to be invited to their dojo to trade. However a lack of a dedicated websites to host trading and deals such as Team Fortress 2s Outpost leaves Warframe player to scream into chat, most are forgotten as the trade moves at an alarming rate. Ah whole systems such as Team Fortress 2s Outpost should be implemented into the Warframe site or a 3rd party developer should invest time into making one. Warframe is a game which caters to new and veteran players alike; bring a fun but extremely casual game play experience to the table. The lack of interesting game play innovations is Warframe glaring downfall; this severely limits the replay-ability for extensive play sessions. Un-doubtable an amazing concept to a devolvement team that have proven themselves more than just avid programmers. Thank you very much to Digital Extremes for making Warframe. Thank you very much for reading my full review of Warframe.
Zombieskittles;-;Gorgeous paints for your character
Sword Slash;-;this game i so amazing it does require a lot of skill but it is so fun especially with friends and i HIGHLY recomend you get it
Outa Ctrl;-;All you need to know about Warframe is that you can slice enemies to small chunks, make a clan citadel, 90% of the things people pay for are obtainable via gameplay, and that its in space. Ninjas in space. gun wielding ninjas space. Plus some levels look like big business buildings so you can imagine your slicing your way through Apple employees and stoping world domination.
Richierich;-;This is one of the best things that ever happened in my life. This is a great game if you have a friend or playing solo. It has a great coop system and xp system. At first i thought wow, this is a pay to win game, but it's not. You should give this a game a try and this is why i give it a 5
Froxxy~;-;This is game is SURPRISING for a F2P The graphics are just amazing,I thought this would turn out to be a P2W but it has 0 aspects of that,One of the best games i've every played. 10/10
POOP MASTER (Gaming Master);-;The Bomb
i3loomy;-;Honestly one of the best, free to play games out there. Sure you can pay to win... BUT! you dont have to! which is great.
Double;-;Very interesting for a free2play game! Nice short history plot even if its still in development! Really fun to play and you have a huge variation of character and you can build the one is suitable for your game style. Even if it still has a few bugs and problems, I love the game! 9/10
DerpyS;-;it gud game kind glichy tho
Dr.Fiskur;-;it's fun and all. can get a little repetitive when you have to grind insanely for something, but it's need for grinding is what makes it fun. you have to spend time into this game. you cant just leap into the highest level in a short time. everything has build timers and as i said, the grinding can be insane. i recommend this game if you have alot of time to spend or if you simply want to have some fun with friends. Granted, the game has it's occaisional glitch and internet connectivity issues. but it's still a fun game to play.
O.T. Izzul;-;This is.
Screwball;-;This is the best game. Love it. Just keep your wallet locked up and you'll be fine.
K.D.K.D>see you after 3 weeks<;-;i well give this game new page and hope for the beast
Drew;-;I Highly Rate this game, It is the best fps game i have ever played 10 out of 10
Shina-K;-;THIS GAME IS LIKE ITS LIKE HALO ONLY ITS NOT YOU SHOOT THE BAD GUYS, AND THEN YOU WIN! CONGRATULATION! you play with 4 random people and go through missions, so its loads of fun~! 12 out of 10
Xanderjk;-;this game is brilliant
Reevahn;-;Awesome game. Almost 1k of in game active hours of game and still going stronk! If you're a newcommer, don't let yourself get frustrated by the early game: ask questions in chat, most of the community is friendly and understanding. Major updates every month or so, with weapons added even more often! Just don't download it if you're in college: it will kill your study
Havokk07;-;best co-op game I ever played!
Kahlan Nyx Parx;-;10/10 I love this game. It's more suited to play with friends, but you can play solo if you want to. There are also clans you can join and have your very own dojo. With the newer updates, it's a bit harder, but everyone likes a challenge right?
Ass Slapper;-;The most boredless game :D
Undead_Duck;-;The story is terrible, the graphics are good but not anything special, the gameplay is repetetive and requires a lot of 'grinding' to get anywhere. However for some reason its my favourite game and i find it completely addictive, it might be the space ninja robots, it might the super fun movement system or vast array of weapons and characters, i'm not sure but i love it. 9/10!
Sifi(^);-;This game is really good, and not good good, but so good, it will explode your brain *Don't take it too literally tho* Its about you, a Tenno, which will stand up, and kill everyone.. Well, not everyone, but most of the enemies, including the Grineer, so this game, is just a freerun run&gun magic game, interesting boss-fights, and new-player friendly, which is always good. It gives you the freedom of crafting your own gun, hence you got the blueprint and the required materials, which are sometimes hard to find, but sometimes as simple of killing everyone and farming the crap out of it :D The gameplay is hard to master in my opinion, as in the beginning, even if its new-player friendly, the running and shooting mechanics can be hard to master, but if you just put some time in it (Sadly, i don't really have that much time for it because of real life stuff) it will get easier. Its beautiful, with great graphich, and even a low-end pc can run it on low settings. Overall, a great game, still some room for improvement on some parts of it, but, for the most of it, its an amazing game, worth the shot to play :)
Hamaworld;-;Very fun and great game , Recommended :)
MeoWHamsteR;-;A great sci-fi TPS co-op alien ninjas (you heard it, alien ninjas!) Game thingy... Aliens.... Yeah, so, as I said, it is a very VERY fun game, with very friendly players, youtubers and devs, very cool events and weapons (there are a lot of weapons in this game, and some of them aren't the ones your'e thinking about...). It is FREE, and has THE best graphics for a F2P game I came across. Yes, it do need to watch some vids 'bout this game to get the hang of it, and if you are going to play this game and invest a lot of time into it, you pretty much HAVE to spend money on it (unless you found some rare stuff, which you can trade for Platinum, which is the "real money" of this game), and, of course, let's not forget the awful amount of farming, but, WORTH IT. If you DO decide to play this game, please add me ingame, my name is, of course, MeoWHamsteR7. I'll invite you to a very nice clan, and just help you overall. See ya in yo' fancy Warframes!
colordeaf86;-;The new updates are just making a good game even better!
xElieazar;-;I've been a member of this community from when it started and i can say that is one of the greatest i've seen.And that is given by the fact that the developers are in a really close relation with the players and they give them what they want and more,like they said "the company is in the player's hand". When i first saw the teaser to the game i knew it would be successful. And i don't regret a single hour spent playing this game,the gameplay it's amazing and it's designed by you,your choice of Warframes and weapons build your experience,you can definately find a warframe of your taste but my proposal to everyone is to try them all because every single one of them offer a different experience. Sometimes it can get repetitive because you will need to farm for resources but get 3 more friends to play with and you won't even notice the time flying.
Vidleo;-;When I first started playing this game a couple of months ago, I was definitly confused with the mechanics, the mission menu, almost everything basically except the gameplay itself. I ended up learning how to do the things that were initially only understable if you tinkered around, self teach yourself how it all wokrs. But with one of the updates that make the mission menu simpler to follow, a more comprehendable control tutorial, and most of all, it teaches you what you need to do outside of the game that I only knew when I self taught it or looked on wikipedia. This game is coming along nicely. Only thing I'd ever have to complain about to this point is the "Play to win" catch. I feel inferior playing against those who buy crazy armor and weapons, or even the simplest designs. But that's not really something that makes me hate this game. I love it
MistaStealYoAK;-;Fast paced, third person hack-n-slash/shooter. Not your everyday free-to-play hack and slash game. Different warframes to choose and unlock depending on how you like to get down. Plenty of upgrades and mods you can apply to your weapon or frame to match your playstyle. Space ninjas. Space Nazis. Recommending it.
The Magician;-;Great game.
BOBODBOSMONKEY;-;i lov this game it fun
Sheep;-;Warframe is a brilliant style, and in its unusualness, it creates nice and smooth gameplay. It is always bieng updated so it always feels new. The only propblem is sometimes when you go in a random group, people will refuse to help, but this does not happen to much once you reach the later levels.
nawdounn;-;Its a fun game not as good as pron tho
Supreme Warsmith;-;Robot Ninjas in space killing the clones of clones, why else do I need to recommned this game?
Gerber Von Faghammer;-;super addictive
Aeroziff;-;fun game, best with friends. graphics are nice for a free game. no reason u shouldnt download and try it out
Brofu 2016;-;Incredibly fun, like a mix space, and ninjas. dare I say, space ninjas. You are the Tenno, a race of organisms that have been in cryosleep for a long time. When the Factions of the Grinneer, the Corpus, and the Infested start to overtake the solar system and its outlying planets the Tenno have been awakened by the Lotus, the mainframe for Tenno communication and status, to stop them in their tracks. For a free to play game, unlike many that have tons of microtransactions, this game has 0% of pay to win. All items in this game can be acquired through effort and playtime, and yes, some grinding. It has a fun playstyle and its playerbase is incredibly helpful and supportive of new players. its environment gets slightly boring in a short time, but you get a small respite in certain planets, like earth. Along with void missions, derelict missions, nightmare mode, and invasions/alerts. This game definitely has replayability. If you are a player who loves getting achievements and 100% a game then this game will not be for you unless you have the apt amount of time to give it. It does take a long time to get certain things, and some of the items you get are completely random to the point where you will need other player help, but based on the solo difficulty the game was obviously never meant to be played 100% solo.
MrCitrus;-;Iss aight.
[IPH] Scorpioner Gaming;-;This is one of the best games EVER!!! The best part is..... Its free!!!
steven_the_bandit;-;Bery pun and addicting!if you like having pun and playing as space ninjas, then this is the game for you!and its free, (except the platinum, guns, melee weapons and such... but dont worry, the weapons are..umm.... very cheap! you may even be loki enough to get half off platinum as login rewards. but its an exciting and an adventurous game.. just dont be annoying to others play nice and have fun,,, by pressing switch teleport constantly.... thats the best way to just do it! or nike.that too! warframe can be a little squishy at first but after a bit of practice and ranking, it will get easier! i reccomend being loki using mk1 bratton for gun!!! its the best to weapon to go for! ecspeciall when you add ammo drum to it! you will be invisible! Remember, Say no to drugs kids! and whatever you do.......press " alt f4 " during your game when your hosting. its a cheat that turns you into rage mode :)
Queen Derp;-;Very very addicting game, lot of fun. CYBER SPACE NINJAS FTW !
Wolf;-;Warframe. It is a fun game. I like how you can have pets, like the Kubrow. I dislike that some of the bosses are overpowered, and you have to have more OP stuff to kill them.
J;-;It's a free,multiplayer online, great graphics, ninja game. WHO WOULDN'T LOVE THAT!!!?!?!?! :D
Roronoa Zoro;-;11/10 would hotfix again
The King of Bees;-;in this game you play as space ninjas in a future where mankind has evolved beyond the need for stealth. as you stealthily cut a path of destruction through the hordes of enemies with your loud unsilenced weapons be sure to remember the ninja spirit animal, the rhino. use a rhino warframe and become a walking tank, the ultimate form in stealth for a ninja.
Ethin Andrews;-;Space Ninjas need i say more
[DGG] Colonel_KupCake;-;This game is better than doat 2 or LoL so :D get this instead!
Amarthiel;-;Awesome, Fun, Entertaining, and free!
Voltaryx;-;Very nice Awesome gameplay and its very entertaining when playing with friends!
gerpo;-;too much grind
Iron666;-;Great game. Lot's and lot's of fun with your friends. Only negative side I found about this game is the repetitive missions. You are going to be doing same things over and over again, just on another place. But still, they change something, and game is still pretty new, so take that in mind. Updates are going to come out, so be sure to check this game out.
Teddy Ruxpin;-;Great fun, slick and smooth. Really comes into its own after a few hours play as you can get into customising your Warframe(s) and weapons. (And by then you'll have some idea how to go about setting up your frame and weapon modifications.) Metacritic scores don't do this game justice - they were all given out by reviews made when the game was in early beta. It was pretty good then, it's better now. Top quality alien shooter action. The criticism I hear levelled at this game time and again is that it's not completely free to play. You do need to put a little bit of money into it for slots for new weapons and warframes and probably for items called orokin reactors which increase how many modifications you can load into your setup. In addition to this, while it is possible to get pretty much anything in the game through playing it, you have to repeat the same mission ad nauseum if you want to get all of the components for one warframe or item right away. I think a number of people who are giving it the highest praise are the people willing to drop some real dollar into the game to purchase items from time to time. In this way, and if you're a collector, you could easily spend a great deal of cash. Nevertheless, the core gameplay is slick, it'll cost you nothing to play it perfectly adequately for a few days and it has throat-singing in its soundtrack. Try it, It's free.
Miaoven Winter;-;One of the two best games currently on the F2P circuit, both of which happen to be self-published. Digital Extremes is a group that cares deeply about its player base, involves and keeps them updated with all aspects of development, and responds promptly to critical emergencies. They're working very hard at making a PvE-exclusive TPS in the vast sea of PvP domination. No matter how you view the project at its various stages, you have to give them immense credit for going full throttle at this. Nothing but applause. Edit: Should note that at the time of this OP, the game did not have the Clan Dojo Dueling Room or the Conclaves. Nevertheless, focus on PvP modes has remained a secondary priority for Digital Extremes, and they are still standing fast behind their commitment to PvE.
Commodore Clarke;-;It's stuffed with sexy and free
(+Re+);-;The gameplay is quick, fun, and solid. There isn't many inbalances in the combat. Going to a higher level area means you will die, pretty straight forward. While the parkour feels a bit forced sometimes with how your character will snap into a sequence of moves which launches you off a cliff, it works well when it's done intentionally. I usually loathe Co-Op games, I prefer single player. And this game does allow solo play (which ramps down the enemies in number and skill, I love that.) There are missions that require co-op play, and turning the game to a public match is one button, lovely. It feels a lot more refined a co-op experience than most. As an F2P game I have to talk about P2W. There is none. A lot of games claim to have P2W and don't. P2W by some is that this game allows quick advancement. That's not Pay2Win, you can access everything except cosmetics in game, for free. It may take longer to get, but you can get it free. Stuff is reasonably priced, and sometimes you can get 25-50-75% discounts on premium currency (platinum) as a daily reward (among lots of other things.) Which it's then recommended you wait until you get a discount to buy any dosh. There are things like how many weapons you can have at once, and how many warframes you can have at once. This is all increased with platinum. Did I mention a new account grants you 50 platinum? Which you can use on cosmetics, or slots, or daily revives? Yeah that's there. My only complaint is the raw time you have to invest. You can only rank up once a day. Which is frustrating. But I guess it keeps people from advancing faster than others. Understandable, but when if you fail a rank up test you have to wait 24 hours is rediculous. I'd understand 4-12 hours, but not a whole day. Crafting is out of the picture for the most part for the first few days of existance. You will not be able to aquire the parts to craft even lower end gear until you get further into the game. Which you can't do because your gear is bad, so you're relying on the luck of the drop to get enough mods to make your low end gear not suck. Again, I understand they don't want accellerated advancements. New gear though, doesn't mean BETTER (with the exception of Prime variants), your weapon starts at lvl 0, and goes up to 30, which allows you to mod it further along that track. It doesn't really take long to get something to lvl 30, a weapon if used a lot can get to lvl 30 in a days worth of (hardcore) playing. Recommended. Yes. gg.
Replika;-;This is one of those games that clearly should not be a free2play. it simply doesnt fit. what could have been an awesome futuristic dungeon loot'n shoot for the co-operative gamer is in a fact an endless grind designed to put you in a world where you are constantly shown products like guns n toons that you could have now if you pull out your credit card, go on, go on buy it! why wait years its right here! OK you go and be back packed another round see how you feel after that. as i said it could have been a nice game with a nice reward system but instead, playing this game makes me like im being deliberately incovenienced into paying and paying and paying. to that i say Thanks but no thanks
Natsu Dragneel (Reznor);-;awsome game realy fun
Jin;-;One of the best free2play games out there, hands down.
BOBODBOSMONKEY;-;i lov this game it fun
Sheep;-;Warframe is a brilliant style, and in its unusualness, it creates nice and smooth gameplay. It is always bieng updated so it always feels new. The only propblem is sometimes when you go in a random group, people will refuse to help, but this does not happen to much once you reach the later levels.
nawdounn;-;Its a fun game not as good as pron tho
Supreme Warsmith;-;Robot Ninjas in space killing the clones of clones, why else do I need to recommned this game?
Vollo;-;Ignore the metacritic score, this game is a lot of fun, very grindy though. Been playing for about a year now and love every minute of it. Space Ninjas with guns and robots, what's not to love.
NASKET;-;One of the best games I played so far
SoySaucy;-;DAS gmae ish a good which i played
megamik_5;-;It's a nice game, but would recommend playing with friends as it can make the expirence lot more fun.
towelguycool;-;Very exiting game, very fun and it plays very nicely. 10/10.
Biotechnofrag;-;Warframe is a brilliant game, many alternative fighting styles, and so many mods and items. Try not to put money into this game, get in good with high level characters and forge your playing style, and the prices of platinum are a rip-off. WARNING: DO NOT PLAY THIS GAME BECAUSE OF THE CURRENT UPDATE SINCE IT STOPS ALL GAME USE FOR WINDOWS 8 AND UP USERS.
logannorman;-;Game is very addicting, downloaded it on a whim from a friend who played the game occasionally. Was slow to start, but now I have spent over 90 hours and counting in it. There is a lot of grinding in it unless you want to drop some dough. However, the grinding is enjoyable and there is almost always someone to play with. The enjoyable gameplay along with the constant updates and additions make this one of my favorite F2P games of all time and I don't feel pressured to drop a lot of money on it, even though I will occasionally make a purchase here or there. 9/10
Adelancia [NL];-;Nice addictive fast pve fps (with some pvp sites) with tons of possibilities by using an upgradeable cards system for your extra skills in warframe or your weapons. Including a crafting system and some customization to make yourself unique.
ThePathFinder;-;Really aswome game. 3rd person slash FPS game, with very cool close combat. F2P. Mostly co-op. Good Crafting system. I really like it and YOU need to try it!
NinjaTotodile^^;-;Beauty.
Real ^2Apex Predator;-;This is a fun co-op game that you can play with your friends
Ron;-;Really fun game. You can get almost every thing in game by farming. Not pay to play like a lot of other games. The lore is still in the works so you can't expect too much but its still pretty good. Farming and levelling up weapons and warframes is really fun too and at times, challenging. 7.8/10
ShogunATL;-;I really, really enjoy Warframe. Combat wise, if you've ever played the multiplayer maps in Mass Effect 3 it is very similar. If you enjoy being able to customize your character's look and abilties, you'll very much enjoy this game. The developers are also constantly pushing out new updates that have a fair amount of content/improvements to the game. Now the game is still technically in Open Beta, and while most professional reviewers have pointed that out, their reviews are also from fairly early public builds of the game. A lot has changed in the past 5 updates or so, I really think the game needs to be revisited. The game can be challenging, or you can stride through battle slaughtering countless foes as easily as chewing gum. The choice is up to you, various game modes and varying difficulties can all be chosen by the player. While the game is free to play, and you can earn in game credits to buy and build new and more powerful gear, throwing the developers som cash can help speed the process a bit. Plus, I think the devs deserve just a bit for producing something that has given me so many hours of enjoyment, easily taking hours away from my beloved wife... ...sorry honey! So give this game a go, if you're looking for beautiful graphics, fun fast paced combat, and an ever evolving game, you won't be disappointed! Suit up Tenno, war is calling!
Poringez;-;The decision to play this game is to give up on reality. Bugs, Glitches, Horrible pubbies and the nosiest lady in the world will be the order of the day. That does not automatically mean that this game is bad, because it absolutely isn't For a F2P game this is the one I had the most fun with. All the weapons and Warframes can be bought in the ingame store, but can also be found while playing The only things that can not be found ingame are vanity items. Every update is a new adventure, What will break next? Will the UI break again or will the loot table be topsy turvy again. WHO KNOWS? Try it out, Play untill you atleast get a different warframe other than the starter ones and you will be alright.
DaBoomer24;-;This game is amazing! It has a super long campaign and tons of customization options. The only downside is having to use real money for stuff but you can unlock it through cards yet it takes a lot of farming.
obsession.;-;This is one of the best games I've played. Take an hour and play it. You never know what you expect and you're tempted to go further and further, and so you realize that the game is so addictive that you are not to go to work: P
greywolfseranade;-;Warframe is so kewl its the besterest gam evar.
Pheress;-;words can not describe how amazing this game is download and start playing today it is amazing
Sepion (SMILEYFACE.);-;This game haz guns and swords and people shooting and swording so i think its a pretty good game if you like swording people in half/3 pieces. I like 3 pieces of chicken but not always. I like it spicy. Also this game has robots but you kill them and they are hard. They have guns. Robots are cool.
.storm;-;I've been playing this game since beta firstly came out as f2p, and game was good then but really boring, no trading, few warframes, a lot of bugs and i still got till 30th lvl before I've decided to stop. Few days ago few mates and me saw it on steam and install it again, I found my old acc and started playing again. GAME IS AWESOME NOW. The amount of bugs they cleared, stuff in stores, game mods, lvl's, optimtization's and basicly gave mostly what people asked for, they are active on forums, answering Q&A and very helpfull. Love their blogs in which they love to tease and give people news about stuff they are working on etc. Get it, great game, much fun, if you have few friends, start a clan and fight.
Nepsicle;-;Its free. Its crazy. Its fun. Need I say more?
time2die;-;warframe is one of the best 3rd person shooters ive ever played. It gets updates almost every week. Its free. Is massively multiplayer or you can by your self. Theres warframes unlike any others. endless modding possiblities. overalll i give this game a 10/10 :D
Real ^2Apex Predator;-;This is a fun co-op game that you can play with your friends
Ron;-;Really fun game. You can get almost every thing in game by farming. Not pay to play like a lot of other games. The lore is still in the works so you can't expect too much but its still pretty good. Farming and levelling up weapons and warframes is really fun too and at times, challenging. 7.8/10
ShogunATL;-;I really, really enjoy Warframe. Combat wise, if you've ever played the multiplayer maps in Mass Effect 3 it is very similar. If you enjoy being able to customize your character's look and abilties, you'll very much enjoy this game. The developers are also constantly pushing out new updates that have a fair amount of content/improvements to the game. Now the game is still technically in Open Beta, and while most professional reviewers have pointed that out, their reviews are also from fairly early public builds of the game. A lot has changed in the past 5 updates or so, I really think the game needs to be revisited. The game can be challenging, or you can stride through battle slaughtering countless foes as easily as chewing gum. The choice is up to you, various game modes and varying difficulties can all be chosen by the player. While the game is free to play, and you can earn in game credits to buy and build new and more powerful gear, throwing the developers som cash can help speed the process a bit. Plus, I think the devs deserve just a bit for producing something that has given me so many hours of enjoyment, easily taking hours away from my beloved wife... ...sorry honey! So give this game a go, if you're looking for beautiful graphics, fun fast paced combat, and an ever evolving game, you won't be disappointed! Suit up Tenno, war is calling!
Poringez;-;The decision to play this game is to give up on reality. Bugs, Glitches, Horrible pubbies and the nosiest lady in the world will be the order of the day. That does not automatically mean that this game is bad, because it absolutely isn't For a F2P game this is the one I had the most fun with. All the weapons and Warframes can be bought in the ingame store, but can also be found while playing The only things that can not be found ingame are vanity items. Every update is a new adventure, What will break next? Will the UI break again or will the loot table be topsy turvy again. WHO KNOWS? Try it out, Play untill you atleast get a different warframe other than the starter ones and you will be alright.
DaBoomer24;-;This game is amazing! It has a super long campaign and tons of customization options. The only downside is having to use real money for stuff but you can unlock it through cards yet it takes a lot of farming.
obsession.;-;This is one of the best games I've played. Take an hour and play it. You never know what you expect and you're tempted to go further and further, and so you realize that the game is so addictive that you are not to go to work: P
greywolfseranade;-;Warframe is so kewl its the besterest gam evar.
Pheress;-;words can not describe how amazing this game is download and start playing today it is amazing
Sepion (SMILEYFACE.);-;This game haz guns and swords and people shooting and swording so i think its a pretty good game if you like swording people in half/3 pieces. I like 3 pieces of chicken but not always. I like it spicy. Also this game has robots but you kill them and they are hard. They have guns. Robots are cool.
.storm;-;I've been playing this game since beta firstly came out as f2p, and game was good then but really boring, no trading, few warframes, a lot of bugs and i still got till 30th lvl before I've decided to stop. Few days ago few mates and me saw it on steam and install it again, I found my old acc and started playing again. GAME IS AWESOME NOW. The amount of bugs they cleared, stuff in stores, game mods, lvl's, optimtization's and basicly gave mostly what people asked for, they are active on forums, answering Q&A and very helpfull. Love their blogs in which they love to tease and give people news about stuff they are working on etc. Get it, great game, much fun, if you have few friends, start a clan and fight.
Tyrant Mara;-;Free to Play Space Ninja Parkour Simulator. Attach potatoes to your ninja and weapons to enhance.
Fizzel;-;It's a game.
InsanityAtWork;-;It's ok.
i_HUNTL3Y;-;a very good game
Crio_;-;Good game,Pay to Win but not bad
Teddy Ruxpin;-;Great fun, slick and smooth. Really comes into its own after a few hours play as you can get into customising your Warframe(s) and weapons. (And by then you'll have some idea how to go about setting up your frame and weapon modifications.) Metacritic scores don't do this game justice - they were all given out by reviews made when the game was in early beta. It was pretty good then, it's better now. Top quality alien shooter action. The criticism I hear levelled at this game time and again is that it's not completely free to play. You do need to put a little bit of money into it for slots for new weapons and warframes and probably for items called orokin reactors which increase how many modifications you can load into your setup. In addition to this, while it is possible to get pretty much anything in the game through playing it, you have to repeat the same mission ad nauseum if you want to get all of the components for one warframe or item right away. I think a number of people who are giving it the highest praise are the people willing to drop some real dollar into the game to purchase items from time to time. In this way, and if you're a collector, you could easily spend a great deal of cash. Nevertheless, the core gameplay is slick, it'll cost you nothing to play it perfectly adequately for a few days and it has throat-singing in its soundtrack. Try it, It's free.
Miaoven Winter;-;One of the two best games currently on the F2P circuit, both of which happen to be self-published. Digital Extremes is a group that cares deeply about its player base, involves and keeps them updated with all aspects of development, and responds promptly to critical emergencies. They're working very hard at making a PvE-exclusive TPS in the vast sea of PvP domination. No matter how you view the project at its various stages, you have to give them immense credit for going full throttle at this. Nothing but applause. Edit: Should note that at the time of this OP, the game did not have the Clan Dojo Dueling Room or the Conclaves. Nevertheless, focus on PvP modes has remained a secondary priority for Digital Extremes, and they are still standing fast behind their commitment to PvE.
Master Broshi;-;Super Space Ninjas. Swag.
Ornstein;-;Beautiful game, would spend forever on.
Apothacary;-;Awesome game and bottomless pit for your time :D
TheoRoosevelt;-;Space Ninjas? yes please, and not as grindy as other Free-To-Plays.
DurkSG;-;I'd say this is a good game of WWII for you fans of Military stuff!
line kills;-;i really like warframe like really, i love being loki and i love sprinting around at the speed of sound heres where warframe sucks: theres NOTHING TO DO at least there USED to be, now theres conclave where you can PvP 2v2 i havent tried it yet apparantly it might be fun??????? but really theres NOT MUCH to spend credits on, unless you like grinding for other warframes?????? (but what if you already like the warframe you have? what do i sink creds into then, CONSUMABLES?????? [yea rite]) warframe suffers from being a free to play forevergame IT NEEDS A CAMPAIGN WITH A PLOTLINE THAT YOU CAN FOLLOW AND PLAY ALONG WITH, NOT JUST "COMPLETE THE SOLAR SYSTEM + DO ALARTS"
Jhoh shotty chooker;-;My favorite free to play game. Third person run and coop and shooty stuff. Excellent controls, lots of free form wall running and ledge climbing built right in seamlessly.
Zherix;-;I honestly love the game to bits. if I were able to give it a star rating, I'd give it a 5/5. Although I'm very impatient and I don't like the 2 day wait to build Warframes, I still love the game. Give it a go if you haven't played it! It's really fun!
Fevershaking;-;This game is fun. It can get a little repetitive, But it's fun as hell. It also has wonderful graphics+ DX11. It's basicly Gears of war...Without the cover system...And you're a Cyborg Ninja Guy :)
A.1;-;Fun free to play game :D
MitisBlue;-;just play the game
Rinski;-;Brainless battles and a lot of pew-pew, pah-pah, slash and kabooms! Good game for relax and timekilling! ;)
Wrong;-;very unique game, worth at least a little money purchase and also whats great is, its NOT a P2W. Perfect for any third person enthusiast waiting for action and wrecking havoc on the battlefield. With parkour! (y)
SpeC;-;Great Game!!
Tubbymuffin224-READ MY PROFILE;-;This game is a completely epic mix of Assasians Creed, Gears of War, and Star Wars. For anyone who can't picture that, it is a third person, co-op, own-the-bots, lazers-everywhere, space-ninja, and its free-to-play  well. ALL IN ONE FLIPPIN AMAZING GAME. Oh, ad the graphics are pretty nice too...
Screwball;-;This is the best game. Love it. Just keep your wallet locked up and you'll be fine.
impulse |;-;Started this game a few hours ago because I wanted something more "in-depth" than Defiance. This game is great so far! The sci-fi feel is fantastic, and the graphics are phenominal. As a free-to-play game it is definitely worth a shot!
Yezzinator;-;"Extremely fun and addicting." - Yezzinator, 2014
Worthy Noble;-;Quite a fun game from the start I highly recomend that you get this free to play game right now trust me its the best!!!!
Natsu {C};-;cool game but i like beta more
[ASP SHOP]Ima Syafi;-;JUST 4 WORD, THIS GAME IS AWESOME !!!!!!!!
Saeko;-;Roughtly, this game is "metroid meets team fortress 2". But actually in a deeper sense, or actually in my disturbed mind, the tennos are the metaphor for the perfect society, the grineers are the metaphor of the communists, the corpus are the metaphor of the capitalists, the infected are the metaphor of the anarchists and the corrupted are probably some revoluting people that join force from everywhere across the world. Twisted logic.
KickSlap;-;Let's see Warframe it's a sci-fi game with exosuits (space-ninjas) fighting the ugly bad guys. Well you can basiclly buy almost anything in the cash shop, including cosmetics. This game is immensly fun with friends, and trying out the AMAZING weapons, there are katanas, whips, laser guns, shotguns, freeze rays, and many more. Now the maps are the same, and can feel repetitve, because it is, although some of the levels look really cool... well compared to the other maps. Now the gameplay could range to really boring to really fun, that depends on what weapons you using and how you use them. Now the Warframes are the exosuits the players can wear, it gives them special powers, like jumping high, iron skin, healing, and mind control. Getting warframes can be very difficult, and that brings me to my next point, the learning curv is very steep so you need to watch youtube videos on how to play properly, thes game is also very difficult so if you like that then good. So in the end, do i recommend this game? Well if you like what you've seen here then go play this, if this turnes you off, then you can try it i guess. So I personally enjoyed this game immensly, but i didn't let that get in the way of the recommendation of this game. This Review is just my opinion.
Samoth;-;(Review may be subject to changes as the game's still in beta) + No paywalls. A very important thing in a F2P game. + The game's fun. + Fluid combat and movement. + Good graphics. + Lots of weapons to choose from. - The entire game is a grindfest. The only goal in this game is to increase your Mastery Rank and get more weapons to grind with. Amazing. - No dedicated servers with high bandwidth and PC performance requirements for hosting. This turns most public games into unenjoyable lagfests. - Ridiculous cash shop prices on Warframes and weaponry. - Major balance issues with all equipment in the game, especially with new weapon releases. Which essentially is power creep. - No variety. - No real difficulty. Most of it is just artificial difficulty with stat increases. - Community lacks brain cells. - Terrible PvP. Yes, PvP is just a thing that was added because everyone asked for it and it's definitely not the focus of the game, but that doesn't mean I can't criticize it. - Nonexistent AI. - No endgame content. Warframe has had a lot of potential which it showed back in early Open Beta. However, the game has taken a turn for the worse with more and more grinding and power creep put into it. It's a fun game to play at first, but as you progress and increase your Mastery Rank, you will notice that the only thing you're doing is grinding your  off. 75/100
Kryose;-;good game sucks it's pay to win
Spectre;-;Pretty slow at start, but if you enjoy third person shooters it gets better after 2-3 hours of gameplay. There is loads of weapons and warframes to use and you can get all of them without paying a single dime. To do so however requires quite a bit if patience since you have to grind/farm for ingredients and wait through a 12+ hour timewall in order to craft anything. If you don't mind farming for loads of stuff and waiting through timewalls or are prepared to put real money in it, the game does manage to make you feel quite badass indeed. On another note, the community is friendly as hell.
[UB@D] Hjalmar;-;nice game its had a lot of good updates it has been improved greatly if you played it when it first came out and didnt like it try it again. You might find you like it SO MUCH MORE STUFF.
Fragget;-;great game. play it its free.
Foechizzle;-;Warframe is a co-operative, free-to-play, sci-fi shooter game developed by Digital Extremes (DE) for the PC and PlayStation 4. It is set in a distant future where the solar system is torn between a hyper-militarist clone empire, profit-driven technological merchants, and infested mutants/zombies. The player takes the role of a "Tenno", a member of a fourth faction with a blurry past and roots in ninja themes, and is guided by an entity called "the Lotus" through missions including timed survival, prisoner rescue, sabotage, and many more. The players is always pitted against enemies in superior numbers. To this end, players have at their disposal a varied arsenal of weapons both archaic and fantastic, and, most notably, a special suit of armor called the Warframe, each of which has a particular set of abilities. Despite being primarily a shooter game, the gameplay has a definite focus on the agility of the Warframes, featuring some parkour elements, and the way each Warframes abilities allow for creativity in combat. To sum it up this is a very good game.
aXil 24/7;-;I love this game This game is awsome
Athrun Jewel;-;16/10 stars, would play. This game is without a doubt the F2P MMO of it's type. Mixing the parkour run-and-gun physics of GunZ: The Duel and GunZ: The Second Duel, with the sci-fi setting that "Dark Sector" Laid the groundwork for, this game has become a direct successor to the hit title. Play the game as one of 15 (And counting) Warframes and DOZENS of weapons, through run-and-gun style or even STEALTH Style missions of varying difficulty, levels, and types. Pure killing? EXTERMINATION! Stealthy Assaults? CAPTURE and SABOTAGE missions! Want to just test your mettle? ENDLESS DEFENSE! ASSASSINATION! And even SURVIVAL MODE where your life support is CONSTANTLY draining, making you weaker the farther you go! This game has become an amazing game and was even recently named "Best Free to Play Game" in the market by contest on MMOBomb. If you've got a medium-spec PC (You can PM me for details on this if needed) or even if you're an enthusiast gamer with no money for subscriptions? This game is for YOU! The DEV's care about the population and while prices are steep for PLATINUM (In-game real-life currency) to discourage a "Pay 2 Win" mentality they're still fair. There's even PvP once you reach rank 30 (the current maximum) for your WARFRAME (Warframe and Player Levels are not computed as one.) TL;DR; GREAT Game. You will never find me saying something bad about it. -Black Rose Gaming.
Hidden Blade;-;i just got in my mind this game IS NICE but the problem is grind and a bit of p2w ill play it again though c:
Yung Yojimbo;-;DID YOU REALLY BELIEVE IT WOULD BE THAT EASY?
Garigato-kun;-;Great leveling system, nice combat and movement tho a little repetitive
Mugen;-;Play it for christs sake
ola.engel90;-;Warframe is fun but to enjoy it completely, you will have to put in a few bucks.
MariusHunter;-;This game is so awesome
Neo[N];-;Shld i download it? Yea u should ,Pretty Amazing GAme <3
VariousX;-;For a 3rd person, innovated and well designed. Worth a try.
Desperado;-;This is a sexy 3rd person future ninja type of shooter. It is fast paced and requires skill and teamwork. The multiplayer workes well. A system of constant upgrades, weapons and abilitiess along with steam rewards make it worthwile and keeps you wanting more. Not the smoothest platform, but I think they will continue to work out the kinks. Definetly a killer free game. HIghly Recommended. _Desperado
kewlfrogz;-;OMG, I played this in closed beta and it was so repitative and didn't really take the time to figure out what was going on. I was told to check it out again, I d/l the new 11.5 and I am now totally addicted to it. The missions make it fun, the online play is quick to match up, the vote for mission is sweet, the clan dojo has totally sealed the deal. I am loving it!!
Alpha;-;Do I recommend this game? YES, Absolutely !!! Its free !! And: This is the best free online-game I have ever played. By far !! Why? Up to 4 players against different kind of enemies in different landscapes and situations. It has elements of card-games when modding the weapons (like RPG-elements). The steering of the character is a challange at first, but based on the speed, when you got it, its fun like a racing-game. Players who are more active are rewarded with higher levels in characters and weapons, but those levels are limited at 30, so new players arent disadvanteged too much and are able to catch up soon. Everyone can get the character (Warframe) and the weapons which fit best to their very personal fighting-style. There is a possibility to spend money, but not needed at all. Asssasination, Defense, Extinction, Rescue, and so on are just some of the level-objectives in the 200something levels. Fast actions, fast movements, great team-tactics and a well-thought weapon-damage-system makes this game a great fun-trip every time. Get into the universe and we might play together soon.....
CHAD;-;Very fun game with great movement abilities. Very Addicting
Mandroll;-;I first tried out this game a long long time ago during the beta as a founder. The money I spent for the founder pack is something I have yet to regret. Every new patch brings new features, more diversity in the missions, new frames and very often new zones. Even if it is free to play, there is no NEED to spend a lot of money on this game, I'm still running on my original founder's platinum which i've mostly used to buy more slots for my warframe/weapons as well as a few cosmetic items.The crafting is very well done and offers a wide range of possibilities and a good alternative to spending platinum to buy gear and frames. For casual players with only a few hours to invest in a game, you can have fun with this only playing a few hours a week. For the more hardcore players, you can spend an easy 200 hours (probably more) to get everything and upgrade everything. The major downside of this game is the social aspect. Unlike other ARPGs, the fast paste gameplay makes it harder to socialize than in other ARPGs. The clan system is pretty nice and the general chat offers good alternative for socialising but as a whole I feel the game is not quite there yet. (and I am convinced they are working on improving that aspect somehow). The game Devs are really there with the community and participate in events/interact with the players a lot. It's really fun to see so much enthusiasm in today's gaming world. All in all, I'll start playing the game and tell myself: just a few runs, I'll only be on for an hour or so... but then I spend 3-4 hours running stuff and realise that well its 5 am and I should probably go to bed because I have work in 3 hours :S As a founder I highly recommend this game to anyone who enjoys ARPGs, crafting, farming, and participating in event!
MORGANFREEMAN;-;nonsense game .. why pay so much stuff for virtual crap
sithspy99;-;Its an awesome game filled with fun, and action.
bstephens102;-;Wonderful 3rd person shooter everything is available to you if you have the time to grind and build it!
y-u-killedBatman;-;that game is awesome but it be boring after days
MrPalmtreeguy;-;It's an awesome game, a few minor bugs but it's still in beta so i hope they'll be fixed!
MintRockets;-;An excellent game, brilliant over-the-shoulder hybrid shooter style, excellent usage of NVIDIA's PhysX.
Rooster;-;Way fun! More people is good! Very delightful! Soup!
Dick Chpey;-;Love this game and if anyone wants to play with me JOIN MEH CLAN NOW DAMMIT
Potato #bebackin6mnths #ggcsgo;-;Great game requiring skills which are easily developed once played for hours... Although pvp's system sucks, the overall game is just magnificent.
K0r0shi;-;The concept of the game is cool, graphics are nice, playing with friends is good and all... BUT! it gets tiring quickly due to It's lack of variety in stages, enemies, modes etc etc. If you are looking for a game to stick with, this is not for you. However, the game is free so It's fun to just jump in and play with friends once in a while!
mp_limitblyat 1;-;Try it out its great.
Gandalf The Gay;-;Decent game, fun if you want to just waste time.
Golden Bucket o' Skins;-;It's ninjas in space. What else do you need?
Padraig;-;(Note: I played this game while drunk and writing this review drunk...opinions expressed by druken VampiricPadraig may not reflect the actual opinions of Sobar VampiricPadraig and thus should be taken with a grain of salt) UI. Awesome Gameplay. Awesome. The wave thing...yeah, the first thing. Kinda awesome, but don't expect to stay alive after Wave 6 (When you can choose to leave) Overall. I give this a 9/10 Cons: Get rid of the Platinum system and we are good!
-=MOTA=- Tegiminis;-;join us on an odyssey of front flips and jump kicks across the solar system
Tekoth;-;Warframe is one of the best games ive played in a long time.I its requires you to use strategic gameplay and parkour methods to survive in most situations, making the game estatic and addictive. Althought the game is in beta i belive it will be #1 on lots of gammers lists.
UNCLE SAM;-;really good for a free game, but updates take along time, even after you acualy get the game
Kaboom0;-;Amazing... The time I have spent is evident of that... The movement system is awesome...
Carter;-;Greatest game on Steam I've found
LongDanzi;-;do you like ninjas? how about space ninjas? would you like to become a space ninja and kill everyone that hates space ninjas? if you answer yes to the questions above, get this game. if you do you will: -Become a space ninja -Travel across the galaxy -murder anything and anyone who isn't a space ninja -make some weapons -level up said weapons -parkour -Parkour to hard and over shoot where you wanted to go -fall off the level -get placed where you started parkouring -tame a space dog -murder some bosses -have the bosses send you hate mail -have the bosses call a space ninja to come murder you -sees the space ninja -*Dies* -"Insert any swear word here" -rinse repeat so sprint+slide+melee your way to victory
Entropic;-;I started playing on Friday, by the time I went to sleep on Sunday I had 50 hours played, so yea theres that.
Graveling;-;Pretty fun and exciting game, lots of weapons and characters. There are many things you can do in this game, for example you can run on walls do backflips or slide down ramps. You like to get upclose and personal? you can grab a shoty or hold f to equip melee and kamiakzee the enemies. Dont like to get close? keep the distance with rifles. Each warframe has different abilities/playstyles. you get 3 weapons, a primary, a side arm and a melee weapon. You can either go in guns blazing or stealth missions if you like(patience is required). The pve is what shines the brightest in this game, though the ai can be a bit questionable they are still competent and offer a challenge to the player. In pve you can play up to 4 players and 4 players in pvp or you can solo. Now here are some minor problems with the game. Sometimes games can get very lagy making everyone warp around. Stealth is very hard for the wrong reasons, enemies can sometimes spot you via sixth sense or can sometimes derp right infront of you, many maps are usualy close quarters meaning sniping and stealthing can be very difficult which i recommend only if you have reached end game or need a challenge. Im not a fan of pvp and i dont play it, but i did try it in its early stages. I don't know if they changed pvp but damage mods really ruin pvp as some one who doesnt have them is going to get stomped and turns the game into a call of duty with ninjas. Overall good game, but it can get a bit repetitive with all the grinding (exp/resources) which is reasonable because this is a free to play. the bleed mechanic can get quite annoying since it goes through shields and is based on rng. 3 factions each and have their own environments. Bosses are pretty meh except lephantis which was very satisfying to fight. Buying platinum sure helps lessen the grinding which is good, so if you dont like to grind recommend buying some platinum.
HIV360;-;(Im not very good at posting comments, but meh just give it a helpful review)>>> Warframe is very awesome, for a ninja play, si-fi, and a third person veiw. (LoL)> . I can picture if its first person but that prob decrease xp of you playing it. Making a Warframe tip: It will prob take a long time to make,a lot money to spend, and a lot time to collect. But I think that way is more effective than just wasting your 'real money' to buy plitanium. Well, its a very> very> very awesome game and I give it a 10/10. I will prob update this review again if I want to and shred some darkness into the light.......
Cman724;-;realy good
n7-Cyden;-;You guyz gotta play this!
SgtSkullee1;-;this game is awsome
Gatos;-;Great Game!
Demon093;-;ruined my life. 10/10
Dr. Racooniac;-;fettes game, verdient f2p als attribut. is weder p2p noch p2w(da es eh >90% pve is) recommend!
Yuu;-;This game can be effectively described and summarized in three words: Ninjas in Space. If you even slightly like ninjas, make sure to check this game out. 10/10
Byrius;-;Warframe takes place many centuries after modern-day civilization today, after the events of Dark Sector. The game is a co-op 1-4 player third-person shooter with many different features such as weapon customization, PhysX support, great graphics, amazing movement capabilities with very simple controls, large variety of enemies and bosses, clans, and over a hundred different weapons and playable Warframes. My favorite part, however, is the lore. The game has the most amazing lore I HAVE EVER SEEN in a game. It is so very extensive. Shrouded with wars and mystery, much of the history of Warframe was lost with memory loss and time. But from the known lore, the history of the game is amazing even with very little info known. The only bad thing about this game is that things in the shop are over-priced and hard to obtain without spending money. But, by far, this is the best damn shooter I have ever played. If you want to learn more of the lore, get Dark Sector in the Steam Catalog. I couldn't recommend this game any more even if I tried. I pity the people who lose the experiences of this game by not playing it.
Mephistopheles;-;Imagine taking assasains creed, taking out all the plot, then making that an fps set in space. Also you can upgrade upgrades that upgrade upgrades.
[XI]Kazuto Kirigaya;-;This is an awesome game and I really suggest you download this game. GET THIS GAME!!! The guys did a really really good job of this game so thanks to those guys :D
Peter Porker;-;How to start... Well, warframe is an action/fps/hack n' slash game so addictive at the beginning, you will be surprised of the amazing and funny gameplay and method to obtain the stuff, it's easy, it's attractive, it's "fast", it's cooperative, etc, you will be interested in being more powerfull with better mods/weapons/warframes, etc, later you will have a feel that it's a bit repetitive the gameplay, then the absence of a decent vs multiplayer mode (like; capture the flag, deathmatch, control points, king of the hill, etc) will make you feel a void in your soul, then you will feel a lil disappointed when you realize WF in some cases is too P2W, and etc etc... Afterall, seeing that WF is still on develop, you will say that is not that bad, when you have your mates there; it's an amazing game to play and always it will make you go deep on it and having you playing more and more, obtaining what you want to obtain because it's true, you can obtain the 90% of the stuff without pay (certainly, slots system is a bit abusive) and with all of this in mind you will say "Ok, lets try again to see if the boss finally drop the blueprint? :)" and you will repeat this again and again... 9/10
The Real Dom;-;It's a good game, but it really sucks.
Iridon;-;Damn good for a free to play, one of the best I've ever encountered. The start is a bit rough but once you get the flow of it, it becames super fun. The combat and weapon system is really unique, and the movement is unlike any other game I've played before. Downsides are it gets a bit grindy, but the way they implimented the game it works out well. You rank up by using more guns and increasing your skill with them. No weapons are off limits to people who don't want to dump real money into it, but your pool of weapons and frames will be limited. Even then there are events and promotions that give weapons you can just delete and keep the open slot. A really fun and interesting game, the best part is the developers are very active and quick about hearing the community's word, and take a great deal of care into making sure the feedback they get doesn't fall on deaf ears.
Byraganon;-;Pretty damn fun, definitly need friends to play with to make the most out of it though.
highmagedrake;-;Edited: I decided to come back and try this again, and after the hump that was the first rank, enjoyed it a lot more. Without spending a dime, keeping up with paid players, and the levels are quite a bit of fun.
Blackwolf;-;I was very skepickal about this game till i played it with friends and had so much fun ill be playing it for a long time . great graphics and gameplay cant wait to see how this game evolves
i am bread;-;robo ninjas are a nice touch 7/7 would sell my body for
Lionattack;-;Awesome game with friends, graphics amazing, special affects make it seem its coming out of a science fiction movie
BeerGogglesFTW;-;A lot of fun with friends. Good payment system. 160 hours, and I only spent $20 with plat to spare. It can be repetitive, but its fun. Its one of the few games where I've enjoyed "the grind." It kept me interested and I was happy to work towards new Warframes and Weapons. Once I got all the weapons and warframes I wanted though, I did stop playing. There wasn't anything "end game" to keep me going. But if you got friends to play with, its a good time.
Lorddarknes;-;This game is really amazing it has good graphics and it play really great
HeaLeinGirL;-;fun late night game
Suki Yamamoto;-;Game is amazing. That is all.
That Nerdy Frog;-;Absolutely amazing and well done. Love it!! <3 :3
Vancelle;-;Space Ninjas play for free. Free to Play defines this game extremely well. The fact that most FTP games are pay to win, this game is the exact opposite. This game is Play to Win. Sure you can spend money and buy things, but you can literally unlock everything (except for colors, slots, and aesthetic features) in game. There are items in game that you have to play to unlock, you can't buy everything. The play style of Warframe is amazing, it's PvE with groups of four. Sure you can run solo, but it's a lot more fun to play with groups. The beginning is somewhat slow, but once you hit around the third planet and you figure everything out, this game is simply amazing. The graphics are breath-taking, I could go very in-depth about this game, but I'll let you decide if you enjoy it or not. Just think about this one phrase, "Space-Ninjas".
Rev;-;Who dose not want to play as a space ninja killing creepy looking bad guys? Oh... You? Well... Go away then.
Dr. Crazy;-;Warframe Review This game can be very fun, I personally give it an 8/10, and I believe it's pretty damn good ADVANTAGES - Has great graphics, better than alot of games out there - Has interesting factions and interesting weapons, and Grineerish is just pure awesome - Most of the game can be accessed for free, by crafting or as login rewards - The whole Solar System is free and can be done with any warframe - Every warframe and weapon have advanteges and disadvantages, this makes them fairly well ballanced - The game is Free to Play DISADVANTAGES - Some items cannot be aquired for free, they must be bought for "platinum" - The game has microtransactions which is never a good sign, but they don't give any overpowered items - Colors are not free, palletes cost 75 platinum each, along with most cosmetic items - Platinum is very hard to get without paying money - Ridiculous crafting times starting at 12 hours to 72 hours Overall I think this game is worth a shot, I have been playing for almost a year now (since the early beta) If you are willing to pay real world money for platinum, I recommend waiting until you get a discount as a login reward, I also highly recommend doing research on the wiki before craftin/buying items Happy hunting Tenno! - Crazy
Chao Miles;-;I have spent so much time in this game, it is so much fun and really feels rewarding.
Rept1le;-;Super fun game. but its quite an odd concept. Ever wondered how weird baseball is to someone who's never played it? that idea is a lot like this. cool game though.
Goldust-;-;Warframe is a cooperative online third person free to play action game presenting wonderful gameplay, graphics quality and action involving space ninja-bots.This game is currently in beta but it is generally a PS4 game.It is becoming more wonderful game on steam with every updates and it is an addictive game..So, I will recommend this game to every player on steam.. :)
Daedrus Laertus;-;For those who hate TPS and Sci-fi this game will make you love it!Its a must play game! Everyone will love it! Good fanservice as well!! :O OPPAI EVERWHERE!!
Mah;-;Its fun and stuff
Luixls;-;Gets repetitive sometimes, but on every update I want to play this game again.
MVme;-;I played it on the PS4 and the PC... Why.. can't... I... Stop... Playing...
De_ez Nuts;-;Didn't even know this was on Steam... 10/10.
InvertusD;-;I like it A LOT! That's all.
[NAN.Pro] An$hA Road To 1K;-;It's free and fun. Get it.
ZandelinX;-;So far logged at least 300+hrs into this game what can I say totally friggin sweet. Losts of action fast paced and rarely a dull moment play with a team go in loud or stealth or do things solo either way its a lot of fun. Still in a beta even though its been a year so things will change as content is improved and added on. Best part if there is a problem of or an issue after a patch the dev team hops right to it and releases a fix within minutes. So far its brilliant well designed and for a free to play it kicks  granted not much to a storyline yet but it will get there. In this your an interstellar ninja what more could you possibly ask for and if you dont like it well perhaps you need to try playing a bit diffrently. Download check it out and enjoy.
Shmickel;-;Really fun and graphic are amazing.
Zimrak, Fearless Zee Captain;-;Amazingly fun, consistently interesting, looks and feels fantastic. At the same time, not for everyone. Its the sort of game where you will need to change to progress, without the gameplay changing. Simultaneously, it does require a great deal of farming to get around paying for the cool stuff. If you're the kind of person who enjoys taking on the same challenges from different angles and in different ways, warframe is the best game possible for you. The multiplayer is great, allowing you to have a ton of fun with your friends
[ACCUsers] Noble!;-;this game is not free .
Eternal Silence;-;Seriously the best free to play game ever
Trava;-;Great game to play with friends! Very Diverse character builds and awesome animation!
I AM GUNDAM;-;This game is massive amounts of fun. MAny unique, and familiar art styles blend seamlessly and are seperate enough in their theme so players can recognize different factions with ease. The crafting system will not appeal to casualgamers so much, but dedication is well rewarded.
Jack Bauer;-;fun as hell
Pnazer;-;I played this before the big update, I had the time of my life, but after the Update it became laggy and confusing.
Rex;-;A brilliant game, fun to play and it keeps you coming back. Not P2W at all.
Static Butcher;-;Gets old quick.
Blaine;-;Fast paced and fun.
-Rinslette- #bdaytoday #raya;-;When you have lots of money and don't know what to do with them,buy LOTS of platinum,Plats,plats,plats!
[EFP] winash64;-;Badass. the end.
The Based Ninja;-;As of posting this, I've spent nearly two thousand hours on this game. Two Thousand. 2,000. 2k. That's almost 3 consecutive months worth of this game... It was worth every second.
Dave Strider;-;Warframe It can be grindy at many points but not as much as other games Great concept, missions do get repetative Amazing graphics Space Ninjas Good community Responsive dev-team, always try to be on top of bugs/bug-fixes Love the game I rate 9/10 because of the grinding
Dave Strider;-;Warframe It can be grindy at many points but not as much as other games Great concept, missions do get repetative Amazing graphics Space Ninjas Good community Responsive dev-team, always try to be on top of bugs/bug-fixes Love the game I rate 9/10 because of the grinding
FireFox;-;this is a game, and its a game, so... because its a game its very game so yeah as i said its a game
Krul;-;You like being a badass ninja with swords, shurikens and ... powers, or just run and gun and not give two , this is the game for you.
SORRY !;-;LOVE IT
KiluKahur;-;10/5 would fail at being a sphes njnia again
conner360;-;I got a pet and it died. 1/10
ClimbingThunder;-;You should play this.
JonIzErr0r;-;this game..is awesome. everything can be crafted in game without using real money, it will just take a lot of farming, but hey, that adds to the longevity of the game. PLUS it gives you a chance to level up your warframe and gear. i find it alot of fun. at first i thought this game sucked cause i didnt understand it. give is a try and look up on thi excelent community wiki if you ever have questions. i hope to see you in game :)
Mephistopheles;-;Imagine taking assasains creed, taking out all the plot, then making that an fps set in space. Also you can upgrade upgrades that upgrade upgrades.
[XI]Kazuto Kirigaya;-;This is an awesome game and I really suggest you download this game. GET THIS GAME!!! The guys did a really really good job of this game so thanks to those guys :D
n7-Cyden;-;You guyz gotta play this!
SgtSkullee1;-;this game is awsome
<font face="forte">PouBavui_;-;Wow..Nice Game.
Euphoricaa;-;I absolutely love this game. It's very versatile and open to pretty much anything you want to do with it; whether you put money into it or not. It's a third-person shooter, which is probably why I love it so much. I'd definitely recommend this as one of the best free-to-play games available on Steam.
Wolf;-;it's a very good game
DeMoN;-;Great game, awesome graphics , good story line the game moves at the pace you want it and the game will teach you the basics of how to play the game youll get easily caught up playing with friends for hours at a time 10/10 score from me.
[] ElysiumLeoSK;-;Ninja aliens? This game made my day :)
Tom;-;This game is amazing! Have played for a while and will continue to play! Every update brings new, fresh content in a unique style of play not found in any other game! The one problem is learning to play the game. The tutorial could use some inprovement, but aside from that the game is flawless! 10/10 Side Note: If you are struggling to learn something there is a lot of support provided on the games forums and within the game in various different chat channels.
CLWH :D;-;This game has everything that a person wants. Fricken ninjas in space, dogs killing people, swords, guns, badass Warframes and for the guys, sexualize Warframes that will probably give them rageboners. I'm just saying.
King Julian;-;So here is the deal. Warframe is aweful. Honestly 0/10 would not play. Maybe... MAYBE 2/10 cuz swords. Other than that this game is lame. You force yourself to play a few hours, however, becuase it has gotten higher ratings than some of your favorite games. So you're in around ten hours, and you get to your first level 30 weapon. You have since then purchased and/or found other weapon parts and intended to build a superior weapon to the weapon you currently have. You give it a shot and holy dear lord is it good. And it felt pretty satisfying coming out of the 12 or 24 hour oven (foundry). So you play with that for a while and have a decent amount of fun. So okay, games not great, maybe a 5/10. At least it's free. But, becuase this new weapon is pretty good, you want to see what else is on the horizon. Rinse and repeat until about 40 hours when you realize that you've covered most of the starchart and have a few good weapons. Rinse and repeat until you can take down anything in the starchart VERY fast. Rinse and repeat until you can take out the stalkler in one hit with a meelee weapon. Rinse and repeat until you can last to 45 mins + on T4 survival. etc., etc., ,etc. 10/10 God Tier Game. Would Recommend (EVEN DROPPING CASH ON TEH GAME) TL;DR Graph of y = x where x is how much you play and y is your desire to play
Golden Bucket o' Skins;-;It's ninjas in space. What else do you need?
MariusHunter;-;This game is so awesome
Neo[N];-;Shld i download it? Yea u should ,Pretty Amazing GAme <3
VariousX;-;For a 3rd person, innovated and well designed. Worth a try.
Desperado;-;This is a sexy 3rd person future ninja type of shooter. It is fast paced and requires skill and teamwork. The multiplayer workes well. A system of constant upgrades, weapons and abilitiess along with steam rewards make it worthwile and keeps you wanting more. Not the smoothest platform, but I think they will continue to work out the kinks. Definetly a killer free game. HIghly Recommended. _Desperado
kewlfrogz;-;OMG, I played this in closed beta and it was so repitative and didn't really take the time to figure out what was going on. I was told to check it out again, I d/l the new 11.5 and I am now totally addicted to it. The missions make it fun, the online play is quick to match up, the vote for mission is sweet, the clan dojo has totally sealed the deal. I am loving it!!
Alpha;-;Do I recommend this game? YES, Absolutely !!! Its free !! And: This is the best free online-game I have ever played. By far !! Why? Up to 4 players against different kind of enemies in different landscapes and situations. It has elements of card-games when modding the weapons (like RPG-elements). The steering of the character is a challange at first, but based on the speed, when you got it, its fun like a racing-game. Players who are more active are rewarded with higher levels in characters and weapons, but those levels are limited at 30, so new players arent disadvanteged too much and are able to catch up soon. Everyone can get the character (Warframe) and the weapons which fit best to their very personal fighting-style. There is a possibility to spend money, but not needed at all. Asssasination, Defense, Extinction, Rescue, and so on are just some of the level-objectives in the 200something levels. Fast actions, fast movements, great team-tactics and a well-thought weapon-damage-system makes this game a great fun-trip every time. Get into the universe and we might play together soon.....
CHAD;-;Very fun game with great movement abilities. Very Addicting
Mandroll;-;I first tried out this game a long long time ago during the beta as a founder. The money I spent for the founder pack is something I have yet to regret. Every new patch brings new features, more diversity in the missions, new frames and very often new zones. Even if it is free to play, there is no NEED to spend a lot of money on this game, I'm still running on my original founder's platinum which i've mostly used to buy more slots for my warframe/weapons as well as a few cosmetic items.The crafting is very well done and offers a wide range of possibilities and a good alternative to spending platinum to buy gear and frames. For casual players with only a few hours to invest in a game, you can have fun with this only playing a few hours a week. For the more hardcore players, you can spend an easy 200 hours (probably more) to get everything and upgrade everything. The major downside of this game is the social aspect. Unlike other ARPGs, the fast paste gameplay makes it harder to socialize than in other ARPGs. The clan system is pretty nice and the general chat offers good alternative for socialising but as a whole I feel the game is not quite there yet. (and I am convinced they are working on improving that aspect somehow). The game Devs are really there with the community and participate in events/interact with the players a lot. It's really fun to see so much enthusiasm in today's gaming world. All in all, I'll start playing the game and tell myself: just a few runs, I'll only be on for an hour or so... but then I spend 3-4 hours running stuff and realise that well its 5 am and I should probably go to bed because I have work in 3 hours :S As a founder I highly recommend this game to anyone who enjoys ARPGs, crafting, farming, and participating in event!
Elzzar;-;Its a amazing and wonderful game, full of action, adventure, and that splash of violence that just makes it great. Though in the first few days or months (depending how much you play) it is difficult, mainly in money and resources, but that will soon end, and best of all, you don't have to worry that much about upgrading, since all warframes have unique abilities and traits to decide on! So I would definitly recomend this game, but for people who don't like 3rd-person view, space travel guns, lazers, swords, bows, robots, and NINJAS!!!, turn your head and find a different game.
Wagoven;-;Grinding and Running Simulator Space Ninjas with energy guns so much HATE with laggs and crushes with weak notebook why love this game? qooo~
Alexander Roth;-;- Story - "They were called Tenno. Warriors of blade and gun: masters of the Warframe armor. Those that survived the old war were left drifting among the ruins. Now they are needed once more. The Grineer, with their vast armies, are spreading throughout the solar system. A call echoes across the stars summoning the Tenno to an ancient place. They summon you. Allow the Lotus to guide you. She has rescued you from your cryostasis chamber and given you a chance to survive. The Grineer will find you; you must be prepared. The Lotus will teach you the ways of the Warframes and the secrets to unlocking their powers. Come Tenno, you must join the war." I think in my opinion is one of the best F2P games I ever played.It has: weapons, space ninjas, Archwing, character costumization, santinels, your very own pet (called Kubrow) and more. The best advice I can give you is: take your time and don't buy everything you see on market.Almost everything you see there can be created/optained through hard wark and patience. I definitely recommend this game to anyone that is looking for this kind of games...That's it, now excusie me, I need to get back and save the humanity.
The Dastardly Boned Bastard;-;Want Destiny? Play this instead, save yourself $60
Donchovi;-;Most graphicaly detailed mmo ive ever seen. love the game play. having a sword and bow in space is a fun new spin. I found that the mouse sensitivety is more sensetive than a menstrating teenage girl who was just dumped on prom night, even after i turned it down almost to zero. this gives the illision of extreme lag which can  you off. everything is also shaped weird, as in enemies and such. like there armor is plated over bursting tummours which have serverly deformed them, but this keeps the game interestin and fresh. runs pretty smoothly.
NicaDeX;-;Game rocks :D Maybe the best ninja game ever
Mangus;-;I heard this game was repetetive and even early on I can see how people say that, but it looks like there's a lot of depth to it and it's interesting enough I'm gonna keep playing for a while.
PRIME;-;Warframe is the best game i played so far on STEAM ! IT has amazing graphich and the best gameplay that is evolveing every day.But it has repetiv ad that is its only downfall.But when you surpass that its amazing.You can chose betvine 100 weapons(fireing and meele) and dosens of sutis with their uniq powers!!! SO LOG IN AND HAVE FUN
Alexhangar;-;well... after more than 400 hours of playing this on steam and another 200 of playing on their louncher, I can say that the game got me. Though it gets repetitive, if you can look over that and become part of the community, you'll never get bored of it.
illogicalblock;-;This game is the greatest. It's like halo, assasin's creed, and destiny had a child and it was an mmorpg.
jjwhatup;-;i think this is the best game i have ever played i usally finsh a long game in a about 300 hours but this game i have nearly got 400 hours into it and im not even a quater way through it is a great game for users that like sci-fi third person shooters well you dont even have to be into sci-fi to play this game.
Khuzy;-;Brilliant co operative shooter many different classes, not my type of game but hey I recommend it
JDTechn0;-;Play this game! It's awsome!
{Foxtrot};-;I downloaded this game a long time ago but almost as soon as I got in the game I exited out and deleted it because the blur was just too much. I see now that it looks a little better so i would try it out if I were you.
psycrow;-;two words ... SPACE NINJAS!!!
boom2420;-;best game to come out since boarderlands
PotatoJuice;-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so heres a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings.
Josh;-;Great fast paced fps shooter with gear progression for that mmorpg feel with a shooter/space ninja feel to it.
Cpt.Etnan;-;its a really good idea for a game even though it is a bit unoriginal it is still fun. oh yeah, DON'T CHOOSE MAG UNLESS YOU ARE UNBELIVABLY SKILLED AT GAMES LIKE THESE. ALL HERE POWERS ARE TERREIBLE COMPARED
eurobufu;-;This is a greate game wen u are bored and want to shoot somthing
Aetrem;-;A good game, but you have to grind for alot of stuff.
Mite Bejerkenauf;-;You can change the colour of your weapon.
NewUser;-;This is fun co-op game, would reccommend to my friends.
Athrun Jewel;-;16/10 stars, would play. This game is without a doubt the F2P MMO of it's type. Mixing the parkour run-and-gun physics of GunZ: The Duel and GunZ: The Second Duel, with the sci-fi setting that "Dark Sector" Laid the groundwork for, this game has become a direct successor to the hit title. Play the game as one of 15 (And counting) Warframes and DOZENS of weapons, through run-and-gun style or even STEALTH Style missions of varying difficulty, levels, and types. Pure killing? EXTERMINATION! Stealthy Assaults? CAPTURE and SABOTAGE missions! Want to just test your mettle? ENDLESS DEFENSE! ASSASSINATION! And even SURVIVAL MODE where your life support is CONSTANTLY draining, making you weaker the farther you go! This game has become an amazing game and was even recently named "Best Free to Play Game" in the market by contest on MMOBomb. If you've got a medium-spec PC (You can PM me for details on this if needed) or even if you're an enthusiast gamer with no money for subscriptions? This game is for YOU! The DEV's care about the population and while prices are steep for PLATINUM (In-game real-life currency) to discourage a "Pay 2 Win" mentality they're still fair. There's even PvP once you reach rank 30 (the current maximum) for your WARFRAME (Warframe and Player Levels are not computed as one.) TL;DR; GREAT Game. You will never find me saying something bad about it. -Black Rose Gaming.
Hidden Blade;-;i just got in my mind this game IS NICE but the problem is grind and a bit of p2w ill play it again though c:
Its_Ben;-;This is a fun game if you like play togeather, i find a lot of fun to play and it is a good game for free so i would get it NOW!!!!!
Bartuc Firestorm;-;In my honest opinion the best free to play game out there.
Dr. Sylvia Faff;-;It ruins my life more then dota 2
Gawd of Vidya;-;Much shoot. Such slash. Wow play it.
Bark Smoothy;-;Lose all my stuff after every update. 10/10 no game is perfect.
[UB@D] Hjalmar;-;nice game its had a lot of good updates it has been improved greatly if you played it when it first came out and didnt like it try it again. You might find you like it SO MUCH MORE STUFF.
Snow;-;Can't stop. Send help.
Kagdama;-;I really enjoy this game, it's not pay to win but you can purchase pretty much everything in game with real money (for those of us who can't spend all day playing) Update 14 just released and overhauled the entire UI and added player ships and a new companion. Give it a try.
Mr Black;-;Ninja Shooter...whats not to like?
Buckeye Burl;-;Catch Up to your Teammates Simulator 2014.
[1134]Jacks Spur;-;You play as a space ninja mercenary in space flying around and wreck stuff with other ninjas! now w/ pets!
DJ.Charlie#Dadead;-;Best game ever if you are not a ninja  off but if you are welcome. Very fun since they added a dog that you can run around with. Watch out he bites!
WAR;-;A good parkour, badass, hacking and slashing type game that is for everybody.
Spawnie89;-;Very addictive. Constantly evolving. Loads of fun. Do recommend.
Sandy Sakura;-;Gray Fox simulator. Not much else to say.
GuT.v2K;-;Start game, look at character, play missions, farm farm farm, build weapon, wait 24 hours, look at character, farm farm farm farm farm farm, build warframe, wait 5 days, look at character, farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm, look at character, farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm farm 10/10 farming simulator!
zerO;-;This game caused me to lose 30 points on my essay that was due a few days ago. Thanks Warframe it was worth it.
Kaoru Konneko Gone 10th-20th;-;SPACE NINJA AND MAKING STUFF DEAD! Also F2P done right for once.
xxdarkr466xx;-;its a game that is very game like
Takerinus;-;One of the best games I've ever played.
Fire of the Abyss;-;420/10 i love wasting my life away playing a  game
RestingAlex;-;grind grind grind grind oh has it been 3 days huehue w.e. Yea play this game srsly good. Pay a little to have more fun its cool k.
:^);-;this game really ing hates your left pinky
RR Toki Zensekai 6ITH;-;This game is a Third-Person Action Shooter with lots of parkour, up-close melee combat, and plenty of powers and guns to keep each game going at a nice, fast pace. I will say this, the game will require quite a bit of time before it really becomes truly enjoyable, however recent updates have allowed players to get good loot fairly early to have an edge in battle and then allow the player to start working towards the more powerful items. Most weapons are fairly balanced (except for most beginner weapons, which are extremely weak---Don't pick up the Lato and AkLato) and with the right amount of tweaking, can be easily used for late game, but some weapons were designed to go into much further late game play. The community is probably one of the friendliest groups around as the game is more centered on PVE than PVP and most players will be on the same playing field as you, so never hesitate to ask questions and ask for help from others. The game updates very frequently and is always handing out new content, including weapons (not DLC), quests (not DLC), and enemies (not DLC). Did I mention this game has no DLCs? The only thing purchased with IRL money is just for quick advantages at earning weapons and Warframes that can be obtained in game with enough patience and some cosmetics as well, but the game is very far from Pay-To-Win as anyone can get the same advantage as everyone else, it's just a matter if you want that advantage sooner, so never feel like you're hard-pressed to purchase something. The only quirp I have against this game is that connection issues can sometimes be a hinderence, either preventing you from joining or just out-right ending the game when players join, but if you have a fairly decent connection, there isn't anything to worry about. Overall it's a fun game that is still expanding with a good community. I highly recommend this game. Besides, it's Space Ninjas! How much more awesome can that get?
|Isuzu Sento|;-;Hell i love this game...The Online Campaign Feature rocks!!!!!!!!!!!!
Illuminati Lunchtime;-;Your a space ninja killing everything in space. 10/10
AZZA;-;I have something to say....I am addicted to this game... I dont know what it is... Because the game is a hell of a grind... But i think its when i finally achieve what im trying to get... The "Prime weapons and Warframes"... The rare mods for weapons and Warframes.... The awesome big updates once a month that add a load of new content... The awesome community....The awesome developers...and of course i cant forget the new Melee 2.0 System... Maybe thats what it is so addicting???... Well all i can say is give it a go, its free, so no loss (Except for DL :P) and try it. You may notice it is a big grind so to help you out, use this link to sign up and get a 7 day level booster to help with getting better weapons... Becuase thats the only thing holding you back from getting the awesome weapons! https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=516fa1c11a4d801222000000 Have fun!
StayAliveForMe;-;warframe is so amazing <3.<3
Ray Brighten The Light;-;Space war Great on graphic but still have some Glitch... Action For ninja!
chris.s.clevenger;-;Warframe is a very good game, great looks and feel to the game. Easy to get the hang of it. Now before anyone starts "Yelling" at me saying it's a pay to win game, I'll say this... oh sure you can pay to get almost everything in the game with real cash. But with that said all it does is give it to you and make room for it for you, you still need to go level it and learn to use it. So not pay to win, but pay to make it quicker, yes for sure. My only small con to the game is they added in tons of stuff that in my book should have been given to the players for free, but they charge for it as well; like "Colors" to change you warframes looks to a better color. You'll need to pay for that... or like me... never do it, so no worries. The game is a Grind! You need to find frineds and run though mission over and over to get Mods to become more powerful.... Recommend this game? Oh sure, its very fun and if you don't want to spend anything it is free. Who can beat free?
Yon;-;9/10 wall runs
Peter Porker;-;How to start... Well, warframe is an action/fps/hack n' slash game so addictive at the beginning, you will be surprised of the amazing and funny gameplay and method to obtain the stuff, it's easy, it's attractive, it's "fast", it's cooperative, etc, you will be interested in being more powerfull with better mods/weapons/warframes, etc, later you will have a feel that it's a bit repetitive the gameplay, then the absence of a decent vs multiplayer mode (like; capture the flag, deathmatch, control points, king of the hill, etc) will make you feel a void in your soul, then you will feel a lil disappointed when you realize WF in some cases is too P2W, and etc etc... Afterall, seeing that WF is still on develop, you will say that is not that bad, when you have your mates there; it's an amazing game to play and always it will make you go deep on it and having you playing more and more, obtaining what you want to obtain because it's true, you can obtain the 90% of the stuff without pay (certainly, slots system is a bit abusive) and with all of this in mind you will say "Ok, lets try again to see if the boss finally drop the blueprint? :)" and you will repeat this again and again... 9/10
Byraganon;-;Pretty damn fun, definitly need friends to play with to make the most out of it though.
highmagedrake;-;Edited: I decided to come back and try this again, and after the hump that was the first rank, enjoyed it a lot more. Without spending a dime, keeping up with paid players, and the levels are quite a bit of fun.
Eckkse;-;You just have to play this game, it's pretty addictive, and have space ninjas, what else do you want? Well there is more, infinite farming map's plenty of bosses, plant of customization options, if you like ninjas and stuff, you just have to play it :)
@Dd!CT3D(ZFG);-;good game and its free
FataL [LOS];-;Highly addicting game! Everything can be earned in game without spending money! This is a true "free to play" game and I recommend this game to EVERYONE! Come and become a Tenno!
just a boy abusing techies;-;An awesome game for everybody. The game is getting updated frequently, and has lots of content. It's free to play so I dont actually know why you are reading this review, just download and try it out, I'm sure you'll love it!
MattCr;-;It's pretty good if you like grinding
Sovexo;-;You can do all the stuff in the trailer if you can do all the stuff in the trailer then that mean the game is awesome. PERIOD. PLUS. You play as freaking space ninjas...
KickSlap;-;Let's see Warframe it's a sci-fi game with exosuits (space-ninjas) fighting the ugly bad guys. Well you can basiclly buy almost anything in the cash shop, including cosmetics. This game is immensly fun with friends, and trying out the AMAZING weapons, there are katanas, whips, laser guns, shotguns, freeze rays, and many more. Now the maps are the same, and can feel repetitve, because it is, although some of the levels look really cool... well compared to the other maps. Now the gameplay could range to really boring to really fun, that depends on what weapons you using and how you use them. Now the Warframes are the exosuits the players can wear, it gives them special powers, like jumping high, iron skin, healing, and mind control. Getting warframes can be very difficult, and that brings me to my next point, the learning curv is very steep so you need to watch youtube videos on how to play properly, thes game is also very difficult so if you like that then good. So in the end, do i recommend this game? Well if you like what you've seen here then go play this, if this turnes you off, then you can try it i guess. So I personally enjoyed this game immensly, but i didn't let that get in the way of the recommendation of this game. This Review is just my opinion.
Samoth;-;(Review may be subject to changes as the game's still in beta) + No paywalls. A very important thing in a F2P game. + The game's fun. + Fluid combat and movement. + Good graphics. + Lots of weapons to choose from. - The entire game is a grindfest. The only goal in this game is to increase your Mastery Rank and get more weapons to grind with. Amazing. - No dedicated servers with high bandwidth and PC performance requirements for hosting. This turns most public games into unenjoyable lagfests. - Ridiculous cash shop prices on Warframes and weaponry. - Major balance issues with all equipment in the game, especially with new weapon releases. Which essentially is power creep. - No variety. - No real difficulty. Most of it is just artificial difficulty with stat increases. - Community lacks brain cells. - Terrible PvP. Yes, PvP is just a thing that was added because everyone asked for it and it's definitely not the focus of the game, but that doesn't mean I can't criticize it. - Nonexistent AI. - No endgame content. Warframe has had a lot of potential which it showed back in early Open Beta. However, the game has taken a turn for the worse with more and more grinding and power creep put into it. It's a fun game to play at first, but as you progress and increase your Mastery Rank, you will notice that the only thing you're doing is grinding your  off. 75/100
Niggachu;-;There's a part in the game where you need to get a kubrow pet ( Dog kinda things) and you need to kill them, destroy their home, take their egg, and then hatch that egg until that kubrow becomes youre sex slave. 10/10 Best Game Ever
Legatus Ignatius;-;Dead Space meets samuris with superpowers. Best in co-op.
iamtyphon;-;One of the best graphics an online RPG can offer.
Sparten 117;-;Awesome but should tell you more information and needs more story
Origin388;-;For a free game its not too bad, of course all the best stuff is bought with currency that can only be acquired by Real money but eh, you don't need it to play through the game! Pretty good game i'd say a 7/10
john;-;I played this game back when it was first released on steam and not much since then. That being said I thouroughly enjoyed what the game had to offer back then and everytime I hop on to check what's new there is always tons of new stuff and while the game itself can get a little repetitive I feel it's still enjoyable overall. The melee weapon play is very fun and the gun play was pretty decent too. The crafting system can turn into a grind but with friends it can still be a pleasant experience even while grinding.
Barack Hussein Obama II;-;Kill  with badass weapons, then build more badass weapons to kill more . 12/10 plat's a bit expensive tho. -Obama approves this message
Draken;-;Probably the best free to play game FPS of all time. It's fast, pretty, and fun. Even the micro transactions system is very fair, and they keep evolving the game in the right direction with constant updates. Highly recommended.
BurningArk;-;While fun, the game has three free "classes" to pick in the begining. The other "classes" are avalible with by use real world money to buy in game points to obtain the other "classes"; with the most expensive ones being about 20$. Wareframe plays exceptionaly well, and is just plain fun; especially with other players/your friends. However, because Wareframe is free the majority of the gameplay is essentially pay-to-win due to the better items and other "classes" being available through the use of real world money. That's not to say that Wareframe is a bad game, because it's not, but this one aspect is enough to be a huge turn-off for some people.
NiNjA_ShIfTy;-;This game is amazing by visuels graphics everything about it is awesome, a must get now!
Homeydaclown;-;Game is just like dead space+mass effect=Warframe
impulse |;-;Started this game a few hours ago because I wanted something more "in-depth" than Defiance. This game is great so far! The sci-fi feel is fantastic, and the graphics are phenominal. As a free-to-play game it is definitely worth a shot!
Yezzinator;-;"Extremely fun and addicting." - Yezzinator, 2014
h4ppy.j3d1;-;Basically it's a fast paced super sentai game. You are a badass in spandex in the future slicing, punching and shooting at bad guys at super speed (if you are decent) or trying to avoid death (git gud mango). Bosses are -easy and you'll enjoy this piece of software (at least 30-50 hours) until you are forced to grind forever to acquire a new pair of metal breasts for your space waifu. PLAY ALONE OR WITH ONE OTHER PLAYER, NEVER JOIN 4 PLAYER MISSIONS BECAUSE IT'S A CLUSTER! Grafixx 8/10 Sound 3/10 Gameplay 7/10 P2W Ratio 6/10
Boris Johnson;-;Totes mlg. Much wow.
[ASP SHOP]Ima Syafi;-;JUST 4 WORD, THIS GAME IS AWESOME !!!!!!!!
Saeko;-;Roughtly, this game is "metroid meets team fortress 2". But actually in a deeper sense, or actually in my disturbed mind, the tennos are the metaphor for the perfect society, the grineers are the metaphor of the communists, the corpus are the metaphor of the capitalists, the infected are the metaphor of the anarchists and the corrupted are probably some revoluting people that join force from everywhere across the world. Twisted logic.
Filthy Explosives;-;If you hate grindfests avoid this one. If you can get past that/feel compelled to shell out money to deal with it, its a rather fun game.
G A N G S T A H;-;1 word... 1 fkn word to describe this game. Disappointment.
C0MMAND0 D34TH;-;Pretty good game but eventually you realize that this game is just a big money trap and a grind fest with little to no story at all 6/10
BlackRed;-;A Pay-to-Rush game- Meaning, if you want to be anywhere "cool" you may need to spend real money on "platinum" (the game currency). Otherwise you can grind for days for materials to make items, warframes .etc It is not a pay-to-win game really, but grinding for days dont really make it fun does it? Too much emphasis is placed on the markeplace, and potential expenditure of Platinum. The gear you can acquire are really good-looking with its own properties... , but the whole mechanic is to get you roped-in, spend the starting Platinum and be a little bit more cool than you are when you started. rest is grinding, grinding, grinding, until you can get more gear. Conclusion: Good looking game. You are etter off playing Mass Effect 3 Multiplayer- essentially the same thing, just more emphasis on spending real cash for intangible data.
Infamous Jim;-;Don't do it. You're making a mistake.
the7oclock;-;The game has potential, but overall it is a terrible experience. The entire game revolves around you spending real money to win. It actually takes pay to win to a whole new level and the gameplay doesn't make up for it. I would not recommend this game to anyone even my worst enemy....
Mierda;-;I know this is beta etc etc etc. , i am not going to talk  about the game mechanics, mods and tinkering with items is really enjoyable though, leveling up stuff and hunting rare mods/stances etc is too. the 'market' is crap, just plain crap, some idiots will always lower the price of your goodies (which you gotta put some real effort and time to farm) , and people will mock and 'lol' you when you try to sell your goodies for normal price. there are freeloaders, actually a lot of freeloaders who will come to your mission and stay still until you do all the work and finish, there are idiot people who wont wait for anyone and just rush with all speed mods equipped, doing no dmg or no help to anyone, just plain ing rushing. allience system is really pointless atm because there is no point forming an allience, it will just create stress and pressure for the warlords of the clans because of the 'solar rails', and there was no benefit that i could see holding solar rails. if you build a dojo and try to create a clan, you will be seriously disappointed because you gotta recruit a lot of idiots and try to teach them the same very basic  over and over again until they just wont play anymore or just exits the clan to join another clan. Devs listen to players a bit too much because this game has the most moronic, stupid and annoying community i've ever seen, and believe me when i say this, warframe community is worse then dota 2 community because %90 of the people who plays this game is a nobrainer, i saw people who play this game for months or even for a year and still dont know jack about the game. the developing of this game includes a lot of nerfing because of this crybaby community, and i can see this game gets casual day by day , if the devs wont stop listening to these crybaby kids, i can assure that this game will become a 12 year old childs game. and make no mistake , this community just LOVES to do  contest, they will always say 'i got 127419723921 dmg xD' , 'my x is better then your y' , or if you say you need some forma bps 'wow i never thought i've ever see someone needing forma bps :s i got 71823918723 :S' a lot of drama queens included too, 'hey i know this is just a game but remember what eclipse said to us, that we have no honor, that we are not tenno, doesnt this hurt you, lets conquer their rail and prove them wrong' (conquering = doing the same mission over and over again till you get epileptic) trying to roleplay in a game which has no lore except this moronic ninja talk. i am not going to say a single word about the fanboys, they just dont deserve it. i am not finished, there is just this one thing that bugging me most; all these talks about stupid 'ninjas' seems to attract more nobrainer kids every friggin day, and mark my words, these kids will destroy the game, devs gotta cut this ninja  and try to implement a decent, not so childish lore in to the game otherwise i will stop playing because i dont wanna spend hundreds of hours teaching to stupid kids ABC, i am not a teacher and no one is paying me for this lol. seriously, i dont want nor deserve some random 8 year old kid ing my T4 survival at 5 min and causing me to lose my key because its 'bedtime'. this is ing disgusting and it makes me wonder why the  i am still playing this game. i am already feeling very, veeery disgusted at myself for playing in this community for 500 hours. you just have to grind the  out of game until they implement new 'stuff' to grind. this game is seriously epileptic in all ways, the 'prime times' which 2 of the big titted 'devs' sit and play the game and talk about utterly stupid crap is the most annoying 'dev event' i've ever seen, i mean they are not developers, one of them(which has big ) is the 'community face' of the game, we all know what this means right.(if you are a fanboy there is a high chance that you dont know what that means) it is just what always happens, a good(ish) game appears then the community fk it up, as it seems this is one of those cases.
old_joyful;-;When i first started playing this game, it was really fun, but once i progressed farther into the game, it becaume rediculously repetative. I felt like i was playing the same 5 maps over and over. If there were more maps, or even a different map for each level, it would make the game much more amusing. Everything you can buy in-game is WAY to expensive, the only point of the game is what exactly? It seems all there is to do is grind to get a so-called better weapon, but it sucks, get another 40,000 in-game credits, and buy another  weapon, not to mention the upgrading system.
Bear with no username;-;Pros: + Fun gameplay for a while + Good graphics Cons: - Seeing the same levels gets boring after a while - Grinding fest to get new weapons to get grinding - ''Try to rank up once per day'' -------- Devs give absolutely no  if players have fun playing, as long as theyre wallets get fatter. You can craft weapons, or warframes, but it will take 12 - 72 HOURS to finish crafting, or you can PAY to boost it, if you ever get the items for it. You dont? Well PAY to get better drops. Pay for this, pay for that.
kaffeyum;-;As a Hammer Head Shark Samurai, I had to run around in a maze shooting at containers. I'm sure the game has a positive side, but I don't have the patience for it.
finn;-;I feel that every quest/mission were kind of the same long boring action. Firefightss with CPU enemies that got really old. Getting screwed over if a team mate leaves the game. All out, I don't recommend this game.
ps3trophies;-;Make no mistake, Warframe masquerades as a final product with no in development warning on Steam, and no mention of it still being beta anywhere but a tiny spot on the launcher. Back around update 7 (when it launched on steam), the game held quite a bit of promise for the future, however, Digital Extremes has decided it's better to release a thousand new weapons and ignore many core gameplay problems than to work on creating actual content for the game. They claim "infinite replayability" because the levels are procedurally generated each time you load one up, but it settles into the same mindless grind of mid to high level Diablo of "go to where thing you want drops, kill everything, leave." The game also goes from having far too much challenge before you can get the handful of core, vital mods to be able to go past the first few planets (and not only are there only a very small few of these mods, but some are nearly impossible for new players to get), to an endless stream of one shot kills on everything and its mother -- and a number of warframes can clear entire rooms with skills alone, with or without mods. Additionally, Digital Extreme's idea of a challenging boss fight is large area effect attacks and invulnerability phases, as evidenced all of their revamped bosses. One, Lephantis, wasn't even particularly bad, until they decided players were killing it too quickly, and added damage caps to it, not making the fight any more difficult, just making it longer. In addition, the loot tables are so horribly bloated because DE's response to core problems ("nearly every enemy has a knockdown attack and it's not particularly enjoyable," "parry is a useless gameplay mechanic") is to release extremely niche new mods that compete with older, infinitely more useful and versatile mods in your limited mod slots. Would you rather have 320% more shields, do 30% more damage with your abilities, have twice as much energy (the game's mana), move 30% faster, or...a 95% chance to automatically block an attack with no noticible effect on incoming damage? tl;dr it's bad and I regret spending $50 on it. Edit 2/12: And now DE has decided, in an incredibly petty move, to ban the leader of the top clan in Warframe from the game entirely for forum posts made by other people. I can't even think of anything to add onto that. Warframe's community managers banned someone from the game entirely. For something they personally didn't even do.
CloudPies;-;After a full year of playing this game, I can say for sure its going nowhere. - Decision are sprung on 'beta testers', I'm guessing it's because if they actually proposed the bad decision ahead of time, they would be shot down completely. - Balance is a joke. No effort is going into looking at the game overall and making changes accordingly. They don't even have a design document. - Bugs rule the game, and actually prevent you from playing. One time, they were changing the fonts for the game and managed to make the first boss invincible. Very sleek coding Digital Extremes. - Forum management are along the lines of people's republic of china's governing methods. Admin concided to a friend of mine that his warning point was wrong and had no basis, warning point still there because he refused to sing songs of glory about them. - Cash shop makes you regret every purchase. (I don't even know how they managed to do this, its incredible) sleek/10. Don't touch it. ps. Warbros #1
dilsnufis;-;I didn't play it that long, just a couple hours. But IMO that's plenty long enough to know what a game is like. I didn't really like it. The shooting is ok. The graphics are good. But the free-to-play nonsense is all over this game. I mean, why not sell boxed copies (or digital downloads, since we're on steam) to fund your development of it? And no, I don't mean credit packs. I'd really like a good spacey-shooter MMORPG, but this thing needs more variety in level design, and get rid of the lame paywalls. Make it fun first! Ultimately, I just uninstalled it because I couldn't see myself enjoying this kind of thing for very long. Everything is a repetitive grind.
rakataka;-;Game is very monotonous and getting the other Warframes, as well as pretty much every other piece of equipment, is straight up un-fun and a pain in the .
Liberation;-;Great game,no reason for you to not have it cause its free.Got bored at the 1000 hour mark,but the devs keep the game some what fresh with constant updates
WoLoLo;-;Space Ninja Simulator 20-wheneveritsdone
ItsMarkieMark;-;Pay to win es... pay to win... Play with a group of friends... it's more fun that way. Plus you won't get mugged by a hoard of bad guys on the higher leveled missions. I'm suprised how well the game runs when played online. Lots of different warframes to pick from, each of them having their own unique abilities... but each of them costs like a whole new game.
Kiddo;-;Like It Kinda Sort Of Cybernetic Ninja and With Gunz
Assy McGee;-;This game is Assy Approved with Assy seal of Awesome. You must download it.
Captain BAMF;-;Ive been with this game for awhile now. For a free to play, it's as good as they come. Clans, survivals, defenses, exterminations, mobile defenses, interceptions, constant alets, solar rail wars and dark sector conflicts. Not to mention they recently added kubrows, or dogs, that can kick  along side your player instead of just robots. This game has progressivly gotten better over time. The devs love and reward feedback of all kinds. If the community hates something, it will be addressed asap. Can'y say that about many other games can you? IT IS FREE TO PLAY. You can earn every item in the game playing, and not only that, but while grinding away for weapons and loot, you will find loot other players want. Which means you can sell it for PLATINUM. Not only can you play free, but you can freely earn certain boosters and materials that are easier to buy then find, without buying ! The amount of customability on your warframe, weapons, and companions makes it pretty damn unique too. Best weapon in the game? kinda a loose term here since if you put alot of work into any wep, it will blow  away. If your feeling down on fire or passion for playing other games you own, try warframe out, just remember 3 weeks from now that you do have other games, that you payed for, that are not of this quality. Happy Hunting- Captain BAMF (Get some you space ninjas!)
Stink Boy;-;This game is FREAKING AMAZING!!! An amazing coop experience! The gameplay is fantastic, the graphics are beautiful, it has controller support (good for people who dislike keyboard and mouse on 3rd person games such as myself) and best of all, it's FREE!!!!!
Brother Nature;-;You can have your own personal fan stalking you everywhere and sending you creepy messages 12/10
Wade Wilson (Rebel's wolf);-;they should make this game for mac
Day;-;First of all, Im not a fan of These kinda MMOs grinding and typical slow lock-on spell-on-cooldown gameplay.(i like mmorpgs though) But Warframe is quite different and unique: the core gameplay is very dynamic fast paced action combining 3rd person shooter, melee fighting and magic-like abilities everything is realtime, fast, and requires some skill from a player. You go on various missions in up to 4 player teams to combat hordes of enemies that can rise in numbers and levels quickly providing you as much challenge as you can take. The movement in this game is also great: you can do many trick jumps, run on wals and almost fly around if you know what you are doing. There is even stealth which is fun and useful if you want to play solo. Now the addictive part is of course acquiring new weapons, classes (warframes) and rare mods that augument weapons and warframes. And believe me, there are so many things to get and to level up, some are hidden quite deep. There is quite a lot of grinding, but the process itself fun because the challenge escalates fast. The game is honest free2play and you can unlock everything but if you want to keep everything you will have to buy inventory slots with platinum (which is bought for real money or traded for rare mods between players, so you don't really need to spend a dime if you are willing to grind). The downside: it doesn't have a huge overworld that you can walk around and explore, like most other MMOs, just individual missions. Some things are still being polished and improved. Needs more variety in environments and missions. The game is mostly PvE focused, there is PvP but its still in ongoing development. Overall its a great game for everyone who loves action. intense horde combat and mmoarpg levelling and farming for loot Gameplay: 10 Graphics: 10 Conclave: 8 Dojo: 9 Updates: 10 Grinding: 10 Farming: 10 Replayability: 9 Story: I came to kill stuff for free Overall Score 9.8 -Matthew Olls
Sergo;-;Your a fat giant "maybe black" nigerian elf in a robotic  costume shooting at expired milk aliens that look like they need gallons of proactive daily to survive, but then again when u slide ur giant sword up their  who needs it? Overall i think this game gives me s daily sometimes to the extent where i have repainted my living room white.
CryingBoys;-;Nice grapichs and skill for fps game.. But, this game have bad grapichs for ai.. I hope steam can fix that..
Bonk;-;Hmm what to say. Played it for about 15 minutes with the fam, just about threwup from the mindless grinding of enemy waves. Hit Alt+F4, responded really well, got me out of this torm of code pretty quick, so cudos to you developers for letting people have a shortcut to exit your nightmare creation. 10/10 IGN great for uninstalling!
Death Mark # . .;-;i Love This Game i sped half a year playing it
'Mork;-;When it comes to F2p (free to play) games people often tread carefuly as for the regular pitfalls (pay now and not get stuck in que and have a real game experience) Warframe however seams to be apart from most f2p games in this regard a fun "run and gun" game style that is easy to learn and takes some time to be good at . A great CooP game for some mates
WELL MET 4Head;-;Very fun when you first play the game, and it has a great theme to it. However there is no end game content currently, and the game is just one big grindfest.
yuck;-;warframe is about being a shark space ninja how cool is that wow 2/10
Chase;-;After playing the intro and first mission, I can safetly say this game is amazing. One small issue with me, probably because I'm just OCD. The cursor for menus and such is a little jumpy and extremely slow. BUT, all in all 10/10
Mansquidlion;-;They've truly re-invented the wheel with this one.
WC_ImSugoi;-;I Love GrindFrame, the grind is a trap.... Space Ninjas with swords though, was all worth the grind...
Animus375;-;Really fun, a bit grindy, but the grinding can be pretty fun.
Owl;-;One of the best games I have played always happy to come back. 11/10
[Enigma] Creeper Enigmatico;-;It's like Call Of Duty. [IGN - 10/10]
aveDZ;-;Gundam Ninja Destiny Warfare 2 is a great game!
[TC]Perseus1251;-;This is an amazing game that's expanding quickly. However if you dont like waiting at minum, 12 hours for most things to craft then it might get a bit boring. But you can usually manage you time fairly well to where it's no big deal.
Elusive;-;First came Dark Sector. Pretty cool, underrated game if you ask me. Hell, even Hayden's armor from Dark Sector looks just like Excalibur in this game. Then they  out this. I'm not saying Warframe is bad though, I enjoy it a lot, I mean, it IS just a beta still. Some things could be fixed, that of I don't exactly know right now, but really it's a fun game, try it out. They also really need to work on Mac Support.
me;-;Log in screen Email flappy Password bird You will probably regret this
Bolturu | gimme a knife plz;-;The grind is real. I r8 8/8 m8 g8
TheMoistOne;-;Game is horribly broken. You are supposed to take the lives of the enemies while all your doing is wasting you own.... 11/10 Would reccomend...
Ringo *;-;There is not enough explanation on how the game works like walkthrough tutorials for example. there are also not enough people to join in group missions which make advancing difficult
NathanImmy;-;really good game u need to put a lot of hour in to it tho
Gigabyte.JayaX.LL;-;Cool game where you can get a knowlege
xXAmanoXx;-;Best Freedom Simulator of 2001 Space Ninjas with Assault Rifles 9/11 would murica again
KING;-;It was fun for a while, really grindy, when I played there were like 5 maps total that I got used to really well and I'd see them from planet to planet. If grinding was ever fun, it was in the hours I played warframe. After a while it got boring and I just couldn't do it anymore. Should keep anyone entertained for at least 10 hours.
Grampa's hentai sprays;-;Epic game. Many ways to kill enemies!
Pepe The Meme Extraordinaire;-;Best game on Steam. Hands down. If you dont play this why are you even on steam?
Jonely Loe;-;Not polished enough, I want to be able to see my face. Platinum is overpriced.
Cerberus;-;I want to recommend this game, I really do. I just cannot in good faith recommend something that has all the right components, but willfully chooses to put them together so badly that it becomes unplayable without spending enormous amounts of cash. What am I complaining about? "Free to play" mentality. Let me start by saying this: Warframe can be really fun. With its co-op play, procedurally generated levels, different game modes, and huge range of Weapons/Warframe/Mod options, it certainly possesses the qualities that one looks for in an engaging and fun game. Unfortunately you can and WILL find yourself completely unable to progress or enjoy any of the fun features unless you're willing to spend real world money... and here's why: What bad developers do when it comes to F2P games is carefully design the games so that they are unwinnable for players who don't spend real world cash on the game. The players get hooked, then frustrated, and then either ragequit or spend lots of money so that they have a chance to win. This strategy works, but is incredibly scummy and in no way deserves to be supported. Warframe performs this on many levels, and has definitely lost my respect because of it. To begin with, the game starts you off with basic "storyline" missions which are fairly straightforward, easy, FUN and more or less teach you how to play. That's fine. In fact, they even let you choose your starting weapon and Warframe, which is great! Customization right off the bat! It also works great for you in the first dozen or so missions until the questline is over: just enough time to get you hooked into the game. Then comes the stick. Several missions in, you will learn that this innocent weapon/warframe selection is one in which you can actually make a BAD choice which essentially cripples you for every mission going forward... at least until you get a new Warframe/Weapon combo. See, the game doesn't ramp up the difficulty, it just ramps up enemy HP and damage (and the annoying hacking minigames) and does so completely irrespective of the "levels" that it claims to be designed around. This quickly leads to you getting out of your league in nearly every single mission; most of which are required to be completed in order to unlock the new content. Essentially content progression works like this: Want a new Warframe? You can buy the blueprint for an ungodly amount of credits (which are essentially game currency). Oh wait, you mean you want to PLAY with the Warframe? No no, you need to build all of the Warframe parts first! How do you do that? Thanks for asking! The game won't tell you, but you'll learn from other players that you basically have to do special boss missions a million times to find the blueprints for the Warframes' components. Blueprints which by the way ALSO have huge credit and resource costs associated with them. Oh the resources? You farm those from planets which you unlock from doing higher level missions and beating bosses. What do you mean you can't beat the higher level missions solo? Oh you have a terrible Warframe/Weapon combo? Well get a new Warframe/Weapon then! See how it loops back in on itself? You're too weak to do the missions on your own, so you try to get new weapons or Warframes. That's when you learn that you don't have the resources to build the new weapons/frames even when you DO have the huge amounts of credits required. The resources require planets you don't have access to. The planets require missions you can't beat. There's only two ways out of this loop of stupid and the first involves spending a huge quantity of real world cash to "bypass" the game's requirements. Platinum (real world cash) gets you basically everything in this game, from rush building items that would otherwise take literal days to build, to buying weapons and Warframes outright without having to collect a single resource, to buying all of the rare and valuable mods or whatever from other players who spent the time to actually earn them. It's clear the developers knew exactly what they were doing when they made the missions impossible for new players. They were creating a cash trap. The second way of getting resources involves "piggybacking". This is technically an MMOFPS, so that means there's other players around. Now you can go on the main chat and beg higher level players to let you tag along on their missions, which is a decent way of earning the credits and resources required for doing literally anything in the game. Only problem is that you're then stuck following uber players around as THEY play the game and you watch. You literally cannot harm the high level guys they are fighting, and you die in one hit, so you're more or less forced to trudge through mission after mission waching other people play in the hopes that someday you'll be allowed to join in. This is not fun. This is not gameplay. This is boring and frustrating, and is the equivalent of being on an olympic sports team and being asked to follow the team around with a camera instead of playing. "Wait," I hear you ask, "What about players who are your level?" Well speaking from an Oceania perspective, those don't even exist. I can't tell you how many times I've sat waiting on a mission screen for someone, anyone to come join me. Nobody does. That's because they're all busy piggybacking with high level players since the game's progression is broken and money-based. In other words, forget matchmaking. Even if you did find people your level you'd probably also find that they were too weak to help much, or a hindrance in the several missions which require "stealth". I won't even get into the terrible mechanics of stealth here, but just know that it's like Assassin's Creed 1 if your assassin was a shopping trolley and enemies possessed the Eye of Sauron since once they see you, they will NEVER NOT BE ABLE TO SEE YOU. The bottom line is that Warframe has so many tantalizing and interesting options... which it then locks away in a gilded cage and tells you that you either need to pay for them with endless hours of your life... or with real world money. The irony is that I was willing to actually spend money on this game until I saw how badly they mistreat their non-paying players... and I just didn't want to be a part of that kind of system. So I'll be keeping my money, and the hours of my life I'd otherwise have wasted on this game, and investing both in something more productive and less horrifyigly abusive to its playerbase.
DON'T MESSAGE ME;-;1,526 Hours Spent on this game. That with a job, and with school. It's that good. Get it.
SammieWhitch101;-;Did a gameplay I really Love this game :D : https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=azx0AGsz8Mw&list=UUPatyxehNIEynXHap92WvVg
lithom7;-;Once you play it, you're hooked. Even if it doesn't last forever, you'll still have a blast .
Princess Woona;-;I enjoy the game a lot. Been with the game since Beta. At first take a bit to learn the controls but after it's great. Don't really care about grinding to get cool items since I enjoy doing the missions and playing with friend. So far one of the best Free to Play games ever and how it done right. Love the graphics and battle format and shooting and swords fighting. Ninja! Jumping off walls. Hopefully the game will stay awsome till the end.
bluefox7996;-;best game ever , this game required skill and some of your money to level up but when it does it totally worth it
Archiac;-;This game is awesome, I have no other words for something like this... Except... Maybe... Nah, just awesome
madks13;-;Although it is in Beta still, this game feels more like Release. Graphics are stunning, gameplay polished and lore quite furnished. It is updated regularly (each Thursday) and every month or 2 there is a major update bringing new gear, lore and game mechanics (mission types, gear type...). This game is a FPS (first person shooter) with a lot of action (wallwalking, sliding, coptering...). It requires planning and strategic thinking though, as higher level missions become quickly lethal without it. All in all, i quite enjoy playing it although i myself am not a FPS fan. Which is why i recommend it. UPDATE (23/04/2015) : This game has been released only to become better, since i last reviewed it. Although some bugs are slow to fix (nothing game-breaking), most are fixed pretty fast. Even as a casual i already spent 1k+ hours on it (playing it without Steam so it doesn't really reflect the real amount of time i've spen on it). The visuals as still as stunning, and becoming better. New mechanics were introduced, making the game a bit harder, and a lot more enjoyable (nothing Dark Souls-like). Since last time, the devs also added tutorials so it's noob friendly too. Quests, factions, syndicates, hubs...everything needed for a successful game.
R3hab;-;Personally, if you are about to make a game that has ninja aliens, mixed with sub-machine guns, you have VERY high expectations from the community. Warframe is an amazing, fast-paced game where, like I said, you are pretty much a ninja with gun. You can be paired up in a team of 4 or in a 4v4 game of capture the "Flag". For being a free-to-play game, this game is a MUST-HAVE for people who dont want to spend money on games. The combat is a real work of art. From sliding on the ground to super-attacks, this game is packed with new things to learn. One thing I do suggest to do is to include a "Basic Combat Skills" Tutorial for new players who really have no idea what to do. This is one of my most favorite games of all time and it just is all around a great game.
Beaker;-;If your looking for a shooter that passes time by as fast as a bird well... warframe is the game for you!
bannanaman14;-;This game is freaking awesome
dominatusimperator;-;Let me put this in the form of questions. Do you like ninjas? If so, this is the game for you. Do you like space? If so, this is the game for you. Do you like third person shooters? If so, this is the game for you. Do you like hitting things with swords? If so, this is the game for you. Do you like getting entire games for absolutely free, and not having to pay for anything afterwards, even the highest level items? If so, this is the game for you. In other words, get it. You have absolutely nothing to lose.
Fusey;-;Alternate title; Space Ninjas VS Zombies. Warframe is a game where you are a ninja in space. Sometimes you do ninja things, well, you would if the parkour system was any good. This will hopefully be fixed with the addition of the new parkour 2.0 system but as it currently stands you feel more like a f**king helicopter than a ninja. You have a large selection of space weapons to choose from including highly advanced snipers, laser guns, pistols that shoot explosives and... Bows. I'm sorry, what? No highly advanced space bows that shoot heat seeking laser guided arrows? Just regular bows? Hmm, yeah okay I give this game a 10/10 Roll credits.
SamberJACK;-;Best game evar!!! Haha. JK. That's me being hyperbolic. Warframe is a nice TPS in beta which has pros and cons. First, It got its own style. Original. Imagine space ninja going on a raid in a illegal mining facility managed by evil villains. That's what you get in this game. The concept is great, but unfortunately poor gamers who cant pay will have to suffer the wait system, and lack of weapon/suit slot. Yes, you have inventory limit in this game and everytime you craft your weapon, you have to wait around half-day ! If you are one of these poor gamers, don't sweat. The trading community in this game can cover your platinum (in game exclusive currency available by paying real money) needs although it takes more time. So, enjoy this Play-to-not-wait game!
NoDoubtsAtAll;-;Nice game.....BUT it is riddled with bugs, even now. Gameplay is a fun action game, which as everyone explains, and it is the best way to put it, you are essentially a space ninja. With friends it can be a lot a of fun, and be a good time waster, but alone it can get repetitive fairly quick. At first glance it seems like the game has a lot of areas to explore, the truth is a lot of them are recycled, much in the way it was in Dragon Age 2 (If people remember that annoyance). As for the bugs, there are A LOT, and some are even game breaking, such as; Melee randomly stop working on both keyboard and controller (I had this happen multiple times), Chat locking up and making you unable to access any of the menus, If an alert ends while you're in the mission sometimes doors won't function, Clipping issues with some parts of the map (Fell through and above the map several times), a huge lag issue with pvp mode (both sides said everyone was telephoning around). And last but not least, not a bug but just a pain....No way to get rid of unwanted Kubrows beyond killing them off, which takes 10 days, and shouldn't have to come to that or being forced to buy another slot. It is just a waste.
Hokiebird117;-;This game unfortunaltely dies out quickly.Unless you have plenty of frined to play with(but the online services are buggy as  anyways),you are not going to get much enjoyment out of this game.Sorry
Aza;-;Ninjas are cool. But what is better? THAT NINJAS PLAY FREE. Shoot, stab, magicafy(kill with magic) and dash. To be one with the ninja, is absolute. This is my story of my first experiences with this game. I loved F2P games at the time and I saw Warframe as a open Beta. I played it and it was very different to now. But after a while, I got bored. It was way too repetitive. About a year or 2 later. I got bored of other games (LOL) and came back to Warframe. Almost everything changed in the game. More stuff = more fun. Yes it is still a bit repetitive, but there is more to aim for. More quests. More stuff (in general). That is why a reccomend Warframe and give it a... 9.5/10
Akymo;-;Amazing game, was better than I expected for a free game, can't believe it's free. Really difficult too, only critic I have got is that it got bad steam support and may be too hard in some aspects and a bit gear dependent for your own warframe. Basicly, you control a warframe, or hero, or a unit like Halo, which you can pick from alternative classes or warframes as to speak, which you can find and collect and craft weapons to level up with aswell. Tons of levels, and a story, and excellent graphics, and smooth gameplay, and active online player base.
Garland;-;NOBODY KNOWS YOUR HERE-"FOOOORRSEEEGAAAHANALGLORYTENNO,FOOSGROWTEHGRINEEEERRR" Besides that all and all great game. The developers are really in with their community. DE dun good.
OhMarkoh;-;loads of fun, other than the fact it should be called WarFarm cause its a pain getting good weapons. 8/10
Mr. green man;-;I love this game because it gives me a chance to play with my friends and it's just a great game over all. I also the the combat tactics and well... IT'S AWESOME.
Jojy;-;Dem shaders are purty. Though the gameplay is slightly repetitive, it gets better if you play with someone you know.
Gold Mall;-;Really good game, I love it and would definetly recommend. This game would even be good worth 15 but as a free to play definetly get it!!
Cap'n Treehugger;-;Its a very unique 3rd person shooter unlike any other... Instead of it just being some guy with a bandana on,goes out guns a blazing kicking A** you actully have these things called warframes... eatch with a unique skill set and each with its own ... lets say traits (Frost and Rhino being tank, Ash and Loki being assasians, etc) . Its a fun game with so many other things than the stuff I have just listed.. But why waste ur time making u read it... check it out urself ;)
Cimbo;-;I squashed my friend with an elevator. 73.58/73.58
old_joyful;-;When i first started playing this game, it was really fun, but once i progressed farther into the game, it becaume rediculously repetative. I felt like i was playing the same 5 maps over and over. If there were more maps, or even a different map for each level, it would make the game much more amusing. Everything you can buy in-game is WAY to expensive, the only point of the game is what exactly? It seems all there is to do is grind to get a so-called better weapon, but it sucks, get another 40,000 in-game credits, and buy another  weapon, not to mention the upgrading system.
Bear with no username;-;Pros: + Fun gameplay for a while + Good graphics Cons: - Seeing the same levels gets boring after a while - Grinding fest to get new weapons to get grinding - ''Try to rank up once per day'' -------- Devs give absolutely no  if players have fun playing, as long as theyre wallets get fatter. You can craft weapons, or warframes, but it will take 12 - 72 HOURS to finish crafting, or you can PAY to boost it, if you ever get the items for it. You dont? Well PAY to get better drops. Pay for this, pay for that.
kaffeyum;-;As a Hammer Head Shark Samurai, I had to run around in a maze shooting at containers. I'm sure the game has a positive side, but I don't have the patience for it.
finn;-;I feel that every quest/mission were kind of the same long boring action. Firefightss with CPU enemies that got really old. Getting screwed over if a team mate leaves the game. All out, I don't recommend this game.
ps3trophies;-;Make no mistake, Warframe masquerades as a final product with no in development warning on Steam, and no mention of it still being beta anywhere but a tiny spot on the launcher. Back around update 7 (when it launched on steam), the game held quite a bit of promise for the future, however, Digital Extremes has decided it's better to release a thousand new weapons and ignore many core gameplay problems than to work on creating actual content for the game. They claim "infinite replayability" because the levels are procedurally generated each time you load one up, but it settles into the same mindless grind of mid to high level Diablo of "go to where thing you want drops, kill everything, leave." The game also goes from having far too much challenge before you can get the handful of core, vital mods to be able to go past the first few planets (and not only are there only a very small few of these mods, but some are nearly impossible for new players to get), to an endless stream of one shot kills on everything and its mother -- and a number of warframes can clear entire rooms with skills alone, with or without mods. Additionally, Digital Extreme's idea of a challenging boss fight is large area effect attacks and invulnerability phases, as evidenced all of their revamped bosses. One, Lephantis, wasn't even particularly bad, until they decided players were killing it too quickly, and added damage caps to it, not making the fight any more difficult, just making it longer. In addition, the loot tables are so horribly bloated because DE's response to core problems ("nearly every enemy has a knockdown attack and it's not particularly enjoyable," "parry is a useless gameplay mechanic") is to release extremely niche new mods that compete with older, infinitely more useful and versatile mods in your limited mod slots. Would you rather have 320% more shields, do 30% more damage with your abilities, have twice as much energy (the game's mana), move 30% faster, or...a 95% chance to automatically block an attack with no noticible effect on incoming damage? tl;dr it's bad and I regret spending $50 on it. Edit 2/12: And now DE has decided, in an incredibly petty move, to ban the leader of the top clan in Warframe from the game entirely for forum posts made by other people. I can't even think of anything to add onto that. Warframe's community managers banned someone from the game entirely. For something they personally didn't even do.
CloudPies;-;After a full year of playing this game, I can say for sure its going nowhere. - Decision are sprung on 'beta testers', I'm guessing it's because if they actually proposed the bad decision ahead of time, they would be shot down completely. - Balance is a joke. No effort is going into looking at the game overall and making changes accordingly. They don't even have a design document. - Bugs rule the game, and actually prevent you from playing. One time, they were changing the fonts for the game and managed to make the first boss invincible. Very sleek coding Digital Extremes. - Forum management are along the lines of people's republic of china's governing methods. Admin concided to a friend of mine that his warning point was wrong and had no basis, warning point still there because he refused to sing songs of glory about them. - Cash shop makes you regret every purchase. (I don't even know how they managed to do this, its incredible) sleek/10. Don't touch it. ps. Warbros #1
dilsnufis;-;I didn't play it that long, just a couple hours. But IMO that's plenty long enough to know what a game is like. I didn't really like it. The shooting is ok. The graphics are good. But the free-to-play nonsense is all over this game. I mean, why not sell boxed copies (or digital downloads, since we're on steam) to fund your development of it? And no, I don't mean credit packs. I'd really like a good spacey-shooter MMORPG, but this thing needs more variety in level design, and get rid of the lame paywalls. Make it fun first! Ultimately, I just uninstalled it because I couldn't see myself enjoying this kind of thing for very long. Everything is a repetitive grind.
rakataka;-;Game is very monotonous and getting the other Warframes, as well as pretty much every other piece of equipment, is straight up un-fun and a pain in the .
Liberation;-;Great game,no reason for you to not have it cause its free.Got bored at the 1000 hour mark,but the devs keep the game some what fresh with constant updates
xxKirbSt0mpxx;-;My wife left me soon after I found Warframe. 10/10 Would divorce again.
Kiiresh-san;-;A really, really good game with beautiful graphics, although the grinding is really strong it rewards you with tons of guns, melee weapons, warframes and lots of other stuffs. It is one of the better Free2play games right now and doesn't need any money to be spend on to be good. You just need a lot of time... like really A LOT of time.
BOT Alan;-;very nice game updated sonstanly and nice gameplay
GREENMAN41;-;Space ninjas, whats not to love?
CenoS;-;WORTH IT! It is free and provides unlimited hours of fun.
Cocoapebbles;-;Really good game definetly reccomend
Midnight Grey;-;It's like Farming Sim, but with a  ton more gun...Waaaaay more Gun. Here, just imagine this: Let's say Farming Simulator and Borderlands 2 had a baby, this would be it's baby. At least for me...
Tranus;-;I've read a bunch of the negative reveiws, and most are people who don't know how to play the game right. So here's a list of solutions to all that stuff. Problem: RNG dependent progression. Solution: Don't transmute mods, unless they are low quality. Rare mods are actually valuable, so there can't be a surefire way to get them, otherwise the game would have no content. Problem: Too much farming. Solution: Stop trying to farm for high-end items right off the bat. You actually have to look at what resources you have access to, and choose your next weapon/warframe from there. In most games you find the weapon you want then farm what you need, here it's actually a challenge to get stuff. Problem: Stuff never drops. Solution: Do something else on the same planet, and after no time you'll have what you need. If you're looking for a more rare resource, do an assassination. They are garunteed to drop at least one of their planet's rarest resource, so it's more reliable than just hoping it will pop out of a basic enemy. Problem: Endgame takes forever. Solution: This game is not for people who want to buy a game, play for an hour or two, then have every item that ever existed. This game actually gives a challenge in getting items; they're worth a lot more than people think. Problem: Mods too rare. Solution: That's because they're worth something. They provide more advancement than just getting the next weapon, in fact they are about as rare as weapons in other games. You just have to get over the fact that they're powerful, and you don't get them every two seconds. Also, mod farming is incredibly inefficient, just find something else to do and they will come faster than you think. If you have a theif's wit mod (you probably do, they're incredibly common), then don't throw it away. It makes getting mods a million times easier. Problem: Pay to win. Solution: Stop trying to buy you're way to endgame, that's not where the content is. Also, prime weapons can be built like any other, and they mostly have the same stats as the normal version but with different mod polarities (It's also somewhat of an accomplishment to build one, so it's sort of a show of your prestige at the game). Problem: Overpriced platinum. Solution: Yet again, all the items are worth more than you probably think. The prices match the gameplay it would take to build the item, so they're actually pretty fair. And the only things that cost a lot are weapons and warframes, which are more fun to build anyway. Problem: Monotonous missions. Solution: Play different missions; farming the same thing may seem efficient, but it's just going to make you think that's all there is. Problem: Math. Solution: Oh I'm sorry, I didn't realize using basic multiplication to compare two things is so hard. That's really too much for you to handle. Overall, this is a great game. It does take awhile to get stuff, but that's because it's not meant to be completed. The idea is that not all of the content is locked off till you reach endgame, it's distributed throughout the progression of game, so items are valuable yet not impossible to obtain at every stage of the game. You'll love it, as long as you don't expect to become grand champion of the universe a day after you play it.
DmgCtrl;-;The game is incredibly fun, but has some issues with a handful of mechanics here and there. It very much relies on the, "Well, it's still technically in beta," excuse. That being said, it is, sometimes, a valid excuse. Sometimes content updates can seem few and far between, and other times it seems like they release update after update within a few days. That being said, they tend to fix things that are broken, even if it does take them some time. While I do not agree with all of the creative paths they have chosen to take, the community has responded very well to it, really bringing lifeblood to the game. Despite all of this, Warframe achieves the simplest need for any game: To be fun. It has a lot going for it, and the developers really care about their product, and they both care that people enjoy it as much as they need it for profits. That being said, the "Freemium Incentives" can be a bit much, in-game. You can play the entire game free-to-play, but there are times where, if you really want to enjoy the game, you have to spend money. The simplest example of this is inventory slots. You are limited to a certain number at the beginning of the game, and more can only be obtained through purchase using real-world currency equivalents. That being said, I tend to find the thought, "Well, it's okay. These developers deserve my money for the amazing product they have provided," floating through my head. Just be careful not to go overboard; the game is worth an initial cash purchase of $20-$40, but no game is worth the hundreds some people are willing to sink into the game. Despite some of the negativity in this review, I have to give the game an overall-positive, thumbs up. This is just because THE GAME IS SO DAMN FUN! The parkour is entertaining (if a bit buggy at times, which only adds to the hilarity,) the combat is effective and you feel like you have an impact (if appropriately leveled,) Archwing has grown on me somewhat (if still a bit lacking, in my opinion. Don't get me wrong, it's great, but I earnestly believe it didn't need to be in the game,) the weapon and character varieties keep the game spicy, and customization is off the charts. The one tip I have to you concerning this game: Don't play too much. You'll burn yourself out immediately, and it can get very depressing to wait in-game for something to construct. Oh, I suppose I should mention that too, before this review is over: Crafting an item (and often times, the pieces for that item as well,) can take hours. It takes 2-5 missions for individual resources, depending on the complexity of the item and the rarity of the resource, and then you set the item up to build in the "foundry," which can take hours. No, I'm not exaggerating: Most "characters" (called Warframes,) take about 12 hours to build each individual part (Helmet, Suit, and Systems, though they can all be worked on simultaneously,) plus 3 days to combine the three together. I despise the amount that this incentivizes the freemium model for collecters like myself, but I will admit, it's satisfying when it's done. What was I saying? Oh, right. Burning yourself out. The reason I mention the foundry is because, within the first few months of play, I started to feel overwhelmed with grinding and waiting, and I was doing the parts of the game I hated while waiting for the parts I wanted, which made the parts I wanted feel disappointing. The game is fun, but recognize which parts of the game you like, and don't play the parts you hate to the point of upset. I suppose most people should take this for granted, but you may find yourself just too damn addicted to the game. If this happens, back off, put the game down for a few days (ignore the log-in rewards; they get disappointing after a while,) then come back a week later. The game will seem as fresh, new, and fun as it did within your first week of play. Overall, the game has its issues, and while it hasn't overcome all of its issues yet, the amount of fun the game provides is well worth it. Buy Play this game!
Hexie Lambent;-;Oh wow this game looks pretty cool, let's check it ou- OHGOD IM A SPACE NINJA SHOOTING LIGHTNING OUT OF A MAGNUM WHILE POWER SLIDING WITH A FLAMING TWO HANDED AXE AFTER BACKFLIPPING OFF OF A TWO-STORY HIGH WALL AND CHOPPING SOME SUCKER TO PIECES AND STEALING HIS SOUL. RUBYDOO. TACTICAL PUMP. SANIC SPEED RACER MARIO KART. ELECTRIFY THE WORLD. MUST FARM CREDITS TO BUY BLUEPRINTS TO EARN BLUEPRINTS TO EARN OTHER BLUEPRINTS TO FARM MORE. There is no life. Only Warframe.
Quintanomor;-;Games actual cost = The price of your graphics card
juice;-;GARGLE ME!!!!!! GARGLE ME!!!!! LOTUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUS I WANT YOU TO GARGLE ME RIGHT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! NOW!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! BRING IT OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOONNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNN
Cake;-;its cool
Noctuabundus [GOTR];-;, , and a bag of chips.
Oompa Torman;-;its a game you can play alone and with friends its ofc better with friends in a skype/teamspeak call adn just have a lot of fun
[NSDAP][KKK][ISIS]George Bush;-;Basically? It's Metal Gear Rising. With moar guns. And in space. And it's free. Go play.
Indiana-Jones;-;Very fun for a free to play game, great graphics, and can run on a older computer.
BetaZerker;-;Space ninjas with guns. What's not to like?
Sergio.GyG ESP;-;Third person online shooter with lost of misions epic guns and powers and a little gore
TheRenegade;-;Was a little skepitcal when I first started playing the game, there are only a dozen or so mission types, so I was worried that it was going to get repetative fast, but thus far it hasn't. Running nightmare missions for the best mods in the game has a nice challange, makes it feel more like a game than a grind fest. F2P, thus far I haven't found it to be P2W, but then again PvP is really non-existant. I feel that adding in some better PvP will be the main way to ensure that this game actually hangs around. *Edit - after 100 or so hours of playing, the missions do indeed get repeative. It also sucks to play without friends. I would have liked some more variety in the game. Things cost to much platinum imo, while yes you can earn most everything for free, buying those warframe slots are pretty pricey...
Malagkit;-;It is a very amazing game. It change my view of playing shooting genre games that I used to hate. This is a vey good game indeed.
Kitsuke;-;Great game for people who likes first person shooters, and multiplayer.
Mehmet;-;Good stuff
Procryonicx;-;So Far Way Better Then What It Used To Be! Before This Game Was Crap But With The Uppdates It Has Been Amazing I Think! Way Better Grahics! A Storyline That Is Not Clunky Like The Old One And Is Acctully Really Good And Just More Awesome Stuff Added To The Game! Everyone Should ATLEAST Give This Game A try! -Pro
Alice. Alices.;-;700 hours and I still feel like a noob.
PancakeCats;-;Could only get better if you could wipe out a planet of ethiopians. Its okay though they will starve anyway.
Techno;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work.
Sapperism;-;Amazing game, it dosnt force you to use real life money to buy things as you can unlock the blueprints for them with in game ccurrency as well as find the equipment needed to make them. Great game :)
Copper (II) Sulfate;-;This game preserved my virginity 10/10
Pasadena;-;this game is awesome . done !
Ultric;-;So you're in space, right? And you're, like, a ninja and stuff. There's like these super gross human clone guys and these really stupid looking mailbox robot men. Like, ugh, this game is so uncool. You're a freaking space ninja and your mission is essentially to go around the solar system messing life up for a bunch of things that want to rule the galaxy. Your weapons? They're basically anything you could ask for and more are constantly being made. Do you want to be an invisible force that empties entire ships without setting off an alarm? Try Ash, who has the ability to teleport to every enemy in a room and stab them in a back. It's cooler than it sounds. Want to screw with the angry folks as you slaughter them en masse? Get Vauban and throw vortexes at people. Yep, straight-up vortexes. Maybe you've decided that guns and throwing knives and stuff are for sissies. Want to just run to the front lines and destroy entire armies with punches and kicks? Valkyr. She has the added bonus of allowing you to screw with your team mates by yanking them away from whereever they're going. Oh, you can kinda use that on enemies too I guess. Weaponry is an awesome component to this game. For the more traditional third person shooter, you've got a nice range of assault weapons that satisfy any gamer. Want to dual-wield revolvers and mod them to be able to clear a room and look stylish? Go right ahead. Want a sword to chop through your enemies with ease? Enjoy. Of course, maybe you'd like something a little more interesting. As in, perhaps you'd like a gun that fires 5 lasers in a wide berth that you can adjust the focus of in order to deal with different sized groups? Maybe instead of a sword, you'd like a frisbee that's covered in blades? Perhaps a gun that shoots goo. Goo that explodes. A laser LMG? A electro-whip? A sawblade launcher? A bow and set of throwing knives that freaking chop people's limbs off? Still not satisfied? Maybe take a trip into the outer reaches of space into forgotten space temples loaded with corrupted enemies that hit harder and drop better gear. Perhaps your Ember warframe doesn't really convey "awesome" to you enough. How about you take a few trips to the void and get a version that's head is on fire. And all of this is free. Warframe. Play it.
Massic;-;I have been playing Warframe off and on for years, since it was in open Beta. + Controls and gameplay that more often than not plays quickly and smoothly + the recent updates have been raising the bar in terms of visual effects and quality, visually it belongs on the current gen platforms + Combining gunplay, melee combat and character abilities (basically magic) can feel very rewarding + Overall the game is very simple to play and adds challenge as you progress - Grind. That's true for many F2P games, but even with its randomly constructed levels the sense of repetition will set in very quickly. Grind to access the next tier of gear, grind and roll on the random loot tables to get the blueprints needed for the new gear, grind for the materials needed to build the gear and in some cases, grind for items to sell for Warframe's in-game currency in order to increase the size of your inventory so that you can add the new gear while keeping your old gear as well. - The RNG. There is no true distinction as far as rewards are concerned between a newer player and a veteran. The highest level content requires the use of consumable items that are found in other missions and while a veteran player may be able to last twice as long as a new player before they are forced to end the mission and lose the consumable, both the new player and veteran will be rolling on the same loot tables - Bugs. There are a LOT of bugs and with every update that adds one new feature there is at least a week or two of bug crushing, some minor (repeatedly being disconnected from the main chat server) to severe (becoming trapped in geometry, unable to fire your primary weapon or just glitched out without the option of continuing) - New Content. Adding new weapons and warframes is great, but Warframe encounters difficulties when making the new content balanced and most tragically of all. fun. The Archwing missions in perticular, a mode that holds many similarities to older thrid person robot shooters such as Zone of the Enders and Slave Zero, is largely seen as a frustrating addition, an opinion that was made more prevalent when new gear was made attainable solely through archwing missions. Overall Warframe is a good game, but it relies too heavily on cheap hooks like time gates, pay gates and most of all the RNG/Grind gate for me to recommend it to anyone.
ivanvidovic18;-;Its great game, real free2play...everything in game you can get without spending any real money.
DeadPool;-;Guud game M8 Mlg Review 100mountainDew/100
Pyromancer;-;In Warframe, you get to be a space ninja... What else would you ever need?
James Lee;-;Would spend another 100 hours on it.
Flare Arrow;-;Eh. It's decent.
Hey I'm Ray;-;warframe is an exalent game, and is highly addictive
Cookie Bear;-;It honestly surprises me that this is free. This is just so amazingly done.
Mimus;-;Ultimate Space Ninja Grind Simulator 2014 Now with fluffy dogs included.
SuperDerp;-;"Fart" is censored in chat 12/10
Trader Joe;-;this game is the meaning of insanity keep doing the same missoins over and over again expecting to get better materials would play again 10/10 (   ) I have come back after 2 years or something and i now have like 6 meelees 2 secondarys 3 primarys and 3 warframes i freaking love farming i just love to harvest my potatoes or my other products speaking of potatoes im off to plant my new batch of blue and yellow potatoes!
[DL] Congudo;-;Friend comes to me and say "Hey, lets play Warframe, its coop dude, nice graphics, great gameplay, seriously dude!" I say okay, downloaded the game, started it, did the tutorial, joined my friend session and... OH MY GOD WHAT A GREAT GA... Host Migration... Hum.... Let us try again... Could not connect to host... Again?... Could not send invitation... Damn, again! ... Joined the game, killed 4 bad guys... Host migration... Until now we played like 15 times, 14 we couldn't even complete the second objective The game is great... But playing with friends seems hard...
43Dark_Nero;-;i want to play but my computer is
Castrol Actevo X-tra 4t motoroil;-;If you could change crosshair, the game would have its own Sports channel within the next 2 mins and would replace TLC and probbably all the other junk cable channels.
Lasagna;-;A great game, crafted with love and passion which makes It obvious from the large amount of content since It's release. Unfortunately It has a horrible economic system which behaves like capitalism in a nutshell, but It doesn't make it Impossible to achieve Items and Relics without spending a penny.
CrowdeR;-;First things first - This game does look attractive - If you ignore the fact that the character models look like they're concept art or something. Secondly - I did have trouble getting my head around the game. The in-game tutorial is lacking and often leaves you confused about what to do next. It took me quite a long time to figure out the nature of the "polarity" slots - by spending several hours and days on Warframe.wiki to try and make sense of everything - Which you will also be doing at some point. Thirdly - The quest system is completely backwards. Imagine, if you will, a quest line in any other game. One quest leads you to a new quest, etc etc. Well in Warframe the first quest is simple, but then you're given quests that are rediculously hard to achieve at first, because you need to grind for parts of a machine (that you haven't even built yet because that takes 72 hours?) and then build the thing. So in a sense you're on a quest to collect parts for a machine and when you get them you have to wait 72 hours to actually do the quest. It's pathetic. This waiting time is forced upon you by the developers to make money. So they deliberately make the game a waiting game. You can either sit around for 72 hours before progressing further - or you can pay. Fourthly - Repetitiveness. You'll soon come to terms with the fact that this game is a grind fest. If you like grinding - You'll love warframe. But even that does have a cracking point. All-in-all the game does have its flaws, but it is attractive and enjoyable to play. The abilities of certain classes are awesome to use, but you'll have to farm repetitively for parts of that class in order to be able to build that class (which has a waiting time remember) before you can play that class. Are you seeing where this is going? If you enjoy nonsensical violence and enjoy exercising your patience then this is for you.
Megaswap;-;This game is definitley worth going for if you love hack and slash with third person shootnig action. Immediately got hooked on the first level itself.
Bringer Of Men;-;Space Ninjas not more to say!
booce;-;I only played the game for 5 minutes. Every other minute was an update.
Snake Wildlife;-;You can earn EVERYTHING except character color-packs scarfs and pet/sentinal-attachments, by playing the game. It takes time but that's what this game is about, as you continue playing and you unlock more things to play with...and oh boy is there a lot of cool stuff to get, and more being added all the time. OR you can spend as much as you would, buying a regular game to just purchase what you want immidiately, its a very fair business model that doesnt beg or rob you. When it comes to the games content to play (theres quite a lot here), ALL of it is FREE. You can self-res 4 times before the game wants you to pay a bit of money, but do not worry, as after 24 hours, these self-resses Reset. (You can still play more missions without self-res tokens, its just if you die again, the mission is a failure, which is really no biggy if you have teammates, which normally always pick you back up like in Gears of War) Its very addicting to work towards your next weapon/warframe unlock. OVERALL: Sound: 5/10 - Going to be honest here, many stock freebie-sound effects here and theres barely any recogniseable sountrack throughout the game apart from the theme tune which kinda rips of Terminator 2. Im just being truthful, i still love Warframe but its sounds are copy>paste>edit jobs from other sources. Gameplay: 8/10 - Addicting, fun, but dont expect everything for free or to leech levels off of players, YOU need to PLAY the game to get what you want. I still feel more game-modes and more map-tiles are needed, you quickly run out of unique content and go into repeating content. You MUST join a clan to get the top tier Clan-Only weapons, dont forget to join one or youre missing out! Feels sooo much better when you play with friends, i highly advise this! Graphics: 7/10 - Not bad for the start of next-gen, but seen better. Turn off 'Color Correction' as this actually causes incorrections in color...green turns into yellow for example. The game is unbelievably super optimized! Running very cool on the graphics card and isnt one of those "lets burn your hardware" games.
Randinator;-;Its very fun, also good for waisting time. But after a while you start to wonder what kind of drug the team was abusing when they decided their prices for platinum.
pepe;-;Stolling with my friends on a Void mission when suddely... Corrupted Vor comes and s up your whole team in the  (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) 10/9.5 a split black man ends your whole team in void missions (   )
pepe;-;Stolling with my friends on a Void mission when suddely... Corrupted Vor comes and s up your whole team in the  (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) (   ) 10/9.5 a split black man ends your whole team in void missions (   )
Ser Burdy;-;its got ing motion blur 10/10
Crissy;-;Thanks for this Game
Matt;-;One of the best free to play games there is now, very unique and a lot better with friends
CarLNighT;-;Great, but it's one hell of a grind fest...
fueshoNation;-;It's okay, I play only it in my spare time ^_~.
Filluprobots;-;Solid for a FTP
HattSHIT;-;Fifteen apples in my baggage I am cabbage
Catbug;-;"Game about space ninjas" -Ghandi 2015
Max;-;Amazing game play mechanics which allow you to have a fun and exhilarating experience; You may customize almost every detail about your character and weapons of choice.
General Jehuty;-;Alien ninjas play free. Enjoy the meta challenge of being an alien robo ninja born out of a metallurgy factory running grind.exe and a faceless alien courtesan trains you to grind even harder.
Hoa;-;This game is addicting and made me grind for most of my stuff.
Duckie;-;Warframe is an interesting and innovative puzzle game. Rather than the player trying to figure out how to use the game mechanics in order to progress, the game plays itself in the player's mind. The goal is simple, you must escape the arsenal screen. Sounds easy, right? You'd be mistaken. The second you click "appearance", the game has you hooked. It will not let you go until you have the right colors. What are the right colors, exactly? You have to figure that out yourself. Buying new color pallettes will make the game either harder or easier, but the game does not tell you which ones do so. I have managed to beat this game once, playing as Valkyr. It took a few hours, but I knew I had won once I started playing a mini game (They're called "missions" in-game) and didn't compulsively feel the need to return to the "Appearance tab". At last, I had been freed. But I am still determined to beat the game with each Warframe I own. If you like games that challenge the player's mind, this is for you.
Beaner McFreely;-;Don't get me wrong, I love warframe, and I do recommend that you at least try the game, but through my experience with this game I have had nothing more than trouble. Game play is awesome, endless hours of farming and grinding, it is truely an MMO players dream, however the game has far too many bugs that the Support team refuse to do anything about, from constant log issues to frozen UI the support team always recommend you allow the game to run through firewall, no matter the issue. Personally I find no use in firewall, it does nothing but slow me down, and I keep my computer clean, physically and digitally, so for me, I have no use what so ever for firewall and it is always disabled. Still everytime I run into an issue while playing (which I must say, happens literally once or twice an hour) and report it to the support team, they always tell me the same thing, "Allow the system to run through firewall." but when I exclaim to them that this cannot be the problem I am met with an apology and instructions on how to allow a program through firewall. Its a great game with a terrible support team. My enjoyment in this game would usually tell me to rate it a 10 of 10, but the constant problems prevent me from giving it any higher than a 5 of 10.
Captain Whiskers;-;Pay to win, too much of a boring grind to unlock anything free. Lost my attention before I wanted to spend money on it. (I have spent money on F2P games before.)
Sion;-;Endless grinding to no real endgame  Bugs the devs refuse to fix and instead mask with more weapons and warframes  Pay-to-win mechanics that EA would condone  Horrible rank-up mechanic  AI is awful I would have rather paid $20 for a game just like this with devs that weren't Jews and gave a sht.
Divine Darkness {A};-;one of the best free to plays i think i have ever played including demos and mods. And to those who say its pay to win. dont listen to them they are just trolling the review its actually quite balanced. first 3 free classes are some of the most powerful ones. Now if you want to spend $10 usd than go ahead get a new class. But all you are buying is a completly diffrent skill set. All classes have their own uniqe play style so do you're homework and look them up on the warframe website.
MistakenData;-;This game is amazing. I think its the best Free To Play game there is.
();-;This game is awesome
InsaneNeenja;-;Progressive FPS, fun to play with friends.
E.P.I.C[LV];-;Realy cool game !!!
onion italiano;-;Warframe is a Free to Play construction simulation game here you and your team of "Tenno Home Improvement and Weapons" must complete a vast array of timed contracts for your many customers. The game features some unforgetful characters, such as Captain "Charles" Vor, a retired Navy captain from the Grineer Naval school, and Alad "Whats in the bag" V, a board member of the Corpus Lumber Yard. The game's name refers to the WarFrame, a special tool the Tenno use to beat their competition in contracts, it is a special tool belt and vest that surrounds it's user in high tech grade A tools from harbour and freight. 8/10 really fun game but lots of grinding, but fun enough that it doesn't matter. F2P and not P2W so that's good.
Van Baza;-;It's the kind of game which you either love or hate. Depends on how well you take grinding. Also big thumbs up for the community.
Ecalla;-;You can fight yourself in the dojo 10/10
Brushul Brushi Mark;-;SO GREAT for a free to play game
Dejobli;-;Warframe has got to be one of my most favorite games of all time, and it still- as the developers want to say -hasn't fully released, despite having enough content to make three games. Not only is Warframe free, but it's also updated often and has quite a lot of replayability. PROS 1. Warframes A warframe is an exosuit designed for your tenno which is basically the entire point of the game and is even its name. You start off the game by picking one of three frames- Excalibur, Loki and Volt -before proceeding through the tutorial mission and selecting your beginner weapons. As you go through the game, there will be a massive collection of Warframes to collect with their own unique powers and stats, some of which are passive like Mesa's health bonus if you don't take a melee weapon into battle or Zephyr's low-gravity. These frames can be bought with platinum from the game store or crafted with blueprints purchased from the game store with credits. Some frames, the only few so far being Mesa, Limbo and Mirage, must be crafted through quests which take you through bits of the game's story and missions to acquire pieces to the blueprints which you must craft similarly to the other warframes. There are a total of twenty-two unique warframes, not including their 'Prime' variations and all are a blast to acquire and use. 2. Weapons This game has a large variety of weapons and when I say large, I mean Borderlands 2-large. From pistols to snipers to a light machine gun, from daggers to hammers to glaives to a literal gunsword. There are at least one or two weapons released every few hotfixes and updates and if I bothered to count each individual weapon- whether they were from events, were primed versions or are from syndicates and tried to explain each one, we could easily be here all night just looking over it all. Melee wepoans come with their own special mods which allows for melee combos and increased capacity to its mod points and add immensely to the level of gameplay in Warframe- each melee weapon type has its own individual 'stance' mod. There are twenty categories of melee weapons available for you to choose from and still growing with each update. 3. Mods Mods in Warframe allow you to increase stats on a weapon, warframe, sentinel or kubrow. Mods can even be sold in the player market for the game's funbuck-currency, Platinum, or transmuted to create a new mod which a chance to get a rare mod. These mods can be upgraded singularly to provide better benefits like 100% more damage or 70% more crit rate and the effectiveness of these mods depends on the weapon's stats alone. One weapon may benefit from a crit-rate mod more than others, going from a 5% crit rate to 25% while another would only go from 2% to 5% due to it being meant for a different build. This allows you to really look and see what fits best for a weapon to make it as effective as possible, allowing you to do the math in your head to enter the battlefield with a literal monster in your hands. The amount of mods you can put on a weapon are determined by the polarity or polarities of a weapon or warframe, if the warframe/weapon has an Orokin Reactor/Catalyst installed and if the warframe has an Aura mod installed or the weapon (melee only) has a stance mod installed. Aura/Stance mods provide extra points depending on the level of the mod itself and the polarity of the stance or aura slot. Matching a mod polarity to a slot polarity will greatly increase the number of points it gives you for Aura/Stance mods, or decrease the amount of points it uses for basic mods. 4. Platinum Now for a touchy subject with every free-to-play game, the premium currency, Platinum. Warframe- in my personal opinion -gets this bit right in the best possible way. Platinum is very expensive and for all the right reasons- this is because they allow you to immediately purchase special resources, weapons, cosmetics or even entire warframes, the frames and weapons coming with their respective orokin catalysts or reactors, as well as an inventory slot. There are few things that can only be achieved through platinum, the most important being Warframe slots and Weapon slots which can be recieved by doing events which give free weapons, inviting enough friends into the game, purchasing Premium or Prime Access directly or trading some in-game goodies with other players for platinum. These goodies could be rare, max-ranked mods for weapons, or even prime parts earned from the void that you can get for simply playing the game long enough. There is no such thing as 'pay to win' in Warframe, especially considering it's marketed as a CO-OP GAME. If there is anything of the sorts like this, it's more-or-less 'pay to get quicker' and even then, you could only pay 40 platinum to speed a weapon's build time as opposed to buying the weapon for 250 platinum alone. 5. Grinding I'd like to make a note here that 'grinding' is absolutely no reason to dislike a game as EVERY game has grinding when you follow the definition we use in gaming. Grinding for EXP, grinding for money, grinding for weapons or armor or whatever, every game has potential for a grindfest and while Warframe is subject to this, a good majority of MMOs and RPGs are as well. CONS I can't think of any other than the OCCASIONAL bug that won't really be noticeable unless you look for it with the sole intention of pointing it out. The developers don't really try to milk money out of you as much as they try to keep you playing the game. But if I don't put something here, someone will cry. 1. RNGesus As you would expect with just about any game, the system at which items are rewarded- mostly pertaining to Prime parts -are at random. Since prime parts can only be obtained from Void missions or trading platinum for it, and since there is such a whopping large majority of Prime weapons and warframes, this means that you could spend a week of grinding through void missions for parts you want to build a prime weapon or prime warframe you want. Example Overall, I'd give this game a 9.5 out of 10 and I'd recommend it to anyone looking to get into a shooter.
Lackadaisical Gamer;-;Good game. Some interesting lore, good graphics, good gameplay and excellent, beautiful death to the grineer. Needs grenades. 10/10
Tarkexcited ();-;I can fap to this.
Superman;-;Do you enjoy fast paced shooters? Hectic clutch moments? And the feeling you get when you beat a difficult boss? This game has all of those and much more! Sure the limited color options for your Warframe are pretty sucky but the overall game itself is amazing.
_-Rillox-_;-;I love the graphics in this game for one, they put a lot of unneeded detail into this game, not quite as much detail for its generation as metroid 3, which still surpasses graphics in many games currently being created though it was for the wii. I also love the combat style, and really everything else. My only complaint is how annoying it is to unlock everything, however that annoyance makes this game fun.
DignifiedPeach;-;The Short Version: The Best 3rd Person Shooter Game I've Played. 9.5/10 With very minimal pay 2 win elements, this game is bred for success. With elements from Halo, Assassin's Creed, and Diablo, this game adds an exciting mixture of Space Combat, Parkour, and Looting. You buy blueprints to build various guns and items as your journey through procedurally generated levels where no playthrough is the same. Though you grind, with friends and effort, your grinding will be fruitful. After 11.2 hours of gameplay today, I experienced bugs only on one level, which I've played easily 30 different worlds, each taking a nice variety of successes and failures, triumphs and losses. Not only are there different levels, there's different game types. You can run into a place and your mission is to kill everyone, or to spy and gather intellegence, or assassinations where your try to take out a war master. More will be added in the future. Thanks for reading, I hope to see you in game!
FeedMeBacon;-;shooting weird aliens 10/10
SoulPsycho;-;This game is really engaging and offers endless hours of gameplay. What I really like about Warframe is that you can choose everything you want to do, there is no set questline or mission that you have to follow in order to progress. I mean, who doesn't like space ninjas with guns?
Burningwood;-;A true to Free to Play Game-- This is probably going to be "Destiny" for the Steam Box when it gets really going (LOL, they have spaceships for your solider and drop you into combat). Controller Support is there for in gameplay and works really well, but you need a mouse and keyboard for some of the menus out of game. Sigh, with just a couple of more tweaks "full controller" should work. Play through is like Boarderlands, a team goes against AI, grinds, etc. Weapons are up to you to craft through a meta collectable card trade system. People trade online stuff, but I have yet to trade myself. Community and finding matches is pretty awesome as of this review. Free to Play-- Yes, its a full functional free to play game with an incredible solar system to explore. The story can keep you engaged, and the grinding is pretty intense. Premium Content 29.99 (Steam) 49.99 (Their Site)-- I have no clue if it's worth it, and I don't know where this game will be heading as how it handles the community and it's content. Still fun to play so far for free.
butlerkun;-;Space ninjas! They're SPACE NINJAS! What other reason do you need?
JJDaMan!;-;Interesting game, I like the ninja aspect of how the game tries to show itself to players, and the graphics are really amazing!!
KnifeStrong;-;Have you ever played a Facebook game and thought, "Wow, this is really boring and makes me feel like a filthy casual"? Have you ever played an FPS with a protagonist rocking a crew-cut and QTEs and thought, "Man, this videogame about shooting dudes is great [note: no it's not], but I sure wish I could run like a sweet- ninja to the other wall"? Have you ever bought a videogame and thought, "Oh my god this cost way too much money for how much I get out of it"? TRY WARFRAME! IT'S FREE, YOU CHEAP, CHEAP PERSON YOU. You are a magic robot ghost thing (maybe) who just woke up from a really long nap, and the dudes who woke you up are trying to put holes in you. With their guns. Lucky for you, you woke up inside of a Warframe [note: this is what the game is named after], which is basically a robot ninja body which bleeds for some reason. Even more luckily for you, your hot psychic magic robot ghost mom (maybe) notices you're awake and tells you how to use your cyber-Naruto body. SPOILER ALERT: You escape. Then you proceed to do missions across the Solar System for dosh and swag, which you use to fashion glocks and katanas and more immediately useful swag. You can even make new mecha-magical Musashi bodies to walljump and phsysics-engine-abuse teleport-jump over dudes with. It's not pay2win, but it IS pay2winfaster. Making stuff takes time. Like "12 hours" time. Or longer, if you're making a new techno-Ryu Hayabusa to jump around in. Spending the IRL currency-based currency, of which you get a little bit for free, can make that go faster (don't use it for that). You can also outright buy sick new weapons or frames or resources (don't use it for that, unless you decide to get the Prime packs, Richie Rich). You can also buy more slots for the number of Warfames you're allowed, or number of weapons (SPEND IT ON THESE YOU WILL THANK ME LATER). Overall though, the game is fun if you run it with friends. But not Public Matchmaking. Those jerks will vanish a million miles ahead of you, kill everything, then call you fat while they wait for you to get to the mission exit. Use only if you want to roflstomp a mission or need endurance/distractions/ablative armor. 420/10 pretty dank would buy again
haygen;-;this game is rad as all hell so like, you're a Space Ninja and you run around shooting Bad Guys with Space Guns. right so already this is mega-badass, but here's the thing, you get space shurikens. thats right son. cyber ninja stars. so alright you're sold but you gotta be saying "this is too good to be true" NOPE. you also get a sweet  ninja jetpack that lets you fly around in space, as a ninja, and shoot Space Baddies with your sweet space laser. for real. and its free.
BromadTheNomad #DoTheThing;-;Ninjas in space, enough said
JedsDead;-;Now, you can be a space ninja from space... The Gist: Pros - Fun as hell. Easy as hell. Free as hell. In depth and intense as hell Cons - PvP is hell. Hell is not a theme of this game Definitely worth trying... Elaboration: First off, this game isn't as much "ninja sneaky sneaky, stabbby stabby, shuriken throwing smoke bombs" as much as it "Samurai slashy slashy, shooty shooty, plasma bomb throwing time stopping stomp"... It is an anime fighting game without the sharp hairdos and boobs bouncing all over the place. Which is a let down to some. But fear not. It is fun and intense. There is a lot to say about this game. Two of the major points are 1.) You don't have to pay a cent 2.) You are going to pay more than just a cent. The reason for this contradicting statement is this; The game allows you to work for any of the items or characters in the game, but overdriving items is impossible without some payment and you can't color customize your ninja robot suit without buying a color scheme first (btw if you do play it, just buy the 'classic saturated' color set, it's all you need). This game has; Crafting, Grinding, PvP, Mini quests, 2 companions (a robot thingy and a dog), Boss fights, both melee weapons and ranged weapons, free running ( kind of ), a party of 4 players, build your own Dojo, build you own defense system platform thing, so much blood, abilities and a ninja suit specific ultimate ability. Theres probably some stuff Im forgetting. This game is something different, and you should for sure download it and give it a try. I'm not disappointed at the $15 I spent on this game so far. It's fun and keeps me coming back and it's not because of the daily login rewards or new shiny content, but because there is a lot to do and level up and it doesn't get old. There are so many god damned weapons to try out and make and max out that it is impossible to put a playtime value to this game. If i had to it would be: Forever. The PvP at the moment is just . Its not balanced. Maxed out weapons one shot people. Some abilities are way too powerful and overpower the arena completely. And there will come a time when you are going to enter an instance and not see a single enemy, because the maxed out er flew ahead of you and blew up the map. blew. up. the. map... I've been that blow-the-map-up guy as well. .-. itsh pretty fun ... But you'll get over it, there is a solo matchmaking option and if you've got a friend or two you guys can just jam together. This game keeps growing, and I think it will continue to grow. A brilliant new twist on a FPS that brings in elements of a dungeon grinding game. Try it. I mean, it's free to play so why not? right?
BeastMaster Christ;-;It was an ordinary day in my life, a few months after my girlfriend left me, I came across Warframe. She smiled at me and asked "Do you wanna be a SpaceNinja? It is fun being a SpaceNinja.". Desperate to find a cure for my broken heart, I gave it a shot. Warframe was right, being a SpaceNinja is fun. Days, weeks, months passed, I no longer think of my of my ex-girlfriend. Everyday I look forward spending time with Warframe instead. She looks good, she is creative, she is action-packed, she's very adventurous. She made me feel needed by the universe. She made me feel strong. She made me feel special. She's not the typical girlfriend. She didn't demand much money so she can be a better girlfriend to me. All she wanted was my time. She asked for money only when I wanted a new Space Suit, and only when I needed a new shelf for my SpaceNinja toys. You can choose to spend on her, but trust me, it isn't necessary. You don't have to pay to win her love. Warframe is probably the perfect girl, whose only flaw is that she is overly-attached. She's all I wanted to be with, but it came to a point when she started asking so much of my time so that we can do the very same thing we were already doing for a year. She wanted me to get her this resource, then that resource, then another, so I can craft more SpaceNinja stuff, which eventually will be worth nothing but a SpaceNinja trophy in my shelf. I felt the pressure. I felt strangled. It was repetitive. It was tiring. Then is when I realized, I needed a break. We didn't see each other for a few weeks. It was strange because I loved her so much but I never felt the need to see her again. I miss her sometimes, yes. She said she misses me too. And so we decided to be just friends. Now we see each other every now and then, but no more commitments. I think it is better this way. Enjoying each other's company, without the pressure of doing so much for her. Warframe, indeed, is good for casual fun. But the moment you take it seriously and love it more than you should, then is when you'll realize that she demands so much more than you can give. Then is when you'll fall out of love right away and realize that all those work are for a relationship that you will be soon leaving. If you wanna make a serious long-term relationship with someone, go on, Warframe is the one to be with. But if you're the type who gets bored easily by doing the exact same thing for no real purpose, find someone else to love. I still recommend her though. Because she, at least, does her best to give you the fun you deserve.
Byakurani Agogo;-;Pretty decent so far. The balanced the paywall with grinding pretty well compared to other games.
crazy3125;-;Its a great and fun game I play it every day.
Derpy;-;Probably one of the hardest, yet funnest games i've ever played.
fuzzygundam;-;A wonderful time-sink, skillful parkour movement married with resource collection and equipment levelling, good for giving you things you'll want to grind for. I've put a lot of time into this thing and it rarely gets all that boring, since I can just crack out my high-level gear and go break faces.
Winter;-;If you haven't played Warframe yet, why haven't you played Warframe yet? You really need to play this game. It's in space.
Heisenberg;-;Ever evolving fun. Hands down the smoothest shooter controls I've ever played. I need to get back into it and try out the flying mode.
JAY9015;-;This is a great game, with great detail and the game play is fast and fun. I would defo recommend this game.
LONEWOLF archangel of death;-;ok take cods gameplay and halo aleins and technology  and make them have sex ya get this except THER NINJAS!
Jazu;-;Valkyr's butt kept me playing. 10/10 would rate again.
alienspacebats;-;It's difficult to properly review a game like this, as it's in a constant state of flux. I've been playing since June 2013, and have 1000+ hours logged, so it must have something going for it (either that, or I'm mentally ill/addicted). I'll probably keep playing for the forseeable future, however I have taken 'breaks', sometimes not playing for a month or more out of boredom or just getting fed up of the grind. I enjoy the general aesthetic, and the controls/visuals/gunplay are very good. I'm mixed about melee, the latter has been updated but still feels like I'm flailing idiotically in front of enemies. Warframe is a free-to-play game meaning the player has three options; 1. Grind and farm like a monkey. 2. Spend an unreasonable amount of money on in-game items. 3. Not give a sh*t about the former and just play the game anyway. The grind in the game is sadistically, insultingly steep. As with most MMOs you will be expected to do the same thing over and over just to obtain whatever item it is you're after. In the space of two years I have noticed a steady increase in the 'grindyness' of the game, and more and more of it is being regulated by the most weighted RNG I have ever seen. This may or may not be related to a Chinese chicken meat company owning a majority share of developer Digital Extremes, Perfect World is in there somewhere too. What do you think? The business model is fair enough, the in-game currency can be traded with other players for certain in-game items, so you needn't spend a penny. Pay to win is not really a thing here, as it's 99% co-op, but as mentioned, the player needs to put time in (re: farm, and farm hard). The player can craft items from blueprints found in missions, or bought from the market using the non-premium in-game currency. Crafting time for items varies, but is generally repulsive and initially offputting for many. Weapons can take up to 12 to 24 hours, whilst others require one or two other weapons to already be crafted as components of said weapon. Frames (new suits/characters) have to be acquired in four parts; blueprint, chassis, helmet and systems. These drop randomly from bosses. RNG is a god here, and the drop rates are, again, repulsive. 15 helmet parts in a row is a fact the player will have to face at some point. Each part takes 12 hours each to craft, and when they're all done, the suit proper can be crafted which takes 72 hours. You can 'rush' crafting using premium currency, or you can turn the game off for three days. This is to say nothing of the materials required to make each part. Again, found in missions, randomly, and dropped by specific enemies, or not, depending how lucky you are with the RNG. There is a special area called the Void that can only be accessed by using void keys. The mission types are exactly the same as the regular game, but the enemies are slightly tougher, and ascending in difficulty (Tower I being the easiest, and Tower IV being the most difficult). What makes visits to the void desirable is the chance to be awarded a 'Prime' weapon or Warframe part. Imagine having to farm for keys of a specific mission type that drop randomly, amassing a collection of which, completing twenty or so missions of the same type and finding - thanks to the diluted, ridiculous drop tables - only one out of four parts to construct the 'Prime' weapon/frame you had your heart set on. The cash shop is disgustingly expensive. You can buy a full game for the price of a gun here. Power creep is a thing and is very poorly managed. QA is very poor. In fact the PC players of the game probably are the QA team. There are weekend events occasionally, but these have been showing a steady decrease in quality and are becoming more and more buggy, repetitive, dull, badly designed and poorly explained. As a veteran player, I find myself ignoring them completely. They are wretched, frustrating and a waste of time. Developers promise to alleviate grind and improve quality of life for the player, then introduce double RNG sandwiches and call it an exciting new feature. Almost every new feature comes with more stuff to farm, but that's F2P I suppose. They've made a grind/farm game and are slowly removing the tools which make grinding and farming a little more bearable, in fact a number of recent nerfs/changes seem outright passive aggressive towards this community subset. Connection/online play is still problematic after two years. Warframe uses P2P, which often results in trainwrecks of lag-ridden, unplayable, bug-filled matches hosted by people playing the game on hardware unable to support the game properly, and seemingly connecting to the internet using a 56k modem. The game isn't optimized terribly well, and in my experience doesn't seem to like AMD hardware very much. It's updated regularly, though new iteration breaks something else. Hotfixes are released quickly, and their support team is - in my experience - excellent. In the end, the crux of the game revolves around destroying enemies, upgrading weapons, destroying enemies slightly easier with upgraded weapons, and doing it all over again when a new Warframe or weapon comes out. It's shallow, repetitive and getting worse so get in when you can. May as well give it a try, entry is free, though I still can't recommend it to others.
Porking   _;-;I used to be alright...
Woody from the Woody movie;-;Rest in peace DE, you are grabbing NEET cash in developer heaven now
VictorVonDoom;-;Warframe is a 1-to-4-player co-op, third-person action title that combines gunplay, melee combat, and freerunning environment traversal in equal measures, and does all three very well. The firearms are numerous, and widely varied, and they deliver satisfying feedback. The melee combat is visceral, brutal, and lightning fast. The freerunning (though it takes a bit to learn the ins and outs of the game's physics) is mostly smooth, and makes you feel like a badass space ninja. The Warframes (characters) each have unique--and highly gratifying--power sets, and therefore unique strengths and weaknesses. But the deep and complex modding system allows you to enhance weapons and Warframes to suit your favorite playstyle, or to exploit the specific weaknesses of the game's various enemies/factions. The developers are always on top of it, often delivering hotfixes within hours of a bug's discovery. Major updates come fairly often, further increasing the game's already expansive array of goodies. Major events/instances can yield exclusive equipment to participants. The game is free-to-play, but is very careful to avoid being construed as a "pay-to-win" title. Aside from purely cosmetic items/features, you can obtain everything through normal gameplay. Every character, gun, sword, sentinel, blueprint, component resource, and material can be acquired through completing events and missions, farming, or boss rushing. Using Platinum (the game's real-money currency) simply saves you time. The community is very friendly and cooperative, offering up information, tips, and aid to new players when requested. Becoming a member of a clan has tangible benefits, as there are certain perks, items, and weapons that can only be obtained through clan-initiated research. There are always clan Warlords looking for new recruits. If you're a fan of shooters, ninjas, co-op, or sci-fi, this game is definitely worth a look. It's free, so you've got nothing to lose. :)
Lutch;-;Played it. OK game. Destiny still way better, though.
King of Dank Mey Meys;-;Pirated Destiny on PC
Flare Arrow;-;Eh. It's decent.
Weasel;-;A fine co-op-stravaganza for those who like being space ninjas with guns.
FriedCracken;-;A very nice cooperative game and very nice graphics, a little bug and glitch, but it's kinda cool game 10/10
Zombie!?;-;Welcome Tenno. I wanted to write a review after I understand the game properly. It has got to be the most amazing game I have played for free. At first you would be like WTF where do i get the money from this is P2W ! But within 58 hours I have reached Ranked 3 Gold Initiate, Joined a Moon Clan. Built up Rhino Prime, Readying Boltor and fighting solo in T1 survival. This game is very very interesting and the best fun comes where you play on higher levels than you are supposed to :P Anyway the team mates are a MUST. you can pay for the Platinums which u only get from Trading otherwise.. You can get them when they are on sale 75% off. Daily rewards are really nice too. Overall you need to grind at start. be safe. After you reach level 3 Plus resources are REALLY easy to claim. The upgrades choices. fighting style. Everything has massive massive customization and I can't speak enough bout this game. It is simply beautiful :) Oh and the developers push in regular updates. And.. Did I mention we fly in space? YEAH SPACE NINJAS :D Goodluck Tenno. ADD me if you want me to help you with start up runs :D
Cinnamon;-;Best Graphics Ever For An Indie Game!! When I play free-to-play games on steam, I always think "Man, this will probaly have the WORST graphics and gameplay" But the seccond I played it, I was like "HOLY *BLEEP*" That was my thought when first entering the game. But later I was thinking BEST GAME EVER!
43Dark_Nero;-;i want to play but my computer is
vishuspuss;-;This game is a non-stop grind... Fun at first, but gets old quickly. You will do the same things over and over and over again and again. Oh look, there's an event... oh wait. It's just a repeat mission with one new mob to kill. Then you have to kill that one mob over and over again and again. Rinse, repeat, welcome to Grindframe
MrMastrMonstr @ Youtube;-;too much farming not enough ninja implications to hard to stealth run
Mr.Arber;-;The best PVE game out there
nepir;-;this game was a nice and game when it started (early close beta) and to this day it only got better more wapons more warframes some bugs are still there not to much of a problem and these bugs are there from close beta that is a point the can work on so if you are new neet some help ask me nepir that is 1 of the things i like you can help noobs get a nice start or even a warframe this game 9.5/10 fix the bugs and you got a 10
Lord Gartax;-;If I had more money this would be a good game.
booce;-;I only played the game for 5 minutes. Every other minute was an update.
Snake Wildlife;-;You can earn EVERYTHING except character color-packs scarfs and pet/sentinal-attachments, by playing the game. It takes time but that's what this game is about, as you continue playing and you unlock more things to play with...and oh boy is there a lot of cool stuff to get, and more being added all the time. OR you can spend as much as you would, buying a regular game to just purchase what you want immidiately, its a very fair business model that doesnt beg or rob you. When it comes to the games content to play (theres quite a lot here), ALL of it is FREE. You can self-res 4 times before the game wants you to pay a bit of money, but do not worry, as after 24 hours, these self-resses Reset. (You can still play more missions without self-res tokens, its just if you die again, the mission is a failure, which is really no biggy if you have teammates, which normally always pick you back up like in Gears of War) Its very addicting to work towards your next weapon/warframe unlock. OVERALL: Sound: 5/10 - Going to be honest here, many stock freebie-sound effects here and theres barely any recogniseable sountrack throughout the game apart from the theme tune which kinda rips of Terminator 2. Im just being truthful, i still love Warframe but its sounds are copy>paste>edit jobs from other sources. Gameplay: 8/10 - Addicting, fun, but dont expect everything for free or to leech levels off of players, YOU need to PLAY the game to get what you want. I still feel more game-modes and more map-tiles are needed, you quickly run out of unique content and go into repeating content. You MUST join a clan to get the top tier Clan-Only weapons, dont forget to join one or youre missing out! Feels sooo much better when you play with friends, i highly advise this! Graphics: 7/10 - Not bad for the start of next-gen, but seen better. Turn off 'Color Correction' as this actually causes incorrections in color...green turns into yellow for example. The game is unbelievably super optimized! Running very cool on the graphics card and isnt one of those "lets burn your hardware" games.
fall;-;Great game, friend no like, he say no play more game, I say why? game was fun, we laughed, we cried, we didnt win, but we played, friend said no. I said yes.
Crackleking;-;Warfram is a solid co op shooter. The shooting is fun but the it takes ages to unlock anything and the ai is . but with amazing combat and cool aesthetics i can over look some of these flaws 7.5/10
'Mork;-;When it comes to F2p (free to play) games people often tread carefuly as for the regular pitfalls (pay now and not get stuck in que and have a real game experience) Warframe however seams to be apart from most f2p games in this regard a fun "run and gun" game style that is easy to learn and takes some time to be good at . A great CooP game for some mates
Woody from the Woody movie;-;Rest in peace DE, you are grabbing NEET cash in developer heaven now
Hiroshima;-;recomend. it was the  when i got it, now i just have to pay for everything i want to unlock,
Serp;-;A game that gets fun once you put in the time sync. This game works around taking time to craft items and getting drops from enemies to craft those items. The game can start out slow for some but I enjoyed it the whole way and once you get to the lategame segments of you maxing out your weapons to the fullest and having your favorite warframe equipped is well worth the time sync and is worth money to put into if you like the game enough.
Denizazu;-;Constantly updated, gets better by the day.
XmontherX;-;the game is very god but its boring because all planets have the same missions
Sonic Son'edit;-;One of the two best indie games of 2013/2014. Strongly recommend.
Mike de Landegre;-;Great Game!
TMONKEYT;-;Love it!
glub Linux;-;Well apparently this game is good. Still needs some polish here and there but the design itself is worth the investment.
Derpy Puppeh;-;If you like level grinding and waiting ten years for things to be crafted, go ahead! If not then don't play this game, I have to hand it to them, they did good with the game, but holy hell the level grinding and crafting takes way too long! I understand the game is supposed to be difficult but seriously, holy hell. This game will suck all your time away. You can see by the time I played I gave the game a chance, but I gave up on it after awhile. The in-game currency costs WAY too much, and there are a thousand more things I have to complain about, but I wont waste your time, here is what I rate the game. -2/10
LoveAfear;-;Really good gamge funny with friend not need to pay any real money yo ucan farm everything
Coffeechipmunk;-;Warframe is like finding a new food you love. You eat it for 2 months straight, and then get bored of it, and never eat it again. This game is #5 on my top 5 played games, and is peaking just over 100 hours. That was pretty as much as I could get through without having to pay, as you only get a few suit slots, and a limited number of weapon slots. It's tons of fun while it lasts.
Pikapika14;-;It's like Skyrim with Space Ninjas without Skyrim. But seriously, not buying this game is a crime.
Chroma-Key Dreamcoat;-;Great game only con I have to say is the updates are getting more and more pointless.
Fast Eddie Mcklintock;-;Lots of detail and effort put into boring repetative gameplay. Bummer kinda. Not unplayable, many will probably find some reason to get hooked, but I couldnt.
Camping_Carlos;-;STUPID GEMINI NIKANA SHEATH YOU THINK YOUR GETTING A SWORD AND YOUR NOT MAKE ME WASTE ALL OF MY SPECIAL CREDITS NEVER MAKE THIS MISTAKE!!!
NitroNukeStrz;-;Warframe is a third person shooter game about being a awesome futuristic ninja (Much like Shinobi) and shooting guns faster then Sonic can say "BOOOOST". Within the game you are a troubled high school weeaboo, with no parents and no relatives. One day you fail your GCSE so badly that they have to lock you up in a time cage that erases your memorir's and renders you a copy of Shadow The Hedgehog. 300 years later a delivery ship lands on a planet that you were trapped in to drop off a shipment of twinkies, but the store owner who ordered these was drunk and challanged the delivery boy to a fight. The delivery boy however was massively ripped and had a 12 pack and knocked out the store owner with one slug in the face. The delivery boy now shooken up from the 2 second fight then declares that he was going to be giving out the twinkies to everyone in town for free. Everyone then started to move towards him to get a bite. But back to you (The main character), you smell the twinkies and you hear his words thanks to you super twinkie censor, and you break out of your imprisonment and then you attempt to go get some twinkies. But sadly by the time you step outside he has already left due to no longer having any twinkies. Angered by your lost chance to get some twinkies, you now storm the glaxay, crushing all the innocent workers, security guards, high school attendents and Part time workers to find the man who was giving out twinkies for free, and get your free twinkies. Although you are not alone on this epic quest, you can team up with a friend or a random player to help you (And them) on your epic venture to find free twinkies. Make no hesitation, those twinkies are yours, they have your name enscripted on it and you know it. Overall I give the game 9 Twinkies out of 10 Graphics: 10 The game looks very pretty and surrports HD screens despite being 30FPS at max Sounds: 10 There are no stock sounds and surrond sounding makes you feel like your there Controls: 7 The keyboard and mouse works but no controller surrport is there even though there can be Online: 9 It works like a charm but there can be disconnection errors depending with who you are playing with and how many flashy effects they have covering the earth. Multiplayer: 10 Co-op and optional team deathmatch and if you don't like working with people you can always play on your own while "I walk a lonely road" plays in the background. WOW *Hitmarker* factor: Such flash much effects nuff said.
Kodiak;-;Great game, lots of fun, especially with friends. Only downside is that it is difficult to obtain some things without premium coins. I would also like to see less inventory restrictions. Otherwise, a great game!
Keithy;-;A fun, but very repetitive, FTP game. However, if you don't like grinding to get what you want, then this is NOT the game for you. Many items in the game require grinding like a mother humper. Over time I've lost interest in this game fast, it's just the same thing over and over, it drives me a bit insane.
Pudding;-;This game ish really fun! Itsh format ish sorta like Vindictus or C9 in that all of the fighting takes plwace in instanced maps. And itsh co-op! The maps are kinda repetitive, but yew get to go pewpew, so itsh fun, rights? ^^;
Speedy;-;It's free, it's amazing and I have no idea why you're not playing it right now.
Krabzinger;-;Space Ninjas VS Inbred Russian Combine. Best game ever 15/10 Actually tahts not at all what the game ois about
Sprites;-;Great game where you can shoot stuff and get cool weapons especially after losing a Dota2 ranked mmr game.
Cory In the House;-;I dive kicked a box headed man then went to space to fly around on a Archsuit and blowed up loads of . Then went back to my ship to recollect on how badass I am and how incompetent the grineer are, and how they bad are bad at their jobs. And it was all controlled by me. Ordis is angry/10 (You have 30 seconds to tell me the last MMO you played that had an experince like this.)
luigilopes;-;Ridiculous i spent so much time to just be suspended for no resason till the 1st january 2035, i later made another account after i was harshly dismissed by there automatic response from the support team, i later made another account and couldnt even do any missions again as it said i had been suspended till 2035 again. After this i made another account and used a different ip as it seemed to be that my ip had been blocked by warframe and it worked till my ip reverted back to normal and suspended me again. also whilst on the new acccount i bought frost which was practically pointless as i was able to play with him for just two missions.
Bio Blaster;-;This is a realy great game for those who like free rom games.
Nemesis.;-;Do you want to know a joke I learned while playing Warframe?? Destiny
Renamon;-;Let us settle the most important questions first. I have been playing the game since the early closed beta, had seen the game change a lot over the course of that and the 11 updates. Now the important questions that always come up with Free to Play games. A. Is it Pay to Win: I would say no, some would assume right away that it is because you can use the real money currency (Platinum) to buy weapons and warframes. There are a few things that mitigates this: 1. Weapons/Warframes need to be leveled with experience. 2. Weapons/Warframes need mods (dropped by mobs) in order to become powerful. 3. Powerful weapons/warframes are gated with Mastery rank (sort of an account experience). Someone buying a warframe or weapon still needs to level it and get the mods for it to become powerful, which is a matter of available time. 90% of the weapons found in the store can be built with a blueprint and the available materials you collect trough the missions you do. There are powerful weapons in the game only available via random encounters, research or events. The only things that one could get from the shop: Catalyst and Reactor (used in weapons and warframes to double it's mod capacity) and Forma (this in a way helps on that too). These are only available via events and random events called Alerts (Forma however can be farmed). The only things you cannot get without platinum are: Cosmetics for pets, Weapon/Warframe/Sentinel slots, Capes, Clan badge, Warframe skins(different color patterns), colors and in game Account avatars, Affinity (exp) booster, Credit booster and Platinum to Credit exchange. B. Is it a grind: While it was in the closed beta this had gotten a lot better, drops have been increased and it is always a matter of know where to get the materials. Starting out this will be a bit rough, but after you get your second/third warframe it will not be much of a problem. So the main question is not exactly how much money you want to spend rather, do you have the time to invest in the game. If the answer is Yes, then read further, if the answer is no then you are still able to give it a try but you will get stuff at a slower pace. 1. What is Warframe? Warframe is a Co-op TPS (up to 4 people) with limited PvP (duels, 2v2 fights on selected maps), putting emphasis on fast action without having a cover system, a lot of people would say it is like Mass Effect 3 with a mission system. Especially now with the reworked damage system (with update 11). You play "Space Ninjas" and have to complete missions in a varied enviroment, you start off with one warframe of your choice from the three starter ones: Excalibur (balanced), Mag (more of a caster type) or Loki (mobility/utility frame, has no direct damaging ability). All Warframes come with 4 abilities. You fight against three factions over the course of the game, each having their own arsenal. Grineer: They are human/Cyborg people, clones who's genes are degrading with each cloning, making up for their degradation with cybernetics. They are mostly Heavily armored, with quite a few crowd control units. Possibly the most varied faction in the game. Corpus: High tech space "Merchant Guild", they operate mostly with shields and employ robotics also known as MOAs, they are fairly weak compared to the grineer but they do more damage. Infested: Space zombies and the likes, they have variations all around, have no shields at all, some have some form of armor, they compensate with health and numbers. Orokin: you will only encounter these later in the game, they consists of controlled Grineer, Corpus and Infested units. Only found in the Void missions. 2. Gameplay Warframe operates on a Solar map system, with a variety of missions available at each planet. These missions are locked in a chain and needs to be opened by playing the previous mission in the chain. When you select a mission, depending on the area it is in will Generate a map, these maps are put together from tiles, so you will notice that some rooms look the same, sometimes you can get big maps sometimes you get medium to small maps. Your objectives depend on the type of mission the map is and a few factors, sometimes there are random happenings on the mission: Change of objectives, this can happen on the fly. Faction change, you will notice this from Lotus mentioning it, this will change the enemies spawning, the original faction not only fighting you but the newly arrived faction as well, no original faction enemies spawn anymore, just the newly arrived one's. Another one of these random events is the arrival of the stalker, a powerful enemy warframe, this usually happens after boss kills and a certain factor working in the background. Mostly he arrives when you are not at full potential (like leveling a low level warframe/weapon). If you are alone he will be a tough fight, if you are with a group all you have to do is survive long enough for others to burn him down, if you triumph he will drop rewards (which can be blueprints for his weapons or mods). 3. Features Crafting, this is the thing that will take away. Get the blueprint for weapon/warframe, farm the required components and then start the craft, the time required is roughly like this: 12 hours for most weapons and weapon/warframe components (researched weapons mostly), 24 hours for Pets, Reactor/catalyst/forma and 72 hours to complete a warframe. You can rush these by using up platinum. Clans can create a sort of Clan hall, called Dojo. They can do the layout themselves and decorate it as they see fit (granted this requires materials), do weapon research, trade, duel in specific duel rooms. With update 11 people are able to trade Mods, Void Keys and Platinum, so if you have the time and there is a need for it you can trade away rare mods (upgraded mostly) for platinum from other players. Events: These happen quite frequently, sometimes this changes up the map, like a faction taking over a planet from the other. Alerts: These are generated missions appearing randomly on the map, it mentions the reward, type of the mission. Some things can only come from these alerts (Aura mods, Catalyst/Reactor, One warframe blueprint pieces, some weapons). They come up quite frequently and after every Warframe livestream. Scanning: New feature, you need to buy scanners and scan the enemies for info, including some drop table and stat information. The developers are always changing the game, tweaking here and there. This game had changed quite a lot from the start (mod system, now the damage system is overhauled). They are also working constantly on updates. Nightmare mode: Some missions will become nightmare missions, mobs are higher level and there are special modifiers for the mission (like no minimap, no shields, no energy, losing HP, etc) but if you complete it then your reward is a dual stat mod. 4. Is it worth it? I don't play too much but I like the game, if you have the time to kill and want to try a good free to play game then give it a try, you might get positively surprised.
Ecnebil;-;I'm not playing as much as I played in beta but it is a very very nice game in terms of PvE. Of course there is little bit PvP in it but this doesn't change the fact that this game rocks.
erry;-;Really fun. If you enjoyed Deadspace or Mass Effect, this is the game for you.
conrad`;-;A very wow cool game
.Hiikun.;-;Grind-a-Lot, but fun
Dicktator;-;I can't say anything now, this game is just too good to be a Free to Play one.
NegativeZephyr;-;Amazing Game better than any other free game
[SA] Ergo;-;Pretty good until you realize they break the engine a little more with every update and the game consists of eternal farming with no sense of reward , progression or development. It's just grinding for the grind
[CGC] Vivian James;-;I just don't get this game. The progression is painfully slow, the weapons don't feel powerful, it's easy to get lost in some levels... And the community? The community is the worst. I kept being told that I should let other players carry me, but how am I supposed to level up if I fall in seconds and people leave me to die? Nobody in this game ever gave me a hand when I needed it. Do yourself a favor and stay away from this game. It's free to play, but there is no such thing as refunds for wasted time.
LEvi;-;It's a free to play game that is not pay to win :)
King Iridium;-;Greatest 3rd person shooter ever, it is just an all around good game.
^1ETI|^9CrackerNugget;-;If I had to sum-up Warframe in one word: Tech-ninja. It does not get better than that. Guns, swords, and endless carnage. A few glitches here and there, but the gameplay is nonetheless fantastic. Third-person, over-the-shoulder shooter where you take control of a suit capable of providing endless entertainment filled with bullets, gore, and flying limbs. And on top of all that, wall-running, wall-climbing, wall-jumping. And what makes this game even more fantastic is that no matter what playstyle you prefer, be it stealth, tanking, or getting in their faces guns and swords flashing, there is a warframe with your name on it. There are also weapons that complement any playstyle. All-in-all, great game with lots of potential.
liquidbacon;-;It's like awesome and epic met at a bar one night, went to awesome's apartment, and this was the result.
InSane Twins [O] [X];-;Ninjas grind free. Ninjas replay the same stages over and over again free. Ninjas encounter the same enemies over and over again free. Ninjas hack or steal stuff, in the same enviroments over and over again free. (By the way, did we ever tell you, the definition of insanity?) Ninjas play more to get different equipment, that is not that different from the previous one free. And many more... (We dont want this review to be long...) We guess real ninjas pay to grind a lot less and then after the boost expire they start grinding again FREE! It is free 10/1 000 000 IGN Should mention some pros too: Optimization is outstanding! Never seen a game with an optimization like this, it looks awesome even on High-Medium settings. Slicing enemies with swords is well made too. Voice acting, pets, weapons design+variety. All good. This game is for people with a lot of patience and time and we mean A LOT. We are very patient, but we think that the time could be spent better by playing better games and more games, not just waste so much time on ONE game no?
Doktor;-;Grind Simulator 2015. Incredibly fun with completely overpowered weapons that make no sense. Gamebreaking updates that make the game more infurating (enemies that can shield multiple enemies while those multiple enemies grab you and pull you into their buttrape harem). As of writing this, update 17 is coming soon. If you like PAYDAY 2's style of missions, I bet you'll like the new starchart. Except I don't.
cote257;-;its a great game always something to do and before you know it its one of your favorite games
Apex Cruz;-;It is really fun and i will play it on PS4
Eren Jaeger;-;This game is so awesome like farming for new warframes and weapons going though new plants and playing the warframes (ninjas) and having fun playing with others and getting your companion!
Frosch;-;great game even after u think u done it all that the game has to offer, there r events that they come out wit that will challenge u on what u know about the game and many different kinds of weapons with different unique mechanics.
Gintoki;-;I started playing and found out everything is free. This is really Free To Play. I think my playtime speaks volumes. I started playing this again because my friends wanted to over the entire week. This is 1 week of playtime.......My only problem with this game is the crashing. My game crashed so much.......I need a new CPU.
Ecumene;-;I never wrote a review for this game? Wow. Anyway, yes; Warframe. I've played this game for over a year at the time of writing this. I've got 160+ weapons and every warframe to date. I'm a Grandmaster founder of the game ($250 founder's pack). Have spent hundreds of hours before switching over to Steam and also did the original Optional Reset when it was introduced. But let's cut to the chase; I definitely recommend this game. It's the most well-done F2P game out there. Yes yes, ironic to hear it from someone who has poured so much money into the game, but I truly mean it. Want to collect everything (excluding Founders*) in the game? Sure, you can. Without paying ANYTHING. Yep. You can grind it all out through collecting resources, playing events, contributing to the dojo research labs, etc. Nothing is stopping you. The gameplay is also fun; one match you could be using an assault rifle with a jet-powered hammer and the next you could be using a rocket launcher with a pocket rocket launcher and a pair of daggers. You choose. So much variety in terms of warframes and weapons! * Founder's gear is exclusive and is unobtainable.
Bulkules;-;I've been playing this game for a day and I can already tell it's gonna ruin my life 10/10
Tyangsa;-;Great Games, When First Time Play This Games I Feel Like Playing Ninja Alien, I Guess...
hdygad the sunbro;-;this game is ing badass i mean a space ninja with a ing full-auto shotgun sniper pistol and a giant ing axe what more could you want? 10/10
Newbs;-;Awesome space ninja hack and slash game. topped off by the fact that it has an awesome F2P model
Kanzu;-;This game, is perfect. You use space ninjas and so questionable space ninjas ("cough" rhino, valkyr, ember, frost, hydroid"cough"). This 3rd person shooter is epic, Digital Extremes actually listens to players. This game, is the perfection of 3rd person shooters. Only thing its missing is a cover system, but god damn it does not need one
DJ Doge;-;I have have been playing this for more than a year. The developers have improved this game massively. This game has great potential and the upcoming update 15 will make it way better. Go warframe!
vsilver;-;This is one of the best game's i have ever played,and i reccomend it to everyone.Just try it and ye might love it.
Razor(-_+;;-;This game is just... AWESOME!!
Niggafish1248;-;Not only that the graphics are amazing, and gameplay its awesome and epic. I love this game so much. I have played this game before having steam, before the game even came out in steam, and I played it when it first came out, I used to get bored playing this game until the game improved and made lots of cool changes. It is really awesome. Set in the far reaches of outer space during a new Dark Age, WARFRAME introduces the Tenno, a race on the brink of extinction after being enslaved by the Grineer for centuries. Players enter WARFRAME on the cusp of the Grineer's victory over the Tenno until they begin to arm themselves with WARFRAMES - an ancient exo-skeletal technology only they can operate. Hidden within the Orokin Derelicts of a lost civilization, new WARFRAMES lie dormant and undiscovered. These artifacts are the Tenno's only hope for survival.
Taco land;-;The perfect Free-to-play RPG. Other than the fact that it only downloads one MB per second. In a 700 - 800 mb update!
Taco land;-;The perfect Free-to-play RPG. Other than the fact that it only downloads one MB per second. In a 700 - 800 mb update!
Lai;-;grindy, pay2notgrind, piece of  that i can't stop playing
Renebored is hitting on russians;-;*farm for x amount of time to get warframe blueprints you want* F*CKING FINAL-you're out of a certain resource *farm x amount of time to get required resources* F*CKING FINAL-you need to craft the parts *12 hours later* F*CKING FINAL-you need to wait 3 days for the Warframe to be built *3 days later* F*CKING FINALLY I CAN PLAY WITH THIS DAMN WARFRAME In the end you don't even like that particular warframe's playstyle Rinse and repeat
The Great Spray And Pray;-;Worth your time. Only problem is the game is hard to play unless you put some money into it.
LSoD MrDiamonds;-;CUZ
El Polo's Diablo;-;I haven't played it yet. Looks fun though :P
Roman;-;fake and gay <3
Samkiud;-;In Grindframe, you either: pay to play smoothly or grind to boredom. It is fun enough while it last though, but the fun does not last enough to keep you hooked behind the pay-wall.
demontrace;-;One word review: Disappointing More details: This is a game that starts off really promising. Interesting controls, large variety of weapons, numerous ways to level up and progress, seems like it has it all. Unfortunately it crumbles under it's own weight. Numerous ways to level up turn into an extended grind game that is overwhelming. The large variety of weapons turns into a double edged sword, which requires an explanation of the mastery system. Each weapon, warframe, and anything else you can take with you to level up has a cap of level 30. The levels that you acquire during gameplay all contribute points towards a mastery system. The mastery system caps how much progress you can make in a given day towards other aspects of the game. There is a faction type system in a game called syndicates. The items offered by these syndicates are generally considered extremely good, and cannot be acquired any other way. The problem with this syndicate system, is that the points you can acquire each day is capped at a rather low number. Add to this problem with points that are capped universally. You may have 10000 faction points you can make in that day, but that's across ALL factions. In certain syndicate themed missions, you can search for insignias, that you can turn in to a vendor for additional syndicate points, sometimes worth more points than the mission themselves, but there are at max 8 of these in a given mission, and it is an exhaustive search through very large missions that can sometimes border on futility. The worst part is if you decide to do these missions with other people, but they decide they don't feel like searching for all of them, and rush to the mission end point, you will be forced to end the mission after a 1 minute timer. You CANNOT replay these missions, and if it ends early, you could be out of potentially thousands of points. Naturally I did most of these missions solo, even though the rest of the game recommends, and is designed for group play. I will add I also did Spy missions solo, as even 1 person in your group triggering an alarm, can lead to the entire group failing the mission. The biggest problem with the mastery system, and where the game really collapses under is own weight is leveling the weapons. There are so many filler weapons in this game, that are commonly called "mastery fodder", that acquiring these mastery points becomes a chore. It takes time to level weapons, made all the worse by leveling weapons that are weak, and not fun to use. You can tell very quickly when a weapon you are using is terrible. This is aggravated by the fact that you are limited to how many weapons, warframes, etc, that you can have in your inventory. Unless you are willing to buy premium currency, which of course costs real money, you cannot increase your inventory size. That has been an issue since the game came out years ago, along with many other issue which I will go into later. Numerous weapons and warframes, that you might have actually liked, will be sold and discarded, all because you don't have space for them, unless you're willing to fork over a lot of money. The game gets to the point where you might be looking at hundreds of dollars of investments, if you're willing to make significant progress in this game. The day and age that we live in with steam sales, bundle packs, and numerous other sources of price discounts for quality games, makes the $50-$60 retail game almost a thing of the past. This game will be looking for much more money out of your pocket. In addition to leveling up the weapons for mastery points, you also level these weapons for mod slot points. At level 30 you have 30 mod points to empower your weapon. The mods ALSO require leveling up, however they don't level up from use, but rather by sacrificing other mods to level them up. In addition to sacrificing mods in this process, you ALSO use up credits, which is the games fictional currency. This can be one of the most expensive parts of the game is terms of credit use. Unfortunately, the developers of the game seem to be aggressively cracking down on ways to farm credits, which in and of themselves are still excessive time sinks. Leveling mods and farming credits are one of the longest processes in the game, however Digital Extremes is all too happy to offer ways to boost your credit income, or level up mods, for your platinum in their premium stores. I think it says enough that one of the most popular store purchases are fusion cores, which help level up your mods, at an extremely overpriced platinum amount. I want to say it was the equivalent of $5, but i could be wrong. Either way, it was still overpriced given the amount of other things Digital Extremes wants you to buy. To further exacerbate this issue with leveling up guns, mods, and currency comes the addition of Orokin Catalysts, and Reactors. These are EXTREMELY rare items in terms of acquiring them from the game itself. Once every 2 weeks, DE(Digital Extremes) will offer a mission to acquire one of these items, not one of each, but just one of them, and occasionally they will have some odd mission pop up that offers one, but at most you are looking at a handful in a given month. A reactor is needed for warframes, and sentinels(a pet) to double their mod point capacity, and the catalysts are for weapons. At max level this takes the mod points from 30, to 60. As you can imagine these are extremely important to get the most use out of a given weapon, or warframe. As these are extremely rare, you will have your best luck acquiring them by paying platinum in the premium shop, as it can be an agonizingly long time in reality to acquire one. In addition, once these are attached to a weapon, or warframe, it CANNOT be removed. You cannot pay any type of currency to do this. Once attached, it is gone forever. You can try to contact customer service, but not only are you going to be waiting multiple days, there is no guarantee they will help you out. The mod leveling, mastery point leveling, NEED to acquire Orokin parts, credit farming, weapon leveling, and rare resource acquisition, are an extremely frustrating part of this game, due to needing to dedicate significant portions of your life to farming these, or pay real money. I will touch on resources, as these are also a significant time sink. With every weapon, warframe, and whatever else you need, you must craft it first. You have a personal ship that you use to enter each mission, and inside this ship are stations you can use to level up your mods, buy things from the store, or craft your equipment. To craft anything you need credits, and resources. Resources are acquired from killing enemies, breaking open crates and chests, or killing bosses. The rarest resources are most easily acquired by killing bosses. A rare resource is not guaranteed, but it is still your best way of acquiring them(or the premium shop). Some of the best equipment can require 10 of these rare resources, or more. This is in addition to waiting long periods of time for the crafting process. Warframes take 3 days to build, not to mention the 12 hours for each component to build, before you can use them in the warframe building process. Weapons take from 12 to 24 hours. You might be excited to acquire this new piece of hardware, but you'll be waiting multiple days more than likely(UNLESS YOU PAY PLATINUM. This is a recurring trend in this game). In addition to the resources requirement, and credits, some of the very best weapons require farming high level void missions for blueprints/parts. Multiple different blueprints/parts are required for a given weapon, or warframe. Part of the problem with farming these missions is that they require keys to enter. You acquire these keys by farming OTHER missions, or by purchasing them using the limited syndicate points, or premium currency. Unfortunately I am out of room here, but all I can say is STAY AWAY.
Havel The Rock;-;Best farming simulator ever 10/10 would farm again
Prop42;-;If you ever thought to yourself "You know, I wish Mass Effect had more space ninjas fighting augmented space people, clones of Isaac Clarke that sound like splicers from bioshock, and zombies", then this game is for you. In all seriousness, its a very fun game, but it gets fairly repetitive quickly.
osd_dragon;-;Don't download this, the playing is nice but i have been banned for "user agreement violation", when i asked what did they mean, they didn't say what i did just that i violated the agreement, I am very disappointed in the way this game is ran, I don't what I did to warrant this, do not play this game.
mid or techies , maybe couriers;-;p2w games r best
soo;-;this game has a horrible economy model that will, sooner or later, force you to either stop playing or pay real money for in-game goods. the core gameplay is pretty fun and the graphics and aesthetics are close to perfect - original enemy designs, excellent effects, stunning tilesets, wonderful ship designs - you name it. the customisation is fantastic but it comes at a cost: the only colours you have to paint your warframe and weapons with are dulled-down, muddy colours, with multiple shades of the same colour and not much inbetween. you have to PAY MONEY to BUY COLOURS. you get only 2 warframe slots and not nearly enough weapon slots for a varied loadout. this forces you to constantly either sell 'old' weapons [i.e. one of the 3 rifles/secondaries/melees] to make room for a new one, or go the 'sensible' route and trade items for platinum in the universal chat. what this involves is organising to meet up in either your dojo or the buyers' dojo, which must have a trading hub. this isn't actually that bad until you consider the alternative to buying items with platinum, and that is GRINDING. crafting one warframe, for example, requires you first to get the blueprints for each of their parts: the warframe's SYSTEM blueprints, their CHASSIS blueprints, their HELMET blueprints, and their body. you can often only get these blueprints from certain boss missions - but there's no guarantee you won't get a blueprint you won't already have. then, once you have all the blueprints, you need a 'general' WARFRAME blueprint, despite having a blueprint for each of the warframe's parts, you need to buy or find another one - and then it comes down to the actual crafting. what this involves is roughly a 25,000 credit cost to build each part - and then hundreds of each specified material, at least one of which will be either an extremely rare drop [again, from a boss] or something that can only be bought for platinum [read: real money]. not only is this expensive, it is also time-consuming - or rather, it takes a given amount of realtime for each item to be crafted. you're looking at 24 hours for a weapon or body part, you're looking at about 3 to 5 days for a whole warframe. of course, the ONLY reason this time barrier exists is so that they can shoehorn in another way for you to hand over real money - speeding the crafting process up costs yet more platinum. this, overall, is a great game with excellent potential, ruined by greedy developers. i've seen too many people defending the game citing the fact that 'the devs have to eat too' - it should NOT be at this cost. SO many other games have working economies whereby you can buy ingame items using real money but without having to - in other games, it is a choice rather than a necessity.
exjason;-;So, to start off my review of this game, Beforehand, A long time ago, This game used to be one of my favorites, But now with the constant hotfix/update failing due to "internet connection reset" Or it simply not ever downloading the update/hotfix, I have grown sick of the fact that I cannot play this game during the weekdays, Due to the fact I actually need my sleep. The update servers must be connected in some form or manner to the log in and maybe even game servers, As during normal mass play times, The updater simply Just doesn't update the game, Many threads have been made and none answered by developers, Which pains me to say I would love for the updater to actually Use my download speed over Just not download at all or at painfully slow speeds, Until this painfully slow or nonexistent speed is fixed up, It is really hard for me to want to recommend this game to any of my friends.
DarkEternal;-;If you want a game that you can have fun with until they apply a "Hotfix" which breaks the game so you can't log in, then this is the game for you! And then when the server decides to let you in, you can't chat, can barely start a session and can't see any other players that you may join or join you. Great potential but it falls flat due to poor patches and fixes.
Uncle Stoopnixie;-;I just wanted to check out the ps4 version of this game and it somehow overwrited my PC progression. I spent about 80$ and 60 hours on this game and now its all lost. The devs are just a bunch of thieves, do NOT spend money on this game.
McFrosty;-;Haven't played in a while but, I can say this much; even before all the newer updates it was a wonderfully fast paced action game in which the missions were sensibly logical and well thought out in design, now even though I haven't played in so long I would still most definitely recommend this game. There is a character for everyone, even though it's a little grindy to get it, once you do you will be happy with it.
TornadoTigerZzz;-;LOVE THIS GAME. SO FUTURISTIC
Gingka;-;it's ok
Vae Victis;-;Don't play Waframe, for a lot of different reasons. The most obvious being the fact that EVERYTHING is behind a paywall. You can't advance at any pace without dropping money. You can buy blueprints for warframes and weapons through the market with In game earned currency. But unfortunetly you will never be able to unlock them because the materials needed to make said item require a key to be bought with platinum (The purchasable currency) to even UNLOCK the (levels? Stages?, Tiers?) needed to farm the item you need. Players with bought weapons will be stronger than you, pvp is a mess. It's even hard to progress through the story alone because you have a limited number of everything. A F2P should ALWAYS Follow Riot Game's Pay model. Pay to look cool, not to have an advantage over anyone else willing to drop a little cash, to be better than you. Period.
[Travelling - eta 2w];-;Do you like ninjas? Play this game. Do you like varying weapons? Play this game. Do you like intense faction-based assaults? Do you like dealing out damage inside of an agile "robotic" suit? Do you like having friends watching your back? No? Then you're gay. Get this game scrubs. EDIT; 2/16/15 Do you like tact bosses? Do you like several suits, several abilities, several ways to play? Do you like zapping a trooper and having your friend lift him into the air, slam him into the ground, and wreck him? Do you like color customization? Do you like lasers? Do you like a decent damage strength-weakness system? Do you like community events? If you don't, delete system 32. If you do, get this game.
RT;-;Very good much yes, Me like game understanding it is acceptable
Salad;-;I played this game a couple of days it was released for F2P, even before it was on steam. I hated it. It was so damn repetitive. Sure the first 10 hours of gameplay were fresh and awesome, but after noticing that i had to grind to get all the moderate items in the game, I gave up. (of course i tried to) I uninstalled it and said goodbye and farewell. Recently, I saw this game thrive on steam and I barely payed attention to it. Last week, I saw it just staring at me, and I told a couple of friends, "Hey, why not give it another go?" And just like that we gave it another try. I was amazed on how much has changed about this game. I found the singleplayer story stuff kind of pointless and sometimes a nuisance, I enjoyed playing and toying around in your own personal ship, and definitely enjoyed how I many warframes were added. There are still some flaws like grinding, confusing  menu (menu back then was so much more simpler), and the singleplayer stuff. I do recommend this game and I see bright future updates. 8.5/10 I am satisfied. Good Job Digital Extremes.
The Wolf;-;Open game up, try to login in. "account suspended until 2035" Guess I'm going to have to wait this game out then.
misterfister.t9;-;This game is extremely tedious and grind-y. Definitely not worth the huge time-sink. The player interaction and shallow "team dynamic" is so -poor it doesn't even come close to making up for the lack-luster gameplay.
Bonder (ImaJerk);-;This game holds your hand every step of the way, regularly reminding you of what you need to do next. Is very much so a free-to-play game, regularly reminding you that you can buy things. The guns are ridiculously accurate at any range. One of the enemies runs at you from very far away with a big knife. If you want content that you get nickled and dimed for and have someone constantly tell you what to do next then by all means play this game. otherwise its just an above average free to play game.
Arcade;-;One of the best free games ever
Shikamaru-Lazy-^^;-;New melee system is so bad ... when this game came out it was really good imo , you can actually play with the sword and feel like you actually slash the enemy in 2. Melee 2.0 (Current system) is so bad .. i spoke with people that still play melee and they said they have to stack all kind of effects ex:(corrosive,fire,frost,electricty,etc) the more the better so that your enemy will die from Damage over time , as you guys can see in the first trailer you take like 5-8 attacks to kill(no t to mention he has some quick op blades) your average minion with this new 2.0 melee system . boring as  , you spam E like a manianc 5-8 per Minion? srsly? now check the second Trailer Minute 1:00 - thats the old 1.0 melee system = Strong mod on the sword -> cut them down like a sword . I played this game as soon as it came out in 2013. it was really good . we had a blast , now it feels like a crap . RIP WARFRAME 2013-200whatever. Bring 1.0 melee system ( Charge attacks Back ) then we can talk about this game again.
lukesauce;-;Its a really good game but it feels more like a shoot em up than a ninja game. I chose the steath character and never used my sword because i was to busy shooting. If you want a ninja game I dont reccomend this.
Today's Special Offer;-;Good game, but horrible business decisions and buggiest game I've ever played. Incredibly grindy and p2w. Giant maps with sprinting being useless, countless griefing possitibilities in a co-op game, and the map being so buggy it may as well not be there are some of the many flaws with this game.
sketch v_e 0;-;2 much repetitive 4 this sexy body.
Nikita g2a.com;-;Fun, only for a short while tho - everything's really pricey, but it's not a NEED to pay to win kinda game - paying does help
w1375deck;-;Fun game for a little, but the weird, unclear story just makes you stop and say "ok, next game"
Devin;-;Couldn't get it to work. Don't think I installed it.
iFin;-;I can't in good conscience reccomend this one. I had fun, don't get me wrong. It's a game with great potential, a great aesthetic, and overall has a lot of content for your buck, even if most of that content is more or less the same. They even add a large amount of content on a regular basis, and to be honest that's part of the problem. The developers seem more concerned about adding new and shiny things than fixing the old and shiny things that don't work properly, and from a business standpoint that makes sense. It's like they think a good idea is enough and doesn't need to be refined and polished. Here's an example: to get 'Chroma,' a cool looking dragon frame, you need a part for 'Frost,' an ice frame which drops from a certain boss. That boss was bugged out and got stuck in an invincibility state and never became vulnerable. Patch comes around, boss possible to be killed again. In my haste I fall off a ledge and die (which you don't do normally from falling) and my screen blacks out. I can still move and shoot, I just can't see anything. Here's what the patch notes said : 'Fixed Lieutenant Lech Kril being unkillable due to players not being able to properly hit him with ranged weapons.' 0 responsibility taken. That's what really gets me. And it's not even an isolated incident. Not even close. I've been around for like a month playing this game to death and there are forum posts from 2013 talking about the same issues. In my month of casual play I could literally write a huge essay on this games problems and possible solutions, but no one would pay any attention. Because warframe doesn't want hobbyists, it wants addicts.
Baritone Saxophone;-;Too grindy imo. Mechanics are great, but it feels like to do anything or to get any gun I just have to do constant grinding for materials. More of a farming simulator than a fun FTP sci-fi game.
Captain-Snow;-;Oh boy what to say..........I try to join my friends but it freezes for 30 seconds whilst on the loading screen (when i see ship) and after the 30 seconds it starts loading 'YAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAY' (sarcasm) after loading 75% of the way, it.........MOTHER ING DC'S ME EVEN THOUGH MOST OF THE TIME I AM THE HOST, AND I DC FROM MY SELF......MIND- OF THE CENTURY, what kind of dumbasses does it take for a game to make someone DC from themselves.....like WTF, fix this and the review will be alot better than this one. -insert rage here- eeeengfhvgf9urewhgwprengoifdnhvcqhg9whucwapggo8ttnuv\spifdt742yr3u21r408teQBFYO8QHJC9FRHC0YRqm7fd980h42jerfewaf08dsait4-9207501984ujr;le'ojfapd[]aKQ0WTKG[ARW,KG[WA-
Malac;-;If running around and skipping enemies just to get to the objective and ignoring everything on your way, including team mates tha that need help is your idea of fun, knock yourself out. This was my experience playing with pretty much anyone that joined my team after 20+ hours of play.
Demi;-;There's a difference between a fun game and a bad addiction.
Darkfreedom;-;Man, i used to love this game, look at my hours. I remember a time when everything ran fast, was stable, and never crashed. WHAT HAPPEND? Now i have regular Server connection problems THAT PlSS ME OFF and CONSTANT CRASHES that i can't do anything about. I CAN'T EVEN DO MOST VOID MISSIONS ANYMORE. And now, when i have almost everything you can have in this game, i realized that i have been addicted to a pointless farming sim. Sure, you can go do spy and exterminate missions solo.But what's the point? There is no strategy or "Ninja Skills" needed, just maybe hiding behind a wall. I feel mentally rped by this game.
SN7;-;Its ok.
Lokimari;-;It's great.
Worlds Sluttiest Pheasant;-;Grinding Simulator 2015 9/11 would grind more than a stripper.
MLG Pro Trixie;-;Worst game i've ever seen!!!! I opened it for the second time ever and it froze my cpu because of some  glitch on the update screen and glitched steam into thinking I was playing it for 22 hrs. I had to reboot my cpu but that wasn't enough! No I had to uninstall steam, remove the games files from my hard drive, run an ANTIVIRUS SOFTWARE, redownload steam and log back in. On top of all this the gameplay itself is terrible, the tutorial is waaaay to long, controls are weird as hell (if you try to use an xbox controller they're even worse!), melee is a nightmare, and from experience the server connection is horrid!! Another thing to mention is that my steam got hacked during my first gameplay of this and I was told I was hacked through the game! Do yourself a huge favor and even though its free DO NOT BUY THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
8 Forma Redeemer;-;An amazing cooperative F2P 3rd person online action game set in space. Space Ninja's with Superpowers what more is there to ask for.
MOA;-;Dis game makes me go fast
Nortarus;-;Walked into a room. had no idea what I was doing. died whilst unloading my Furis into a metric ---- ton of Grineer. 12/10, would die fighting Grineer again
lucabf8;-;Great fast action mmorpg game!! Saw it recommended in multiple places and it is for a reason! The game contains a variety of weapons and classes to choose from. Last but not least it has really good graphics in my opnion, but for a laptop it's a little too much, but it is still playable and enjoyable. Great work!!!
CheeseyBrony;-;Warframe is are very heavy shoot them up game. If you want a game that is very funny and has hours of game play this is it. THe game is free you might think it's pay to win but it's not. Yes you can pay money to get better stuff but thet items you buy it as good as the player. That only way to get better stuff is by doing hard missions and earn the resources to level up and build weapons. Yes some stuff you can only get with money but if you work to get some rare items people will give platinum (which is the playing I dont know to spell a word so screaw this get the game it's epic
Dragon Fruit;-;It's ok. It's free.
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Stormrhodos;-;Amazing free to play-Action rpg "shooter" (Warframe needs a genre description of its own,don't make the mistake of thinking of the usual  quality for f2p-shooters,this is something else.) + Great quality for a f2p-game with constant updates and improvements. + It's completely free,you don't have to spend any money on anything unless you want to (no restrictions) and all of the platinum purchases are convenience. + There's a wide selection of Warframes,weapons and cosmetic items and new stuff is constantly getting added. + Tons of content,altho quality of the content varies,it is mostly lobby-based indoor tunnel-shooting missions and levels can get repetetive since there isn't an awful lot of variation in environment and mission types. But again,new stuff is getting added on a regular basis and the developers are good at their jobs and listen to the community. + Great for Coop-play,up to 4players in a squad,different outloads and frames can work well together and make things easier,and there's plenty of challenges such as survival and endless defense missions with waves of increasingly difficult enemies. -The community is a mixed bag but still a LOT better than most f2p shooters. But since it is a free-to-play and literally anyone can pick this up (+console players) you'll still see a lot of kids,spamming and allcaps attentionwhoring. If you haven't played this game I can only recommend you try it out,you've got nothing to lose but potentially a bit (or lot) of your time^^ It's surprisingly good for a free to play and oozing quality.
Lexk;-;I dont say that this game is bad but, for me this game doesn`t give any action and good fellings.
MLG Pro Trixie;-;Worst game i've ever seen!!!! I opened it for the second time ever and it froze my cpu because of some  glitch on the update screen and glitched steam into thinking I was playing it for 22 hrs. I had to reboot my cpu but that wasn't enough! No I had to uninstall steam, remove the games files from my hard drive, run an ANTIVIRUS SOFTWARE, redownload steam and log back in. On top of all this the gameplay itself is terrible, the tutorial is waaaay to long, controls are weird as hell (if you try to use an xbox controller they're even worse!), melee is a nightmare, and from experience the server connection is horrid!! Another thing to mention is that my steam got hacked during my first gameplay of this and I was told I was hacked through the game! Do yourself a huge favor and even though its free DO NOT BUY THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Keita;-;good solid game and for free i would even say it is better than destiny as i found a lot of the features from destiny relate to warframe
Bagel;-;Too many microtransactions. I know it's free to play, but jesus christ, get over yourselves.
The Network;-;Super awsome space ninja kick  game. To bad I cant sign in with my PSN account I dropped 100$ on that game :( 10/10
SimplyLivid;-;This game does not work at all. My friend who is right next to me can connect and play but everytime I try to join a match or accept an invite, It does not let me. It is very frustrating and I searched online and did everything and tried everything. Many people are having the problems and nothing works.
Kirigaya Kazuto;-;its amazing choppy chop
MC;-;Very good graphics ! easy to play :D
Loneith;-;A great idea for a game bogged down by bad customization constantly pushing you towards the overpriced cash shop. Before the new game smell fades you'll already feel the grind set it.
ShuCreamHD;-;Understanding that it is still in Beta but at the moment don't even try playing, the developers are clearly lazy, if they can't fix the crashing problem after this long, you may as well shut down the game itself.
Gardijak;-;It was okay, but it gets repetitive after just a few missions.
Drunken Child;-;Sick as
gen.adolf von panther the 5th;-;they need to work on it atm i cant play will not let me get on to the game as if i put my password were it is incorret good and fun game i hope they can work on it
Ana The SuPreMe';-;My favourite game ever. Spent too much time in it but i absolutely love it! This game made my childhood :)). Until i bought CS:GO.
ok;-;It will protect your virginity. 11/10
snow;-;First of all my hours should say it all, secondly its Free To Play what else more is there to like? Try it and im sure you'll love it :) It has a great community and i made many friends :D Its one of the best games i ever downloaded!
Rock Skippa;-;Warframe is a different kind of free to play game. Instead of barraging you with ads, or forcing you to buy things you dont want, it completely keeps the aspect of a regular month-to-month or one time pay type of game. While some could fight and say its , "pay to win", I beg to differ. While you can use platinum, the games currency for real money to game transactions to purchase already made weapons or new characters, you're not limited to having to use your money. Instead you create the items, making the game that much better, thus the games fun lies within the aspect of creating and gathering materials for items and trying to be the fastest or the strongest Tenno the solar system has ever seen. Anything you can buy, you can create. It may take a few hours of fighting but then where would the fun in the game be then? In summary, warframe is a new twist on the "F2P" game industry, by one single characteristic that makes Warframe collect most likely the most revenue of any free to play and that is they do NOT force you to purchase items. No one likes being forced into anything , especially not a game, and this game, one where the devs listen intentively to the players, patch things accordingly, and make the game all around enjoyable by not making you pay for a monthly subscription or limiting your activites by not paying, derserves more respect than it can ever obtain. Plus: ******* space ninjas. 11/10
Ling Ling;-;Waited so long for this game to be installed What do i get? A freaking black screen
Coconut Overflow;-;Amazing game, addicting, is definitely not p2w. I love it!
Hakma;-;Warframe's the name, breaking loot tables my game
Chris Travis;-;stupid game take alot of russian to win xddddddd
Winbugs10 piss me off;-;Launch it --> Crash infinity loop
Stroggnonimus;-;The game itself is very good, except that it very quickly turn to a grindfest. So either you shove money to it or spend thousands of hours grinding. Gameplay awesome though - fast paced space ninja action, what could be better ? 1/10 - "Not COD" - IGN
_-_-_- AKAGIxxKAGA;-;Banned coz soliciting spam, just because i give some mod to my steam friend.  gmae
alex(music);-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so heres a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings but reallly this is a good game
( T.S. );-;this is my life
Goat | CSGORAGE.COM;-;A good game but to be honest do you wat to grind tons of hours just trying to get some new gear or do want to play something good like a FPS that you play in a rank system i.e. CSGO, COD and others like them (other FPS' are available)
SteelBallz;-;Awesome Game I have on steam and on my ps4! Ps4 alil better!
The One True Cat;-;I it wouldn't be pay to win i would really enjoy this game.................. It's really a shame you have to buy everything with money :l
DustyBlue;-;I love the aesthetic design, I love the gunplay, I love the swordplay, I love the ninja acrobatics, I love the progression... I'm just really loving this game. The last time I liked a free-to-play game this much was... Team Fortess 2. *gasp* I really dig this game's style, and it hooks me for hours and hours each time. It takes a certain rare charm for a video game to capture me like this these days, and it's still just beta. I don't even play multiplayer games very much and it is buckets of fun, and you can play it solo too. I hope to see how this game grows as time goes on, because I'm certainly going to ing be there. I love what this game is doing, I think it deserves more attention, I hope it gets more popular, so here's me spreading the word on this totally awesome game.
Assassins Cred;-;I LOVE IT because i like to slice and dice
Mr. D;-;Shooter with melee combat. Great! Replaces storycontent with addictive grinding, I already poured more than a hundred bucks, most of my spare time and social life into it. And on top of it, it`s free! You should try it, really. Bada babab baaa, I`m lovin` it.
ghost_warrior33;-;warframe its a vere nice game it have an awesoem wepons and mods at have evere thing you need i playd it so mutch so i recommend this game go a head and download it and have a look on it guys :D --------------------------------- pros: +nice graphics +nice gameplay +beta lol +coll cntents +so many to explore ---------------------------------- bad things: -nothing bad:D lol ----------------------------------- so what are you waeting go download the f**** game lol :yoy:
pk.;-;A very fun free 3rd person sci-fi action shooter. It tends to be fast paced due to the parkour styled movement system. Similar to Mass Effect 3's co-op multiplayer. The difference is mainly in the diverse unique weapons, many warframes (classes) you can choose from, and the fast paced parkour movement in the game. Now the different warframe's range from classes which offer a variety style of play, whether it be pure damage, defense, stealth, tanking, healing, crowd control or utility. We have warframes that harness : Electricity, fire, wind, water, ice, magnetic's, anti-matter, illusion's, poison, sound waves, the undead, chaos, rage based melee fury, blades like true ninja's. There is so much to choose from and have fun with! As far as weapons go, this game has some amazing weapons. There are hundred of weapons to choose from; you can have equipped a Primary Weapon, Secondary Weapon and a Melee Weapon. You can also unequip primary and secondary weapons and run around in a melee spree, deflecting bullets at the same time with your blade. Weapons Range From: Weapons that shoot Ssw blades, multi-shot missile launchers, weapons that impale enemies to walls, bows that are capable of killing multiple enemies with a single arrow, infested rifles that fire electricity, toxin launchers, kitana's, toxic axe's that eat through armor, greatswords, laser rifles and machine guns. It is one of my favorite games, with that said however it can be grindy, and a bit hard to pick up for new players. With Update 14 coming out it is a bit easier for new players now. There is a Prologue to help players through the different controls to this game, while completing a quest to help ease them into the game while acquiring some beginning mods easily to help increase the damage, survivability and many other things of weapons and your warframes. The player community and developers are very friendly and release weekly new content along with patches and hot fixes for bugs regularly. They are pretty on top of things, and keep in mind this game is in the open beta stage which allows the developers to release new content constantly expanding and improving the game. Allowing the playerbase to evolve with the game itself. I would recommend seriously trying this game for a good 15-20 hours. It is alot of fun and there is not game that is truly like it, it is unique. And most importantly, PLAY WITH A FRIEND/FRIENDS. It makes it that much more enjoyable. Enjoy!
Satsujinki;-;This game looks great.....*checks my hours* WTF?!?!? HELP ME!!!! I'M BEING ADDICT!!!!!
Bold and Brash;-;Great community. Great Game. What more could you ask for?
air;-;Farming, Farming, Farming and Farming! 69/69
META BODY;-;Deleted my old review, which was positive and hopeful, impressed with this game's strong sense of Tsutomu Nihei-esque biomechanical sci-fi aesthetics and John Woo parkour action. Since then, the game has maintained itself as just another terrible f2p grindmachine, and (perhaps even worse) a constantly mutating and unfocused wreck of a game. I haven't invested nearly as many hours into it as some, thankfully, but it seems like everyone realizes at some point that it's not the game you hope it will be, and could be. It is with a heavy heart that I admit Mass Effect 3's multiplayer is a far more complete and satisfying experience, even if Warframe's aesthetics are much wilder and more exciting. Maybe some day they'll find some kind of focus and this will crystallize as a game worth playing.
Ultimate badass;-;This may be TLDR but do not worry i am going to break it dowin in to category nicley. Note that there are good and bad things about pretty much every category GAMEPLAY For the most part the gameplay is smooth and very resoponcive as the player is given access to three weapons to take in to battle. A primary weapon, a pistol, and a sword or duel swords. The shooting mechanics are a bit ordinary, hold right click to zoom in all that jazz as the sword play at first is just as ordinary. With sword play advances further with combos and such like things as one furthers themselves in the game, note that there is only one combo unlock per stance so it does not progress that much. Although a well balanced sword can out damage most weapons in game. With that aside this game will take you to a lot of different planets known and unknown alike. On these planets every single mission is basically on one giant map cut in to different sections as some are reused or a player is simply spawned on the oposit side thn they were before. So needless to say one planet means one look that you will get tired of really fast. Some on top of that are built in facilitys that make the dungeouns very constrictive so do not have your hopes up for A visually pleasing level design. Not to mention that most maps have a horrible layout that makes it impossible to take advantage of the jumping mechanics in this game such as wall running except for in particular portions where it is needed to cross a map, it makes the mechanic feel like a gimmic and it plays as one as well. The jump mechanics for the most part are terrible, one of the most difficult challenges in the game is jumping from one platform to a higher platform because half the time the character will run up a wall and do a back flip leaving you further away from an objective. Or if one is taking fire from an enemy and wishes to dispatch him it takes at least 2 seconds to get up that small ledge as proper enemies can take away a large portion of health/shield given that opertunity. CRAFTING Now this is the insentive to keep you going, every single weapon in this game can be crafted as well as warframes. For the most part it is enjoyable to grind through missions in hopes to get that last rare matterial needed for an item that will finally progress a character. The down side is if you are planning on playing for free be prepared to wait, a lot! There is a wait period for every item crafted which would not be too bad except the least one has to wait is 10 hours! Most weapons take at least a full 24 hours and warframes take a whole 3 days! They claim this game is not pay to win but they sure as hell put a lot of insentive on paying players geting what they want faster! For example. FREE PLAYER-Grinds for blueprints, fights boss three times in hopes of getting all blueprints for warframe 2 hours max. Grinds for all crafing matterials as well as cash 5 hours at least. Begins Crafting warframe pieces all at once 12 hours. Warframe pieces are done begin final blueprint craft for warframe. "Not like they could just let you put them together right thn and there after all those hours." 3 Day wait period. THAT IS THE FREE TO PLAY MODEL RIGHT THERE. COOP Now this game is hard to play alone but it does start you off with 12 revives and rewards players with 4 revives daily so thats a nice litte feature to keep ya going. COOP is a must in this game and it is 50/50. THe community is good and willing to help out with a lot of nice people but more often thn not if one runs with random players they are going to have a bad time. There are not that many new players in this game beyond the existing community so a majority of people one will find themselves teaming up with are vets with awesome gear and way OP weapons which will drain the experiance from this game drastically. As one runs missions trying to hunt for matterials to build a warframe. These players will treat every mission as a race and dash to the finish line leaving you in the dust, if you explore and look for loot you will not get any kills simply stumble across the map seeing an endless amount of dead bodies left behind <<Every time. This type of gameplay does not reward you with anything, if one feels the need to explore and actually look around it is best to play with a friend or go in alone. But if you do not care and let them race themselves to a red light that is fine go ahead and explore just beware once they get to that red light a countdown eventually begins that will take you away from exploring and eject you from the mission. On top of that every other mission has a side objective with a nice cash bonus prize usually in the form of kills. Get 3 kills in 10 seconds, get 5 kills while sliding, get 30 kills with rifle. Things of that nature, I enjoy this idea but with random racers joining in every other match they hog kills and assume you are not trying to complete that objective nor will they ask you. The so called cooperation turns in to a competitive challenge which one can say goodbye to all crafting hunts and focus on beating this random player to the kills. It can be entertaining but it forces one to play at a different pace and a different playstyle thn they may be used to and happening to often that it just does not seem worth it. PAY TO WIN. In the grand scheme it is a little pay to win that is for sure. They claim that there are items that one cannot buy but must find through drops in the world, I have yet to have come across any such thing. I would not say that this game is pay to win but more like an over aptitude to push payment as the best option to play. If there is something in the game you get they will have an option to pay. Pay to get rid of wait time on crafting materials, pay to bypass crafting and get the item you want now, pay for more revives, hell pay for rare crafting items as well. Pay to unlock my color options for color pallet, pay to get a new warframe now without wait! There is just too much micro transactions that it constantly punishes player for not paying! Every little feature one can buy, Plus the prices oh my god the prices are horrible. The lower end things cost around 5 dollars but warframes and weapons are expensive as , they have warframes going for over 20 dollarsand you bet ya that those warframes are damn near impossible to get in game through drops! This is what you are dealing with while going in to this game. I for one like this game a lot it is creative and fun but destiny is right around the corner and is this X10 with no  micro transactions. This is a good game but way too many cons and way too many things they want you to spend money on I am sorry bot I will not recommend this game for the reasons listed
NCR Veteran Ranger;-;Grind, Grind and more Grinding. Weapons and Warframes to expensive. No Real Tutorial No end game content Dev's are incompetent No Challenge No diverse game modes, basically escort, kill, or defend People get flagged for having Malwares and Running Cheat Engine even if there not using it This game is basically Farm Simulator. 6/10 Metascore of 66/100 is truely deserved.
OneOhOne;-;Game used to be good. Absurdly overpowered things were added to the game (Nova). DE refuses to nerf Nova because all the casual plebs that are bad have already begun to play only Nova. DE then lies about creating Prime variants of all the original frames before any newer frames and creates Nova Prime because they realize they can exploit the plebs of the game and make a lot of money. Game is  now. This review will also more than likely be downrated into oblivion because the game is dominated mostly by weaboo casual mongos that somehow manage to fool themselves in to believing Nova is fine.
robot fucker 6;-;get ready to clumsily space parkour your way to the nearest wikia to find out what dumb  you need to grind for
Kazuma;-;Note this review is not based of any new content as nothing feels new. The graphics and design are great and have 4 friends can make the game a little more enjoyable. However the game will get boring for you really quick as each level feels the exact same as the previous just with a different objective to complete. The levels are continously recycled and there is no real sense of progression you get from other games. When you "level up" you don't feel any stronger than you did when you previously. The crafting system is very hit and miss. The UI for crafting is very solid and very easy to use but getting the materials needed to create the items in question is horrorendlessly bad. The "rare" item drops needed to craft the items drop so rarely you'll be grinding the same levels over and over just to get that one item that you won't feel very accomplished after getting it. You'll just feel like you wasted a lot of time. The gameplay and sound for the game is actually really nice. The weapons sound good and impactful the sword swings are refreshing to hear as you cleave your enemies in two and the controls are solid. In closing I feel that the game could be much better but as it stands I can't find it as enjoyable as other MMOs like World of Warcraft or Final Fantasy XIV A Realm Reborn.
sneaky_dood;-;sometimes there is lots of spagehti and it's kind of scary how you can turtle on the wall like a cheetah. this game is not sometimes good, but maybe it is not, but it is. i like the space ninja that looks like a narwal. i would have rated this game a 10/10 but i didn't pick the narwal space ninja and now the game is crap.... i rate this game a -0.5/10
SkimGOD;-;This game is not a bad game don't get me wrong, it has cool graphics, nice gameplay, and good customization. The problem for me is the gap between veteran players and new players (such as myself). I found myself running behind this veteran players while they rushed clean the whole map, while all I did was collecting the xp, not that much fun. You can play alone sure, but that becomes very hard later on, and there are some modes that require 4 players to play effectively. Getting the resources and warframes needed to make new stuff is not that hard, as long as you have 3 veteran players that take you to a advanced map to farm resources(while all you do is hide when the vets clean the map), try doing that alone and in low lvl maps, its almost impossible(to get the needed resources) The payed part of the game is a bit too much for me, i wanted to spend some money on this, but then i saw that is was more then 15 to unlock a new warframe... I didn't find it pay to win, since you can get all the stuff just by playing, its just the prices they ask for are too high for me. This is a cool game, if you have the time to grind and farm until you become a vet yourself, but i can't recomend this to new players, i wish i could select a neutral review for this, but i can't...
Mateus Buffone;-;Played it just a bit and I am already bored by the game. It seens to me just another free-to-play / pay-to-win shooter. It uses a nice sci-fi setting, has levels, special moves and the like, but all of it get old fast. The general feeling and looks of the game are nice and I may even say original, but all the rest is just the same old (and boring) story in my opinion. If you just want a nice looking free game I would say to try this, but if you want anything else, go look for another game.
Ambwuffy;-;I purchased one of the Founders packs for Warframe about a year ago, finding that the game had very little substance I decided to quit. I started playing again yesterday *7/21/2014* to find that they had made some major updates to the game. The layout of the solar map is very pretty now but the game still lacks substance. The community seems horrible as well, racism runs rampant in the chat room and the game gives you very little direction on what to do or where to go. The tutorial gives the impression that weapons are found lying around the map waiting to be picked up, but that's not the case. Three weapons can be bought from the market for the ingame currency, otherwise the rest need to be made by buying blueprints. The blueprints take on average twelve hours to make in the foundry, and you can speed up the process by spending real money. I understand that this game is free to play but it feels like there is a little to no progression aside from spending money. All in all I give it a 5/10, It's borderline -okay-.
[SK]Banshee;-;If you had asked me if I would recommend this game before their newest combat system, fighting in space with wings, I would have given you two very solid thumbs up. I will admit that the space combat caught my interest but after trying over a dozen and a half times on ONE mission to complete it, I have to say this. Worst mistake ever! There is no training for this combat. The npcs do not MISS ever. you try and dodge, as it's built into the combat flight system and yet they still hit. The npcs are able to capture zones faster than you can react. The devs in their 'wisdom' do not give any mods to help you even in the combat, and when you do find a mod, if you fail the mission.....see above with how many times I failed it, you don't get the mod. Congradulations DE, You took a great game and screwed it with your need to make things so over powered, I will *never* return or spend money on your game.
SkuLLeyes -|- the Boogeyman;-;Nothing special..The game is repetitive,monotonous and boring!
dj.;-;Has lots of potential but, in my opinion, falls flat because of its repetitive third person action/shooter gameplay, which is nice in the beginning. But after ten missions or so (which usually range from 15-45 minutes I guess) you're starting to think that maybe you've seen all this game has to offer already. Rest assured, there's tons of loot to find so there's plenty to come back for. You just have to accept that there's not much variety and the fact that people get lost frequently because of the terrible level designs. Which is not good for a game that focuses on co-op. Not a bad game per se, but just not my cup of tea. [Rating: 74/100]
[ORL] LoboRundas;-;The game is based around the idea of continuous, inevitable, tedious farming. Space ninjas in space aren't a bad idea, but the (D)Evolution Engine the game runs in makes it so with poor optimization, and higher graphical options just make it so you can see less and uglier.
Dream;-;Okay so this game is really fun I must say but there are many things that make it weigh more towards the no side. The game is a third person sci-fi shooter where you are saving your kind from evil that are trying to kill you off and you play different levels traveling through different planets in the solar system but I found that all the levels feel the exact same over and over. You have different objectives each time but it is almost always the same map layout and the same ultimate goal in the end making it feel super boring over time. The game is free to play but once your in the game you are almost always butt ed by the cpu enemy because you start off with bad weapons and in order to get better weapons you basically have to pay so it's free to play the game but to enjoy it you need to spend money basically. But the game is fun with friends and has come a long way and still looks promising so I hope it can improve until then this game is a no for me 5/10
RedTiberius;-;This game is wonderful in the sense you can commit hilariously epic carnage on the enemy types in Warframe. This game is also wonderfully frustrating because of the multiple layers of RNG (Randomly generated rewards basically) and it is a very long grind to get to the highest rank if that is your goal. I would have to recommend this game to people who like Dark Sector and its pretty bad AI where enemies are moving to cover and stand in front of it before starting to shoot at you.
Cookie;-;It was really fun at first but it gets really repeditve after the first few missions. I got bored of it quickly.
SleepyKitten;-;It's really fun and interesting at first, but then it gets really repetitive, and the in-game purchases are too ridiculously expensive.
Koops;-;I like the women in this game. They're hot.
ghoomb;-;i don't see nothin' wrooooooooooong with a little bump and grind
Dat;-;This game is largely a grindfest. If you care to waste away grinding for things that relys on RNG (Random Number Generation), clearly this is the game for you. Also, if you prefer to just read the pro and con, scroll further down. I also ran out of characters to rant on things! In terms of initial gameplay, I was not amazed by the P2W (pay to win) module and how the game did the tutorial. I was thrown into the game with little to no idea what exactly I was doing. It wasn't even until a month or two later that I actually figured out that everyone has a stamina bar underneath their health. What got me to continue playing this game were the company of friends (typical how friends make friends play bad games). DE needs to reevaluate how they do exchange of platinum (in-game currency) with real currency. The prices for some of these accessories/weapons/waframes are just through the roof and also all over the place with no coherent scaling of prices. With each new update, more bugs and crashes happen. But that's to be expected, right? No! If you think about it, the game is already out of beta phase, yet, it is still getting new content that completely changes how the game played each time. Last update I bothered playing had a 13 in it, which involved Mirage and Limbo warframe. With that 14 update, they completely revamped the star chart so it was more console-friendly and made all the menus diegetic (HUDs similar to Dead Space). FOR PC users, this is a curse since it completely makes navigating menus with a mouse utter pain. What's worse is the diegetic menus would occasionally hide behind your warframe (or in front, which the warframe blocks the view) which makes it hard or impossible to access or use anything. Warframes each have 4 abilities that correspond to the #1 - 4 key on the keyboard above WASD. Press it, it activates or channels. What DE failed to do though, was make the abilities unique enough to not spam one ability over and over. Instead of using 1-3 a lot and using 4 as a last resort, it's a constant input of one particular ability. One example is the Nekros warframe. He is all about raising the dead and fearing enemies away, but one ability stands out: Desecrate. Woah, is he going to touch bodies? You bet! He will touch them bodies real good in hopes of getting lucky with extra drops! So good, that it is all he will ever do. Another problem that Warframe suffers from is the vast amount of mods in the game. Mods allow you to modify your weapon and add effects or damage to it. Some reduces damage for faster fire-rate or higher crit chance for less accuracy. Doesn't sound bad, until you already have the necessary mods that most everyone else has. You have a clump of mods that won't ever get used and just takes up space providing nothing of value to you, even when you transmute (gambling mods in hopes of getting a better mod) it. Each update adds more mods that offers little to no change and is already among the other mods out there. Recent event gave players 20% damage to slashing, while nice and all, there's already a mod that offers 10% damage to slashing. Not as good, but there already exists the mods of that category. DE is just saturating the market with mods when they should either implement another system or stop attempting to make new mods. There is a stealth aspect to the game that DE stated in their video about being ninjas. Quite the attention-grabbing title, but the real game offers little in terms of stealth. In fact, it's even counter-productive with some of the modes in Warframe to attempt stealth. Survival is one of those modes where you are trying to kill as many as possible in hopes of staying alive. Stealth doesn't work in that kinda system. You get miniscule bonus credits for beating the entire mission in stealth for particular modes, which, is not worth the effort. Stealth kills are also done on multiplacative system where your weapons X stealth = damage. So murdering bosses or higher level enemies with level 0 weapons will net you 1 damage. Making things in the foundry requires real time to complete and claim in your inventory. It kinda sucks early game since you are given a BP for a weapon, but you can't get any of the materials for it until like...3-4 planets later. By then, you are done with the game, or you already got something superior. Another thing that DE did to alleviate people's instant gratification is "rushing" the thing you are making, which finishes the building process instantly for 25 platinum. This "rushing" button applies to anything and everything in the foundry which could require only 1 minute to 3 days to make; the price is exactly 25 platinum. I personally never hit the "rush" button since I didn't mind playing the waiting game, which is how I managed over 555+ hours in this game. When you manage to make it far enough in the game to afford a sentinel (shoulder critters), the most useful one by far is the carrier, which vacuums up items around you for ease of collecting. Why bother using another sentinel to dish out damage when you're already dishing it out anyway? It's honestly not worth the effort to use any other sentinel than carrier in my opinion. Then you have the critter following behind you, the kubrows. Good luck finding an egg of it, drop rates for it are abysmal as of a month ago. Once you find the egg, you have to purchase a incubator power core BP, which will allow you to make it in the foundry. So purchasing the BP is 50k credits, making it in the foundry is 100k credits. Oh yeah, you also have to maintain the dog, as in, keep feeding it to keep it alive. You have to purchase DNA stabilizers to ensure the dog's hp doesn't drop below -100%, otherwise it will die. You have to login every day and pet the dog, otherwise it loses loyalty meter, which makes it do less damage. Also, if you want to get rid of the dog immediately, you can opt to consign it to Lotus (female woman that likes to talk for whatever reason) for 25k credits. Here are the pros and cons: Pro: +Unique warframes with their own special abilities +Large variety of guns and melee weapons to choose from +Fast-paced combat(aside from bosses) +Enemies ragdoll in the most interesting ways +Lots of mods to place on weapons and warframes +Stealth segments for those wannabe ninjas +Can alter color pallete of weapons/warframes/pets +You have pets +Community is fairly nice (more opinion here than fact) Cons: -One of four of each's warframe's abilities shines the most and thus, is almost exclusively used -Some weapons are completely useless and never worth the effort to farm/make -Melee seems good initially, but gets easily out-classed by ranged toward endgame -Some bosses has a gimmick to how you can damage them. Sargas Ruk (AKA Ruk the suck) requires you smack 3 weakpoints one after another until he will go down -Hundreds of mods and only a few of them gets any use -Stealth is glorified and non-existent. You might as well go in guns a' blazing -Making weapon in the foundry requires real time to make. Takes X amount of time to farm warframe parts and 1 day to make the parts, then another 3 days to actually make the warframe from the parts -Color palletes requires real money unless you happen on an event that gives out a free pallete (like easter) -Can't change color palletes for all warframe. Some has a default color to them (e.g. Excalibur's backside is grey all day, every day) -Carrier is by far all most players would care for as a sentinel pet. New update brought in dogs, but the dogs require a constant maintenance. Have fun in the void -Survival games gets exponentially harder as time goes on. You saw it right, exponentially -Aside from resource farming on certain planets, you'll mostly be seeing the void for most of your gaming life All in all, do not waste your time playing this game. I couldn't even list my entire rant because it was too big for Steam to handle.
EXDOOM;-;login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...login failed check your info ,.... login failed check your info,...
Novatroid ();-;Please no. never play it. just, don't. it's just bad.
theBlueJew;-;it was fun at first but quickly got boring and just became a game where you did nothing but kill the easy ai. the multiplayer was ok but completely unbalanced and all new players got destroyed because of it. it was SOOOOO hard to aim on this and i really didnt like having to miss 89% of my shots because of sensitivity,which i like on high.
Rockon;-;After 1280 hours, I have lost faith in this game and its developers. There is absolutely no depth in this game, and there never will be. It's just a meaningless cashgrab.
Matt;-;At best you can say it's a decent third person shooter . Cons. --repetitive, it seems that you play the same level again and again and again . --in game currency is useless, if you want something you must buy it with real money ..from weapons to revivals..colours , blueprints .. I would rather give 20 bucks to have an unlocked game than to spend 60$ for useless points in a game that feels that is not finished . Until the devs will get some sense into themselves I won't recommend this game .
OdobenusPotatus;-;Warframe is like a little boy's first dog. You like it for the first 2-3 days and then it gets boring and you stop playing with it. There is no ultimate goal in warframe, nothing to work towards. You can get to the "end game" in like 2 hours of starting the game. And by end game I mean farming enemies that are higher level that wield the same rewards as the ones you fight when you first start the game. Speaking of farming, the only real thing to do in warframe is farm for materials to use to make more things to farm with. TL,DR: WARFARM IS BORING!
mrbenp99;-;really bad game u cant be black without color pack. i r8 0/8 bad b8 m8. RACIST!!!!!!!! cant be an eraser so bad 0/8. how too be racist warframe
Katzenbier;-;it's !
Laegel;-;Grinding simultor 2014. A nice game all round with nice visual effects and customization options, but quite repetitive and boring towards mid/late game. Pretty much grinding until you can find a new place to grind more often. Purely grind to get items that enable you to grind more in the places that you unlocked by grinding. Did I mention grinding? 2/10, would not install again.
Katzenbier;-;it's !
Slug Pilot;-;This game is good considering its free, BUT i would never spend a dime to buy it. It is highly over rated and too repetitive. The pace in advancing is aggravating as well. I dont know maybe just not my cup of tea.
Frederick z Ziemiia;-;It was supposed to be more like a stealth game and now what? Another clone of something else? Maybe. I've played for 2 years (almost) spent countless money on it, but i have no hard feelings because it's freaking F2P they never force or ask you to buy anything. Seriously if you want to achieve or become better than others in this game you will need to pay eventually. It's not a big deal, not at all. Only a few bucks? A few bucks will just begin your addiction to buy and satisfy yourself and repeat. I've spent approximately thousands and owned a lot of "limited ****". Noobies see it will freak out literally. For example the freaking Primed Chamber Mod. Developers never put a price tag on it but it got a ridiculous price. I created a clan, which was actually some good memories, that I made a lot of friends and it was fun. After so long this game became boring at some point. Buy the Prime Access, double everything, found the most badass weapon and go through certain best farming maps and call it a day. Seriously is this how games are or should be? I love the design of this game, but something went wrong. It was supposed to be a stealth game but now we are flying in a jetpack suits (some say it looks like Gundam) and gun blazing in the space. Stylish? At least it was because I remembered the title Ninja Plays Free, and I don't actually think the Ninjas fly in jetpacks. I haven't played for a long time but I waited a year to see some improvements on the game play, developers designed a lot of moving method: wall-run, wall-jump, climbing, dodging, back-flip and front-flip. I no longer think that's necessary any more since a grenade launcher is capable to kill anything. I see Warframe got a pretty high rating maybe I'm looking at the down sides possibly played for to long and forgot about the joy or other aspects. No I still remembered what I loved, I loved the design, it is absolutely gorgeous and unique. I literally spent hours on customization. What need to mention is that the colors you put on your frames have limited pallets so if you want some fancy colors you will have to reach to your wallets anyway, things like that push everything backward and annoy me. Pay to win, that's spirit of F2P titles, deny or not. You don't pay or you will have a hard time, and I assume you will reject me with your so promising mental endurance but who wants to play a game with unpleasant experience? So in the end, you go "screw that just 50 bucks" (or something like that) and start to rip your wallet pieces by pieces. For the people who are not wealthy enough to go crazy will end up finding other ways to squeeze some cash into it. In other words to illustrate this addiction, to pay and satisfy, is a drug-like experience, you get on it and you will have a hard time to quite. It was all about glory, and vanity. Obviously a cool dude with stunning color and limited edition **** looks awesome than a person merely spent a buck on it and probably looks horrible. There's no argument with that, just watch when these two kind of players meet together and the cool dude will poke the **** out of the noob. Maybe the cool guy doesn't even have to talk, just simply stand beside a newbie and prove everything. If you are a costumer long time ago and still loving it, I admire you. If you are new to Warframe take me suggestion, but I won't force you from trying Warframe. Trust me F2P title is way too dangerous. Even a free phone-game with in game purchase will rip off your kidney no matter how confident you think you can control yourself because I failed too many times. So I believe I'm not the only person on earth who pay in F2P. The point is if you don't want to be sucked into it, don't even bother click that friendly looking "Free to Play Start the Game" button and that goes the beautiful nightmare. Here are my own opinions. unbalanced Game Play: repetitive, only thing that keeps you come back to the game after you tried everything. The update events, similar to infinite expansion contents but only its free. Events all have the same goals, score to the highest tire get all the reward. Warframe has awesome customization, capable for occupy you all day long. Graphics surprisingly nice: interesting lighting effect, structures and vegetation are not bad but consider it as a free to play game they did put certain amounts of efforts to it. Design: unique and eye catching, I played this game in public and gathered people's eyes. Weapons are amazing, but if you got tired of farming you will have to buy it. Every weapons are unique and explorable with the Mod system. Mods provide different effects to both weapons and characters but mod all have potentials to be leveled up. Level a mod will be a pain in the , it is slow as hell and gets even slower when approaching the maximum level. Another item that appeared in game was Orokin reactors and Orokin catalyst. Both frames and weapons are only capable for 30 mod capacity, which means possibly you can put approximately 4/8 mods on them. Using those two items will increase to 60, which gives you more capacity. It means weapons and frames will become stronger. They are not common, there'are random mission (alert missions) reward and provide as blueprints (acquired materials, so farming again) , those missions appears more frequently when holidays or anniversaries. Another way to obtain is to buy. General: I had a long term relationship with Warframe, I have witness Warframe's grown, from a crappy game to a shiny title. Yes, I had fun, but I wish it wasn't a Free to Play.It seems a one-time purchased games have average better average qualities. Warframe is going off from it's original form (personal understanding). Stealth content is just a extra function but I was into more developments of stealth, but no, it's completely useless. There are no rewards for accomplish a mission with full stealth, and seems most people are not into it. Now, it's full gun blazing, and our ninjas are flying into the space. It's not my game, I don't make the call but I would rate 6/10, if you need a reference on rating. I'm sorry, I'm disappointed. NOT recommended. Fair well Warframe ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- I reviewed my critique, honestly I am slightly ashamed of my tone. I should have approached with a more professional attitude but I was emotional, had too much to say. It is hardly a critique because overall it is too subjective. I hope I have provided a useful review necessarily, all information that I mentioned is from personally experience. Do not be suspicious about any words seem to be insulting or sensitive, I promise the reliability. Thank you.
Xxamiss;-;Insane power creep/power lvl grind game with zero end-game and extremly repetitive gameplay.
Zyph;-;Pros -Epic Graphic -Easy to play -Control is easy -Updates all day -F2P Cons -Pay real money to unlock slots -Sometime crashing -Repetitve Anyway's, Always a good game. I might rate it 8.7/10 Good job Developers
Lord Chicken;-;The Game is gone to Pay to Win....
MasterDk78;-;its just plain simple boring.
Fex;-;Warframe is very playable (actual shooting 'feel'), twitch PvE-shooter, which even sounds good. BUT... there's a big BUT. Pretty much all the information imaginable is HIDDEN from the player. That's just terrible game design, considering the game is built around crafting new Warframes and weapons aka reward mechanics. Every single player will encounter following issues, which aren't explained anywhere in the game. Sure, you can check some of these from Wiki, but even then you need to know what to search. Eg. I was confused about Fusion Cores - so I searched that from the Wiki. Too bad there was no information which was relevant nor even link to FUSION, which was completetly other title - and had the exp tables I was looking for. -Affinity orbs appear every few second. What's that? Exp? Exp for warframe? Selected weapon? Everything? -Modification & Fusion cores. There's separate rank AND max rank (which isn't said anywhere) vs Exp vs Exp requirements for leveling up - major f*ckup here. -You can get components, eg. "Reaper Handle" - which you cannot find any information in the game. You'll just have to accept the fact that it's a "prime component", without having any idea what's a prime. Or what do you do with one. -Damage types aren't explained anywhere I'm probably going to check the game out again every now 3-6 months just to see if they've managed to add the relevant information which would make the actual playing FUN.
Ghost;-;This game is downright frustrating and boring. The gameplay is repetative, and after the prologue, there is no way or indication for you to know where you're supposed to go next. The only way i imagien this gam to be any fun is if you step in with your friends, and start at the same time. Because any experienced player will just bombard you with information you don't understand, thanks to the system surrounding upgrades and leveling being so confusing. And not to mention my experience with random matchmaking. More often than not, i see two or three high-level blips on my radar, because i get to see them up close twice. Once on level start as they run off, and once at the level exit, where they wait for me when they have murdered everything that moved. Frustratingly complicated systems and no guidance or hint to what level mission to choose, as well as the pairing with high-level players make this game incredebly frustrating for now players. All in all, overly complicated game mechanics and a verry unclear dificulty curve surrounding a repetative core gameply, more resembling of grinding than a fast pace shooter, combine to make this a boring and frustrating game.
obesechicken13;-;Addictive but not for the right reasons Pros: Addictive fun through getting better weapons, frames, and other items Cons: Hard to find squads (teams) to play with on later half of missions due to there being 30 missions per planet and 12+ planets/systems. When playing with others it's usually a speedrun where you don't contribute much because everyone's grinding for parts The game's only really fun solo but if you go solo and are not playing carefully it's very easy to lose the mission and have to start over (or use one of your 4 daily revives) on many frames(characters). And it's not as fun to play solo as other coop games Often feel like you're being baited by a carrot on a stick with promises of better items. I find myself playing to get better items rather than because I want to play a game to shoot enemies. There are a lot of bugs. Most are not game breaking. Sometimes I get stuck in a wall at the start of a mission though. Plat (out of game currency) is stupid expensive, 50% more than LoL. Unlike in LoL where $10 might buy 2 champions, 10$ here will buy you 1.5 guns or frames. Otherwise you have to farm several hours to get the parts for the item and then spend real world money for extra slots for the item or sell one of your other items. After 80 hours (my record shows 60, but I have 20 on another steam account because I accidentally forgot to log out of that) you get a good enough frame and weapons to beat every level. You can certainly get better items than what I have. They just are no longer necessary to beat missions in a meaningful amount of time. I 1 shot level 25 regular troops with my rifle.
-SNiGS- Kaori1;-;Endless grindfest with no pvp on the horizon....promise of amazing melee combat...melee is now nurfed to . Not my kind of game personally.
Metal Turtle;-;nothing more than a grind fest and microtransaction, don't do it to your self. And with every new update it gets worse. Pay 2 Not play, because they dont want you to play only to pay.
Paprika;-;the same  over and over, don't lose your time play a real game
Jawbreaker;-;Get banned after buying platinums. Totally disagree. It says i scam other players, so i request them for evidence, when, how. But no, they suspended my support account.
Kakophoni;-;A flashy grind-based game with little in the way of actual support. I sure hope you like farming, because that's all there really is to this game. That and waiting, lots and lots of waiting. If you liked Eve Online you'll feel right at home with this game. Everything has a craft time, weapons range from twelve hours to a day, and Warframes take a full three days to craft, of course that's after you've spent twelve hours on each of the three components. Of course you can use cash shop money to accelerate that if you so desire. Though Warframe is not, strictly speaking, pay to win; there's nothing from the cash shop that you can't acquire through grinding, it may just take you a few days/weeks/months longer to get it all than people who payed. The only things that can't be acquired anywhere but the cash shop are all aesthetics; scarves, weapon and Waframe skins, ornamentation for your sentinel, so that's all well and good. But like I said, the trade off is more time than you're liable to want to spend waiting. And every day you log in you get a reward, and many of those are discounts on cash shop currency ranging from 20% to 75%, and that may sound too good to pass up for someone with a particularly long-awaited piece of gear being crafted. Now I should mention that there is absolutely no thought given to balance in this game. There is and always will be a best weapon or Warframe which usually changes with each patch. Now while it's true that there are dozens upon dozens of weapons to choose from, 90% of them are useless. The way that leveling works in this game is pretty standard; level up each piece of equipment by using it in missions. However your account levels up separately from your gear, and this is called your Mastery Rank. You increase your Mastery by leveling up your gear. The more items you level up to max the higher your Mastery. So many items, weapons and Warframes alike, are there just to serve as Mastery fodder; to be leveled up to max for the Mastery and then discarded. Now there are a few items that are locked until you reach a certain Mastery Rank, but for the most part it's just for having a bigger epeen than everyone else. Returning to the issue of balance, it's disheartening how often a new Warframe is released only to have major performance issues that either go unaddressed or if they are addressed, it won't be to any degree significant enough to fix them. Then a few weeks later they'll release a shiny new Warframe with its own issues to make you forget about the last one they didn't bother to fix. The only times DE actually steps in to try and balance anything is when one Warframe is so blatantly overpowered that it can't be ignored. And sometimes they don't even do that much. And what could I possibly say about the developers? DE can't seem to get anything right. Every time they fix something, they break five more things. Sometimes they're outright contemptuous of their playerbase. Not long ago when they released Ember Prime (basically Ember with a few gold bits stuck on) they made sure to encrypt their loot tables so community data miners couldn't see the drop rate of her components. Now that in and of itself isn't much cause for alarm, how many games hide their drop tables from their players? No, it was when they released their Prime Access, a bundle that allowed people sick to death of grinding to pay for Ember Prime and all the primed weapons that came out with her. But again, not terribly out of the ordinary, they have to make their money somewhere. However this particular batch of Prime items seemed infinitely more difficult to acquire than all those that came before. Of course nobody could prove anything since the loot tables weren't available anymore. The worst part about all this is that there's a good game in there struggling to get out. Warframe is fun, make no mistake. So fun in fact that it deserves better developers than Digital Extremes. It should hold your attention for a few hours, and if you have friends to play it with then all the better. But don't use this game as anything other than a time killer for an hour or two. I suppose it's also worth mentioning that there are no dedicated servers, so your experience will only be as good as your host's connection, which is all too often less than spectacular. Granted you can set a minimum ping tolerance for matchmaking and set it as low as you like, but it'll be something of a lonely experience. Or it'll match you with a host with awful ping anyways, which hapens more often than not for me. tl;dr It's really grindy and poorly managed.
Relativity;-;I want to be able recommend this game. I really do. but unfortunatly, i can't. The core gameplay is decent fun, with the option to be stealthy or unleash your ninja skills in a full on attack. However, this games biggest problem lies outside of the combat. Getting new gear or warframes without paying requires WAAAY to much grinding to succesfully do. and even after the days you spend grinding and finding materials, you still have to wait several hours or several days before your thing is done crafting. This is absolutly rediculous, expecially considering how much Platinum (premium money) costs. I could buy several games with the amount of money it costs just to buy a couple warframes. It's just not worth the time or money to try to play this game
AzzA_Gaming;-;It's a beautiful game! its hard to explane because its that good! LOVE IT! <3<3<3<3<3<3<3!!!!! WOULD RECOMMEND!
JurgenMcnigga #Fallout4Hype;-;they want you to pay to change your name this game was good, now its a freaking p2w
Scopsion;-;Garbage. Becoming worse and worse with every update. Just more and more grind and more and more pay to win. It is just another game where all the improvements stoped long time ago. For example developers completly ignore all the people that want an option to disable those stupid screen shakes. Now it is all about adding new stuff to sell and making the game more and more about the grind. They even are using stealth nerfs in order to make the game more grindy to force people to spend money. Waste of time.
XROY;-;pay for items
Squid Kid Squid Kid Squid KiEgg?;-;Wait for the next patch. I heard they were going to add gameplay and fun in it.
Landwalruses;-;Throughout the time I have played this game I have noticed 2 things: 1) The Devs and Community Moderators are  2) Warbros is most certainly, beyond a single doubt, so very definitely, #1. This game is near beyond saving. It isn't worth your time, effort, or money (if you decide to put money into it, otherwise most content is grindable). Seriously though.
ColumnatedRuinsDomino;-;after the eyecandy loses it's shine you will find a boring, tedious game with gay- artwork, super repetitive assets and a world of losers playing it. you'd have to be stupid not to see through this scam. they make their money by relying on their players huge egos and low self esteem.
Tallcat;-;Has the makings of a fun spectacle fighter, but is ruined by being a free to play game. Also it's got that weird MMO feeling where it doesn't actually feel like any of your attacks have any weight. It's awful.
ColumnatedRuinsDomino;-;after the eyecandy loses it's shine you will find a boring, tedious game with gay- artwork, super repetitive assets and a world of losers playing it. you'd have to be stupid not to see through this scam. they make their money by relying on their players huge egos and low self esteem.
Tallcat;-;Has the makings of a fun spectacle fighter, but is ruined by being a free to play game. Also it's got that weird MMO feeling where it doesn't actually feel like any of your attacks have any weight. It's awful.
jadener;-;I have previously played this game and I actually remember liking it, and coming back to it for like a half year, but then I uninstalled it. Now, after it went fully on Steam, I cant get this damn thing to work, even if I changed like nothing after I deleted it fot the first time. Its really frustrating and they should fix their *beep*. Staring at Crash log is not a fun gaming experience, and I give them thumb down for this reason. Cant play it = Cant give it a good score.
F4llen;-;its a nice game, but since all this freemium games is about spend alot of money to play, to get better weapons, better equipaments and alot of other things, this game becomes redundant and a waste of money and time. but if you want to play because Dark Sector, or because you`re a sci fi game fan, i say to try it...
TheWyvern;-;I actually enjoy this game's gameplay, despite it being a total grindfest, however, the tutorial is an absolute nightmare. Nothing is imparted, the "story," if you can even call it that, is ridiculously slow-paced and the enemies and the instant failure-state missions build a frustrating environment for the player to the point where almost nothing is learned. I can't recommend this game, ultimately, because of the rank-up system. I HATE that in order to progress levels in this game to get new content, etc., you must pass a "test" of sorts given to you by Lotus -- the games incredibly annoying guide. She's like Navi, but on a whole new level of in your face. It makes everything on top of the grindfest that is this game gimmicky and disgustingly slow, as if you fail, you must wait a day to try again. For others, this game is great. I just disagree with many of the F2P choices the Devs have implemented that make the game so dang slow and just ridiculously pay to have fun at times.
NiCONiCO;-;Y'know, I'm gonna be honest here. It's a fun game, it really is, but it's a grind . It's a Free to Play, but if you want some of that cool stuff, like those helmets and other unnecessary accessories for your Warframe, you're either going to have to grind some Prime Parts to sell for platinum if you just despise giving the game developers their money because that makes them greedy s (sarcasm there), or shell out cash because you actually support the game (the first option is better; I haven't bought any platinum, I got it all through trading). You start off with 50 platinum, but you can't really do much. You can buy two Warframe slots and something that'll cost 10 platinum, 4 weapon slots and have 2 platinum left, or 1 Warframe slot and 2 weapon slots. Your call! That's nice, so I guess you can't complain there. The issue falls on the pricing. It's so expensive, and the exchange rate from dollars to platinum is a little... Funky. I won't delve too deeply, but hey, it's not mandatory to buy it. At first, I was like "Hell yeah, ninjas in space, this is the greatest thing ever, and it's FREE! ," but now that I play it more, I sorta just... Have to look at the amount of hours I put into it and ask "why". You basically just do the same thing, over and over. You don't get to interact with any sort of NPC in missions (we're not including Relays, those are hubs), and if you manage to find one, chances are you're just killing them because it's an NPC. There's no real plot there for us to follow unless you spend a lot of time scanning everything and playing through all 200+ missions on every isolated planet where people never really seem to go, but before you bash upon those who like plot, the only sorta plot I'm getting here is that I'm really the bad guy here? Or something like that. Once you do all the missions, you sorta just... Do nothing. You beat the last mission - What now? Where's the final boss? Now, for items - Gotta build them. Or buy them, already made. I can understand the game makes you grind for the blueprint parts to make those nice Aklex or Dakra Prime or that epic Nyx Prime instead of shelling out 100+ platinum for an easily grindable gun or sword. Makes you feel better after waiting 12+ hours for that sword or gun, and 3 days for that Warframe that other guy bought for like 100 bucks in a pack or something. In regards to customization, there's so many other colors you can choose from! But you gotta pay for them. Even the Classic colors, in which they give you only one column to choose from. You'd think they'd give you the first palettes for free, but nah. Just one column. That's lame, but y'know, not really mandatory. Part of me wants to recommend this game to you and my friends, because for a while, it's actually pretty fun. Yet, the other part of me wants to say to not play this game, and use your time elsewhere, because it's a grind. Grinding only lasts you for so long. It just depends on the kind of games you like. Don't get me wrong, it's not a bad game, it's just a rather time consuming game (as shown by my 200+ hours). If you're some achievement hunter going for achievements in this game, boy do I have some news for you-- In the end... If you don't mind the grind, get it. If you'd rather not spend the time grinding away all your depression in this game, don't get it. It's free either way.
Turdelz;-;WORST PIECE OF  EVER! DO NOT GET THIS GAME! I spent ing 3 DAYS WAITING for my ING KURBROW TO HATCH, just to realize that he HAS TO ING MATURE! So after anouther ing 2 DAYS, the ugly  matured. Then guess what? I HAD TO GET HIM A COLLAR. So I went to earth and tried the level, just to PLAY A ING 10 MINUTE MISSION where I had to defend my kurbrow from waves of grenier. THEN MY KUBROW RUNS STRAIGHT TO THE GRENIER AND DIES. ALL MY REVIVES WAISTED FOR NOTHING!  THIS GAME
JurgenMcnigga #Fallout4Hype;-;they want you to pay to change your name this game was good, now its a freaking p2w
You're Waifu;-;This game is terrible, please stay away.
Oplindenfep;-;Wanna pay to win? This is your game.
-UN- Night Haunter;-;pay to win trash....
Zelda  Dec 14 2015;-;Computer 10.5 GB 1440p Ultimate HDD Yeahh!!! Graphics !!! X Settings : Very low 144p X Settings : Low 240p X Settings : Medium 360p X Settings : High 480p X Settings : Very High 720p HD ----------------------- O Settings : Ultra 1080p HD O Settings : Ultra Ultimate 1440p HDD ---------------------------------------- Good Nice Cool !
Nipsey;-;its good
You're Waifu;-;This game is terrible, please stay away.
Ghostfaic;-;Despite the amount of hours I've clocked in (which now kind of feel like a waste to me), the game has great potential, but sadly, it's not sprouting (yet, I hope). The game can be rather really confusing if you're new, even with all the tutorials. Overall, this game's a massive grindfest to get the things that actually interest you if you don't want to spend money (that'll be discussed shortly), and/or if you'd like to reach high ends of the game such as enemies that go off your rank numbers, but sadly, it's rather just the same enemies you fight with the only differences being them having stronger weapons and health. Usually there's eximus versions (elemental/health-leech/energy leech) of the same enemies but even that feels bland and boring. If repetition doesn't bore you easily, you can give it a big whirl, but you'll realize it's rather just the same enemies on different areas, and fighting enemies in outer space directly feels the same but with your accuracy being . The game continues to be updated with bonus events and to give player login rewards, but what the game needs to do is make some improved AI features such as awareness and to make commonly unused weapons and MODs (modifications you can slide onto your weapons, companions, companion's weapon, and Warframe; most you get is to slide on about 9 at once and depending on their rank which goes from zero to thirty and the number on the MOD card, it will drain down how much more energy is in the weapon that you can be limited to. It can be countered with the use of a forma or orokin catalyst, in which a forma puts in a special slot that has a shape in it in which if you put a MOD with its matching shape on the top left of it, the energy drain is cut in half. With the catalyst, it doubles the energy amount, ex: 30 now being 60. Since I've mentioned events earlier, there sometimes are mini events where you get minor bonuses such as double XP, double cash, double resource finding, and so forth. There's also times where there are major events and doing a mission node a repeated amount of times allows you to obtain such material(s), which can vary from rare materials to a large amount of in-game cash. These events allow give introductions of new warframes to obtain, with their latest being Mesa, who looks like someone from Destiny (in fact, you can list some similarity between the two games in terms of design, but I'm not trying to cause any controversy here). There are microtransactions in the game, in which this game sells a lot of weapons, slots (will be talked about in the rating below), cosmetics, all basic-issue Warframes, color packs to change the color of your ship/companions/weapons/warframes, companions, and resources. You can also trade things too, which include getting premium money (so if you're willing to sell your things for that, good luck obtaining someone's interest. Only MODs, prime parts, premium money, keys, DNA prints, and certain resources can be traded. Forget about trading weapons). The only things you can't buy directly from the market are clan-tech weapons in which you must build yourself (where you have your clan dojo with laboratory to do research, one weapon being a flamethrower), and the majority of Prime items (there is usually a time-period where they have Prime Access to the new items that also give exclusives such as 90 day boosters, a few thousand of premium in-game cash, and character icons). Prime items are basically where your Warframes, companions, and weapons have bling and some stat boost that make people drool all over it. Ridiculous on how it goes as once something gets primed, people care for that and leave a lot of weapons behind that look like actual fun. You get the majority of these through grindfests in an area called the Void, and even in here, it's the same enemies just reskinned to look all shiny. The lore is something that needs explanation, too. The lore has so many theories from the community coming up here and there, yet DE hardly ever seems to admit the actual plot. Many try to relate it to this company's other game, Dark Sectors, in which you play as Hayden Tenno, who has a suit that looks similar to one in here called 'Excalibur', his last name is the name of the race you play as (the Tenno), owns a weapon that's 100% the same in here (the Glaive, aka a bladed boomerang), one boss from there is similar to here (a giant fleshy tissue that at first was cool but is now pretty meh), there are flower decals that look like the ones the Lotus has as a symbol (Lotus is your companion and trusted leader), and another character has a suit that looks similar to the one in this game (Nyx). Yet, this company said all connections between Dark Sector and Warframe are incorrect, so there goes that. As far as you will possibly ever know, you are Tenno, there are other factions called: Grineer (messed up clones that are basically conquistadors), Corpus (futuristic merchants in which some go crazy for money), Infested (the same virus issue from Dark Sector, with some of the enemies being infected Grineer and Corpus, but some being things of their own just filled with trainwrecks), Wildlife (wild dogs and manta rays on land), and Corrupted (reskinned enemies of every faction except Wildlife). There are syndicates trying to correct things in their own eyes while having alliances yet opposing opinions with others (optional to be involved there), Grineer try to conquer everything while having a love-hate relation with Corpus (mainly just one guy for cloning and weaponry purposes), Corpus members are either trying to discover about the stuff of the past (Orokin, which is a faction that doesn't exist anymore) and building crazy security bots, Infested just spreading all over and all you can do is help make sure you delay the possible inevitable, Wildlife not caring much, and Void being shiny people corrupted by mind control. What about Tenno? You guys are some crazy ninjas who can do sick moves yet you're recently up from cryostasis, so you don't know jack about your past or anything about the Lotus, but hey, go with the flow I guess. In reality, I like this game, it has potential, enemies and design are nice, weapons are nice as well, but apparently the company's only solution is to keep adding content over content over content to leave a majority of the players blinded by fashion-purposes while the few that have a brain start leaving. 4.5/10, if you want to take a look, go for it, I wouldn't recommend throwing money on it since money is needed on slots for holding your weapons, warframes, and companions. Glad resources don't have to be a part of it, and I'm glad they give you a starter amount on the premium money. tl;dr - game has potential, devs are just adding content after content instead of fixing actual problems, and game is repetitive piece of bland content.
CynicalRazor;-;TENNO SKKUUUUUUUUUUMMM!!!![/b]
Erixson;-;This game is
John Cena;-;It all started one year ago. I met a friend on Garrys Mod by the name of Austin. Me and Austin had really fun times playing various games, but most importantly, League of Legends. We were a dynamic duo, killing enimes and downing nexus' left and right. We were an unstopable bot lane compositon. Until one day, this  ing dog  of a game was refered to Austin by a friend. Sure enough, he became hooked, forcing me to play with terrible supports every game. I tried compromising, playing certain parts of this game just so he would go back to the god of a MOBA, but no luck. I knew it had gotten bad when he introduced me to a friend of his that spent over $2,000 dolars on this single  Guardians of the Galxay knock-off. It was then that I knew what I was destin to do, erase this game from the internet forever. But how is such a thing possible? You may think of me as a super computer hacker, but no, there's a much simpler method: complaining on the internet. It is here that I release my last beacon of hope. If anyone can help me pull my friend from this abyss of dog , please let me know. I just want to go back to Super Mega Death Rocketing people into oblivion like the good old day. TL;DR Would I recommend? No this game sucks Waluigi's nose
Vikingishly;-;This game is very repetitive in it's maps and gameplay. It's good for a free game but not anything else.
Nordic Apache;-;I played last year. It sucked then. Maybe it doesnt now? *EDIT* I played for a couple of hours today. A world of a difference from a year ago. I will give it an honest go and update acordingly.
Help;-;still  16 with a new launcher
Sarmon;-;I have 1800+ hours in this game. I can tell you almost anything. But I won't tell you to play the game.
AnArChY WarChief Paws;-;this is one of the best games iv played in a while
MobiusKnight;-;Space ninjas. Nuff said.
Moba sounds like an STD;-;this game is so amazing BUT BRIAN WONT PLAY IT
MINDBREAKER>;-;Good game, but TOO MANY BUGS including random disconnecting from server and more.
[ELG] Snipe4Life695;-;It's amazing, it's free, and you can earn platinum (real money currency) simply by playing the game and selling items to other players!
AnArChY WarChief Paws;-;this is one of the best games iv played in a while
MINDBREAKER>;-;Good game, but TOO MANY BUGS including random disconnecting from server and more.
[ELG] Snipe4Life695;-;It's amazing, it's free, and you can earn platinum (real money currency) simply by playing the game and selling items to other players!
ShineMYShoes;-;Warframe is one of the best FTP games I have ever played. Maybe even the best. Although there is an option to purchase some items with real money, it is not needed. You can play the game and unlock everything without spending a dime. Recently (a couple of months ago) a huge update came out and made the game even better then it was before. In Warframe you are an elite ninja alien warrior that can performe badass movements like running on walls, sliding, backflips and more. There a 15+ warframes you can play but you have unlock then via blueprints or buying them with platinum (in game currency). There are many different planets you can unlock by playing the game and beating the levels. The are many enviroments ranging from interiors of space ships, lush green lands, and arctic lands. Warframe is an amazing game but it may take a little bit of time to master all the different types of jumps and parqor you can do. If capable computer to run warframe then there is no reason not to get it.
etern;-;Yup instaled played 2 hours . Couldn't login back again . Unistalled. If you want to beat up an old lady on the street I don't suggest this crap .
GyroHippo;-;Downloaded it. Made an account. Says my email is fine but my password is wrong, even though i had just logged into the website with it. I got a password change and the game yet still says my password is wrong. Nice to download a game that doesnt even have a working log in system.
wardenwells;-;No matter how many times I try to play this game, I just don't get its popularity. Metacritic's rating of 66 sounds about right - unless you REALLY like touchy mouse control and rezzing stupid people. And space ninjas. Other than that, the graphics are pretty awesome. I just don't care for the gameplay, which is strange because the game has a lot of stuff in it I usually go bonkers for. Try it but don't expect the world or anything.
Riki Pachinko;-;Warframe used to be a great game. There were prime item that you have to play to get. Me and my friends played every night for 3 months to get those prime items. Some of us paid $100+ to get stuffs to support the team for the hunt, but some doesn't have to pay anything at all, they spend time hunt for items. Suddenly one update (U12), prime items are tradable. We got what we wanted for 2 months in one day, using less than $1. And since we no longer have anything to do, we all quit the game 2 days later. Money ruins everything. I don't trust the developer's decision anymore. Enjoy my $1. I'm looking for new challange, Cheers!
Poak bun (not supp);-;An example of a company having a cool idea and handling it terribly. In the closed beta you could have more fun with breaking the game in interesting ways such as running at 500% speed, and it has steadily gone down since then. The company abuses power quite often on both the forum and the game while leaving the game riddled with bugs.
Tar Bl O))) b;-;Do you like Mass Effect 1 combat with less weapons, even ier melee, and less level variety? This game's for you then.
Theonemango;-;Game is pretty much 0/10 unless you like playing Space Gestapo: Japanese Superiority Edition.
Coach of Love;-;i NEVER recommend this game for.... 0. Too poor server goes down so often 1. Too much strong flashing lights. 2. Awful User Interface 3. Bug of blasting rear-right speaker. 4. Bug of Leaving invisible entry on steam client 5. Cheap reward events at every hours 6. No hint to beat invulnerable boss 7. Too many stupid impatient players 0. Too poor server down so often (added 2014/08/08) it must be impossible for online game, cuz all of data you made become gone. not only chat logs, but also rewards you earned spending some hours. but in this game sever down happens so often in 1 hour. maybe more than 2 times in that at least now (2014/08/08). if you dont wanna lose rewards by struggling in this awful game, never play this. not only this company cannot fix it at least for some weeks (maybe for months its lasting), but also never even restart server soon. what they can do now is to leave it down until when users report it. if it was completely free game for beta, i forgave that. but now this game is Microtransactions, so letting server down so long is impossible. i have never seen before such a shameless company like them. 1. Too much strong flashing lights. In login reward dialog, in battle, in crafting and completing it, etc... even just when ur buddy does jumping attack, u will be forced to see many strong lights. moreover, if u use Kunai (throwing dagger weapon), it flash ur hand in every shot. why need flash so manytime like that ? cuz this silly developer belileves "its cool"....bull . u will lose ur eyesight through the game and soon need eye doctor. This developer maybe doesnt know even "Photosensitive epilepsy". there are many things to study before making game, but they never. 2. Awful User Interface U will get thousands of mod cards, but it cannot be piled up, so u must scroll them till find what u want. Lotus, woman warning us about enemy approaching, talks over and over through game, and of course u can not turn it off, all can do is to reduce her voice from Options. You can never kick other players from ur room, so u must play everytime with who u hate. You can never know what icon means until put mouse cursol on it. You can never know real number of players in mission progress on every planet, cuz it shows data a few minute ago, and ignore our setting for ping limit. of course the developer doesnt give us manual refreshing button for it. You can never know co-op member's life until open tiny window at down-left corner on screen. If u were healer, u may fail to heal manytimes, cuz we mostly watch center, not corner. About amount of member's mana(using for abilities), u can never know, but only by chat. Though there is an ability giving mana to others, u cannot know how much remains but yours. Who report their amount of mana by chat while playing hard action game ? Of course u cannot display these important info directly on their character's head, the developer seems to never notice even such a basic features. 3. Bug of blasting rear-right speaker. im playing with true multi-channel speakers(not virtual), and a few minute later after starting game, it blasts crazy big sounds from there. even if choosing 2-speakers enviroment from OS's control pannel, it still goes on. of course in other games, never happen such a shameless glitch. the only method u avoid this, is pulling out speaker's plugs from rear-right's. 4. Bug of Leaving invisible entry on steam client i dont know it already fixed or not, but it went on till i came to use launcher.exe directly. though quit this game, steam client never let me shutdown itself, cuz "warframe still running". i checked task manager, but never found such entry of warframe.exe or some. and moreover, verifying files of this game from steam client, i was forced to re-download some GB files over and over. i dont care which company is wrong, but it was the one of most annoying thing ever on steam. After using launcher.exe directly, it ended. (p.s. At update12, it finally crashed while updating, forced me reinstall 3GB again, cuz verfying data never works, and showed stupid error dialog again and again. they must never test even updating) 5. Cheap reward events at every hours u may think, "what's wrong with that ?" But this means they are luring u to game everytime through a day for few in-game credits. in other words, just a "chum" to make u use real money (cuz this game is F2P). do you think such company can give you fitting fun for money u paid ? i never think so. you should pay the company which brings us truely enough happy time and fun. 6. No hint to beat invulnerable boss one of my terms of  game is, "No hint to progress". i always use a grenade launcher and flamethrower, cuz it has wide hit range. But some bosses cannot take any damage, of course shows no hint. i checked wiki (why i must see other site, not official, sucker ) says boss has weak point. but shooting there with weapon above, they never take even 1HP damage, and never go on to next phase to be beaten. i dont know its bug or not, cuz they shows no hint....hahaha, !t. 7. Too many stupid impatient players its not fault of this game, but cuz how fast u move is important in this game, almost all of idiots leaves everyhing behind and hurry to goal. they leave not only co-op members, but also keys and hostages need to end the mission. they are truely idiots, never understand even what to do and why they come there. though i played this more than 100 hours(steam dont show cuz im using launcher.exe directly), but over 90% players were such. In most case, action game freaks are inferior to the other game's fun in intelligence, especially so in this game. maybe cuz it is F2P, the free gathers the stupid everytime. so, i suppose for above, 1. give options to turn off these flashing lights. developer must learn from Pokmon Shock. 2-4. fix everything written in 2-4. 5. maybe that's fate to F2P, but i dont approve as game. these chum looks like even add. 6. show always clearly, where to shoot, what to do. r u willing to sell something guide book later ? 7. give black list system can record these stupid players, and avoid to meet again in matching. That's all, for now. If u doubt, just play, and feel despair same with me..... thx.
TF2PublicFerret;-;Nice graphics but to me focuses too much on flashy fighting and not so much on gameplay. Also the levelling is just plain annoying and the game feels too much like Borderlands, Mass Effect and Spiral Knights mixed together.
Robbie F;-;This game well it basically just sucks. Ive played this for 4 hours and i have owned it for about 1 year. It has a crap story and has the weirdest looking characters ever seen in a game in my veiw. I have some freinds that have spent about 100 dollars on this and all i have to say is WHY U DO DAT U COULD HAVE BOTTEN 4 OR 5 DIFFERENT GAMES!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Dio;-;If you like to grind for 40 hours and then quit the game then this is exactly what you're looking for
WOLFMULLER;-;THIS GAME GAVE ME CANCER
Grospoliner;-;Right. So. Third person action shooter where you play a sort of bio-cyberninja in space. Sounds pretty badass doesn't it? Well to be perfectly honest it's pretty ing average. The game looks beautiful. There's no doubt about that, solid graphics and kick  visual designs. The controls work, the gameplay works, leveling up works something like a collectible card game where you slot different upgrades into weapons. So what's the problem? There are about 6 different mission objective types spread across 4 differnt map styles, spread across 50 "missions" Oh and some missions combine multiple objectives. Did I mention the maps are all randomly generated? Yeah... It's pretty much the same thing over and over with no real semblance of a plot or engaging set peices. It's just kill kill kill like Diablo. It's a good thing it's free becuase I wouldn't drop a dime on it.
banned 400 000 hours from doto!;-;too repetitive + the worst map design I've ever seen
lynxz;-;Tedious and boring grind fest with some flashy graphics. It's basically korean MMOs all over again with in-game purchases (lol "free" to play).
eXstermos;-;it is fun at first until you realize all the levels are the same
Beef_Chunks78;-;Laden with shockingly expensive microtransactions.
NutellaMadness;-;It's a very nice futuristic game. The appearance of the Warframes looks cool. The mod system is very awesome and there are so many weapons to choose from. :DD
Fartdonald's#NewRazerKeyboard;-;graphics are nice but WTF I cant login this game is ed up
GYRO heavy contracted;-;LOTUS PACK are these little girls in diaper -- fishing for money??
The Buster;-;if your name is dylan then your will be really bad at this game. Dont play if you are dylan 1/10 Would Play Again
Unreal;-;To be honest I woulnt really recomend this game, you need to download teh launcher, then download the game from the launcher which takes far too long, I was relieved when I got the initial download done, but then I had to wait even longer for the actual game to download
mRbATMAN;-;This game was fun at first, but it is so pay to win its not fun. i dont feel like paying 100s of dollars just so i can complete more levels. Lots of other people spend lots of cash in warframe and i dont feel like doing so. get this game for the third person action, but dont expect it to be fun for long.
Lord Penguin;-;Not really great, one problem is, when you have logged in once, you can't agian, tried yesterday, i came in and played, i was going for another round, i couldn't play it, its a big bug, i see everyone has it, i don't really recommend it.
The Law;-;Spent 2 hours waiting for it to figure out it's updates, to find out you have to register to play, and then to find out the login on the game is broken, meaning I can't play.
akslytherin;-;Spent over an hour downloading it, made an account, and it won't let me log in. Successfully logging into the website and changing my password doesn't help either. Thanks for this useless game that I can't play.
Aries;-;Yes. If you like a mindlessly grinding. No. The community is full of a**holes, servers lag a LOT when playing with others, pay to win is noteably present.
wilhelmpaulm;-;I used to love this game but after buying platinum (in game credits) and not receiving them I started asking help from the support. I've sent every evidence that I did pay but they said they couldn't help me. Note that this is my second time buying platinum the first time went great but now I just feel really cheated. I just can't play something that make me feel so cheated. I was even really excited :c to think I've been boasting this game to my friends and how awesome it is T^T
Fartdonald's#NewRazerKeyboard;-;graphics are nice but WTF I cant login this game is ed up
Aries;-;Yes. If you like a mindlessly grinding. No. The community is full of a**holes, servers lag a LOT when playing with others, pay to win is noteably present.
wilhelmpaulm;-;I used to love this game but after buying platinum (in game credits) and not receiving them I started asking help from the support. I've sent every evidence that I did pay but they said they couldn't help me. Note that this is my second time buying platinum the first time went great but now I just feel really cheated. I just can't play something that make me feel so cheated. I was even really excited :c to think I've been boasting this game to my friends and how awesome it is T^T
Jan;-;Disappointment i'd say. See so many great review so i decided to try out. First, Great graphic. And gear is well design. The game remind me of Halo. I played few mission but i dont really like it. The control is a little bit funny. Maybe because of the keyboard. And the character's motion look weird. Also Ai is kinda dumb. Not say this is a bad game. But i wont recommend unless u are a big space type of game lover willing to put up with those stuff. See some real in gaming video before you download this.
Sir Potato III;-;It was quite fun in the beginning but I got bored pretty fast.
Plebibus Maximus;-;Can't really recommend a game when the devs don't even know what to do with it.
Admiral Jar Jar;-;hack slash shooter 3rd person dungeon crawler with some of the worst setups imaginable. Unlocking new characters cost a lot and weapons are pretty mediocre.
AntiShadow8;-;Cant exactly give a good rateing here. From what i saw the game was going to be fun but there was a problem with makeing it start and run on my computer. Never could get it up and running no matter what i did.
KSE;-;- Tried to create an alias under Steam name, KSEXLR8. - Got banned for having an offensive alias. - Last time I preach the God's word to go forth and multiply.
Deflt;-;This game is quite interesting if you wanna be a stealthy ninja, it's quite difficult to understand the game at first but once you get used to it, you'll understand it, i mean you can costumize your Warframes,costumize weapons,..etc, i give the game a 9/10 it's very addicting.
walker;-;i dont give a  this game reminds me of my dead granny and looking at her frozen corpse makes me sick so you know whats up ing  aliens who dont know  about life shooting  what the  is going on im gonna go  my cousins
O.P.3Time;-;Seems ok at first nice and easy and fun... and then theres the problems, Soloing is impossible since enemies are limitless, they come in swarms all over the map so there is 0% chance to run away from one side of the map to the other, they are just simple everywhere, they fire with 100% accuracy making it impossible to dodge and the block cant do much when you have 20 guns firing at you from every direction, you can only use your skills about 4 times before they run out and they last for about 5 seconds and dont do very much, fighting back is pointless because there are droids that regen enemy shields at an insane rate making them unkillable, cameras spot you from a mile away which spawn sentry turrets and laser wires that destroy your shield in one hit, and if you think about hiding in a closet for a second to let your shield recharge they will just camp you in there and every time you respawn you will die again in seconds, and multiplayer doesnt help, even if you have more people the game will simply add more enemies and those enemies will sound the alarm which will spawn even more enemies and its just 0% chance to survive... and a lot of people will say "hey man you got to play a lot to get better stuff and sh**" but im saying "hey man its like playing counter strike 1 vs 50 and you only get a handgun and yes you may kill about half or more but either way you will die and you won't acomplish anything"... if you're looking for a good game out there try "Borderlands 2" its also Co-op campaign, there are way more guns, better story line, way more fun since its open world, there are character abilities and its 100% better than this garbage.
Kid now;-;Nothing but a farming sim, there are grindwalls behind grindwalls. You will find yourself playing the game subconsciously and have that be your illusion of "fun"
Spec Tater;-;Update: I got to play the game again and my review still applies. The game is broken for me. Developers couldn't add a simple fps cap in the game so it's completely unplayable. Since my only experience is from 2013, I'll be basing my review off that. Its another cheap F2P game. The game gets monotonous very quickly since there are few mission/enemy variety. Whenever you want to create a gun or something, it makes you wait a few hours or a day or two. I can't remember. You can bypass this by of course spending real money. Skip on this one. Also suck it fanboys.
Oberst DaKillah;-;if you are looking for a game that is poorly optimized both performance and network wise as well as has a chance of killing your connection then look no further as this marvel of modern game development made by incompetent monkeys is exactly what you are looking for! with amazing 4 maps copypasted as well as the most generic mission types gives you the greatest amount of replayability up to date! you also have dozens of weapons to choose from! all with copy paste stats, animation and only different skins for making it easy to select which of them work best for your gameplay style! 666/10 would close the devs to the same cage with sirgay titsoff with his WarZ/Survivor stories and Le sellout Rockit with his DayZ and throw the cage to the bottom of the sea!
Yagi;-;PvP is the best part of this game.
Ghost;-;Didn't enjoy it a lot since it's pretty hard to get into for beginners
Eleshis;-;Update 14 ruined the game
Aeroisticon;-;Pros: Good graphics Decent combat Neat character design Free to download Cons: Extremely grindy Bad community (most likely because it's free2play) Unoriginal Repetitive Bad AI Missions are all the same Glitchy / badly controlled parkour Hard to recommend at this point. Luckily it's still in beta so things should change.
da b0ss;-;WHY WARFRAME IS A GOOD GAME -One of the best 3ps games I played -good graphics -f2p (NINJAS PLAY FREE)
D'art of P250;-;Pretty much RPG TF2 with wayyyyy more loadout combinations(cross class is available lel)! PLAY NOW MUDDA ERS!
xOctaviaMelodyx;-;I love this game.. lol
Saint Walker;-;An amazing game, better than any other shooter i've ever played. The game takes DIRECT influence from one of my favorite games, Dark Sector, and while the Developers insist there's no correlation it's hard not to notice the similarities (Eg. Glaive, Tenno, Excalibur and Nyx being blatant copies of the suits Nemesis and Hayden used in Dark Sector, Technocyte Virus... The list continues, admit that this is a sequel and the game'll be better for it.) Warframe gives you the ability to live out your dreams as a super-powered space ninja, even if you weren't exactly planning to be one, you'll be happier just for the experience. Warframe also has tons of replayability and weapons. Every frame has it's own abilites, they aren't just cosmetic; and the number of weapons avaliable to players allows for hundreds of different playstyles. From the aspiring ninja's who use Bows and other Silent weapons, to the living tanks who just want to cleave through hordes with a sword taller than they are. Warframe brings so much to the table, even before true release.
daveola1;-;For a free to play game you get a lot of content. Sure, if you want to speed up progression and make yourself a little stronger, you can spend some cash. I havent spent any cash yet but I will soon just to support the DEVs. If you like FPS games then give it a try. I am having a blast with it.
KeepitFunny;-;One of the best free to play looking games i have ever played
Spensaur;-;diablo space ninjas..... weapon crafting....armor crafting..............SPACE NINJAS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
The Angel of Death;-;Its is fun but it gets really Repetitive. And there is alot you have to pay for.
fl0wmastr;-;this is a cool game w an alien ninja 3rd person shooter w cool puzzles. i highly recommend it! it's free & comes w steam achievements... so why not?! :)
Welcome To The Rice Fields;-;Warframe is a thirdperson shooter, its a great game to play alone or with your freinds. this is diffrent than other thirdperson shooters each mission takes 30mins to beat at a normal rate. The graphics are great. This game is not to hard nor to easy. the storyline is great! Overall i think anyone who is a fan of thirdperson shooter should hit that download button right away, may the massive world of warframe awiat!
Tact;-;STAY AWAY FROM THIS GAME. It is the most boring, tedious grinding game ever. Just a generic hamster wheel with a hole for your money.
pittman789;-;Like Skyrim but with lasers. 10/10
nyxu;-;I spend more than 500 hours on this. Worth it
illusioN;-;dush vrry phun gehme 3 pley wif frenz i rckomend dish gaheme 3 erryboody n da werld . tank u .
Effin' C.J.;-;You get more than what you pay for, which doesnt say much since you paid nothing. You can buy items with real money, but it still isnt a p2w and most of those items can be aquired without spending a dime. Its a good pass time to play an hour here and there, it does get repetitive, but you cant expect a perfect game when its free and not a p2w.
Icy;-;This game is AMAZING!!! Seriously if you havent got it, then Get it already.
An0n3;-;You think I got this forma for being slow? I got this cause I'm FAAAAAST.
GAME OGRE;-;You ninja things and sometimes win sometimes lose but you lose less when you win and get better and less scrubby, and crafting takes a long  time unless you pay monnies you rich person what do you think because you have money you're better than other space zombie ninjas? Jerk. This has been a professional review by me. Final review score; 9/10 I guess this game is okay.
Sabishi;-;A great online game, love the designe of levels, enemies and weapons. If it just crashes less I would give it a 9. 7/10
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
s3kShUn8;-;Great game, Fun Co-op or solo Tons of weapons to create Plenty of frames to level No shortage of enemies to kill
Tbone;-;Defintely worth playing.
KREEGG;-;"Spandex ninja's in space" - Circumsoldier I'd play that 10/10
Grovesimus;-;This is a good game, it kind of lacks on gunplay, but it`s easy enough to be fun.
Zombit;-;I haven't played much in this game so my review won't be based on the entire gameplay or story elements. I have had only one complaint with the game and it is completely personal opinion. In a similar fashion to other multiplayer FPS games you can rank up your character to unlock more abilities/powers/guns/etc. However in Warframe you have to wait 24 hours before you can rank up your first level. This means you are stuck using the same crap gear while grinding until you can unlock anything else, for at least 24 hours. But that isn't my problem. I can wait 1 day, no biggie. I come back the next day to rank up. First I have to pass a mission in 60 seconds. My newb  fails and now I have to wait another 24 hours... Annoying! I would continue to play and grind using my crap gear but honestly I don't want to. That is my only complaint of what LITTLE I have experienced of Warframe. If that doesn't bother you then there are lots of pros to this game such as; coop multiplayer, tons of variety in character customization, intense fast paced FPS action (technically 3rd person), and many others that I didn't get to. Forcing me into only wanting to play the game for a few minutes every 24 hours just isn't worth my time, personally.
Bubba092;-;Most amazing game i have ever played!
BRONIES SUCK;-;This game..... is just the bees' knees, I mean really and truthfully, it's so damn good for a free to play.
Tankrodeo;-;Abit repetetive at times but you shoud defintley give it a try!
Dragonia;-;Not exactly a co-op game. Game is typically played in teams: yes. But players all charge on ahead solo to try to grab kills. Most of the game is spent chasing down other team members who kill so fast that theres nothing for you to do, or if you get ahead, you kill everything and everyone chases you....
LeifKlover;-;Don't get attached. The game is great. It's amazing. I love it to pieces and then some. The dev's are tight with the community. Things are worked on left and right, up down, sideways, constant update practice weekly for bugfixing and reinforcements (weapons and cosmetics). As of July 2nd, 2014, Perfect World Entertainment has bought outstanding shares from Digital Extremes The clock is ticking. Things are going to be looking very dark from here on out.
KeepeR;-;An interesting game only to a certain extent. After leveling up a few frames, it tend to become very repetitive and one tracked. PVP nothing to shout about, more of whoever has the best mods in weapon wins.
Miyukipedia;-;I seriously just got a login reward that allowed me to get 50% off their premium currency 6/10 - I actually considered it
Justin118;-;ing nice! :D
HerbalOne984;-;your basically an alien assassin that gets missions and does them. FOR FFFFFFFFFFFFFRRRRRRRRRRRRREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE
A Young Fresh Newbie!;-;While I used to enjoy this game greatly, the devs continue to make it more and more absurd to try to unlock any of the new content without paying for it. Walls upon walls of RNG combining together to make it dozens of hours for some of the gear, if you ever see it. Prime equipment and the new warframes are particular offenders of this. Downvoting until I see some real dedication to changing their tactics. Less RNG stacking. Let interesting cosmetics make you money from a happy playerbase that feels it's not just hoping for the dice to roll in their favor. There is no progress in RNG. Just luck.
FizzTheSpaceJanitor;-;best truley amazing a great combat system 10/10 janitor approved
big booty bitch;-;i don't know how to play this game 10/10
StuveTheSteve;-;It gets fun at first until you realize it is the same thing over and over and over and over again. Different planet? same mission but theres snow! the only variety is the bossess and the warframes themselves. If you are someone who plays desinty and like endless grinding and repeating the same thing then this is the game for you but repeats and grinding isnt my thing
gunruner29;-;updates to much
epicaricacy;-;This game is suprisingly fun. Combat is fluid, albeit a bit easy and grindy. Graphics are stunning. Game loses major points because after you pick your first warframe/class you cannot switch without paying real money. In fact doing anything beyond the simply introductory gameplay seems to require real money. Way too much of a cash grab.
Bart;-;Good game, but mostly pay to win.
Sky;-;WELCOME TO DIE
Wolf  #2yearanniversery2morro;-;much good, would reccommend. only downside, you need a good computer to not lag, a windows 7 will lag unless you put the settings right. So in other words, get it, play it, love it.
MagiciaN -SAMURA-;-;This game is just awesome
MaxamusX58;-;Ignore the metascore for this one, this game is just awesome, with space, lasers guns and swords! Furthermore, it is totally free to play and it's just a lot of fun to spend time with, and that's what games are for, right?
solidPEAR;-;Excellent free to play game where the gameplay is all that matters, i mean just look at it great graphics but yet so much optimization going on you could probably run this on a potato (not really but you get me) so it has excellent graphics and artstyle but it also has excelent coop gameplay unsurpased for milions of years to come! 10/10 Would bang and play all day.
Sethithy;-;Space ninjas grinding things. 1942/10
Kazuto ''Kirito'' Kirigaya;-;The new World of Warcraft.
tihac01;-;It's good game.
MedScientist;-;Played for a little bit, its cool.
Neroback;-;Really great game :P
Nukesnipe;-;Shot a guy in the head with a bow and arrow, ripped his torso off and nailed it to a wall fifty feet away. 11/10 it's okay - IGN
Opstand;-;is nice
Tankrodeo;-;Abit repetetive at times but you shoud defintley give it a try!
clckwrkrng;-;The Game Has Crashed Simulator 2015 10 out of 10, would crash again!
ImmortalSausage;-;its pretty sexy so play it
Darkchaosblast;-;If you're looking for a good Free to Play game. Then look give this a try. The game is fun and fast pace, yeah you do the same thing over and over but doesn't mean it's going to be easy like the last. With a tone of Warframes to choose from that may fit you best. This game isn't connected to the Steam Friends List. So you have to find your friends in the game (By asking them what their name is in Warframe). I doubt this helped (or is even a review) but I really do think people should at least give this a go. Also power levels are bull sh*t.
Bart;-;Good game, but mostly pay to win.
King Tim;-;framing the War in Warframe
[92nd] The Weird Gamer;-;So so so bad!!! Spend 5 on the game and you're top of match, So much skill......
Deku in a nutshell;-;The gamestyle and scenery is amazing in this game, the concept is amazing, the tenos and even the grenier concept is just awe-enspiring. But there is one thing that seriously hinders the game and thats the gameplay itself. The ranking is confusing, when you go to melee someone you lunge rediculosly forward with a hard to pinpoint autolock meaning if you miss you're flailing your arms about until you actually see the enemy then you have a chance of hitting them. Stealth in this game is horrable, your guns make a loud noise and you'll have more fun sneaking around the enemies than waiting for them to be vulnerable. To get an item that would be stealthy takes a lot of time to get and by then you're already at the first boss moving on to the second boss. Sprinting and crouching don't mix in this game at all. If you feel that holding to sprint would be nice guess what you have the option but if you chose press to sprint you're flailing about at rediculose speeds, reducing accuracy and precission immensly. The camera shakes around and your character looks around super quickly even with the mouse speed at 25%. Assassinating enemies is not something like you'd find in halo reach or halo 4; the enemies in warframe need to be in a state where they aren't suspecting anything at all and even if you get to their precouse backside while they expect you you cant activate the assassination sequence OR the assassination hitbox is the width of a hair making it relitively impossible to do. While it is a free to play game you can expect long grinding seasons and if you're a lone wolf this can be extremely daunting as the bosses and missions will get repetative over time before you can even reach earth. I'm disapointed greatly that this game had everything I expected but the controls setup along with the new HUD makes it much more harder to pinpoint what the heck you're doing and there for not an enjoyable experiance at all.
GORE;-;its "fun" but gets boring really fast, in this game u can run around with some ppl, shoot and melee enemies. thats about it. it not difficult at all and offers almost no cooperation i felt like the coop mode was more like a race to the finnish. i can tell alot of work was put into the game and it runs smoothly, it really looks like a nice game but after u play a couple levels ull find thats its kinda like the same thing over and over again. i really dont mean to downvote it, its not really a BAD game, i only down voted it because i personally dont enjoy it, its kinda good for a free game, its got alot of customization and main menu stuff but the actual gameplay dispite the graphics can be found in like a internet browser arcade game
hangfire;-;Poor controls, HUD doesn't scale to higher resolutions, and incredibly glitchy mouse movement. I don't know if it's mouse acceleration, but it pretty much made me lose all interest to bother playing in just the tutorial.
Tukiko;-;Do not expect to get anywhere in this game without paying money or putting in way to much time.
Kinjry "You did this to me!";-;Probably one of the wosrt designed games I've ever seen. Much of the gameplay revolves around grinding and farm, which is fine. However, getting new gear, and upgrading to better weapons and items with out having somebody help you skip the normal progression. That "progression" is a very stunted experience. The game honestly expects you to go through probably over a hundred hours of gameplay with your base frame and limited weapon selection of credit purchasable guns. There's some decent frames and gear blueprints early on, but some of the components only drop in areas you won't be seeing for a long time, or drop from bosses. Either case results in a lot of painful, dull grind that just isn't fun. I was lucky to have a friend help me skip this problem, so I got access to a lot of farm I would otherwise not have access too. Now, gaining access to areas to farm for better gear..sounds easy right? Just do missions and progress nav points. Except some of the nav points that aren't option to continue progression actually require multiple players, and are often semi-difficult missions. Me, with my twinked gear could do these missions, but virtually every attempt would fail due to allies who are using awful weapons and frame. OR, getting allies worlds above my level and failing my own role in the level due to being so underleveled. I don't mind that such a mode exists, but making it a mandatory part of normal progression is just stupid. On top of all that, upgrading your rank (which determines what you're allowed to even attempt building) has a test, and pass or fail, there is a 24 hour cool down on doing another test. So there is actually a hard locked limit on how fast you can progress. Some of the tests are also very specifically geared towards certain frames, meaning failure in some of these tests is relatively easy if you're using one of the mostly awful base frames. The game by design just encourages blind farming, and goes out of its way to ruin what little fun can be found by having overall bad design choices. On top of all that, this inhuman farm just results in frames so outrageously overpowered it actually removes all skill aspects to the game. Who wants to farm for almost a thousand hours just to play the game by mashing an AOE attack button that kills 2-3 rooms of enemies? awful game, I was very shocked at just HOW bad this game actually is.
Nightraider;-;Far too unpolished and ugly to bother with at the moment.
Chow;-;Too much grinding. Reminds me of why I quit in January. Epic items are usually pay to get or requires huge amounts of ingame currency. Multiplayer is fun though missions can get repititve and sometimes annoying.
Bluesuits;-;garbage game, $40 for a starter pack? Lol what. Gindfest and you walk through half a level with no enemies and when they do show up they instantly die anyway.
Captain Cornhole;-;It is fun for a little while, but gets old after you grind up to the Tenno and gear you want.
Songbird - WTB New Internet;-;pay2win pay2havefun
r0b0t1c;-;Warframe: F2Grind Warframe is an interesting mix between a third person shooter tied in with a basic xp system and diablo'esk looting. The game handles and looks very well. The gameplay itself is very straight forward. You're given a "warframe" that has specific areas of expertise and play styles. By playing the game you obviously earn xp which allows you to further customer your warframe, weapons, and even a floating companion that can aid you in various capacities. Warframe isn't the only game that suffers from P2BeGood. Inherently this isn't a bad thing for Warframe since it's very PvE focused. With that said it can be very discouraging for new players to feel useless and left out of a lot of the later game content should you not pay to advance yourself. Now obviously there are plenty of folks that did the good ol' grind to the top and good for you if you're one of those players. For the average gamer though I think the grind of progression is fairly steep and adds to that discouragement for new players. The grind isn't even particuarlly rewarding in regards to the actual missions. It almost breaks down to lets run through these missions as quickly as possible over and over again. Why is there that incentive in place? To encourage players to buy platinum? To cover up a thin or non-engaging story line? You'll have to be the judge for yourself. Bottom line for me: If you're the type of player who enjoys a good solid grind for that small light at the end of the tunnel this game may be for you. For those looking for some cheap thrills and a casual experience you may want to find different waters to play in.
[=FEH=] Puma D. Ace;-;Warframe ! Well there is not a lot to say about it! After 40 hours even without discovering the depths of the game I stop. I like: - There are 3 different Warframes from which you can choose one, when you finish the tutorial - There is a tutorial - There is a kind of a story mod with missions like stealth, assassination, defense etc. - You can play almost any mission Co-op - There are around 370 moods to choose from which determine your skills - Your Warframe can choose almost any weapon or mod What I did not like at all: - My game crashes all the time after the new patch (some people have same issues the game offers this solution: https://warframe.com/Hardwarefail?) - The revives in missions are limited per day (there are four) - Crafting good weapons and other stuff takes hours of game play (finding blueprints and the resources) - The first Warframes you can choose from are really bad compared to the others (my opinion) - There is no lvl cap for missions so you have new players or experienced players which just solo the whole game - Almost everything can be bought for real money - There are a lot of game play bugs - Most players don't care about team play All in all I give Warframe a 4/10 mostly because my game is crashing all the time but still in my opinion there is a lot of work that has to be done by the admins and the development crew. Your Flaming Ace
Drunkmc;-;I tried this game for about thirty minutes. I spent most of it in the lobby waitiing for games. One game I had nothing but one jackass telling me to leave, because I did not have something I have no idea what it was. The next it was 1 v 1 and I had no clue what was going on. The game is F2P, but its boring and not intuitive.
Ted;-;I really, really enjoyed my first few hours with the game. The action is fast and fluid, and the early missions are straightforward and fun. However, the difficulty soon spikes to an outrageous degree, and missions become a nightmare of confusing direction and deadly enemies with a mystifying ability to spawn behind you. Coupled with a very, very slow progression scheme that is stingy with new abilities and weapons, which makes it boring, and a generally dark lighting scheme, which makes it hard to see what's going on, I am no longer having fun. Warframe had an amazing opportunity to be great. Its fundamentals are solid. But it comes from the school of "make people pay to advance faster" school of thought, rather than "we'll make it so fun people will be happy to spend money" perspective. Thumbs down.
Canton;-;Congratulations on the worst readability indexed game I've spent time on since Eve Online. Another free to grind mess that is more effort to figure out that it is worth to bother with.
Velhenn Valron;-;One of the worst economic model out there which feels almost like a punishement. The game needs you to pay a little bit to have a decent experience. Now economics aside, the games looks good and feels good. But the overall lack of content and the repetitiveness makes it a bit boring on the long run.
sSsnoopers;-;Difficult to understand layout, very unclear on any basic mission objective as the game just throws you in battle and refrains from telling you how to do anything but walk and shoot. I feel like in order to be half as good at this game as anyone else I have to spend too much time on it or i have to buy everything. very good movements and gameplay but I just can't see myself being a fulltime player
Dezasta Senpai;-;Nice game, nice graphics. "Free to play" sure.
Fwuffy Foxeh;-;It started out rather excellent, beautifully designed and fast paced; full of interesting action. Very quickly this degraded to utter repetition and hours of grinding for gear that would become useless once something better came out. Don't get me wrong, it can be fun, but it's not as engaging as it could have been.
Invictus;-;Well.. This game was fun in the start, but then it just starts getting boring. You cannot play more than 4 hours of this without realizing that you can find alot better free2play games than this. 4/10
Seba6519;-;i think this game is a little bit boring, but theres so many other games i can play
AmyTheCat;-;I used to love this game. i've been playing since it was first released and it was amazing. but the 1.8 beta patch changed too much. and screwed over the older players. our amazing gear and suits lost that awesomeness and the game became pay-to-win. all in all it is a good game but not something i would recommend
superconfusionbros;-;really why do we have to get a ing verification email.i mean just...why
HeliusFlame;-;Every update make the game worse. and now you can buy everything in the game for cash. so there is no progression, you can buy anything you need form other players. and it's not even PvP, so the progression was all the gameplay.. and now it's gone.
BenTheMildlyCool;-;I decided to put off playing this game to stare at a much more interesting beige wall.
BenTheMildlyCool;-;I decided to put off playing this game to stare at a much more interesting beige wall.
Ma3laa> :o3;-;its like having cancer
matthewami;-;Awesome gameplay, but these guys are really greedy! inless you feel like grinding the same maps for like 40hrs to get tot he next place, youre not gonna be getting a new weapon or suit unless you pay atleast $20. Also, no one plays this game from what i can see. i was waiting in a room for like 20min waiting for someone to come around, but no one came. the levels are designed for atleast one other person, else all what happens is that you run outta ammo (since the starter stuff is so scrub that it takes 1/10 of your ammo to put one guy down). dont even try to download this guys, all they'll do is nickel and dime you untill you figure out that the free running os gitchy and unrefined.
Gul'damn;-;I hate to say this, but Warframe just isn't fun to play. I liked the concept at first, and put a couple of hours into it, but it's just... droll. The gameplay is repetitive, and the downtime between combat is mind numbingly boring. I do like the exploration available within levels, but the lackluster combat is a huge turn off. It's not exactly p2w, since you aren't competing against other people, but the best weapons and Warframes can be purchased for real money, and in some cases this is the only way to get those items. If the gameplay gets any better in the future, I may reconsider, but for now, Warframe doesn't get a recommendation from me.
Sailor Mars;-;this game is a hit and miss for me I really like space themed games with thrown in sy-fy like the next person but.............. This games problems lay in the fact your team mates will teleport due to latency issues The maps are kinda too big the maps i have take me 2-3 hours just to complete them repetition most of this game is just centered around the same enimies
Genocidocles;-;The game has been steadily going downhill for months now.
sofiloteo;-;So much potential for a good game right here and almost palpable, but wasted by bad dev choices. This game has turned in to a cashgrab. Artificial periodical nerfs to push new market weapons into players. Complete disregard of player effort to build up top tier items when new fotm stuff is introduced. It is a fun game up to a point, but when you start to really get into it, its like opening a huge can of worms.
Bumblechubs;-;Other than the developer incompetence, the endless grind, the lack of end-game content [or really, any fun content], and the power creep that makes Magic: The Gathering blush and get a little moist, there's not much to talk about in this game. Sure, it looks pretty, the art design is one of the few things they got right, especially if you like weapons copied from each other, or just given a couple gold plates and considered a whole new weapon. A year ago I put a hundred dollars into Warframe, hoping that it would grow up and be a good game. Instead, every time I joke about the worst move they could make they up the ante even further. If you have a couple friends, and you want to shoot dudes for a bit? Sure, go ahead. If you want to invest time and money, there are a million other shooters out there, often ones that don't hide behind 'it's a beta' while heavily monetizing every single aspect of the game.
Spaniel;-;If you aren't willing to dump youur entire wallet into this game I would recommend not buying this game. I'm not saying it is impossible to buy things with in game money but it iis difficult and the gameplay is entirely not laid out well. I had a fun first couple of days with it but became very monotonous with each level and I became very irritated slowly realizing that this was a pay to win game.
Resaec;-;My opinion: For people seeing this game grow from start: got to confusing For people geting in new: to confusing to beat high level It is called Demage-System 2.0... And it has ruined this game for me. Every Enemy-Type has its own weaknesses and resistances. So far so good. But you can not say: Greneer in general is most of the time weak against "this", infestet is weak against "that". Noo, near every single enemy ( 2 or 3 are one group ) are weak against this and that, but this one out of that group is resistant gainst what all others from this group are weak against. WTF? Why did you rip the ease of this game out and pour in pure tactics not beat able by the style of the game? But! not enouth. About 6 months ago, in this game ( where it was a third person shooter and a hack and slash mix ) you could raid a level 32 planet solo. It was tricky but possible. The difficulty of the enemy has been multiplyed by ~2.0-3.2. A player with a tenno on level 30 you can fight enemies at level 25 if you are insane. As i started playing again i thouht: Dont push to had, start with a level 25 planet as i could defeat these with ease befor. I had no chance and died all 4 times possible per day in this very first mission. After not playing Warframe for about 6 months because of a false ban by using Nvidia's 3DTV Play (that was right after they activated the AC... i never got an apology), i try it again. With about 60 houres of playtime, i was quite used to its nice and easy style of combat. Now, after playing 12 missions i'm close to stop playing again. I can not tell for every one. But as starting a new is not possible in this game, it is unbeatable hard. I will try a little longer and change my mind if there is just a smal thing blocking me from having fun again. If not, reconsider playing a game changing so much to the worse ;(
marmarmar34;-;Just play Harvest Moon. At least you have more progression with that kind of farming.
Tangent;-;The game is shallow. There is NOTHING more than grind to this game besides a nice production value. The new player experience is horrendous due to new players being unable to obtain the items required to progress in the game.Warframe is exclusively stats over skill, and it shows everywhere in the game. Enemies are nothing more than dumb bullet sponges that grow even more bloated as you progress through the game. Warframes reliance on cheap RNG to extend it's shallow depth is abhorrent, and fills nearly every part of the game. While RNG in a game is understandable, at times, Warframes over reliance sends it on a nose dive into inevitable mediocrity. The best example of this abused RNG is the Hydroid Warframe. Normally to get a new Warframe you are required to beat a boss several times until you get their parts. While this is somewhat reasonable, Warframe's poster child of update 13 requires you to first: Hunt down specific enemies that rarely spawn on a specific planet. These enemies have a random elemental weakness that you cannot predict, and are very resistant to all other damage types. Defeating these enemies causes them to drop a beacon, one of five types that take different amounts. These beacons are than crafted into a one time use key that allows you to fight a boss ONCE. Once you have beaten the boss you than get a random part of the frame, but the game never takes into account the parts you already have leaving you often with a part you already have.Beyond this you are now stuck farming for about one to two hours. Before another hour of building the key. Finally getting to fight a fifteen minute battle that leaves you likely with a part you already have. With the introduction of "tier 4" keys RNG has become even worse. Upon it's release (along with a new "prime Warframe" ) the drop tables for the tier 4 missions were heavily bloated with up to twenty items being duplicated. All to dilute the drop tables and ensure player take longer to get the items they want. Warframe lacks any compensation for player skill. Enemies often have instant knockdown attacks with little to no telegraphing. Energy leach enemies that instantly remove all of your ability energy without any warning or effect they have. Rare enemies with rare drops that only seem to appear when a certain faction has taken over one specific level ( certain crawlers for those who are familiar ). Player progression through the game is merely tracked by how much the p0layer has used weapons, and often this "mastery rank" is completely irrelevant to play. New players being taxied to end game levels to get items they cannot progress through the game without (orokin cells for that Seer is a nice example ). In closing, welcome to WarFarm: Grinding simulator 2014.
Scruff;-;i played his game for about five hours and i swear i done the same mission over and over again. when you first start it doesnt even give you a tutorial on how to make your characters or how to use mods effectively or anything. nobody works together. in my opinion okay game but way too repetitive
Warkarma;-;To be honest, there are like few good free to play games and this one is not it. Pay to win, or get some in game stuff.... Also Boring as hell. All you do is just run around in very dark rooms and shoot.
Avery;-;My friends said that i would be playing this "Space Ninja-ish" game, he said that they were naked but when i play they have this armor on... i am still yet to find out how to remove this, maybe we can get a Naked mod like in Skyrim, pls DE hurry up and fix this so i can thumbs up :D p.s. the female characters have big butts... this is no lie
PrimeBot;-;same thing every level. did not like
Commissar Leminski;-;Slide on the floor and use super powers to fight the same three types of enemies across a solar system of narrow hallways and bright colors. Warframe is a mix of most every sci-fi shooter game from the past decade and did prove amusing in parties with friends; however the amusement was short lived. Limited levels and enemy types accompanied by lengthy grinding caused me to burn out rather fast on the title. There are also pay to win weapons, thankfully the game is cooperative; however this will not stop public players from joining a game and stealing all the drops. NOTE: I did spend 55hours with this game, and I'm told the developers plan to release many more things including an open world play mode.
@Pakmuda;-;The game was great but i cannot backup to play with my friends and my father also want play for a few seconds..Please fix up the backup
DARKSTAR537;-;dont get me wrong here this game is fun but it is the most annoying game i ever played. for starters the game developers use most of the game levels almost every time including dialogue. its the most annoying repetitive nonsence i've ever listened to in a game for the past year also i'd like to point out the combat. for starter's sword combat blows so hard because when ever you tried to attack head on the enemy is like "yeah right like that sword is going to hit me i'm gonna slap it out of yo hand" COMPLETE BS. I'd give this game 5\10 not great not horrenous.
Jet fuel can't melt dank memes;-;Good game, no pay to win aspects, bit of a grind but gameplay is heaps fun so easy to see past it, easily in the top 3 best free to play games.
Sailor Mars;-;this game is a hit and miss for me I really like space themed games with thrown in sy-fy like the next person but.............. This games problems lay in the fact your team mates will teleport due to latency issues The maps are kinda too big the maps i have take me 2-3 hours just to complete them repetition most of this game is just centered around the same enimies
Genocidocles;-;The game has been steadily going downhill for months now.
sofiloteo;-;So much potential for a good game right here and almost palpable, but wasted by bad dev choices. This game has turned in to a cashgrab. Artificial periodical nerfs to push new market weapons into players. Complete disregard of player effort to build up top tier items when new fotm stuff is introduced. It is a fun game up to a point, but when you start to really get into it, its like opening a huge can of worms.
Bumblechubs;-;Other than the developer incompetence, the endless grind, the lack of end-game content [or really, any fun content], and the power creep that makes Magic: The Gathering blush and get a little moist, there's not much to talk about in this game. Sure, it looks pretty, the art design is one of the few things they got right, especially if you like weapons copied from each other, or just given a couple gold plates and considered a whole new weapon. A year ago I put a hundred dollars into Warframe, hoping that it would grow up and be a good game. Instead, every time I joke about the worst move they could make they up the ante even further. If you have a couple friends, and you want to shoot dudes for a bit? Sure, go ahead. If you want to invest time and money, there are a million other shooters out there, often ones that don't hide behind 'it's a beta' while heavily monetizing every single aspect of the game.
Spaniel;-;If you aren't willing to dump youur entire wallet into this game I would recommend not buying this game. I'm not saying it is impossible to buy things with in game money but it iis difficult and the gameplay is entirely not laid out well. I had a fun first couple of days with it but became very monotonous with each level and I became very irritated slowly realizing that this was a pay to win game.
Resaec;-;My opinion: For people seeing this game grow from start: got to confusing For people geting in new: to confusing to beat high level It is called Demage-System 2.0... And it has ruined this game for me. Every Enemy-Type has its own weaknesses and resistances. So far so good. But you can not say: Greneer in general is most of the time weak against "this", infestet is weak against "that". Noo, near every single enemy ( 2 or 3 are one group ) are weak against this and that, but this one out of that group is resistant gainst what all others from this group are weak against. WTF? Why did you rip the ease of this game out and pour in pure tactics not beat able by the style of the game? But! not enouth. About 6 months ago, in this game ( where it was a third person shooter and a hack and slash mix ) you could raid a level 32 planet solo. It was tricky but possible. The difficulty of the enemy has been multiplyed by ~2.0-3.2. A player with a tenno on level 30 you can fight enemies at level 25 if you are insane. As i started playing again i thouht: Dont push to had, start with a level 25 planet as i could defeat these with ease befor. I had no chance and died all 4 times possible per day in this very first mission. After not playing Warframe for about 6 months because of a false ban by using Nvidia's 3DTV Play (that was right after they activated the AC... i never got an apology), i try it again. With about 60 houres of playtime, i was quite used to its nice and easy style of combat. Now, after playing 12 missions i'm close to stop playing again. I can not tell for every one. But as starting a new is not possible in this game, it is unbeatable hard. I will try a little longer and change my mind if there is just a smal thing blocking me from having fun again. If not, reconsider playing a game changing so much to the worse ;(
marmarmar34;-;Just play Harvest Moon. At least you have more progression with that kind of farming.
Tangent;-;The game is shallow. There is NOTHING more than grind to this game besides a nice production value. The new player experience is horrendous due to new players being unable to obtain the items required to progress in the game.Warframe is exclusively stats over skill, and it shows everywhere in the game. Enemies are nothing more than dumb bullet sponges that grow even more bloated as you progress through the game. Warframes reliance on cheap RNG to extend it's shallow depth is abhorrent, and fills nearly every part of the game. While RNG in a game is understandable, at times, Warframes over reliance sends it on a nose dive into inevitable mediocrity. The best example of this abused RNG is the Hydroid Warframe. Normally to get a new Warframe you are required to beat a boss several times until you get their parts. While this is somewhat reasonable, Warframe's poster child of update 13 requires you to first: Hunt down specific enemies that rarely spawn on a specific planet. These enemies have a random elemental weakness that you cannot predict, and are very resistant to all other damage types. Defeating these enemies causes them to drop a beacon, one of five types that take different amounts. These beacons are than crafted into a one time use key that allows you to fight a boss ONCE. Once you have beaten the boss you than get a random part of the frame, but the game never takes into account the parts you already have leaving you often with a part you already have.Beyond this you are now stuck farming for about one to two hours. Before another hour of building the key. Finally getting to fight a fifteen minute battle that leaves you likely with a part you already have. With the introduction of "tier 4" keys RNG has become even worse. Upon it's release (along with a new "prime Warframe" ) the drop tables for the tier 4 missions were heavily bloated with up to twenty items being duplicated. All to dilute the drop tables and ensure player take longer to get the items they want. Warframe lacks any compensation for player skill. Enemies often have instant knockdown attacks with little to no telegraphing. Energy leach enemies that instantly remove all of your ability energy without any warning or effect they have. Rare enemies with rare drops that only seem to appear when a certain faction has taken over one specific level ( certain crawlers for those who are familiar ). Player progression through the game is merely tracked by how much the p0layer has used weapons, and often this "mastery rank" is completely irrelevant to play. New players being taxied to end game levels to get items they cannot progress through the game without (orokin cells for that Seer is a nice example ). In closing, welcome to WarFarm: Grinding simulator 2014.
Scruff;-;i played his game for about five hours and i swear i done the same mission over and over again. when you first start it doesnt even give you a tutorial on how to make your characters or how to use mods effectively or anything. nobody works together. in my opinion okay game but way too repetitive
Warkarma;-;To be honest, there are like few good free to play games and this one is not it. Pay to win, or get some in game stuff.... Also Boring as hell. All you do is just run around in very dark rooms and shoot.
clckwrkrng;-;The Game Has Crashed Simulator 2015 10 out of 10, would crash again!
MrBang;-;its the worst game ever because its only hackers or lvl 100. you die in like 1 shoot. and the game is really slow.
chicken pot pie;-;To start off, If you aren't looking to chop of the alien balls of your interstellar foes then you are in the wrong place. Gameplay: You can kill just about anything anyway you'd like. The possiblilities are endless and completely up to your decisionmaking skills. I cannot explain the endless hours of farming for Corpus heads that I have taken, beheaded using something called the "Dakra Prime". That  already sounds like you'd become a stripper to afford. Second of all, I've thrown multiple days at this game to really get that weapon of your dreams. Doge: You get a doge a space doge doge/10 420/69 or if you are not a doge fanboy then they give you a little companion cube that floats next to you and shoots bullets that eventually will crush the foes at lvl 1 back in the day. Why you should give sell your soul to the DEs of Warframe? This is the question I always get asked and I must enlighten those out there who think this F2P game trend makes the games bad. Give this game its deserved 100 hours that may feel forever because the start is the hardest. It is very limited for beginners and makes it a jagged road to walk on, but trust me. I dragged my balls across a billion light years of broken glass called T4 to get my first loki prime piece and oh baby the feels were real. As the warframe's version of Cortana announces that I'm officially a pimp and I should probably go and get me mum and me camera. This is worth your time and once you launch off your first good amount of well earned hours that need all your blood sweat and tears. You will be so ing addicted and the high will be worth the pain. Sell your soul.
TheKiller_01;-;This game is very fun once you start it but it gets more boring after a large amount of play time. Everything comes fairly repetetive. The game has decent graphics and good animations what makes the game looks fairly pretty. But when you look at the other stuff it becomes less interesting I find. The movement is bad. The combat is fairly annoying at times and the missions can become extremely confusing and even more when you get put into a mission with people who rush it. A lot of microtransactions but there is always an option of not spending a coin to them. Its good that it is a Free-to-play game. I would not have played this game if it charged money.
Orpheotitus;-;I want to get this out of the way: I do not hate WARFRAME. I hate the lack of realized potential. I could go on and on about why I decided not to recommend the game, but I'll try to keep this short for the sake of convenience. When you first begin your new life of farming and grinding, the game seems incredibly promising, but trust me when I say that the first two or three planets are the most fun you're going to have in your warframe career. The problem stems from a distinct lack of anything to work towards. The closest thing Warframe has to an "end game" is a collection of missions that can be accessed with single-use keys that each have to be farmed individually. You're looking at roughly 10 minutes of gameplay for each key. "Only 10 minutes? That's not too bad!" SCREW YOU, TIM! LET ME FINISH MY ARGUMENT! Each of these keys may or may not get you the item you've been hunting for the past six or seven godamn weeks because the loot tables are utter bullcrap. Nothing quite beats that feeling of completing a lifeless "murder everything in your path" mission after grinding for an hour to get that specific key, hoping to find that final piece you need for the amazing weapon you just HAVE to have only to look at the rewards screen and see that you recieved... wait for it... ...ANOTHER LATRON BARREL!! HOLY CRAP!!! A LATRON BARREL?! AWESOME!!! NOW YOU CAN ADD THAT ONE TO THE POOL OF 73 THAT YOU ALREADY OWN BECAUSE YOU'RE NOT SELLING THEM SO THAT YOU CAN GET ACCURATE STATISTICS TO PROVE A POINT IN A GAME REVIEW THAT YOU'RE LATER GOING TO WRITE TO CONDEMN THE VERY THING YOU'VE JUST DONE!!! 'GRATZ!! In all seriousness, if you're looking for a mindless game to keep yourself entertained with, Warframe isn't bad. But if you want a good third-person shooter with strategic elements and cool abilities, go play Mass-Effect, because you won't find what you're looking for here. The whole game is spent charging off into bases full of generic enemies that make Dynasty Warrior mobs look like freaking Kratos, killing most of them with a quick shot to the groin because that's the only way you've managed to keep yourself entertained for this long. Look at my hours. I'm not some new player who had a bad first experience. I've been playing since update 6. I'm a member of the now-defunct design council. I know what I'm talking about here. So believe me when I make these final few points: 1) The devs don't care about veteran players. If you've been playing for as long as I have, you know that most of the updates to the game are just to add newer shiny stuff in to try to grow the player base. There's no reason for older players to stay at all, aside from the always fun activity of staring at a chat box in mild nostalgia, remembering when you had hopes for this title. 2) The power balance is crap. I'm talking about the actual frame balance, not the train-wreck of a weapon list. There are warframes that are NEVER USED because they really have no place in the game. I can't remember the last time I saw a Banshee or Vauban, but there's never a single mission in which one of the four players isn't a Rhino or a Nova. 3) There has been absolutely zero ingenuity in any of the bosses. Each boss is just a patience test. With the exception of Zanuka, who actually requires a bit of planning, all you do is run around, shooting them until they stop taking damage, wait a few seconds, then repeat. None of them are particularly difficult either. Most can be 2 or 3 shot with end-game weapons. There are quite a few more reasons that I wouldn't recommend the game to anybody I cared about, but those I've already stated are the most glaring. Feel free to ignore this and hate on my assessment if you want. Just give it time. Sooner or later you'll realize that, despite having the potential to be an amazing gaming experience, Warframe has just wasted away into mediocrity. Good luck!
Mayuyu;-;As much as I enjoy the game, I hate the game developer for not putting too much effort in it. I've played for 5-6 months. It could be fun if you have a lot of friends but things keep being repeated everyday. DE get new things everyday but not enough, barely to keep the game fresh. You pass Mastery rank 8 and that's pretty much everything I can own in this game. I can recommend playing this if you want a co-op, fast, fun game but not recommend if you hate doing same stuff everytime. Pros: - Fun, nice action - 4 player co-op - Decent graphics - Space ninjas, bows, kunai... - Definitely not pay to win (you can pay to get some unique stuff) - No major bugs Cons: - Connection is pretty stupid. Sometimes you have to wait for so long (4-5 mins) then "Connection to the host has been lost" appears - "Ninja plays free" but DE recently gave players a lot of beam gun and stuff, not many ninja weapons - Warframe does not scale to late game - Too much farming - Weapons so unbalanced - Little update everytime, Archwing not enjoyable as expected Although I don't recommend the game but it was one of the best F2P I have played. I'd give a 8/10
Augie The Gaming Quilava;-;Is crap at letting you sign up and play and when first attempt to sign in fails will block your IP address...
Walter White;-;Positive: +the game is good +the soundtracks are good +The Graphics is AWESOME Negative: -Too Many Updates -it gets a little boring for a while -Pay 2 Play For me i enjoyed the game for a while then always comes the updates and it keeps wasting ur time. u need a lot of money to get awesome items. IF U HAVE A LOT OF TIME AND MONEY STOP READING AND PLAY THIS GAME!!!!
Stelf;-;Cool game A little bit like Halo and mass effect together but free and MP! Realy Recommend this game!
Joel Hole~;-;well..warframe is all grinding..the devs arent the greatest, its super repetitive, the "mini games" are impossible, the community is bad, and they always have some new warframe or wepons right after you wasted your time making the older ones, and its pay to win-for instance, you cant just make weapons or warframes, you have to wait 12 hours to 3 days for things or pay to complete it faster, and they are making thing harder and harder to get so you will give up your cash, and there are some things you cant even get without paying money, like some exclusive stuff or special armor and before you just gathered a few recources to make the weapons, but now its like you gotta make these dual pistols to make these dual pistols, and to make dual pistols to make the new dual pistols you need a pistol to make 1 of the pistols and you need 2 of those pistols to make the dual pistols to make the new dual pistols! Its ridiculous! that was confusing wasnt it..well, id give the game a 4/10 at the most...
Kitt;-;-shudders- grindy, so grindy! the grind is so bad, it killed my inner child. i cut this out of my life like a malignant tumor. only way for me to get back into the game is to pay me.
King Tim;-;framing the War in Warframe
[92nd] The Weird Gamer;-;So so so bad!!! Spend 5 on the game and you're top of match, So much skill......
twitch.tv/Envro;-;Fun game, hard to navigate now though. Rating: 8/10
RetroGuy;-;its okay, but its not groundbreaking. some weapons require platinum, and you pretty much dont get any without buying some. also, the level design is repeated and makes you feel like you are playing the same thing over and over.
Deathcall [WG];-;I cant play beceause of a internet conection problem that i cant fix.
TheLastDinner;-;bqwhdqwdbqwd i hate this game
Nocticon;-;This game is nothing more than an overly difficult bug-ridden grindfest. stay away.
chicken pot pie;-;To start off, If you aren't looking to chop of the alien balls of your interstellar foes then you are in the wrong place. Gameplay: You can kill just about anything anyway you'd like. The possiblilities are endless and completely up to your decisionmaking skills. I cannot explain the endless hours of farming for Corpus heads that I have taken, beheaded using something called the "Dakra Prime". That  already sounds like you'd become a stripper to afford. Second of all, I've thrown multiple days at this game to really get that weapon of your dreams. Doge: You get a doge a space doge doge/10 420/69 or if you are not a doge fanboy then they give you a little companion cube that floats next to you and shoots bullets that eventually will crush the foes at lvl 1 back in the day. Why you should give sell your soul to the DEs of Warframe? This is the question I always get asked and I must enlighten those out there who think this F2P game trend makes the games bad. Give this game its deserved 100 hours that may feel forever because the start is the hardest. It is very limited for beginners and makes it a jagged road to walk on, but trust me. I dragged my balls across a billion light years of broken glass called T4 to get my first loki prime piece and oh baby the feels were real. As the warframe's version of Cortana announces that I'm officially a pimp and I should probably go and get me mum and me camera. This is worth your time and once you launch off your first good amount of well earned hours that need all your blood sweat and tears. You will be so ing addicted and the high will be worth the pain. Sell your soul.
TheKiller_01;-;This game is very fun once you start it but it gets more boring after a large amount of play time. Everything comes fairly repetetive. The game has decent graphics and good animations what makes the game looks fairly pretty. But when you look at the other stuff it becomes less interesting I find. The movement is bad. The combat is fairly annoying at times and the missions can become extremely confusing and even more when you get put into a mission with people who rush it. A lot of microtransactions but there is always an option of not spending a coin to them. Its good that it is a Free-to-play game. I would not have played this game if it charged money.
Orpheotitus;-;I want to get this out of the way: I do not hate WARFRAME. I hate the lack of realized potential. I could go on and on about why I decided not to recommend the game, but I'll try to keep this short for the sake of convenience. When you first begin your new life of farming and grinding, the game seems incredibly promising, but trust me when I say that the first two or three planets are the most fun you're going to have in your warframe career. The problem stems from a distinct lack of anything to work towards. The closest thing Warframe has to an "end game" is a collection of missions that can be accessed with single-use keys that each have to be farmed individually. You're looking at roughly 10 minutes of gameplay for each key. "Only 10 minutes? That's not too bad!" SCREW YOU, TIM! LET ME FINISH MY ARGUMENT! Each of these keys may or may not get you the item you've been hunting for the past six or seven godamn weeks because the loot tables are utter bullcrap. Nothing quite beats that feeling of completing a lifeless "murder everything in your path" mission after grinding for an hour to get that specific key, hoping to find that final piece you need for the amazing weapon you just HAVE to have only to look at the rewards screen and see that you recieved... wait for it... ...ANOTHER LATRON BARREL!! HOLY CRAP!!! A LATRON BARREL?! AWESOME!!! NOW YOU CAN ADD THAT ONE TO THE POOL OF 73 THAT YOU ALREADY OWN BECAUSE YOU'RE NOT SELLING THEM SO THAT YOU CAN GET ACCURATE STATISTICS TO PROVE A POINT IN A GAME REVIEW THAT YOU'RE LATER GOING TO WRITE TO CONDEMN THE VERY THING YOU'VE JUST DONE!!! 'GRATZ!! In all seriousness, if you're looking for a mindless game to keep yourself entertained with, Warframe isn't bad. But if you want a good third-person shooter with strategic elements and cool abilities, go play Mass-Effect, because you won't find what you're looking for here. The whole game is spent charging off into bases full of generic enemies that make Dynasty Warrior mobs look like freaking Kratos, killing most of them with a quick shot to the groin because that's the only way you've managed to keep yourself entertained for this long. Look at my hours. I'm not some new player who had a bad first experience. I've been playing since update 6. I'm a member of the now-defunct design council. I know what I'm talking about here. So believe me when I make these final few points: 1) The devs don't care about veteran players. If you've been playing for as long as I have, you know that most of the updates to the game are just to add newer shiny stuff in to try to grow the player base. There's no reason for older players to stay at all, aside from the always fun activity of staring at a chat box in mild nostalgia, remembering when you had hopes for this title. 2) The power balance is crap. I'm talking about the actual frame balance, not the train-wreck of a weapon list. There are warframes that are NEVER USED because they really have no place in the game. I can't remember the last time I saw a Banshee or Vauban, but there's never a single mission in which one of the four players isn't a Rhino or a Nova. 3) There has been absolutely zero ingenuity in any of the bosses. Each boss is just a patience test. With the exception of Zanuka, who actually requires a bit of planning, all you do is run around, shooting them until they stop taking damage, wait a few seconds, then repeat. None of them are particularly difficult either. Most can be 2 or 3 shot with end-game weapons. There are quite a few more reasons that I wouldn't recommend the game to anybody I cared about, but those I've already stated are the most glaring. Feel free to ignore this and hate on my assessment if you want. Just give it time. Sooner or later you'll realize that, despite having the potential to be an amazing gaming experience, Warframe has just wasted away into mediocrity. Good luck!
Mayuyu;-;As much as I enjoy the game, I hate the game developer for not putting too much effort in it. I've played for 5-6 months. It could be fun if you have a lot of friends but things keep being repeated everyday. DE get new things everyday but not enough, barely to keep the game fresh. You pass Mastery rank 8 and that's pretty much everything I can own in this game. I can recommend playing this if you want a co-op, fast, fun game but not recommend if you hate doing same stuff everytime. Pros: - Fun, nice action - 4 player co-op - Decent graphics - Space ninjas, bows, kunai... - Definitely not pay to win (you can pay to get some unique stuff) - No major bugs Cons: - Connection is pretty stupid. Sometimes you have to wait for so long (4-5 mins) then "Connection to the host has been lost" appears - "Ninja plays free" but DE recently gave players a lot of beam gun and stuff, not many ninja weapons - Warframe does not scale to late game - Too much farming - Weapons so unbalanced - Little update everytime, Archwing not enjoyable as expected Although I don't recommend the game but it was one of the best F2P I have played. I'd give a 8/10
Augie The Gaming Quilava;-;Is crap at letting you sign up and play and when first attempt to sign in fails will block your IP address...
Walter White;-;Positive: +the game is good +the soundtracks are good +The Graphics is AWESOME Negative: -Too Many Updates -it gets a little boring for a while -Pay 2 Play For me i enjoyed the game for a while then always comes the updates and it keeps wasting ur time. u need a lot of money to get awesome items. IF U HAVE A LOT OF TIME AND MONEY STOP READING AND PLAY THIS GAME!!!!
twitch.tv/Envro;-;Fun game, hard to navigate now though. Rating: 8/10
RetroGuy;-;its okay, but its not groundbreaking. some weapons require platinum, and you pretty much dont get any without buying some. also, the level design is repeated and makes you feel like you are playing the same thing over and over.
ykorigin;-;the game is always crashing! and geetting stucked all the time so please help because it's freaking me out and this is annoying!
Inkary;-;Have a mercy for your soul.
B a i n;-;My first reaction: HOLY  SPACE NINJAS! THIS IS AWESOME! After 40+ hours of playing:  this putrid diarrhea . Difficulty does not scale with number of players. Most missions are extremely difficult alone, by design. Good luck finding people playing the mission you need help with, everyone is busy farming the same few missions over and over again. Good luck progressing through the main quests. 6/10 on a good day, that's the best I can do.
Exocet;-;Game is very hard to get into. Very few things are explained to new players, and if they are it is done poorly (see Damage 2.0, mods). It requires extensive reading into wikis and other outside of game sources just to get going. Even being a F2P game, the grinding is ridiculous. I can't recommend this game to anyone.
PuppyCuddle;-;Pay to Win game at its core.
Pyrhhus;-;This game... this is my new and truly favourite game above Team Fortress 2, above Battlefield 3 (not Call of Duty, screw CoD) and above all else. Warframe perfects everything - from the advanced, tactical and utterly awe-inspiring combat to the modification, leveling and hub systems to the futuristic soldier-samurai-ninja guardian of the solar system that you become. I have only two problems with the game. The parkour; for the most part, it's incredibly badass as you vault over railings and wallrun across chasms before slicing your way through an entire army of Corpus soldiers, but sometimes it's annoying (for example, one of the Grineer maps) when you have to do something that takes about six tries to complete. Fortunately, they fixed the specific issue I mentioned by adding a slightly more hidden and far easier passage. Secondly, the crafting system - I've played this game for, what, 10 hours or so and I've improved my current gear to no end, but it's rather difficult to craft new weaponry for yourself considering the majority of the things I particularly wanted (and hopefully aren't even that OP) were on planets about a lightyear or so away. At least it allows you to mod your weapons or warframe so they become pretty damn good even without that new weapon or frame you want. All in all, I'd say this is a masterpiece for people who enjoy Crysis, Halo, being a Power Ranger, ninjas and others running round the solar system bisecting people shooting at you with a futuristic katana before your teammates massacre the remaining opposing forces. Masterpiece.
Rebarts;-;Good gameplay,good graphics. Overall is satisfying.
nailgrinder;-;This game is very repetitive and boreing. DO NOT INSTALL!
firemonkey;-;Well... if you don't mind DE randomly banning your accts simply because you mention in the forums that they cant seem to release a patch thats worth a damn. And you don't mind your game being constantly broken crashing and or unbearably unbalanced every other week ya sure its great.
MR. GOOD GUY;-;It's a free2play cooperative 3rd person space ninja simulator with a fair business model and flashy graphics.worth the try and very fun with friends.worth the try
Pure;-;8/10 This game has been in beta for over a year and it has updates every month. New guns, new warframes, new maps. I can't think of any game that makes new classes in such a short period of time. It is a fun game and is better with friends. It is very grindy endgame though.
Sleepyhead;-;Another F2P skinner box that barely qualifies as a MMO, with each major update the developers continue to dilute the drop tables, nerf abilities and game mechanics that they decide doesn't fit in with their idea of good gameplay, and continuously introducing new "content" that would be nice if it actually provided more than maybe a day (at most) of content to actually go through. Instead of addressing the problems with the content they shove into this game and expect you, the player, to bugtest; because this game is STILL IN BETA, Digital Extremes rather just ignore the glaring problems because there are still people dumb enough to waste money on this game for fancy accessories and the latest items so they don't have to suffer the awful RNG. At best you can expect this game to be a fun casual grinding experience but if you have half a brain you'll likely begin to realize how flawed Warframe is the more you play it.
Bukan Bodil;-;You can learn how to be a businessman from this game. The game is awesome, the graphic was great and it doesn't need high end pc to run it, and the trading site is the best. Already got about 1000 plat ( or $49.99 worth ) from the trading site.
Nikolai's Vodka;-;My personal Warframe experience: >See this  >Looks amazing >Hear that it is amazing + a grindfest but whatever >Download >Takes three hours >Probably my  Interwebs anyway >Click play to see an agreement, agreement, agreement, etc... >Oh  here comes awesome >Nope >Download random  for two hours >Alrighty then >"LOGIN" "SIGN UP" >Oh I see >Sign up >Load first mission/intro/tutorial for about half an hour >Finally start playing >Wait >Cutscene lag >Here we go >Ninja flip out of a sci-fi cocoon >Flip takes a full two minutes >Cutscene takes ten minutes >thisisunacceptable.jpeg >Game freezes on weird  telling me to press 1 >Literally repeat entire process twice >Only progress was bringing framerate up to 2FPS after fully lowering every graphic setting >Uninstall >At least there was some cool looking guy breathing fire on the longest loading screen >1/10
Sterling Archer;-;N*ggas play free.
Harukage;-;Realy good game. Simply fenomenal free-to-play title. Nice style, interesting seting, great visuals. There is simply nothing not to love in this game.
Rin The Blade;-;Great game,extremely fun the customization and modifications you can do to both your warframe and weapons make it fun to be yourself, the mechanics are really nice for a F2P,no P2W here,unless you want color palletes and other decorative items, this game will keep you entangled for more then 500 hours.
NullDevil;-;I used to enjoy this game quite a bit, but not so much now. The amount of time you need to put into this game is insane just to get a few parts for a weapon due to the over saturation in certain areas of the game. Practically everything in this game is based off of RNG (random number generator) this includes resources, enemies you'll incounter, mods, all the way to the rewards that'll an alert will have. The amount of time you will spend grinding in this game for items is not worth the reward anymore. If you're looking for a game to waste time with, go for it. Just be ready to put thousands of hours into this game. If you hate games with lots of grind and farming, this is the wrong game.
NoFap.HerroYou;-;update servers, took forever to update my game (more than 5 hours and nnot even 1%)
[TGC] Jannik;-;Another great FreeToPlay Game ;-). Note: If you know APB (All Points Bulletin) This has the same gameplay as APB, its just in space (On different planets) where you fight different machines / Creatures. It offers a lot of different ways to play: Support, Medic, Sniper or even Berserker (Different roles / Mods / Weapons) Tons of weapons and cool features, that make the game stand out. - Jannik H.
Wat;-;This game is pretty fun however it gets boring since the maps are reused
MLG Shrekinator;-;This is the absolute best coop multiplayer third person shooter ever created and it is majestic and beautiful.
BeDankEth;-;I Truly Do Love This Game, Extremely Fun, Do Get It. I Have One Simple Problem (A Lot of people will  at me for this) Please, oh Please, Make This Game For Mac/Steam Play. My PC Recently Broke And I Just Cant Stand Not Playing It. Please. Make. It. For. Mac!
MKING;-;this game is pretty much a farming simulator but a good one at that add me if you want to play with me i high level with good gear
Baytoti;-;I didn't play it that long, just a couple hours. When i first started playing this game, it was really fun, but once i progressed further into the game, it become ridiculously repetitive. I felt like i was playing the same map every time.
Guerthal;-;Day 1: Logged in to play, grinded stuff unti I was bored. Logged off. Day 2: Logged in to play, grinded stuff unti I was bored. There was a boss fight at some point. I did 7% of the total damage. I need more damage. Logged off. Day 3: Logged in to play, grinded stuff unti I was bored. Started crafting some new weapons. I went to try that boss fight by myself and got slaugthered. Logged off. Day 4: Logged in. New weapon is ready but sucks so much I regret spending most of my credits for it. Finally got all my ingredients to make a new Warframe. Started making a new Warframe with my remaining credits. Logged off. Day 5: Logged in. New Warframe isn't completed yet. Already bored of playing my first Warframe so I'm waiting for my construction to be completed. Logged off. Day 6: Logged in. New Warframe isn't completed yet. Logged off. Day 7: Logged in. New Warframe isn't completed yet. I can either grind low-level maps by myself at my own pace or join a public party (that takes from 10sec to 5 minutes to que) and risk doing a whopping 10% of the total damage. I choose to que with other players, end up waiting 5+ minutes and the boss gets killed while I'm on the loading screen so when I get in the game no one is there and the boss is dead (no quest completion, no loot). Takes me a while to figure out that the boss is dead. Logged off. Day 8: Uninstalling. This game really doesn't want me to play it. 20 hours of grinding got me nowhere + bored.
Guerthal;-;Day 1: Logged in to play, grinded stuff unti I was bored. Logged off. Day 2: Logged in to play, grinded stuff unti I was bored. There was a boss fight at some point. I did 7% of the total damage. I need more damage. Logged off. Day 3: Logged in to play, grinded stuff unti I was bored. Started crafting some new weapons. I went to try that boss fight by myself and got slaugthered. Logged off. Day 4: Logged in. New weapon is ready but sucks so much I regret spending most of my credits for it. Finally got all my ingredients to make a new Warframe. Started making a new Warframe with my remaining credits. Logged off. Day 5: Logged in. New Warframe isn't completed yet. Already bored of playing my first Warframe so I'm waiting for my construction to be completed. Logged off. Day 6: Logged in. New Warframe isn't completed yet. Logged off. Day 7: Logged in. New Warframe isn't completed yet. I can either grind low-level maps by myself at my own pace or join a public party (that takes from 10sec to 5 minutes to que) and risk doing a whopping 10% of the total damage. I choose to que with other players, end up waiting 5+ minutes and the boss gets killed while I'm on the loading screen so when I get in the game no one is there and the boss is dead (no quest completion, no loot). Takes me a while to figure out that the boss is dead. Logged off. Day 8: Uninstalling. This game really doesn't want me to play it. 20 hours of grinding got me nowhere + bored.
Squishy Yummy Tanning Lotion Can;-;This game is a blast I would recommeded it if like ninjas :3 BECAUSE NINJA ARE COOL PIRATES SUCK
Cheeseyjack;-;Warframe is, in my opinion, one of the best Free-To-Play games on Steam. Its fun, addicting, and all aroun dawesome for playing with friends. Even though playing at the beginning can be a bit boring, thats how all games are at first. Try it out before you judge it and say you dont like it. Space Ninjas! What's not to like. 9/10
-Yellow-;-;Yeah... Warframe... Its one of those game that if your not completely obsessed with it and the very beggining, you quickly lose interest. Its fun for a bit but i wouldn't consider actually trying to beating the game. -5/10 - Meh - Dont love it, dont hate it
dog;-;Great game for all dogs and more dogs but dogs will dog dogs and dog in the dog, woah
Vivian;-;this game broke when i passed the intro so i couldn't even exit out without restarting my computer. alt f4 did not work, cntrl alt delete did nothing this game is broken this game is terrible this game was probably made by the founder of  (the community is nothing but memes, brogres, and condescending grammar nazi  enthusiasts)
NexusCraft12;-;One of the laggiest,boring and worst looking game i have ever played. Im better of playing super man 64.
Agent Ice;-;The game is a co-op third person shooter, but please do not let that turn you away. There is a very good reason for this. You would probably puke your guts out otherwise. The game at times is very fast paced and involves flying through the air, climbing up walls, running on walls, jumping (sometimes to great heights), sliding, spinning around and doing flips. Had you done this in first person, not only would this not look as cool, but you would probably not get too far before losing your lunch. The best way I can describe it is you are a highly mobile space ninja/spellcaster/mercenary that can master a plethora of weapons and abilities to complete any mission given to you. Whether you are eliminating enemies from an area, hacking computers, defending a point, carrying out an assassination, capturing a VIP, or some other mission. Although the game is a shooter, the game lets you be adventurous. The maps for each mission are large and have several randomly chosen tile sets. As I said before you can climb up walls and often times find alternate routes that may allow you to find hidden goodies or a stealthier route around a group of enemies. You can sneak around and be stealthy, or rush in guns blazing. You also can choose to play solo, with friends, or with randoms. Warframe also allows for an unbelievable amount of customization to your spaceship, warframes, weapons, and companions. There are many cosmetic items you can use to add to your warframe or switch out parts such as the helmets to get the look you want. You can also change the coloring of your gear. You start with a small variety of colors, but you can buy more color pallets if you wish. Then there are mods. Mods give your equipment different perks. For example, some mods may decrease reload time, others may increase damage or your shields. There are separate mods for your warframe, weapons, and companions. The mod system gives you more control over how you play and fine tune your gear to make it more powerful. There are literally hundreds of mods in this game to choose from. There are also plenty of primary, secondary, and melee weapons to choose from. Each weapon has its own damage spread for different types of physical and elemental damage they do. Some types of damages are better against different types of enemies. The Good 1.Sounds  Although its space and sound should not be as well pronounced as it is in the game, the sounds in my opinion are great. 2.Customization  As I said, there is plenty of it. 3.New Content  New content for this game comes out every month so there is always something worth looking at. 4.Events  There are many events that pop up in the game as well as in the forums. You can enter a contest to win platinum (cash shop currency) or do the in game alerts for rare items and special challenges such as Tactical Alerts. 5.Not Pay To Win  This game is absolutely NOT pay to win. It is pay to get cosmetics or to skip grinding or waiting for some things. Many players trade in game items for plat so you can get cash shop items without spending a dime if youre a wheeler and dealer. You can also gift items too! 6.Clan Dojo - Clan dojos (your clans private base) give you access to items you cannot get in the normal market and give you a place to trade items and parkour courses you can run through. Also, the dojos just look flipin sweet! You can also get an observatory which looks beautiful as well. 7.Exp Rate  I honestly thing the exp gain rate is not bad. Yes, if you are formaing a weapon for end game it takes a while depending on what you do, but it is not really all that bad. You do not need to dedicate months to this game to get somewhere. 8.Solo/Multiplayer You can play by yourself, with friends, or with random players if you want. You can control this in your options. 9.Content - There is a lot of different types of missions and modes you can play. 10.Playerbase  There is always a lot of players online. Even in off hours. 11.PVP Mode  There is a PVP mode that they recently revamped 12.Story and Lore  There is a lot of lore involving this game that helps explain why the solar system is the way that it is. There are also side story quests you can do after completing the main story quest line. 13.Syndicates  Syndicates are factions in the game. There are perks for joining them such as access to items you cannot get anywhere else. It also adds another mechanic in that enemy factions will send squads to attack you randomly, which adds to the tension and the danger of the world. 14.Archwings  It can be fun flying around in space. Do a barrel roll! The Bad 1.Glitches  Easily the number one issue with this game. This game has more glitches than any game I have ever played in my life, and that is saying a lot. 2.Constant Patching  An hour or two (if even) after new content is released a hotpatch is released to fix what they broke. Then there are consecutive hotpatches to fix what was fixed. Each hotfix requires you exit the game and relaunch. This kind of sucks if youre about to do something and getting your party organized. 3.Trading  You cannot trade until you reach mastery rank 4 and then you are limited in how many times you can trade daily. You also need a dojo to trade. 4.Obtaining Cosmetics and Colors  Most color pallets are obtained by spending platinum. The same goes for most of the cosmetics. 5.Kubrows  If it dies it likes you less and then you have to pet it to make it not hate you. As it hates you more it does less damage. Oh, you can only pet it three times a day to make it happy. It also degrades over time. This means you need to buy these expensive DNA stabilizers to keep it alive. Every day your Kubrow will lose 10% of its condition gauge which also decreases its total health, which causes it to die more, which causes it to hate you and do less damage. Yes, it comes full circle, ladies and gentlemen. 6.Lack of Archwing Content  There just is not a lot. 7.Lack of Warframe and Weapon Slots  If you want more than two warframes you need to play platinum for additional slots. The same goes for weapon slots. Fortunately, they start you off with some platinum, which you can use to buy slots if you want. Rating If I were to rate it now, I would give it an 8/10. I would probably want to give it a 9/10, but with all the glitches and patching I cant honestly give it a higher rating. I understand DE is not necessarily a huge group and they are good about patching things up, but gameplay is still gameplay, and that is what I am rating. It is also hard to rate Warframe due to the fact the game is not complete. New content is added monthly and it is still in beta. For now I feel 8/10 is quite fair. I also would like to note, I am not big into buying game currency in games. I am on a budget and I do not normally feel games deserve my hard earned cash. However, I did not mind giving them some of my money because I love the game, I want it to keep going, and I feel like that later on down the road there will be something to show for it. Recommendation Which leave one last question. Would I recommend this game? Yes, I would. This game has elements that would attract FPS and TPS players as well as people who like MMOs/RPG players and possibly anyone else. Even if you do not normally like shooters you may love this game. For example, I have a buddy that hates shooters, but loves the Elder Scrolls games and Guild Wars 2. I got him playing this and now he is on it every day. Even if you do not like guns, you can still hack and slash your foes apart. You also do not have to be hardcore about the game to get anywhere. If you have questions feel free to ask me in here or add me on Steam or in game (AgentIce). It was longer but character limitations. Thank you for reading!
Nigel Barrage;-;Ran around with a staff spinning around and killing people, while trying to break into vaults, Then I came home and played Warframe, 11/10 would space ninja across the map again
Loki-Corgi;-;it's fun but it gets very repetitive after playing it for an hour
Cobalt Charm;-;The most pay to win game I have ever seen
ChunkyWeevil;-;This game has a lot to offer with enjoyable gameplay and a wide variety of characters to suit anyone's interests. The developers are constantly updating the game with new features such as new weapons game types and events to keep the game fresh. This is a great game to play with up to four friends as all missions are co-op.
Feros;-;In my opinion:Stay away from this game.
Preuen;-;This game liek dysteny, excepts much better because you can play with language russian. Because my enlgish not so god and I olny live in this countre for 2 daes
KitCat;-;Awesome game. Great graphics. Good gameplay. Everyone should try it.
HeihachiMachima;-;hours opon hours of fun 10/10
Cesare Borgia;-;Run on walls slash things up. It's entertaining, but not my style of game.
William Khan;-;There isnt really much that sets this apart from other games. Dont know why people call this a masterpiece of game design and dont know why people hyped this up so much. Heres what I understand about the game from the countless videos and 2+ Hours that I played of the game. - Endless grindwalls and microtransaction temptations at every meaningful gameplay decision - Undocumented stealth nerfs and obfuscating excuses for these changes by developers - Unfinished projects explained away by the promise that these features will be fixed "at some point in the future" - A lack of transparency between developers and players - A clear lack of direction for exactly what the game wants to accomplish - Game developers who constantly run away from their mounting self-created problems Overall Rating 3/10 Next game please.
kokopm;-;HEY ! I'll don't like this game because my charachter has been lost and i bought so much platinum . So give back my charachter or pay back the money . -Thank you.
Tatusiek_Iwan;-;Crashes every 8 to 10 minutes ruin each long-lasting mission making it impossible to develop your character properly. The problem appeared a long time ago and it still hasn't been fixed yet. The developers seem they don't know how to fix it at all.
solo death;-;I tried to like this game, I really did. 19.2 hours isn't much but it's enough for me to determine if i do or don't like a game and most of that time was looking at things I can't craft if I don't shovel money for in game purchases, and seeing a giant grindfest even after i do that. If you like that sort of thing, then go for it. If not, skip it and play something else.
WideWings;-;Operation False Profit is COMPLETE TRASH. There was very obviously no quality control in this event. I am not going to restate what everyone else is saying so I am just going to copy paste Just4TehLulz's response: "So, we realize nobody likes monotony. Hell, DE even says they hate having to run one mission 5 times for an invasion. What do they do for the new operation? Makes us have to run it a Minimum of like 12 times. This isn't even including bugs, stupid  RNG which makes it not spawn, and other uncontrollable factors. With these taken into account, the number is closer to 25 or 30. "We're gonna be as transparent as possible" You're about as transparent as China's water with this event, DE. You didn't share with us that all offerings give you the same amount of points, while one takes quite literally 5 times longer to do. Furthermore, it's pretty damn insulting that you guys advertised this as an event to make good amounts of money along the way, but you think people who are willing to drop 100k on some stupid, glitchy card, and most likely not actually get compensated with due to bugs, give half a  about 11-20k credits? That amount is laughable considering the amount this event has TAKEN from me due to bugs. Finally, either you guys must be trolling, or your new concepts for enemies as of late has been complete trash. We already hate perma CC and stupid  scoprion hooks. What do you give us? An enemy that makes the Jackal's special ability like a ing Dad Joke while being able to pull AND DRAG YOU. If the normal release of these enemies is even remotely close to what they are now, it will be ing disgusting. This event has been so egregious and frustrating that it is physically exhausting."
FoRGoTTeNNN;-;Someone just steal my SERRATION and HEAVY CALIBER 10/10 and support don't do anything about it ..
DutchManDelirious;-;Its most probably one of the best F2P and third person games , Love it
undead003;-;Grind! Grind! Grind! That's what you might think. But honestly, it only takes a few hours of life leech to get another Warframe. Otherwise? Enjoy the randomly generated levels and repetitive gameplay. It's not very bad, but if you can't find a purpose within all the hours of gameplay, it might not be for you. Oh, and despite the graphics, it runs quite smoothly.
bicycle;-;75% Luck, 5% Skill, 10% Concentrated Power of Will, 1% Pleasure, 9% Pain, and 100% Reason not to install this game.
XxLordNocoper420xX;-;this game is
PipeBOI LE NOVEMBUR 10;-;The only game in earth to suggest Tentacle-Porno-Hentai with Hydroid (Warframe). If you want to spend all of your sadness and madness of your daily routine which must be really , play this game and you will become even worse than before. Btw of the P2P aspect of the game, just play with some gays who are HL and they should help you surpass all of your dificulties in your life. 1/20
RedDash16 #RIPIwata :(;-;My favorite warframe is the one that wraps himself in tinfoil to stop bullets and has a eating disorder. Nah. not really it's the one that heals, the lobster looking one.
asdfsfg;-;lots of bug , it will cause you fail the mission (many time)
`Safari Mesh // Mudder;-;They steal your money and there community is full of "lol n00b g3t a l1fe". I hate this game.
Minister Ge Ge;-;very good game so addictive:)
damonic;-;this game crashses non stop don't play it because you will get angry andyou will hate this game
San Joel;-;This game is really good and all, but i cannot stand getting banned for a stupid reason, because i have so many random programs running, this game gets 4/10 EPIC FAIL! i cannot stand that i got 20 years for having random program open and get banned for stupid reason, this is unacceptable. I can forgive warframe for unbanning for my account. If i wait the 20 years.. i never forgive you..
dat guy;-;Everytime i sign in i always crash.
Cerberus;-;I want to recommend this game, I really do. I just cannot in good faith recommend something that has all the right components, but willfully chooses to put them together so badly that it becomes unplayable without spending enormous amounts of cash. What am I complaining about? "Free to play" mentality. Let me start by saying this: Warframe can be really fun. With its co-op play, procedurally generated levels, different game modes, and huge range of Weapons/Warframe/Mod options, it certainly possesses the qualities that one looks for in an engaging and fun game. Unfortunately you can and WILL find yourself completely unable to progress or enjoy any of the fun features unless you're willing to spend real world money... and here's why: What bad developers do when it comes to F2P games is carefully design the games so that they are unwinnable for players who don't spend real world cash on the game. The players get hooked, then frustrated, and then either ragequit or spend lots of money so that they have a chance to win. This strategy works, but is incredibly scummy and in no way deserves to be supported. Warframe performs this on many levels, and has definitely lost my respect because of it. To begin with, the game starts you off with basic "storyline" missions which are fairly straightforward, easy, FUN and more or less teach you how to play. That's fine. In fact, they even let you choose your starting weapon and Warframe, which is great! Customization right off the bat! It also works great for you in the first dozen or so missions until the questline is over: just enough time to get you hooked into the game. Then comes the stick. Several missions in, you will learn that this innocent weapon/warframe selection is one in which you can actually make a BAD choice which essentially cripples you for every mission going forward... at least until you get a new Warframe/Weapon combo. See, the game doesn't ramp up the difficulty, it just ramps up enemy HP and damage (and the annoying hacking minigames) and does so completely irrespective of the "levels" that it claims to be designed around. This quickly leads to you getting out of your league in nearly every single mission; most of which are required to be completed in order to unlock the new content. Essentially content progression works like this: Want a new Warframe? You can buy the blueprint for an ungodly amount of credits (which are essentially game currency). Oh wait, you mean you want to PLAY with the Warframe? No no, you need to build all of the Warframe parts first! How do you do that? Thanks for asking! The game won't tell you, but you'll learn from other players that you basically have to do special boss missions a million times to find the blueprints for the Warframes' components. Blueprints which by the way ALSO have huge credit and resource costs associated with them. Oh the resources? You farm those from planets which you unlock from doing higher level missions and beating bosses. What do you mean you can't beat the higher level missions solo? Oh you have a terrible Warframe/Weapon combo? Well get a new Warframe/Weapon then! See how it loops back in on itself? You're too weak to do the missions on your own, so you try to get new weapons or Warframes. That's when you learn that you don't have the resources to build the new weapons/frames even when you DO have the huge amounts of credits required. The resources require planets you don't have access to. The planets require missions you can't beat. There's only two ways out of this loop of stupid and the first involves spending a huge quantity of real world cash to "bypass" the game's requirements. Platinum (real world cash) gets you basically everything in this game, from rush building items that would otherwise take literal days to build, to buying weapons and Warframes outright without having to collect a single resource, to buying all of the rare and valuable mods or whatever from other players who spent the time to actually earn them. It's clear the developers knew exactly what they were doing when they made the missions impossible for new players. They were creating a cash trap. The second way of getting resources involves "piggybacking". This is technically an MMOFPS, so that means there's other players around. Now you can go on the main chat and beg higher level players to let you tag along on their missions, which is a decent way of earning the credits and resources required for doing literally anything in the game. Only problem is that you're then stuck following uber players around as THEY play the game and you watch. You literally cannot harm the high level guys they are fighting, and you die in one hit, so you're more or less forced to trudge through mission after mission waching other people play in the hopes that someday you'll be allowed to join in. This is not fun. This is not gameplay. This is boring and frustrating, and is the equivalent of being on an olympic sports team and being asked to follow the team around with a camera instead of playing. "Wait," I hear you ask, "What about players who are your level?" Well speaking from an Oceania perspective, those don't even exist. I can't tell you how many times I've sat waiting on a mission screen for someone, anyone to come join me. Nobody does. That's because they're all busy piggybacking with high level players since the game's progression is broken and money-based. In other words, forget matchmaking. Even if you did find people your level you'd probably also find that they were too weak to help much, or a hindrance in the several missions which require "stealth". I won't even get into the terrible mechanics of stealth here, but just know that it's like Assassin's Creed 1 if your assassin was a shopping trolley and enemies possessed the Eye of Sauron since once they see you, they will NEVER NOT BE ABLE TO SEE YOU. The bottom line is that Warframe has so many tantalizing and interesting options... which it then locks away in a gilded cage and tells you that you either need to pay for them with endless hours of your life... or with real world money. The irony is that I was willing to actually spend money on this game until I saw how badly they mistreat their non-paying players... and I just didn't want to be a part of that kind of system. So I'll be keeping my money, and the hours of my life I'd otherwise have wasted on this game, and investing both in something more productive and less horrifyigly abusive to its playerbase.
soo;-;this game has a horrible economy model that will, sooner or later, force you to either stop playing or pay real money for in-game goods. the core gameplay is pretty fun and the graphics and aesthetics are close to perfect - original enemy designs, excellent effects, stunning tilesets, wonderful ship designs - you name it. the customisation is fantastic but it comes at a cost: the only colours you have to paint your warframe and weapons with are dulled-down, muddy colours, with multiple shades of the same colour and not much inbetween. you have to PAY MONEY to BUY COLOURS. you get only 2 warframe slots and not nearly enough weapon slots for a varied loadout. this forces you to constantly either sell 'old' weapons [i.e. one of the 3 rifles/secondaries/melees] to make room for a new one, or go the 'sensible' route and trade items for platinum in the universal chat. what this involves is organising to meet up in either your dojo or the buyers' dojo, which must have a trading hub. this isn't actually that bad until you consider the alternative to buying items with platinum, and that is GRINDING. crafting one warframe, for example, requires you first to get the blueprints for each of their parts: the warframe's SYSTEM blueprints, their CHASSIS blueprints, their HELMET blueprints, and their body. you can often only get these blueprints from certain boss missions - but there's no guarantee you won't get a blueprint you won't already have. then, once you have all the blueprints, you need a 'general' WARFRAME blueprint, despite having a blueprint for each of the warframe's parts, you need to buy or find another one - and then it comes down to the actual crafting. what this involves is roughly a 25,000 credit cost to build each part - and then hundreds of each specified material, at least one of which will be either an extremely rare drop [again, from a boss] or something that can only be bought for platinum [read: real money]. not only is this expensive, it is also time-consuming - or rather, it takes a given amount of realtime for each item to be crafted. you're looking at 24 hours for a weapon or body part, you're looking at about 3 to 5 days for a whole warframe. of course, the ONLY reason this time barrier exists is so that they can shoehorn in another way for you to hand over real money - speeding the crafting process up costs yet more platinum. this, overall, is a great game with excellent potential, ruined by greedy developers. i've seen too many people defending the game citing the fact that 'the devs have to eat too' - it should NOT be at this cost. SO many other games have working economies whereby you can buy ingame items using real money but without having to - in other games, it is a choice rather than a necessity.
InSane Twins [O] [X];-;Ninjas grind free. Ninjas replay the same stages over and over again free. Ninjas encounter the same enemies over and over again free. Ninjas hack or steal stuff, in the same enviroments over and over again free. (By the way, did we ever tell you, the definition of insanity?) Ninjas play more to get different equipment, that is not that different from the previous one free. And many more... (We dont want this review to be long...) We guess real ninjas pay to grind a lot less and then after the boost expire they start grinding again FREE! It is free 10/1 000 000 IGN Should mention some pros too: Optimization is outstanding! Never seen a game with an optimization like this, it looks awesome even on High-Medium settings. Slicing enemies with swords is well made too. Voice acting, pets, weapons design+variety. All good. This game is for people with a lot of patience and time and we mean A LOT. We are very patient, but we think that the time could be spent better by playing better games and more games, not just waste so much time on ONE game no?
exjason;-;So, to start off my review of this game, Beforehand, A long time ago, This game used to be one of my favorites, But now with the constant hotfix/update failing due to "internet connection reset" Or it simply not ever downloading the update/hotfix, I have grown sick of the fact that I cannot play this game during the weekdays, Due to the fact I actually need my sleep. The update servers must be connected in some form or manner to the log in and maybe even game servers, As during normal mass play times, The updater simply Just doesn't update the game, Many threads have been made and none answered by developers, Which pains me to say I would love for the updater to actually Use my download speed over Just not download at all or at painfully slow speeds, Until this painfully slow or nonexistent speed is fixed up, It is really hard for me to want to recommend this game to any of my friends.
misterfister.t9;-;This game is extremely tedious and grind-y. Definitely not worth the huge time-sink. The player interaction and shallow "team dynamic" is so -poor it doesn't even come close to making up for the lack-luster gameplay.
Bonder (ImaJerk);-;This game holds your hand every step of the way, regularly reminding you of what you need to do next. Is very much so a free-to-play game, regularly reminding you that you can buy things. The guns are ridiculously accurate at any range. One of the enemies runs at you from very far away with a big knife. If you want content that you get nickled and dimed for and have someone constantly tell you what to do next then by all means play this game. otherwise its just an above average free to play game.
DarkEternal;-;If you want a game that you can have fun with until they apply a "Hotfix" which breaks the game so you can't log in, then this is the game for you! And then when the server decides to let you in, you can't chat, can barely start a session and can't see any other players that you may join or join you. Great potential but it falls flat due to poor patches and fixes.
The Wolf;-;Open game up, try to login in. "account suspended until 2035" Guess I'm going to have to wait this game out then.
Vae Victis;-;Don't play Waframe, for a lot of different reasons. The most obvious being the fact that EVERYTHING is behind a paywall. You can't advance at any pace without dropping money. You can buy blueprints for warframes and weapons through the market with In game earned currency. But unfortunetly you will never be able to unlock them because the materials needed to make said item require a key to be bought with platinum (The purchasable currency) to even UNLOCK the (levels? Stages?, Tiers?) needed to farm the item you need. Players with bought weapons will be stronger than you, pvp is a mess. It's even hard to progress through the story alone because you have a limited number of everything. A F2P should ALWAYS Follow Riot Game's Pay model. Pay to look cool, not to have an advantage over anyone else willing to drop a little cash, to be better than you. Period.
Uncle Stoopnixie;-;I just wanted to check out the ps4 version of this game and it somehow overwrited my PC progression. I spent about 80$ and 60 hours on this game and now its all lost. The devs are just a bunch of thieves, do NOT spend money on this game.
demontrace;-;One word review: Disappointing More details: This is a game that starts off really promising. Interesting controls, large variety of weapons, numerous ways to level up and progress, seems like it has it all. Unfortunately it crumbles under it's own weight. Numerous ways to level up turn into an extended grind game that is overwhelming. The large variety of weapons turns into a double edged sword, which requires an explanation of the mastery system. Each weapon, warframe, and anything else you can take with you to level up has a cap of level 30. The levels that you acquire during gameplay all contribute points towards a mastery system. The mastery system caps how much progress you can make in a given day towards other aspects of the game. There is a faction type system in a game called syndicates. The items offered by these syndicates are generally considered extremely good, and cannot be acquired any other way. The problem with this syndicate system, is that the points you can acquire each day is capped at a rather low number. Add to this problem with points that are capped universally. You may have 10000 faction points you can make in that day, but that's across ALL factions. In certain syndicate themed missions, you can search for insignias, that you can turn in to a vendor for additional syndicate points, sometimes worth more points than the mission themselves, but there are at max 8 of these in a given mission, and it is an exhaustive search through very large missions that can sometimes border on futility. The worst part is if you decide to do these missions with other people, but they decide they don't feel like searching for all of them, and rush to the mission end point, you will be forced to end the mission after a 1 minute timer. You CANNOT replay these missions, and if it ends early, you could be out of potentially thousands of points. Naturally I did most of these missions solo, even though the rest of the game recommends, and is designed for group play. I will add I also did Spy missions solo, as even 1 person in your group triggering an alarm, can lead to the entire group failing the mission. The biggest problem with the mastery system, and where the game really collapses under is own weight is leveling the weapons. There are so many filler weapons in this game, that are commonly called "mastery fodder", that acquiring these mastery points becomes a chore. It takes time to level weapons, made all the worse by leveling weapons that are weak, and not fun to use. You can tell very quickly when a weapon you are using is terrible. This is aggravated by the fact that you are limited to how many weapons, warframes, etc, that you can have in your inventory. Unless you are willing to buy premium currency, which of course costs real money, you cannot increase your inventory size. That has been an issue since the game came out years ago, along with many other issue which I will go into later. Numerous weapons and warframes, that you might have actually liked, will be sold and discarded, all because you don't have space for them, unless you're willing to fork over a lot of money. The game gets to the point where you might be looking at hundreds of dollars of investments, if you're willing to make significant progress in this game. The day and age that we live in with steam sales, bundle packs, and numerous other sources of price discounts for quality games, makes the $50-$60 retail game almost a thing of the past. This game will be looking for much more money out of your pocket. In addition to leveling up the weapons for mastery points, you also level these weapons for mod slot points. At level 30 you have 30 mod points to empower your weapon. The mods ALSO require leveling up, however they don't level up from use, but rather by sacrificing other mods to level them up. In addition to sacrificing mods in this process, you ALSO use up credits, which is the games fictional currency. This can be one of the most expensive parts of the game is terms of credit use. Unfortunately, the developers of the game seem to be aggressively cracking down on ways to farm credits, which in and of themselves are still excessive time sinks. Leveling mods and farming credits are one of the longest processes in the game, however Digital Extremes is all too happy to offer ways to boost your credit income, or level up mods, for your platinum in their premium stores. I think it says enough that one of the most popular store purchases are fusion cores, which help level up your mods, at an extremely overpriced platinum amount. I want to say it was the equivalent of $5, but i could be wrong. Either way, it was still overpriced given the amount of other things Digital Extremes wants you to buy. To further exacerbate this issue with leveling up guns, mods, and currency comes the addition of Orokin Catalysts, and Reactors. These are EXTREMELY rare items in terms of acquiring them from the game itself. Once every 2 weeks, DE(Digital Extremes) will offer a mission to acquire one of these items, not one of each, but just one of them, and occasionally they will have some odd mission pop up that offers one, but at most you are looking at a handful in a given month. A reactor is needed for warframes, and sentinels(a pet) to double their mod point capacity, and the catalysts are for weapons. At max level this takes the mod points from 30, to 60. As you can imagine these are extremely important to get the most use out of a given weapon, or warframe. As these are extremely rare, you will have your best luck acquiring them by paying platinum in the premium shop, as it can be an agonizingly long time in reality to acquire one. In addition, once these are attached to a weapon, or warframe, it CANNOT be removed. You cannot pay any type of currency to do this. Once attached, it is gone forever. You can try to contact customer service, but not only are you going to be waiting multiple days, there is no guarantee they will help you out. The mod leveling, mastery point leveling, NEED to acquire Orokin parts, credit farming, weapon leveling, and rare resource acquisition, are an extremely frustrating part of this game, due to needing to dedicate significant portions of your life to farming these, or pay real money. I will touch on resources, as these are also a significant time sink. With every weapon, warframe, and whatever else you need, you must craft it first. You have a personal ship that you use to enter each mission, and inside this ship are stations you can use to level up your mods, buy things from the store, or craft your equipment. To craft anything you need credits, and resources. Resources are acquired from killing enemies, breaking open crates and chests, or killing bosses. The rarest resources are most easily acquired by killing bosses. A rare resource is not guaranteed, but it is still your best way of acquiring them(or the premium shop). Some of the best equipment can require 10 of these rare resources, or more. This is in addition to waiting long periods of time for the crafting process. Warframes take 3 days to build, not to mention the 12 hours for each component to build, before you can use them in the warframe building process. Weapons take from 12 to 24 hours. You might be excited to acquire this new piece of hardware, but you'll be waiting multiple days more than likely(UNLESS YOU PAY PLATINUM. This is a recurring trend in this game). In addition to the resources requirement, and credits, some of the very best weapons require farming high level void missions for blueprints/parts. Multiple different blueprints/parts are required for a given weapon, or warframe. Part of the problem with farming these missions is that they require keys to enter. You acquire these keys by farming OTHER missions, or by purchasing them using the limited syndicate points, or premium currency. Unfortunately I am out of room here, but all I can say is STAY AWAY.
osd_dragon;-;Don't download this, the playing is nice but i have been banned for "user agreement violation", when i asked what did they mean, they didn't say what i did just that i violated the agreement, I am very disappointed in the way this game is ran, I don't what I did to warrant this, do not play this game.
Michelle;-;Good game, but horrible business decisions and buggiest game I've ever played. Incredibly grindy and p2w. Giant maps with sprinting being useless, countless griefing possitibilities in a co-op game, and the map being so buggy it may as well not be there are some of the many flaws with this game.
w1375deck;-;Fun game for a little, but the weird, unclear story just makes you stop and say "ok, next game"
[CGC] Vivian James;-;I just don't get this game. The progression is painfully slow, the weapons don't feel powerful, it's easy to get lost in some levels... And the community? The community is the worst. I kept being told that I should let other players carry me, but how am I supposed to level up if I fall in seconds and people leave me to die? Nobody in this game ever gave me a hand when I needed it. Do yourself a favor and stay away from this game. It's free to play, but there is no such thing as refunds for wasted time.
PurpleNinjaGod;-;Worst game i've ever seen!!!! I opened it for the second time ever and it froze my cpu because of some  glitch on the update screen and glitched steam into thinking I was playing it for 22 hrs. I had to reboot my cpu but that wasn't enough! No I had to uninstall steam, remove the games files from my hard drive, run an ANTIVIRUS SOFTWARE, redownload steam and log back in. On top of all this the gameplay itself is terrible, the tutorial is waaaay to long, controls are weird as hell (if you try to use an xbox controller they're even worse!), melee is a nightmare, and from experience the server connection is horrid!! Another thing to mention is that my steam got hacked during my first gameplay of this and I was told I was hacked through the game! Do yourself a huge favor and even though its free DO NOT BUY THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
[BDWolf]he Howling WolfBlade;-;Interesting gameplay but...it has a pay to win feature,the community is terrible,the stealth system is very bad,the combat needs no tactic its spray n prey,unless you got a friend to play with you this game is a complete waste of time.
Baritone Saxophone;-;Too grindy imo. Mechanics are great, but it feels like to do anything or to get any gun I just have to do constant grinding for materials. More of a farming simulator than a fun FTP sci-fi game.
Mallchad;-;This, is a fun game... The parkour is fun and imaginative, the weapons look and sometimes FEEL really cool. -I personally think that playing a mission just with your weapons is good as it is, and it makes you want to strafe, roll, find cover. However my problem is as it goes into using primarily abilities, I am very picky with my Warframes in the sense that I DO NOT like the "cast and forget" feel to most frames, and the worst thing is that, those ones are usually the best. It takes the fun out of being skilled and always pay attention to your stats or die. That being said I think my favourite Warframes would be, Re-worked Excalibur, Ash, Ember, Volt (these are out of the ones I've used) I thing I love about these frames most is like apart from defence and mobile defence, they are very versatile and imaginative, I always had to pay attention to EVERYTHING to stay alive, and that just slightly made my blood pump, it made me more alert, it immersed me more, these are some things that I like in a game to be able to enjoy it -I feel that if you really wanna play the game to it's fullest you must be a complentionist, and 2 things REALLY stop that... 1 Some things take way too long to craft, for example, a Warframe takes 72 hours for the actual frame to craft and a further 12 hours minimum for the components, not everybody has a lot of free time to be flexible and this caused extreme waits where you can't find much to do. -The inventory system is a bit stupid, you need to spend an in-game currency called Platinum to get extra slots, 12 for weapons and 20 for frames, you start with 50. These spent platinum NEVER go back into the system, meaning in the end your buying a 1-time use item if you splash the cash on platinum which I don't think anybody would ever do in real life, you might be saying "well food is a 1-time use", well that is something we absolutely need and couldn't live without, this is something for a bit on entertainment. Also, DE, if ur reading this, games generally benefit more economically if they don't ALMOST force buying stuff for a game. A nice system would be where spent platinum goes into random event awards, or weekly quests that drag out for a couple hours (in total) -The bosses are a bit of just really strong normal enemies, they don't have too many patterns that you have to go through to defeat them, you either go in, die, go in, take ages to kill them, or go in, and wreck them. It would be really nice if more bosses had pets or mechs like say, Alad V or Vey Hek, and those mechs randomly choose an event from a list that each has a counter, and every few events you get a chance to deal DIRECT damage. This would give an excuse to give bigger rewards for killing those bosses. Assassins like the Stalker are a bit bland, you wreck them or you get rekt, and the chance is so low. it would be better, if they actually followed your node paths and slowly try to predict where you will go next, making them more likely to find you, however if you find him in a mission, you can get the jump on him. Then after a couple times you can track him to his lair and have an all out boss fight and get his weapons that way. (Maybe his boss sends henchmen after you and you must erradicate him you they are getting on ur nerves (Nekros Prime?!?!) -I think the clans wars should be more in-depth, maybe you are doing a clan raid or something and a rival shows up, everybody is confused and  and all hell breaks loose In the end I enjoy this game, it just takes too long to enjoy, and then you waste away the fun WAAAY too quickly, I don't recommend this game unless you are extremely patient and don't get bored easily
StalkinU;-;Better then destiny thats for sure. Okay, you need to buy weapon slots. warframe slots. and more random crap... But hell, this game often has events where you can get paid items for free as a sure thing for a victory, unlike destiny.. Warframe offers randomly generated maps in whole deck of different themes, making grinding bareable. unlike destiny... sure destiny has a better pvp system, but wait another two years and warframe will have a way better pvp system then destiny. So long story short, play warframe (or borderlands) and never ever pay for destiny.
[{-TNTProjects-}]StealthLionXD;-;THIS GAME IS THE BOM DOT ING COM GET IT! ITS FREE AND ITS A PS4 GAME ON STEAM!! ITS AMAZING
Dev;-;My friend describes this game as making you feel like a badass. So its your choice
[1tes] KingLionheart;-;i was charge this dude and choped his bullets in half with my sword and cut his body in half and then choped his halfs in halfs...................AVPOVED BY FALLEN ANGEL....................like somthin from a movie
RAW | ForkRunner;-;Trash
Wootbier Floot;-;I love spending my money on in game purchases. 10/10
Wootbier Floot;-;I love spending my money on in game purchases. 10/10
Alt-J;-;The pay to win-ness of this game is overwhelming.
Taste My Rainbow (   );-;-Friend does really cool parkour trick- Me: Pssshhhhh I can do that, easy. -jumps and falls into a pit- 10/10
IIAlpha_projectII;-;Amazing game friendly players when online! But you will have to get used to the controls lol.....
Russian Faggot;-;Spend hundreds of hours killing thousands of enemies. All for a shiny weapon you thought looked nice. 10/10 Would commit mass genocide again
Meowacus Catticus;-;Great but grinding is the only way to get anywhere,and....(Shiver)It has micro-transactions...(Shiver)
Jery;-;Grind or spend money #Tier4voidrace
JD4REAL;-;good graphics. fun, fast paced, action FPS. Even the community is great! It could use more tutorials in game, but the wiki, twitch, and youtube channels help with understanding all there is.
Isaiah Yap;-;awesome epic messy fight
KittyCatCove;-;Takes up t o much space and I had to delete almost all my games!
Cpt.MewMew;-;Fun, fast paced, action based game.
armandilo95;-;Nice graphic and gaming experience--Yes! its also fun to play solo AND multiplayer, although multiplayer is recommended. However, it realy doesnt seem like ninjas... haha, i mean i think ppl who can clear msson so ninja-ish is really pro :P if there are any tho
Drascus;-;If you want to have fun, you will need to pay. No money? Go grind. No time to grind? Go  yourself. Got time to grind but you're starting to think this is ing pointless? Welcome to warframe.
Zockhandra;-;Grind grind grind....Pay to win! Warframe starts initially as a fun, advanced space ninja game, and gradually descended into pure madness. Whilst the game is incredibly fun to play mission wise, progression is all based on grinding, farming resources and waiting waiting waiting, unless you pay even more money to have that ridiculous 3 day weapon build time done right now. However, the abilities, design and detail of the game is lovely. It truly sticks to a sci-fi theme without becoming terrible like *cough* *cough* some other games i've reviewed. PvP is not reccomended, nearly every player who has spent money on high tier weapons can quite easily (to put lightly) Destroy you. Strangely though i do reccomend that you play this game, as with friends its incredibly fun and makes for a very good time outside of PvP and clans, besides of course... Space ninja
Larzech;-;This game is so good it crashed my PC for 2 days. The first two times it crashed it went back to Windows. The third time REALLY crashed the computer. My computer didn't send any signal to screen nor keyboard. First I though the power supply died so I swapped it, still the same. Then I took out the harddrive and tested it in another computer. No problem there either. Eventually I was afraid it was the motherboard...until I let my pc run for 15 minutes. At that time it rebooted itself and finally went to Windows and started sending signal to the screen. This computer is 2 years old with Windows 7 and rigged for Armed Assault III. No other game has crashed it this badly, even ARMA 3. So if you can run this game smoothly without problems and enjoy it, good. If it crashes really badly the first time, consider this as a warning and uninstall the game to prevent possible damage to your computer. Did I already mention this is the only game that has managed to take down my computer for longer than a day? Being free with good gameplay doesn't matter much if it can crash my PC for long periods, possibly damaging it. I would have given this game thumbs up if it didn't crash every 1-5 minutes and harder than other games. Edit: This game alone managed to kill my graphics card which didn't show any dying symptoms before!
Jchizuki?!;-;this .. why you make so many updates? i cant play anymore  you developers ./.
Fade;-;Takes a lot of grinding to get access to any other weapons or warframes besides the ones you start with. Packs are too expensive to gamble on that better gear will make a mediocre 3ps worth playing. The game is pretty though.
mine field;-;This game is a pretty good co-op game, but expect money used on it. This game is going to be harder as it goes on. So..... grab some friends.
Raccoon X3;-;That was a treat for the fingers~
Jordanakos;-;Best F2P there is for me . Not trully free though but it doesn't demand you to pay 40-50 euros so you can proceed with game . Just with 5-10 euros you can access almost everything in the game , and there is LOT. Content is added frequently with lots of updates either big or small. I recommend this game hands down. If you can play this with friends then even better !!!
Jersey Shore Reject;-;Free to play, fun, lotsa guns and characters, plenty of loot and customization with monthly additions to content. It's awesome.
HP 5 Chlenix off Nublo?!;-;Good game but not for me ;)
Qalamity;-;Great game. Updates daily and hotfixes daily. New stuff everytime.
ChaosSabre;-;Overtheshoulder FPS with robot ninjas in space. I personally love going around getting stuff to craft new weapons and warframes. Only limitation to f2p players is that you have limited inventory space and platinum is mostly used to cut down the grinding and waiting process to build stuff and cosmetics.
Metal Stalker;-;This is first MMO I have played that is so f2p friendly and it's not pay2win.
redzepper;-;Amazingly full and packed full of gameplay to keep you entertained for a long while.
Jazz01;-;Warframe is the best free to play game in my opinion.
SmoothyTube;-;like being OP? yes? get this game! no? get this game! like swords and knives? yes? get this game! no? get this game! like guns? yes? get this game! no? get this game! like being a bad  in every way? yes? get this game! no? ......... 0-o WHAT?????????? like having super awesome abilaties? yes? get this game! no? ok just stop playing games like being stealthy ? yes? get this game! no? get this game! so yeah it all comes down to this ========================= GET THIS GAME !!! 10/10 :P
Kr0gd0g;-;Ninja Space Pirate Bounty Hunter Crysis Suit Fun! This game is thoroughly enjoyable with alot of replayability with various warframe to try and level with a in-depth user interface and modding system. This is NOT a pay to win game. You only have to pay if you wish to further your enjoyment of the game. This game has earned what little money I have spent on it so far with 80+ hours of game time within a week. I am hooked and I have manged to make a warframe and duel pistols which I COULD pay for but instead I played to earn the required parts. This game is awesome. It looks great and plays great and its only in Beta. Minor issues arise every now and then but I expect those will be handled before the complete release. GET YO  IN THIS GAME!
tklegend102 \\ Fi;-;really fun game its a bit boring at the start but it gets better really recommend it 9/10 sad about the 60fps frame cap also amazing graphics
K3v1n;-;Very fun game but also can be confusing for new players, it doesn't go into much detail about the crafting system as well as abilities.
Alexander;-;Played it for a little. Okay game I guess.
wallakat;-;good game fun just have to do your email at the begging of the game before you can play it!!!!!!!1
The Dank Knight;-;Ok so there was a person who only had 8-9 hours in this...just to clarify Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
Pulco;-;I didnt liked it. The game starts when I dont want sometimes. And the training was not enough . I didnt played too much but it wasnt fun for me.
RedCapJack;-;This is in my opinion an awsome co-op game with alot of features. I love the concept of you being an alien-ninja-rambo badass that "sneaks" onto the enemy (and by "sneak" i mean you charge head first and blast everything in range) however i must say that it's not flawless. I found that in the begining it was hard to get into the game, to really get a hold of the controls, modding and parkour actions, if there maby was an (optional) extended tutorial maby this would help the new players get into the game faster. I also really think this game needs more variation between maps and missions because othervise the game will get repedetive and after that uninstresting, perhaps side missions inside the real mission (maby something like collecting something from fallen enemies). Another thing i thought would be intresting is if the game could expand its story, maby tell the tale of who the tenno were before sh*t hit the fan or how the diffrent warframes were created. Warframe has already given us some intel on who the tenno were, why not more? I think alot of people would enjoy something like that. And just one last thing: Make it so that you can only buy cosmetic stuff for platinum (the payable fee), it's really getting on my nerve that i sometimes have to delete a warframe just so i can have another just beacause i don't have the spare money to pay. Seriously. Stop it. Othervise a good game that i think everybody should atleast try, it won't cost you anything =P
RedCapJack;-;This is in my opinion an awsome co-op game with alot of features. I love the concept of you being an alien-ninja-rambo badass that "sneaks" onto the enemy (and by "sneak" i mean you charge head first and blast everything in range) however i must say that it's not flawless. I found that in the begining it was hard to get into the game, to really get a hold of the controls, modding and parkour actions, if there maby was an (optional) extended tutorial maby this would help the new players get into the game faster. I also really think this game needs more variation between maps and missions because othervise the game will get repedetive and after that uninstresting, perhaps side missions inside the real mission (maby something like collecting something from fallen enemies). Another thing i thought would be intresting is if the game could expand its story, maby tell the tale of who the tenno were before sh*t hit the fan or how the diffrent warframes were created. Warframe has already given us some intel on who the tenno were, why not more? I think alot of people would enjoy something like that. And just one last thing: Make it so that you can only buy cosmetic stuff for platinum (the payable fee), it's really getting on my nerve that i sometimes have to delete a warframe just so i can have another just beacause i don't have the spare money to pay. Seriously. Stop it. Othervise a good game that i think everybody should atleast try, it won't cost you anything =P
IM NOOB#S1#Rip Aim;-;why could i coneect to server
|AVG| Chas-#SDF#-;-;So this is most likely the best review of this game on the internet, so listen up. Its a good game i like playing it idk if you will but if you want to try it out you can. You are suddenly amazed...
The Mountain;-;Warframe is a Co-op based third-person shooter set in a futuristic universe where you play as the Tenno, a race of reawakened warriors that are sustained in these suits called Warframes and begin clearing out the Solar System of threats such as the Grineer, a race of xenophobic clones that hate everything that's not a Grineer including the Tenno. Then you have Corpus, a unified profit organisation that seeks to make profit and kill everything that stops them from making profit, and then you have infestations that are organic lifeforms that seek to spread and infect the solar system. Warframe is one of the most polished f2p games I've ever played and here's why. The gameplay is fast-paced, fun and overall just awesome, I love slicing and dicing and pinning my foes to the wall, the different warframes you have which are the suits the Tenno (you) wear add many ways to playing, you have a wide range of weapons to use as well which I'll list below. Swords Pistols Assault Rifles Axes Staffs Hammers Shotguns Bows Crossbows Sniper Rifles Rocket Launchers Revolvers Machine Pistols Also, you have Sentinels and Kubrow, which are companions that act as a support role that help you during missions. There are different types of Sentinels and Kubrows that have different stats and abilities so in that sense you'd pick the one that suits your playstyle. Outside of missions you're on your ship even though when this game came out it was just a menu screen you had, the ship feature came in later. Anyway, you have your navigation system which lets you select which planet you wanna go to and do some missions, you'll also get daily events which you receive rewards for completing. You have other components on the ship, like the foundry for crafting, the arsenal for all your equipment, the comms for additional features, the mods segment for combining and upgrading mods, and the incubator for keeping your kubrow in. Graphically speaking, it's a very good looking game especially for f2p standards. The particle effects, the lighting the colors, the overall attention to detail is impressive. The aesthetic of Warframe's universe is very flashy, very colorful and very pretty. Sound is pretty good too, music is alright, weapon sound, ambient noise and the voice acting is pretty solid. As for story, usually most f2p games don't really interest me in the story aspect or atleast I hadn't found one yet but this game get's pretty interesting when you start digging up the lore from the codexes, wiki pages or even forums or videos that delve into the mythos of Warframe. It's good so far but it still needs to be more fleshed out and built upon more. What I gave on the first paragraph was really just the background story, a brief and very basic explanation of what Warframe's about and what you're doing. Warframe is like I said, a Co-op game. You do have the option to play on your own but unless you're equipped to do so, you're better off grouping with friends or other people because that's when the experience is at it's best in my opinion. There is PVP despite it not being the main focus of the game, I personally haven't touched it yet but maybe at some point I will. All I know is that you can do 1v1 duels in the Dojo and Dark Sector conflicts where clans fight for territory. But still, the addition of PVP is a good thing regardless, it add's more replay value to the game itself. Warframe is one of the few games in the f2p market that's not necessarily p2w, alot of the things you get in the market you can craft without ever spending a dime in the game. Credits are your main currency and is what let's you buy some weapons that allow you to pay with credits, blueprints which let's you craft things from warframes, weapons, items etc. Platinum is a currency that you aquire by using your money to buy things outright instead of crafting them. But like i stated, you don't have to spend money to get anywhere in this game, you can get almost everything from crafting, whilst it may take longer, in the end you'll still have that item you want. Ever since Warframe's release, the game has been getting better and better. With new updates, new weapons, new warframes, new events etc. There's always a reason to go back and the regular updates and it's great gameplay is one of the reasons why this game is so popular. Recently the Archwing update came, which brought in space combat which is a huge step-up in the progression of developing this game further, hell maybe at one point they might even allow you to literally fly your ship around the Solar System and not just walk in it. In the end you have one of the best f2p games in recent memory that has a strong developement team Digital Extreme that constantly improves the game, a big community, and a fair f2p model. Yes it is grindy, yes it is repetitive but it is also rewarding and fun at the same time.
Sloth#1;-;This game is one of the best free to plays out there, I mean like, look at the Devs, they are constantly working their butts off, I give them my utmost respect to them. After every update, the update is as big as the previous or more, putting the previous update to shame as the current one is so much better. The devs do livestream like every week which is really really good as you know the saying "The Customer is always right." They have suggestions from people playing it, whatsup and all, its just beautiful. Its still in beta, I don't know when they are going to release it to a game but I can see it has a bright bright future. Gameplay is sweet, parkour, ninja, swords and all, ARCHWING? Basically you becoming Gundam Fighters. You don't need to spend a lot of money on this as the game wants you to work for it, but if you want to spend money on it, just buying an item costs a lot so you want to play smart. 10/10 In my opinion, the best F2P. Other than Dota2 or Tf2 because they are competitive but this is not, pure cooperation, PVP is not much in this. Fun with friends and all.
Phat Phuck(SuperSaiyajin);-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so heres a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings.
Uriezel;-;Well, i lost some items for god know why.. they just desapear from the air, even toght, the game rocks.. it's awesome on every way, you will love it more and more the time goes by, and if you get into a clan, you will form strong bonds with your guild mates, or so i hope xD. The game has a way to let you decide how to play, close combat, long distance, middle battle, guns, bows, swords, claws, daggers, etc.. and every frame has his own and -freaking- cool powers, witch you will need to choose carefully, since the frame is the one that deteremine how you will play. A very recommended game. Chears.
Dezarath;-;This game would be amazing if I could actually play it wothout lagging out but love the graphics and everything else. The creators of Warframe get a thumbs up from me!
sparklykesh;-;it crashes when i play
stone;-;hey can someone give circuits and every thing else please and this game is awsoem
Fred;-;The Game is smooth with great graphics. It shows interesting story and meaningful slots.
Weenie Hut Jr.;-;Its fun and reminds me of ascend hand of kul but harder, and there arent any bosses
Fastest Man Alive;-;Best f2p game out there
Dagur;-;i say OMG AWESOME my stomach says what too confusing and alien like dont play it
DaCreeper;-;AMAZING Best thing ever. Great graphics for a beta game I highly recommend this to anyone and everyone
Jarseph;-;this i want it to download faster
Angel Kate <3;-;Yes i recommend this game because of its graphcs and other sutffs its so good and the best part when you gonna defend some objects to complete and obtain blueprints :) Keep up!
<font face='Snap GM'>GMJOKE;-;Players must capture 4 towers, used to intercept data transmissions, and defend them from the enemy. After 100% of the transmission has been decoded, the players must kill all remaining enemies, and are then given an opportunity to extract with an additional reward. Players must wipe out all hostiles in the level, with the number remaining displayed on the upper-left below the minimap. Players must take control of a Grineer Fomorian-class ship core, and lead it through a set of tracks for destruction in deep-space. Introduced in the "Tethra's Doom" event. Players must eliminate an enemy boss unique to the given planet. Said boss usually has much more health and unique abilities and weaponry to distinguish them from common soldiers. Players must find the VIP targets within an enemy ship or stronghold. Once a VIP is located, it must be incapacitated before then being captured. Depending on the difficulty level or level setting, some VIPs are able to fight back or have longer head start to a safe zone where they cannot be captured. After all VIP targets are captured, players must fight their way to extraction.
Killerkoda13;-;ADFGAHGHASDFAS thats what i say when i hear warframe 9001/10 its that good
RapiDgAmer;-;Amazing game, download this!!!!!
Toast;-;This is basically the best f***ing game i have ever played in my entire f***ing life. If you don't already have this f***ing amazing game i suggest you get it right now.
Cool345729;-;I like warframe, It is very fun but a bit repetitive. Just keep swapping mission, weapons and classes when you get bored.
hunterdemon8;-;I love the game
Brazzers.com;-;Absolute hours of fun, especially with friends! I HIGHLY RECOMMEND this game!
CorgiOrgi pixel;-;best third person game ever
eat beat meat sleep repeat;-;its game
Oziman;-;Was cold on this one during Beta, but a friend got me to look again, its a mightly good fun experience. Theres no real depth here but there is also nothing quite like it anywhere else. Its a fun brainless co-op brawler - and its rather good. Its fast paced and thrilling. Its free-to-play so you can expect microtransactions - but you know I actually prefer that business model these days. Recommended!
WeHaveTheTechnology;-;Great Game! 10/10 Stars, Reccomend to all friends ! :P
squishey123;-;I really love this game, it has a destiny feel but its much more advanced and built for people who know their way around a keyboard like only a pc gamer would. Also has that open PC feel we all love
Galaxy;-;I don't actually play Warframe.
[DG] Darky;-;Good game. I love it its really Sexy, and sexy Oh, and sexy
Shanks ^1!!;-;I have 126 hours in the past 2 weeks that should say it all
The Metallic Buttcheek;-;Warframe, in all it's naked glory, is a good game. Now great, but not "eh". I mean, it's better than Team fortress 2, but not better than Skyrim. Somewhere in between. I mean, it's cool cuz you can be a friggin SPACE NINJA, but more than half the levels you're gonna play are set in some space station. Oh, and enemies are total bullet-sponges. However, I DO recommend this game because, let's say you're sitting around on a rainy day. You be like, "hey, man, I'm bored." Warframe will eat up your time like it was never even there. SLIGHTLY pay 2 win, but if you put your mind to it, you can access all of the features, like new Warframes (armor). Find blueprints, find components, make some crap. Use that crap to kill stuff. Use the stuff you find on the stuff that was killed to make MORE crap. THE CIRCLE OF LIFE.
Fitturtittur;-;This game is amazeballs
Annoyious;-;Wow this game is soooooooooo cool! If you dont have this game you should really get it, it"s free and very enterntaining.this game is perfect for you if you have lots of time to spare and love sci-fi games! You should really stop reading this and just get the game already,................................................................................seruiosly go get it..........................................................................STOP READING GET IT NOW..................................................................................................................................................................................OMFG JUST GET THE GOD DAYM GAME ALREADY JESUS POOPING TOLIET PAPER...........................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................Wow Whats wrong with you? Go read a book nerd.........................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................
FreakZ;-;Warframe is very amazing game with a truly original story and setting.
Geoffrey Librom;-;Just get this game already
burnoutsniper;-;This game keeps me entertained for hours, however sometimes the amount of grind is a little bit too much. If you can look past that it is an excellent game!
Discharge;-;I played this game and i can tell it really good. I didn't see any bugs and the game works very smoothly. But geting resources for blueprint's is very hard because you need to unlock more planet's that have higher level enemies.
Nikolai;-;One of the best freegames there is, really fun to play with friends, and really good gameplay
foxL;-;The gameplay is crazy. 9/10
LagInferno;-;Very fun game and engaging keeps me deep into the game
TheMattMachine!;-;I used to have retinas... not anymore 10/10 Vision Express are now rich.
Spartan;-;This is a very high quality game. It is the best Free to play I have ever played. I have played this game on and off in between updates and the best part is that it is constantly updated. I wish there was a more prominent story though.
Jaxocide;-;"Power Rangers in space simulator" 10/10
Rango;-;Pretty good game, interesting, exciting. All advise
Nemesis.xXLightbulbmanXx;-;The best 3rd person shooter out there, Tons of gun and weapons available. It is not pay to win, CUTTING PEOPLE IN HALF. Although most of the game is farming it's still realy fun to play and rewarding.
[Notorious Scrub] Diego Brando;-;I may be very sightly completely addicted to the level some WOW players are. Its good, now go play it.
xXninjascoutXx;-;i am ninja so this is freaking awsome because its a freaking ninja game!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Eliot Johnson;-;Great Graphics along with good CO-OP abillity and large maps for missions
Rin;-;When you hear the words "free-to-play third-person shooter," you probably envision yet another PvP killfest with a frightening potential for pay-to-win microtransactions. Warframe, then, is a pleasant surprise: it's a four-player co-op shooter in the vein of Mass Effect 3 multiplayer, with fast-paced action and plenty of customizable options, except without the story context. Like all too many recently launched free-to-play games, at the moment (technically open beta, but declared reviewable) it feels somewhat buggy and unfinished, but it holds the promise of what might be a great game after a few more content patches. Being a co-op game doesn't mean that you have to ignore a competent storyline (see Left 4 Dead), but Warframe seems content to establish its universe at a basic level: players are acrobatic robot-suited warriors fighting an alien invasion. Then it simply throws us into a long series of very samey-feeling missions. Whether you're asked to rescue a hostage or retrieve an alien artifact or destroy a reactor, rest assured that your primary goal is to shoot nigh-endless waves of enemies. It's good, then, that Warframe makes it quite fun to kill things and watch them die. Movement and shooting feels smooth and responsive, targets are plentiful, and there's just enough ragdoll silliness in the enemy death animations to always make me look forward to my next kill. There's a good variety of guns to choose from, including a powerful bow that can pin enemies to walls, and although the sci-fi swordsman archetype might be overplayed lately, the melee combat here is also satisfyingly weighty. Charged attacks that can slice enemies clean in half are their own reward. Animations in general are fluid and interesting, and although the environments tend toward blandness, they're lit up by a Technicolor explosion of enemy fire and player ability effects. Some tweaking is required (the bloom effects are fairly ridiculous at their default setting), but this is still one of the best-looking free-to-play games to date. Warframe runs on Digital Extreme's proprietary Evolution engine, which does a fine job of both looking great and running smoothly. The primary fodder of Warframe are the Grineer, a race of privateer space marines that do a passable job of taking cover and attempting to retreat or advance as the situation demands. However, they'll also regularly send out seeker bots, which are by far the most annoying enemies I've fought lately due to their small hitboxes and extremely rapid movement. Meanwhile the Infested race (read: space zombies) are almost exclusively melee attackers, and I found I could usually reduce them to confused immobility simply by standing on a tall box. Standing on top of boxes is just one of the abilities of these high-tech super soldiers. Each of the three warframe classes gets a suite of four unique superpowers: Volt relies on electrical attacks, Nyx uses psychic powers to turn enemies against each other, Loki becomes invisible for stealth attacks, and so on. Those abilities are fun to use, but the downside is that you wind up unlocking all of them fairly early on; some advanced superpowers at the upper end of the level curve would've been a nice reward for sticking with a single suit. Also, any of the three warframe classes can use any gun, which is understandable given that you might be paying real money for them, but it makes them feel interchangeable when it comes to shooting. Speaking of guns, the lack of grenades and other explosive options is a bit odd, but it did at least force me to move forward to engage enemies behind cover rather than bogging things down in protracted long-distance firefights. You can sneak up behind some enemies and perform backstabs to critically wound them, but in the chaos of a four-person mission, I found that stealth usually goes by the wayside fairly quickly. Most customization comes from an extensive modification system in which you plug in collected upgrades like elemental damage to your weapons and extra shields to your warframe. The interface for this system still needs a fair amount of work, though; I ran into a nasty bug that completely prevented me from switching mods out on one of my warframes, and in fact required a complete game restart every time I attempted to do so. Plus, the random nature of the drops can also be frustrating. If you miss out on the basic shield and health boosters, you might find yourself needing to re-run early missions until you get some lucky drops, as they're almost required to complete later missions. One of Warframe's significant issues at the moment is its failure to display important information, especially in the mission-select interface. It's a slick piece of work, letting you pick where you want to go in the system in a cool way, but the level ranges of each individual planet aren't shown, making you click around until you find somewhere appropriate to play. Likewise, games in progress are marked, but you have no idea of the relative level of the players involved until you actually join a game in progress. Since there isn't an quickmatch button, I had to go through a fair amount of planet-browsing each time I wanted to hop into a match, and false starts are a drag. There's always the option to simply hop into a mission by yourself and hope that someone joins you, but some missions aren't well-balanced for solo play. Some require you to carry an item that prevents you from firing your main weapon; others consist of defending critical points from enemies attacking from multiple angles. Running out of ammo is also a concern when you're outnumbered this badly. Most critically, there's no lag or ping display anywhere. Given Warframe's reliance on peer-to-peer connections, it's frustrating not to know whether you're about to hop into a game hosted by someone who's streaming HD movies from Netflix in the other room. I ran into latency problems that ranged from noticeable to almost unplayable in around a quarter of the games I joined. As with most free-to-play games, Warframe contains a store where you can exchange real-world money for one of the two in-game currencies, platinum. There isn't much in the cash-only store that could be considered mandatory, although some of these items, like the in-game pets that stun and shoot nearby enemies, additional daily revives, and power-boosting items that let you slot in twice as many mods to your frame and weapons could be classed as "very, very handy." Still, the economy feels fair, especially since you're only paying to be able to kill AI enemies more efficiently. You'll also earn the other currency, credits, as you play, and the market does a reasonable job of ensuring that most items (aside from things like XP boosters and slots for extra warframes) can be purchased with them. There's an extra laborious crafting hurdle for free players, but it's not tedious to the point of frustration. I spent $50 to buy 1,000 platinum, with which I was able to buy a bundle consisting of a new warframe, three new weapons, and a set of boosters which made earning XP and credits much quicker for a few days, with enough platinum left over to purchase another warframe and a weapon or two. For perspective, it would've taken at least a few days of regular play (not counting crafting time, which is often on the order of 12 hours per item) to earn the credits to buy them all. In its current state, Warframe feels like the foundation (or frame, you might say) of a game that might be really interesting at some point in the future. It just needs more of everything: more mission variety, more good enemies, more polish, more environments, more players. Given the cost, Warframe's well worth a try if like this ambient.
HornReaper;-;This reminds off unereal tornument just way better and whit alor wok, you can have alot off funn in the whit difrent mods planets whit Missions, Toons of weapons and the more you play the more awzomenes whill happen to you. this is defently i recomend playing just you need to play moe then 10h before the games opns more upp. abd they add new conntienent pritty often and pach eatch week and whit new stuff. and you dont have to buy money in the gane you find better items and items you can sell later on to get even more stuff,
crossxmaq;-;Always new updates, awesome gameplay and graphics. Lots of customizable options too.
Rango;-;Pretty good game, interesting, exciting. All advise
Nemesis.xXLightbulbmanXx;-;The best 3rd person shooter out there, Tons of gun and weapons available. It is not pay to win, CUTTING PEOPLE IN HALF. Although most of the game is farming it's still realy fun to play and rewarding.
Lucifer;-;Space? Ninjas? Parkour? Aliens? Free to Play? Oh Dear...
RiFT (C001Guy777);-;Besides TF2, this is the best freee to play game. EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Beautiful graphices, tons of weapons, blood and gore (but not a lot for the squimesh), and I could go on. A great game, and free.
Colonel Lutalo;-;Great game but linear level design, great weapons and armour
Teh Turtle Man;-;A great game, Graphics are beautiful and the gameplay is smooth
Lykonic;-;Love it, but it's so beefy and big it lags the crap out of me; enough that I cant do the cipher challenges to turn off alarms. Thats the only thing I say thats negative. My friend Xerel has a PS4 and says the lag is gone on it, so its probably just my crappy computer. (He has a $1000 laptop and has lik no lag)
Buy Bitcoin!;-;4.1 / 5 24 hours logged in 2 weeks. I didn't give it 5 stars because it's not a free to play game. It's a free to play demo. The quality is preemo but the development costs must be paid somehow which means you are going to have to invest some money if you want to keep enjoying this game. The 'demo' version gets a bit repeaditive and I personally need some more convincing as to the glory that 'Platinum' can unlock. I put some pretty good farm time in but the rewards lacked luster. If you aren't afraid to spend some money on a game then this one could offer some great co-op fragging but if you are looking for free to play don't expend to stay engaged for that long.
Aerodent;-;Ok game would play agaibnba
Fir3proofregent;-;SPACE NINJAS!! seriously though if you like 3rd person shooters with a mix of swordplay then this is the game for you 9/10
A.I.;-;Its a fun game but it has many issues. IMPORTANT (Downlad from warframe website and not steam!) When you first download it it gets around 6 gigs of data, then when you launch it it patches the game. So if you try to verify or backup the game you lose all fiels and it will donload the 6 gigs again, and then patch it again. Save yourself some headache and download the game from the warframe website. I gave it a thumbs up cuz its a good game but man i had to download this game 3 times already and that is not fun.
Heyi;-;I'v been playing since closed beta, and even now it still keeps me entertained and enjoyable. And there are updates almost every week, giving us new content. And the major updates often keep you busy for a few weeks.
MacGeoffolis;-;This is one of the best free to play games currently on the planet, beautiful graphics, stunning gameplay, and the best part you dont have to pay a cent unless you really want to.
V B X;-;This game is by far the most detailed free game to play. Truly remarkable graphics and with each update, it only gets. better. But there two aspects I would like to bring to the players who would like to play Warframe: 1. The game severly punishes you if you truly wish to enjoy the game, as it will force you to play for many many hours to get new warframe and weapons. 2. Although a game that does force you to play a long time, I must say the player community is the most helpful and fun than that I have experienced in any game yet. So making friends to help you gather the stronger weapons can be much more fun, eventually ending up with something more valuable than those top tier weapons. A friend X3 Anyway, I hope you enjoy the game. The game of Warframe.
The Cosmonaut;-;Interesting concept and pretty fun to play. It gets to grindy and repetetive later though,
GDani;-;the only non pay 2 win free to to play game
GDani;-;the only non pay 2 win free to to play game
Mitoy;-;Overall it is a good game Pros: *Good Graphics *Nice fight scenes Cons: *Needs a warframe account *It does not serves you breakfast
{ISU} Funny Bunny;-;YES BECAUSE YOUR A NINJA
<b>Girl Power JamieLou<b>;-;cool
supreme;-;This is fun but you have to take some breaks while playing, because this just isn't a game you would play for hours on end, also the new navigation and ship isn't as simple as it used to be, but the actual gameplay is really fun.
omarxz11;-;can i play pvp in warfame ? and if i can play pvp what lvl i can play pvp in it ?
Seegar De Thaym;-;Best game of all time. You need to at least try it. <3
Lemon Among Men;-;This game is really fun alone or with friends or even with random people.
Zxynax;-;Spam kill. It'll happen to you alot. There's only really one play style to this game. Which is sad. Makes configuration almost purely cosmetic. The skills are the best example of this. They're all essentially the same thing.
Messiah of Madness;-;See how many hours i spent on the game? thats HOW GOOD this game is Best F2P Game to ever grace steam
ImYoSeniorA;-;great game!
D0nk3yPunch3r *DO WORK*;-;It's 3rd person shooter/hack-n-slash pvp, free, very active community and always getting better. give it a shot and you'll love it
Teh Turtle Man;-;A great game, Graphics are beautiful and the gameplay is smooth
Blaz Trigger;-;It's fun man so play it man just do it man you know you want to man
QBIXZ;-;one of the best free games
TG Eggbeforechicken;-;It is about space ninja assasins from tron with super powers. Nuff said.
Bichson Hoang;-;I like this game. Don't like the bugs though.
Pckool;-;Best Free to play on Steam in my oppinion! If you like feeling Bad A**, then get this game!
aemoniumNemesis;-;You can Play as Alien Ninja do i need to say more?
RainPlays;-;this game is good if you want to have fun with friends or just seeing what space would be like so if you have many friends on steam this is your game
Vaxule#JUSTDOIT;-;THE BEAST THIRD PERSON SHOOTER I HAVE EVER PLAYED AND ENJOYED :)
=B$G= Arszilla;-;One of the first Steam games I've ever played GOOD -Its a parkour simulator -Good community -Good graphics and gameplay -Variety of warframes and guns -Continious updates -Challanging missions -NOT a P2W BAD -Bit hard to grind -Platinium is needed for some guns etc (for fast unlocks) 9.5/10 Play it
connermiles9;-;Let me tell you guys.BEST FREE TO PLAY EVER just try it and you gonna love all the Alien Ninja **** It's epic with friends and have fun ;)
mahumed;-;All around amazing game
Nikolai;-;One of the best freegames there is, really fun to play with friends, and really good gameplay
foxL;-;The gameplay is crazy. 9/10
Allah AK Bar;-;one of the most best TPS EVER!!!
crossxmaq;-;Always new updates, awesome gameplay and graphics. Lots of customizable options too.
Lexusjjss;-;It's got space ninjas and explosions and wallrunning and shiny weapons and big swords and it's free.
Rofoe;-;its an amazing looking game and feels like your in the game whilst you play you run up walls kick people in the face and did i meantion your a ing alien
mahumed;-;All around amazing game
Captain Paytore;-;i love this game its so fun and it keeps updating so the gameplay is always good
Gushin' Granny;-;Holy  balls so ing fun get it now
Agil;-;ur ninja in space, can it b mor awsom? nop
Crestfallen Scrub;-;Warframe is a great game, but alot of people abandon it due to it being a grind-fest overall its really good rating: 9/10 Pros: Completly free(unless your lazy) good visuals easy controls loads of differant classes,playstyles and weapons Cons: (might just be me) game was really hard to get into at the begining grinding(think monster hunter)
Side;-;did i ever tell u the definition of asalamandrasulaf
jaderman77;-;One of the best games I have ever played. The graphics are amazing!!!
Human Proxy;-;i dont  know what to write here so but yea this game is  just like counter strike dota and league of losers.b0ss can i habe friends in this game pls kenneey123 is my name on warframe c:
Albert Finestein;-;All i have to say its a ps4 game and i have a 1.4ghz processor and it runs perfectly so in my ccase well made,
HNCSteve;-;Very fun game, absolutley amazing with friends. challending as well as rewarding.
Slettal;-;Ninjas in Space!
TeamsolderTheGamer(Youtuber);-;the game update keep failing plz tell me why D;
Dystrial;-;I love this game. Although it's an FPS, it also has a very large amount of variety in the game, which allows for an extreme amount of customization. That's most likely the most appealing part about this game to me.
joshroland44;-;i love this game its a good thinking game and fun to play theres a lot of cool thinks
Origin Hornet;-;Great User Interface, Great Gameplay, Greatness In All. Quite Possibly The Best Game Steam Has To Offer In MMO Gaming. Try The Game Or You Haven't Lived.
Chrissy;-;This game is simply amazing. And free to play too! The basic gameplay is free It's amazing i recommend for all who wants to play fps game.
AlphaWolfram5000Extreme;-;The dev team on this game must really love their jobs because this game is beautifu.
Daiyoukai;-;Ver y fun once you get the hang of it
Doom Donuts;-;A fun broken piece of  that sometimes works Don't play unless you have a load of patience because you won't want to stop playing, even if it doesn't work properly half the time 10/10
Boomchakalaca;-;Great game try it its free meta score is totally bs would rate it a 7.5 out of 10 most fair ingame shop only problems to me is that game can get grindy.
derpytortoises;-;I started playing this thinking it was pay to win but it actually turned out to be pretty easy to get in game items with credits.
Hollow;-;Hell to the Yes!!!
thecodpro;-;it's a nice game
-Hydra-DC-;-;its good and needs more blooad and better gu shot sounds
RajaKrishna;-;This is an incredible game. Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal.Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe
DeadpoolMcGee;-;this game is amazing it has good graphics even though it gets no lagg on the worst computer the fighting in the game is good and so is every thing else DOWLOAD THIS GAME
jeredws;-;one of the best games i have ever played, honestly i am surprised that this is a free to play game. everything can be earned for free by building them using blueprints or you can spend alot of money on an ingame currency called platinum and buy everything that you want...but that would be exspensive. being a free game they have to make money somehow. i would highly reccomend getting this game if you have a good computer or check it out for free on the playstation 4 aswell
Miramin;-;Really enjoy this game!! I wasn't expecting to like it when it was suggested to me by a friend but it's great.
AP Shinryu;-;A great co-op free-to-play! Beware, this game requires a lot of patience due to the consistent farming, but it's still amazing to play!
VxXT0X1CXxV;-;Just started playing this and its not to bad its quit entertaining Love the bow
Und9rCr0ft;-;Its a game where you play as a powerful space ninja warrior, often you can feel extreemly powerful fighting off loads of enemies. Sadly one thing you have to get used to is to keep moving, so you cant stay in one place and get shot to death. Your not playing as a tank in this game, but still a very powerful space ninja. Oh did I mention space ninjas? yeah, space ninjas.
Lullaby of Amnesia;-;Very fun and intertaining for a free to play game. I highly recomend this to all steam users.
i cri everytiem;-;Great game :D
XxtenmamisogixX;-;great game
XxtenmamisogixX;-;great game
Trolly;-;Dat Lore Level, Those next gen light FX, FREAKING SPACE NINJAS WITH WONKY PARKOUR, Da Gore, Da FREAKING SPACE NINJAS, The go-wit-da-flow-Of-Troll community is too strong, werf AF. In case you were wondering, it is Totes free
Pvt. Master Z;-;Very awsome game.
Yer.A.Melon;-;Thought it was a pron game... Saw a gif of this on a forum where the main suit was bumping babies with another female suit, it was hot i guess? idk it was like the matrix Lol kind of p2w but you can still be awsome, it just takes longer? 8/10
hybrid10118;-;First i would like to thank the Dev's for their beautifull hard work on this game. i started this game when it came out and it was .. MEh.... fun and fast paced but repetitive and boring after a few games. since then, the Dev's have been hard working, every single update they did closed their flaws, optimised and unplayable game, braught it to an extreme content Filled World, remade the UI braught thousands of bonus to player, and even after the game was branded ''Pay to Win'' after a few updates it felt as if it was already a thing of the past. if you feel like playing a game that is. - Fast Paced. - Encourage either full out assault AND Stealth. - single and Multiplayer experience. - Challenging gameplay (hard to master) - hundreds of weapon. - Full crafting system. - Unlimited Replay - Dozens of character to play with and Unlock - a good community and the best of all, Dev's that freakin listen to player :P this game will be for you, and for those who say the game is missing stuff or not to your liking, tell the dev's and stay patient, i've never seen anything not getting fixed since the start of this game !! Have fun and see you inside Tenno :D
Fleet Admiral Rajuur the Barroth;-;243 hours in and I still can't stop playing. My recommendation for newer players is to get the Dual Zorens. MY WOOSH WILL PIERCE THE SKY
[VCO] Alberato (Nate);-;Fun mature action-adventure instance-based MMO. The way mods, artifacts, weapons, powers, and pets are used upgraded and synergize is very complex and rewarding. Things like mods actually make a very large and noticable effect on the way you play the game. This combined with twenty different frames and dozens of weapons makes for a very diverse game. Warning: public matches are ok for the first few hours of gameplay. but a friend or three is crucial for enjoying the mid to late game. Grinding can be a thing occasionally. Consider joining a clan.
Vincent Raccoon;-;If you are having second thoughts on weather you should get this game, let me end it for you by saying that you should. Everything about this game is extremely fun and entirely possible for any player. Yes you can spend money to get things such as weapons or warframes, but the only things you have to spend money on are completely cosmetic things such as colors and scarves. Yes, you will have to grind to get things in this, but if you have friends to play this with, or take every combat situation as something new, it doesn't even feel like grinding, it feels like playing and like fun. And even though the mission have limited types, the amazing devolopers are always adding new things to keep the game fresh and new. Even if they didn't though, a mission could change completely based on what Lotus (your contact on everything going on) thinks you should do, or your own actions on other missions. And then there are weapons you can only get if your in a clan. You can still get them even if you don't get into a huge and powerful clan. I know this because I am in a clan with one other active player, and have 2/3 of the weapons and warframes researched. Trust me when I say it, you will love this game. Just look at my hours on it. Hell, I'll even help you out if you need it, just message me. See you in the stars, Tenno.
Vincent Raccoon;-;If you are having second thoughts on weather you should get this game, let me end it for you by saying that you should. Everything about this game is extremely fun and entirely possible for any player. Yes you can spend money to get things such as weapons or warframes, but the only things you have to spend money on are completely cosmetic things such as colors and scarves. Yes, you will have to grind to get things in this, but if you have friends to play this with, or take every combat situation as something new, it doesn't even feel like grinding, it feels like playing and like fun. And even though the mission have limited types, the amazing devolopers are always adding new things to keep the game fresh and new. Even if they didn't though, a mission could change completely based on what Lotus (your contact on everything going on) thinks you should do, or your own actions on other missions. And then there are weapons you can only get if your in a clan. You can still get them even if you don't get into a huge and powerful clan. I know this because I am in a clan with one other active player, and have 2/3 of the weapons and warframes researched. Trust me when I say it, you will love this game. Just look at my hours on it. Hell, I'll even help you out if you need it, just message me. See you in the stars, Tenno.
Professor Toothy;-;If you like "pay to wins" or generic sci-fi... This game is barely for you.
crd.;-;Its a ing farming game... Hours and hours of gameplay just to level up. Great'
Zapattack1234;-;Insanely addictive and very unique.
Gunnyboy;-;You! Yeah you! I see you sitting in that chair, looking at this game and thinking "Whoa, parkour space ninjas and sci-fi guns? Awesome! .... but wait.. oh F__K, it's Free to play." Have no fear distrought gamer, for, and I know you won't believe me at first, but this game IS FREE TO PLAY. AS IN FREE. NO MONEY NEEDED. YES, THESE CAPS ARE NECESSARY. .... Anyways, like I said, "no money needed." So, for all of us penniless gamers out there, (myslef included), this is great news. BUT, for any of you rich kids who wanna just "throw money at the best stuff in the game".... sorry, but your precious money won't work this time... matter of fact, the best stuff in the game, (The prime items) can only be built from actually PLAYING THE GAME. So, I know what you're thinking: "Yeah, that's pretty cool, but you can't fool me! I know there's a catch!" .. Well, you'd be right... there is a catch... When you first pick up that MK. 1 gear, and the oh so community-loved Skana, you'd better pack a couple cows and a county of chickens with ya, cause you'll be FARMING. I mean farming so hard, corn might come outta the screen. You simply have to FARM FARM FARM to get the gear you'll want. Is this bad? To some... yes. BUT, it's a surefire way of getting what you need, so whether that's a pro or con is yours to decide. So, final wrap up... oh, and thanks for reading this "essay" by the way.... guess that 5th grade English class comes in handy sometimes.... ANYWAYS... Final wrap up, is Warframe good? YES. Is it fun? YES. SO fun, in fact, you might find yourself playing this game past "Tenno-clock". All puns aside though, at the very least, it's worth the download, so why not take up the cause and join in the fun of this "Sliding simulator 2013"? Seriously though, downlaod it, play it, live it. And have fun. Peace.
Zed Weenie;-;Warframe is a fun game, but it gets very redundant (repetitive) very quickly. Don't take this the wrong way, graphics are cool and it doesn't lag my bad computer. Some tasks get repetitive though, repeating the same mission to get a part for a weapon blah, blah blah. It's still fun, even for newcomers. 7/10 Would Play Again
Happy Banana;-;My game is crashing for no reason. Any body know why?
Modzy;-;Best free2play game on steam. ever.
JumpingMonkey;-;Played it a little bit, it's pretty good.
Alisupergold;-;Best to play whit you'r Friends
ultra;-;Recommend you play with a group of friends, otherwise this game is going to be a nightmare. Best friendly co-op game I seen so far. Has potential.
BabyRainz;-;why when i backup the warframe data than suddenly the game is gone? any solution?
tfcAaron;-;Best game ive ever played. I recommend it
John4257;-;Very nice game...i hope it didnt lag in me D: but still a realistic and cool game :D
DoctorSunshine;-;Action packed game. Never a dull moment. The game always has new typpes of missions to do and its a four person co op. You can buy new characters to play as and each one is unique in its own way.
Princess Stormy Facade;-;The easiest and most accurate way to put this game is this: Ninjas in Space. Literally, you are a ninja in a suit of armor but not power armor, that's different. Also imagine the ninjas almost have none of their actually only important quality; stealth. Yup literally the moment people see you and you shoot at them, you are detected and cannot revert to a stealth gameplay. If you want a stealth game, Warframe isn't for you, plain and simple. If you want stealth, play Skyrim or Alpha Protocol. The game lags in short bursts and consistently for me regardless of what graphics settings i use. There's no way to optimize the graphics settings in the game or set it to preset quality modes. All weapons and even the character itself levels up, but that's no big deal as Ratchet and Clank did it way before Steam was even an idea, before half-life 2 or 1 pretty much. This game has had a rather large amount of love poured into it, but the fact levels do not have any secrets in it (otherwise known as those things you found in duke nukem 3d, doom, and the first two quake games that the game would then call you out on) makes me rather sad. Some things I'd recommend adding into the game are... A way to improve the stealth aspects of this game. Some people may want to be an actual ninja in space, instead of a kung-fu cowboy who jsut shoots things. People can just play Planetside 2 if they wanna shoot things only. Maybe a way to passively detect the viewing direction of enemies. For sure a better way to move the camera, none of this stupid over-the-shoulder crap or atleast give us an option to change the default and set camera mode. Make invisibility less of a crappy invisibility, or name it to crappy cloak instead because a 10 second thnig of invisibility isn't even really useful as you have to stand up and get spotted to use it in the first place. Maybe make it so that the tutorial in the menu part is skippable. Part of palying games is discovery, I ing hate it when my hand is held forcefully as if i'm 12 in a damn video game. Sorry, but i beat Quake 2 on all difficulties no problem, i beat Alter echo twice, the hardest game of the golden age era of games. I'm seriously sure i can handle everything this game has to offer. That's not saying I'll actually see it as thi game can't keep me interested enough. I don't like playing this game for the above reasons, most of them too great to ignore in my mind. Yes, i recommend Warframe. If you want to have a Sci-Fi action shooter with acrobatics *cough* UT3 *cough* and a terribly small stealth aspect, which then forces you to play offensive run and gun. So yes. Play Warframe if you can enjoy a shooter game that has no secrets to find, automatically making it pretty much the equivalent of forced artistic expression. Soulless. Atleast put some ing puzzles into the game, and not  ones like duke nukem 3d did with the button combinations which were pretty awesome at the time, but nowadays we can do so much more. I give this game a 3/10 overall, 8/10 for appearance, which is the smallest factor in the history of games when it comes to the relation of games to how fun they are to paly, and for gameplay i give it a 4/10. May be a bit harsh, but I want to see shooters with a puzzle element, something to make the player think more than one might think while playing metroid prime 2.
unhealthy sashimi salad;-;Addicting and fun but maybe be boring after u have done everything.Great game though :D
Piglisrael;-;An annoying grindfest where people with their moms credit card outdo you anyways, only redeeming feature is the models. Animation is poor and the menus are garish, the stability of the servers provided are laughable at best and can make it almost unplayable. The way upgrades work are limited and poorly assembled with very little to actually incentivize more play. Warframe gets a 100/100 A+,  this game.
MCbryce0110;-;Really fun game if you like being a Ninja from outer space! Kind of like start trek! GET IT!
Rufus;-;a very good strat game! lots of loot, weapons, and warframes (charecters) 4.5/5
Kohar;-;why do I have 1000 hours in this terrible game
Tex;-;As addictive as DoTA 2.
Shadowstep;-;This game has change a lot by updates, with the most recent update being a major change to the user interface, for the good. With the new quest system allows a more friendly intro in the game without being overwhelmed by all the content in the game and includes more narrative into the game so it is no longer only played for it's gameplay, however only slightly becuase the quest system in new, but will improve over time with updates. The game is Free to play but I recomemed you spend some money on this game, about the same amount you would pay for a normal game becuase you will find yourself having a hard time getting on your feet in this game with equipment but do not buy weapons or Warframes directly with plat. becuase it is really expensive and you can better get them through Blueprints and gathering the materials to build them instead. The reason for buying plat. is to get on your feet and super charge your equipment making them twice as powerful. For mod collecting mods (the things you use to upgrade your equipment) you can go to the trading tab but only for rare mods that you really want or need otherwise just get them from the game. Overall this game has improve over time and will continue to do so, so if you find yourself unsatisfied with the game you may find it more entertaning with future updates.
||centre||;-;Nice game. It is a nice concept. It was fun when I played it during the start of it. But, I can't play it right now, sadly. I wish it was on other platforms as well.
ThePantyDrAWPer;-;Extremely fun and addictive a little bugs here and their but the developpers know what their doing and even have so fun little livestreams about updates and stuff which also gives you a chance to win a draw
SpaceExza;-;One of the BEST Thirdperson MMO game i ever played. Deffintly something you should look into :)
InsanitySlayer;-;Space Motheren Ninjas!
headshotlord1;-;is epic
xXYuutaXx;-;One of the best MMOTPS game ever, in my opinion.
call the cheat police;-;Awesome alien-slaughtering action!!!
xFayt;-;This game is pretty fun although it gets a little repetitive and gets boring after a while of playing it nonstop so if you want to get this don't play it all the time or you get bored of it really fast.
TommyG;-;when ever i try to log in it say internet time out, anyone know how to fix this cause it looks like a awesome game
3DRay-X;-;Warframe is a realy awesome and unique game. The creators thought this game through for sure. The way that they combine the old fashioned weapons (meele weapons) and the new fashioned weapons (primary and secondary) is fantastic! The veriaty of power ups which are know as Modifications or Mods is huge. I couldn't count them all. Weapons have a huge veriaty as well. The Warframes of this game are about 20. Not a lot but it's pretty hard to aquire all of them. I shall not explain any more. The rest is up to you to discover. Good luck Tenno...
Theduelest13;-;Great game! Just needs a deathmatch.
darkwater409;-;Definitely a fun and addicting game. You start off having just come out of Cryostasis. After that, from what I've played of it so far, you are sent straighht into battle. Your character is somewhat similar to alien space ninja with upgradeable helmets shaped similar to "shark fins". The gameplay is amazing, the graphics are better than most games I've played, and the game is literally action packed. Definately a 10/10 in my opinion. I would definately recomend this to all who action packed sci-fi style games.
DecentlyExposedJay;-;Of course I do. I spent so many hours playing this game. It's tons of fun :3
Gravy Jones;-;The game started off very fun with it having some pretty solid combat but unfortunately that can only get you so far. It ended up being the way of Vindictus, the combat was AMAZING but the content was lacking. All the stages are pretty much the same and it gets extremely repeatative rather quickly. However, for some people it could be something new and fun to play.
Really Mad ();-;What can I say, God damn, this is so cool :)
AnathemIsCool;-;no thanks
Really Mad ();-;What can I say, God damn, this is so cool :)
AnathemIsCool;-;no thanks
The Whitest Pussy You Know;-;Needs to be Nvidia compatible...
Flame1280;-;This game I can only suggest to certain people, Its fun for some but a grind for others. It is free to play yes but in order to get new gear to use you have to go to different planets to look for parts. This is where the grind part of this game can come in because as it is not a fully finished game the variety in the maps is still...lacking but the fast paced hyper active combat can make up for that if thats your style..its personally the reason I've almost clocked 200 hours in this game. I will point out that the weapons and new warframes you can aquire are definetely unique from one another and that throws in enough variety on that front to keep you interested as long and you get the parts needed to build them with out throwing in the towel and quitting before hand. So yes all in all its fun, theres fast paced "ninja" combat, variety in combat styles and gear but there is the grind of getting those new items without spending real money to aquire them quickly.
[RZR]FulltimeKiller13;-;Its Fun, Original and Beautiful Grafix
MisterMollusk;-;This is a really fun game and one of the best free to play games I've played. It's meant to be played cooperatively, so try it out with a friend. It's free, so there's no risk in giving it a shot.
The Prowling Magus;-;AAAAAAAAGHH! IT'S SO GOOD!
Shtantzky;-;Fast-Pace, third person, badass pile of awsome!
Knightshade515;-;Ninjas in space fighting Aliens. If that sentence didn't intrigue and excite you, then there's no hope for you as a human being. Enjoy nothingness, you joyless wasteling.
Reconterd;-;Really fun if you just feel like killing a bunch of things.
QBDLettuce;-;Best Co-op game I've ever come across, and I've tried alot. Simple yet complex and intricate movement and combat system, with smooth transitions into free running madness, all while under attacks from swarms of enemies. Do you and your group have what it takes to survive?
Just Call Me Kevin;-;This game is really fun to play with you friends, There is a stealth aspect to the game which I love and you're able to go in guns blazing aswel..
Giant Sax Meme;-;It's a radical game about space ninjas goin' round killin' stuff. It's NOT P2W, everybody has the same resources available, paying or not. So don't let others talk you into that. Though the game IS a bit of a grind at times. Search (x) for (insert resource and/or blueprint here.) and build up the credits to create what you want. RNG is a total hack, but don't let that water down your fun. Overall; It's a nice game to play with friends, or by yourself. Money will make the game easier, though you don't have to at all.
Mr. President;-;Quite possibly one the greatest Free-to-play games on the market, the community is decent, the graphics are dazzling, and the combat is explosive, however this game loses it's appeal once the equipment and character acquisition grind come into play. All characters and weapons are craftable, however pay-to-win is a very viable option unfortunately, with crafting times varying from 1 day to 3 days for each piece, let alone the actual multiple piece item. The environments are recycled and lose their shine after a while, though it really doesn't detract from the game seeing as how it fits the clone/pirate/zombie storyline. Overall a superb game, until you hit the equipment wall.
SOULSHOUT;-;WHAT MORE CAN YOU SAY BUT : MUST DOWNLOAD - MUST PLAY- BEST F2P ;3
FailQuail_Justicar;-;amazing game, but be prapared for lag if your on a lower end system
nac660158;-;Warframe was a different game for me. I usually don't play online third person shooters or any online shooter for that matter. The game had a interesting setup, I liked the fact that this game has a lot of customization on weapons. However the game has quite a few issues. First of all this game is heavy pay to win. Crafting in this game takes a lot of time (12 hours for weapons) and a lot of credits (in game currency). However people who pay for the game can just buy these weapons from the start. People who pay can also buy additional warframes from the start, which have to be crafted (it is very difficult to do) by non paying members. Non paying members are also limited in even the basic colors of their warframe. They are only given a tiny fraction of colors (That didn't include black which bothered me since its one of my favorite colors) that are honestly not that good with the exception of a few. As for gameplay itself it seemed to have good mechanics, I liked the fact that you can beat a level with stealth to avoid fighting masses of enemies (best done solo with loki warframe). Weapon balance seemed good. Combat is fast paced, fluid, and full of action. Live action and several different ways to use melee attacks along with awesome jumps had me, at times, just messing around with the controls for fun. The game feels kind of disconnected between players though. Throughout my time playing this game very few players would talk to me, and honestly there wasn't much to talk about. The game also has very repetetive maps. While I understand making a unique map for every single level would be impossible, throughout my time playing I only saw three maps. An underground cave, a base on a icy planet, and a warship. The individual sections are also repetitive. By one or two playthroughs of each map you will have seen almost every section there is. It would be nice to see a unique design for every world, which I think is possible. The missions themselves are highly repetative. I found myself doing the same thing over and over again with few alterations. Some new mission types should be added to the game to curb its repetetive feel. In the end, if you are going to play this game as a dedicated player, be ready to fork out some money because my f2p run of this game had me leaving by the time I finished mars. Some improvments that I think would help the game: Create at least three unique maps for each world, get a world chat lobby to connect the players a little more, make demos for weapons so we know what the gun is like before we go through the trouble of getting them, and add some new missions to make the game less repetetive. Well there is my review
GreenSnakeKiller;-;Very fun! Kind of confusing at first, but once you know what you are doing it is awesome!
boboknight11;-;I have played Warframe alot and I can tell you that if you like shooters you will love this game. Most free to play games I have played are really bad or are pay to win but Warframe is not. Warframe has a system were if you want to pay to get things quicker you can but almost everything that you can pay to get you can get without spending anything and the stuff you do have to pay for are mostly cometic. Warframe's combat system is very good and fun to play with becuase there is a weapon or tool for almost every play style out there. The people who make Warframe seem to care very much about there game and what people think of it and have a content update every week and a big update every few weeks. One thing I wish warframe had more of is story and I think that that is pretty much the only thing that is lacking in Warframe but do not worry because the devs are making meny updates to the story and lore. Warframe is a very fun and very well made game and I think that if you like shooters you will love this game.
BAKA Commando;-;The upsides are simple: This game's aesthetic is amazing; Tenno look cool, everything they do looks cool, player actions and stuff are cool, and dome helmets. The story is ambiguous enough to be open to whatever player's interpretive powers might allow and it doesn't get in the way. You have guns and you shoot things, you have swords and you hit things. Navigation is almost never an issue and teamwork is smooth and easy. Pace is generally pretty fast and thus things don't get stale as quickly. The downsides are also simple: Buggy as hell. This being free to play, everything that isn't 'basic XY or Z' costs dollars or a lot of time, especially aesthetic stuff. Grinding is not too bad but still present. Networking can be awful at times, and occasionally nonexistant. Teamwork is not a necessity, having a team is, as the game doesn't seem to be balanced even remotely for less than the typical complement of 4 players without being laughably easy.
Scaled-Bagel;-;Very easy game to play, if you ignore all the grinding and damage calculations. And grinding. And endless grinding... But it's a very fun game, mixes shooter with parkour-ish mechanics.
Yourak_Hunt;-;This is hands down one of the most addicting games I've played in a long time. 20 minutes turns into 5 hours easy. You won't be disappointed
Darkgore;-;Fully f2p game , there's no way you can win this with p2w. Tons of content and customization to use your creativity! Just try it ! This game is full of action and unforgettable experience.
DroptheDead;-;Warframe is an online Coop-Shooter, which slightly reminds me of a mix of Halo (Story + Setting) and Mirror's Edge(moveability and gameplay style). This Combo results in lots of excitement and possibilities and a lot of fun while playing. You can go on PvE missions all around our solar system (and even a bit outside of it) or play PvP in consortium. The matchmaking is cool (you can even set the max ping you want to be matched with), even if you play without your friends you will be automatically assigned to squads going onto the same mission. There are a few bugs which might force you to shut down the game (only occured in menu) but remember: it's free and it's in beta. So wtf do you want? :D It is a free-to-play title, with (in my opinion) exemplary handling of paying gamers: You can only speed up your advance (getting new warframes and equipment) through paying real money. If you are non-payer: You can farm everything on your own and get the newest warframes, too. Which is perfect, as I want to play a game to get the good stuff (so you got a lot to do). The only thing I'm not sure about is Warframe/Weapon slots. You will need to purchase them for real money, if you want to have more than 2 warframes or 8 weapons at a time. Warframe slots cost 20 platinum and weapon slots cost 6 platinum. The smallest platinum buying pack costs 4,49 and gets you 75 platinum, so at the worst real money to platinum rate one warframe slot costs around 1,20. The only really bad thing I noticed: It's pretty adictive, especially in the beginning (e.g. after getting your first warframe part).
FORDCU BABA;-;much good very play wow so violence much recommend explosyon wow
Runavicious;-;This thing, I'd PAY for this and it's for free, its too well made to be true.
bendsnoopy;-;the boss game
Izayoi;-;is entertaining but gets repetitive. 6/10
Blu-J;-;GAMEPLAY: 7/10 STORY: 5/10 (based on lore) ONLINE: 7/10 Very P2W (Pay to win). You can buy everything and they even have donor deals that give you more elite items for giving over $100. Never the less, this game is fun to play with friends or online, just make sure you have a decent internet connection. Since it is still beta, there a few glitches(like flinging yourself across the map) but they are more "WTF was that!" and don't destroy the gameplay. Most of the weapons you want are also craftable for mostly resonable resources and in game cost. So P2W slightly balances out for weapons. The different Warframes and difficult to get, so either be prepaired to fork over some cash to get the one you want or grind for the resources you need to make it. The Warframe you start out with is prefectly viable and works, so they arent forcing you to P2W. Online is decent, people a generally very nice though not often helpful (whether though lack of knowledge or lack of input). Except lag issues though, especially with lots of other people. I only recommend this because it is free, and you dont have to pay to have decent items to play with.
awping shitter;-;Pretty good. It is pay to get better wepons but the wepons they give u at the start are not horrible. You can just upgrade ur default weps the make em as good as the others.
Syndacus;-;I completely admite this game, although I do not enjoy the multiplayer. I always have to 3-4 minutes for one person to catch up in order for us to complete the mission.
Golden;-;This lady told me to go in a room, where I then proceeded to be hit in the face with a knive by a guy. 10/10 would get hit in the face with a knive by a guy again.
Wade Winston Wilson;-;a very well made game, suprisingly made by a small dev team but has become widely recognized to the point of a console release which is a great feat (even if it is download only) great game and more stuff being added to it
TRR Vegeto247;-;It's a fun and beautiful game but the only problems are: it's FTP which means micro transactions, said purchaseable items are needed for the more difficult levels as free items are weak or take forever to acquire, you need to level EVERY NEW WEAPON YOU ACQUIRE, there will be areas or missions where you will NEED a full team. Play when you have nothing else to play or do.
DuhdundeDon;-;A lot of effort put into this free game and it's pretty fun
Moth Broth;-;Super rad, poured time into it for no good reason
[CRFX] Ragefright;-;This is one of my favorite game's, not only is it a MMO that focus's on Co-Op but it's also a FPS, too my knowledge there's no game's quiet like this. a Space ninja, with amazing powers! Yep, no place like home. <3 xoxo
KingButt;-;it makes me poop really hard
dizzyispower;-;Fun shooty. I suggest playing it in short burst so it does not become too repetitive.
Sir Mopi Of Swadia;-;Extremely fun and good free to play game. Everything can be acessed without money.
ss  (Kyle);-;I tried to stomach this game. The videos looked good, they really do look fun. I downloaded, jumped into a game with friends and could not stomach close to 1hour. It really is boring. It does nothing... All you do is go from one room to another swinging your sword around, that is it. Graphics are decent with smooth flowing but that is all it has going for it. Lucky to hell it is free because if this had a price I think I would pull my hair out requesting a refund urgently because it is mind numbingly boring. I suggest leaving it alone, maybe give it ago but then you'll see what I mean. It has no story, most things are buy for better stuff but it all seems to do the same effect, the character moves weird and makes me feel sick a little. Anyway nope not for me.
Snailbait;-;it's left 4 dead with space ninjas and a side of rpg
Vapore666;-;Very fun game. I suggest you try it!
Clam;-;it's cool and all, but it gets repetitive when you grind to level up and the missions are intense too, so you can't enter like a level 5 mission as level 2. gotta grind. which is stupid from the linear maps.
Omega_project;-;game os quite fun but gets a little repetative. need new things to be added as the game progressis tp keep intresting
zzzzq;-;Like Skyrim with Guns.
Waffleess;-;great F2P a bit addictive though!
The Mexican;-;This is a great and crazy fun game to play. The learning curve is a much at first but once you have a few hour in this game you are hooked. The design and game game is wonderful. The Frames to pick from or obtain offer everyone something speical to them and the style of game play you would enjoy. The dev are always releasing new content and items. I like that this is not a 5 hour game and then on the something else. This game is something you will enjoy for months and never look back. Give it a try and hope to see you in the game. THEGRID
Captnolimar;-;Get this right now or you will never live as a true gamer
Ouchqt;-;Very good quality game for f2p, rather grindy and repetitive but overall fun
Jiaz;-;Very fun game. There is a few weapons behind a pay wall. That being said you get a great game that I personally never felt pushed into paying anything for. My character never felt weak or wasn't able to keep up or fully participate. Server stability was never an issue. Often times running smoother than games I had paid for. Highly recommened giving it a go.
Stripes Cahming in teh Gym;-;My god, this game is glorious!
Buckmans;-;One of te better games available at the moment, It's fun it's free it's big......... It's worth getting an erection for.
Lenny;-;very great much killing such grafics WOW
dionaga;-;Very grindy, but there's a fun game underneath it all.
rustle;-;ayo trill dis some sick  boiiiii
Butt_Slut;-;best game i ever played ever thats free...no really
Vincent Raccoon;-;If you are having second thoughts on weather you should get this game, let me end it for you by saying that you should. Everything about this game is extremely fun and entirely possible for any player. Yes you can spend money to get things such as weapons or warframes, but the only things you have to spend money on are completely cosmetic things such as colors and scarves. Yes, you will have to grind to get things in this, but if you have friends to play this with, or take every combat situation as something new, it doesn't even feel like grinding, it feels like playing and like fun. And even though the mission have limited types, the amazing devolopers are always adding new things to keep the game fresh and new. Even if they didn't though, a mission could change completely based on what Lotus (your contact on everything going on) thinks you should do, or your own actions on other missions. And then there are weapons you can only get if your in a clan. You can still get them even if you don't get into a huge and powerful clan. I know this because I am in a clan with one other active player, and have 2/3 of the weapons and warframes researched. Trust me when I say it, you will love this game. Just look at my hours on it. Hell, I'll even help you out if you need it, just message me. See you in the stars, Tenno.
Professor Toothy;-;If you like "pay to wins" or generic sci-fi... This game is barely for you.
crd.;-;Its a ing farming game... Hours and hours of gameplay just to level up. Great'
Gunnyboy;-;You! Yeah you! I see you sitting in that chair, looking at this game and thinking "Whoa, parkour space ninjas and sci-fi guns? Awesome! .... but wait.. oh F__K, it's Free to play." Have no fear distrought gamer, for, and I know you won't believe me at first, but this game IS FREE TO PLAY. AS IN FREE. NO MONEY NEEDED. YES, THESE CAPS ARE NECESSARY. .... Anyways, like I said, "no money needed." So, for all of us penniless gamers out there, (myslef included), this is great news. BUT, for any of you rich kids who wanna just "throw money at the best stuff in the game".... sorry, but your precious money won't work this time... matter of fact, the best stuff in the game, (The prime items) can only be built from actually PLAYING THE GAME. So, I know what you're thinking: "Yeah, that's pretty cool, but you can't fool me! I know there's a catch!" .. Well, you'd be right... there is a catch... When you first pick up that MK. 1 gear, and the oh so community-loved Skana, you'd better pack a couple cows and a county of chickens with ya, cause you'll be FARMING. I mean farming so hard, corn might come outta the screen. You simply have to FARM FARM FARM to get the gear you'll want. Is this bad? To some... yes. BUT, it's a surefire way of getting what you need, so whether that's a pro or con is yours to decide. So, final wrap up... oh, and thanks for reading this "essay" by the way.... guess that 5th grade English class comes in handy sometimes.... ANYWAYS... Final wrap up, is Warframe good? YES. Is it fun? YES. SO fun, in fact, you might find yourself playing this game past "Tenno-clock". All puns aside though, at the very least, it's worth the download, so why not take up the cause and join in the fun of this "Sliding simulator 2013"? Seriously though, downlaod it, play it, live it. And have fun. Peace.
Zed Weenie;-;Warframe is a fun game, but it gets very redundant (repetitive) very quickly. Don't take this the wrong way, graphics are cool and it doesn't lag my bad computer. Some tasks get repetitive though, repeating the same mission to get a part for a weapon blah, blah blah. It's still fun, even for newcomers. 7/10 Would Play Again
Happy Banana;-;My game is crashing for no reason. Any body know why?
Modzy;-;Best free2play game on steam. ever.
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Xenomorph;-;ok, ive decided to come back and rereview this game. With all the updates and small changes, its alot better, and it doesnt feel as boring and samey. The particle effects can chug the frame rate, but other then that the graphics are still top notch. the weapons are kinda bullet hosey, but with what ive been using its still nice and responsive. the melee attacks feel better, some how, the have more impact then nothing. playing with others is definatly were this game shines, but keep in mind your revives. the whole self revive is a bit annoying when you run out, as you need to pay, so thats a tad stingy. overall the business model is somewhat fair. you get credits faster and level up faster so it doesn't feel like a grind. i now do recommend the game, as it is much better, and deserves extensive play, even if not in one sitting. However, the business model isnt perfect, and can feel aggresive, so be warned
Codester;-;Great game
|AA|BUD1CE316;-;This is so epic.
Sylux;-;One of the best free-to-play games out there. The begginning is difficult to go through but after that it can be a very rewarding and awesome game. Check it out. Right now. Ninja's play for free
[HAN]IOTA poi;-;every  is fine well problems? is this really a ing free game? u serious about that ? every good equipment need REALLY money to purchase and IT IS NOT CHEAP at all! wut? u want to try it free? good luck with that u r gonna spend weeks for sth those players who spend money to play will get in several days so i would like to this the game had better charge players (like WOW or whatever) and let most of the equipment be availble for purchase via the in game currency instead of making every  no cheap in USD. Besides, making it similar to world of tank--> enable using the basic in game currency to purchase advanced currency that currently only avaible if paid with USD. besides.... a corperation of 4 players? i though it was sth like the stupid EA's Battlefield i would rather play PAYDAY2 since this game wont charge USD on every ing gun about the graphic i only get a GT555M so i wont say too much i do enjoy it though sometimes the fps drops drammatically other features are pretty good >_>
[BH] Anya;-;A lovely game, still in development. (Obviously). But the gameplay is amazing, straight-forward, and the release of new content is well worth the wait and keeps me coming back. Can't wait for more addition of lore, game types and the like. The shiny, it intensifies.~
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Jester of Wrath;-;One of the best F2P games i have played, and most likely the best TPS out there. Most games may be slow in the start and catch up as you go along, but Warframe manages to pace it pretty evenly. Altough, closer to high level gameplays if you are playing by yourself, (Wich i unfirtunatly am...) Things will start to get slow very fast. However, if you manage to get into a clan, or make one yourself and have people play with you, it will quickly start to catch up again. I recomend finding friends to play with and go on missions like The Void and the like. And since the creators are nearly always working on the game, you can expect updates very often, and check out their Twitch to get the latest news. 8.5/10
Destructive Logic;-;Need to create another account to play.
Sir Scrubbington;-;Mate, what a gem of a game. For free, this is well worth it. Its not a  piece of Freemium software either, this is a properly F2P game. So, here's the breakdown... Criteria Score Graphics 9 Gameplay 8 Content/td] 10 [/tr][/table] Graphics in this game are pretty stunning, but there are occasional texturing issues and glitches. Gameplay is repetative, but addictive and most of all, great fun. Shooting an enemy then jumping on his buddy and cutting him in half honestly gives you a bloodlusty rush. The amount of content in this game is fantastic. Many Weapons, Warframes, and abilities all make up this wide selection. Each Warframe, Weapon and ability are all vastly different and provide a great selection to play by your style. Overall, 9/10. Congratulations to the developers, you've provided an proper Free to play game, without it being pay to win as so many games are these days. Well done.
Billy Mays;-;Hey. It was good
Iam a SHPEE;-;i do recommend this but there is a bug taht bans u for no reason but it happens rarely so dw this game is totally awesoem and the addition of the kubrow makes it much more fun
Raniel Dadcliffe;-;Fun game, at times, farming is rough but other than that it's pretty awesome.
shr00d;-;Hell yes.
Finn the Human;-;Great game loved it
NegaZero64;-;This unique F2P game is one of the best PC games out there. It has a very nice system of parkour, combat, and other things. And the updates come out at a rather frequent rate, always giving you more, and looking forward to more. The one thing that I dont like is the secondary currency of Platinum, which can only be bought through real-world money. But you can get up to 50% off discounts just by playing the game. And it is not at all pay-to-win. You can progress easily through the game if you really want to. Platinum just makes it to where you can get a jump across some obstacles. Everything is can be accesed, and nothing seems to be Platinum exclusive. 9.5/10 stars. I really recommend this game!
killr_xsstrim;-;i love warframe
Gr1mvisions;-;it is a really fun game if your into advanced games like alien/future type games and mmos so if you play it you cant stop till atleast you have two max lvl warframes. :D
SWAG!!!;-;I Love This Game <3
TH3COMBATMEDIC;-;Great Co-op game with nice looking graphics. Good community and awesome Devs. Not pay2win at all and if anyone says that they haven't played the game at all. This game can be won without paying a single cent. Of course if you want to pay for colours or attachments then it would require platinum.
F0l2saken;-;This honestly is a very well made game, at least I think so. It mixes RPG/looting elements commonly found in hack nslash games with a 3rd person shooter game like gears of war for example. The problem is, the lack of variety. Throughout the entime game you'll be leveling up your gear, grinding for hard to find mods and resources, all to fight the same basic variety of enemies. They have just 3 factions of enemies in the entire game from start to finish. Epic bosses? They finally added one with the Orokin Derelict Missions, but other than that, they are all non meaningful and easily forgotten. I played this game for a while until I realized "What's the point?" What's the point of grinding to find better gear to constantly fight the same enemies on the same levels in a world that never changes at all...
Petit Gteau Cannibale;-;A game about space ninja's. Please ignore.
Rusty Shaquelfurg;-;This game is truly an amazing space age kinda game. I love it for it's customization and gameplay techniques. c:
The Lone Wanderer;-;It's a fun and fast paced game that successfully makes you feel like a badass. You are essentially a space ninja that carries out objectives on different planets, levelling up and taking on more difficult enemies.You can leap over railings, slide through doorways, all whilst firing at an enemy. You can then finish him off by slicing him in half with your sword and watch his body split in two. It makes you feel very powerful and very agile. The game is great for free to play and most fun is had when you work with friends. It can become a problem later on if you do play with randoms as you may need to collect loot whereas they may want to race to the finish. You then miss out on the bonus creds for finishing the level. Loot is necessary to build new weapons, warframes and sentinels when you have acquired the necessary blueprint. This is where the game becomes a little grindy. You sometimes have to repeat the same boss and same planets over and over in order to get the materials or blueprints that you want. (Update: Blueprints have been made easier to collect) You can however purchase them with real money in the shop and some items such as new skin colours can only be purchased this way. The levels are very samey and the map is randomly generated; you can sometimes run through an identical room two or three times in one level and that doesn't include the required backtracking.There is also a limited number of planets at this time and you can only level each warframe up to 30 which doesn't take very long to do. Perhaps this will be addressed at a later point as the game doesn't provide much incentive to keep you playing. The game doesn't scale down if you want to play solo, so it can be a refreshing change of pace and is great for someone that wants a serious challenge. Warframe can be very fun and I'd certainly recommend it to anybody who wants to hack through large waves of enemies and feel awesome doing it. It does become quite repetitive but it is definitely worth a go since it's free to play.
babyjoker0319;-;one of the few computer games that i play easy to navigate and enought action to keep me going.
FaZe Stalin;-;I've only played this game for a little while but it's an AMAZING game! At first it was a bit confusing but after a few missions everything makes sense. The actual boss fights requires you to use some strategy but that's a good thing because its not just a shoot and kill sort of game. But as with 99% of F2P games it does have some bugs. Sometimes if you slide thrugh a wall you might glitch through it. Another thing it lacks is after a while you sorta get used to fighting the regular enemies. The pros are that the gameplay is solid, it's fun to murder foes with friends, there are many weapons to chose from, & the warframes are also a pretty nice thing. Overall I give it a 9/10
Kobayashi Maru;-;Warframe is a bit of an enigma in the free to play market, as it is very different from most other free to play games. So instead of rating it the way I usually do I'm going to list the pros and cons and you can decide for yourself. Pros: -Very polished gameplay and mechanics -A large variety of frames and weapons, leading to many styles of gameplay (with new ones being added on a, roughly, monthly basis) -Very in-depth customization, I've yet to see 2 frames with the exact same color scheme -Built in alert/invasion system for bonus rewards, so the game doesn't get boring -Built in high difficulty setting for missions you've already cleared, so lower level missions are still worth coming back to -Seasonal events that shake things up a bit -Constant stream of rewards from doing missions -Generally nice community Cons: -Some frames are really hard to get if you don't pay. E.g. Components are bound to random alerts, etc. -There are a few balancing issues, making some frames and weapons far superior to others. -Limited warframe slots if you don't buy more (2 by default) -Game hits a slight difficulty wall around jupiter missions and beyond, if you don't have an orokin reactor. -Starting weapons are terrible, get others as soon as you can. -Some items seem a little highly priced for you get. ex. $5 for a new color palette. -Environments can get a little repeatative after a while Other notes: Things that could be a pro or con depending on your preferance and are worth mentioning. -PvP almost non-existant, 90% of the game is PvE -Generally not advised to play solo, and will get the most fun out of it with friends. -Has trading system, but is very limited -Damage system is fairly complex and deep, may be confusing to some -A little grindy to get some items, but if you have a fair amount of patience, shouldn't be too bad. -No dedicated servers, game just picks the best host and starts And that's the gist of Warframe. If you're on the fence, give it a try, it's free to play.
bob120981;-;best free to play i have played
Special Klams;-;Guns and ninjas... what's not to love!
Otis;-;Still the best game out there
Macroskye;-;for free to play its worth a shot but its quite slow and repetative
Nexus Blaze;-;This game is totally awesome
bendsnoopy;-;the boss game
Izayoi;-;is entertaining but gets repetitive. 6/10
Blu-J;-;GAMEPLAY: 7/10 STORY: 5/10 (based on lore) ONLINE: 7/10 Very P2W (Pay to win). You can buy everything and they even have donor deals that give you more elite items for giving over $100. Never the less, this game is fun to play with friends or online, just make sure you have a decent internet connection. Since it is still beta, there a few glitches(like flinging yourself across the map) but they are more "WTF was that!" and don't destroy the gameplay. Most of the weapons you want are also craftable for mostly resonable resources and in game cost. So P2W slightly balances out for weapons. The different Warframes and difficult to get, so either be prepaired to fork over some cash to get the one you want or grind for the resources you need to make it. The Warframe you start out with is prefectly viable and works, so they arent forcing you to P2W. Online is decent, people a generally very nice though not often helpful (whether though lack of knowledge or lack of input). Except lag issues though, especially with lots of other people. I only recommend this because it is free, and you dont have to pay to have decent items to play with.
Flowers;-;Beautiful game that should set itself as an example of what's to come into the future of first-person shooter MMORPGs, Warframe blends superb graphics, great controls, a startling concept with an interesting backstory, and hella rad gameplay to provide a good time-sink and good game for all. Try it, and you will not regret a single thing. Also: Did I mention it's a free-to-play with minimal forcefulness in microtransactions?
AlexusPro;-;Very good game ...
Kurisu;-;Cool game!
Dr. Person;-;There are Space NInjas. 10/10
Standards;-;10/10 would vehemently divekick again
krazzywarrior;-;Warframe is awesome, but you will need to spend a lot of time grinding solar systems to get good gear. Its well worth the grind in the end. If your looking for a game thats got Grity and hard fought battles that require a good team with some good ability to fill in the Trinity (somewhat) Warframe is your game. 10/10 in my book for a 3rd Person Shooter with the capablity of soloing most of it.
Seqan;-;Warframe is Mass Effect's gameplay combined with Halo's versatility meshed together with Left 4 Dead 2's cooperative teamwork. This game is the epitamy of F2P games in my opinion with a very good model. Anything that you can buy with real money can be acquired in game for free, and the best equipment cannot be bought at all. This game is easily my favorite one to play and I highly recommend you try it out.
Sir Adair;-;This is a awesome game!!!
TacticalChaos_;-;Great way to pass the time, and can be hard at time's to level, but keep you intrested!!!!!!!!!!!
Cirden;-;Good game,Fast Paced,Action packed. worth checking out
Rivers Cuomo;-;Do you like Sentai? Power Rangers? Karate Bugmen? Then this is the grindfest for you. Only complaint is not enough karate.
Orangereapor;-;So far its the best MMOFPS i have ever seen. The graphics are great, and there are several characters to choose from, but at first you can only pick from the 3 that they give you. So far the updates keep getting better and better. There are some items that can be bought with special currency, but there are also items that can be obtain just by earning money from the missions. If you wanted to do some missions on your own, you can play the game in solo mode. Some mission can be challenging but they can be done. At the moment, there isn't a signal thing that is negative about the game.
NxT Definition;-;The games graphics and style are awesome and 3rd person-shooter action s pretty solid though the melee could be better. The game has a crafting mechanic for the weapons which is cool as it adds replayablity, however i found it Very grindy and i play games like disgaea and Monster Hunter so when i say THIS game is grindy...it really is grindy, some people may infact love that but personally it was too much for me. -Overall its a good game and is worth playing at least once since its free to play. Give it a go.
Vyaelra;-;This game is incredibly buggy, but not so bad that it makes you want to stop playing. There's a lot that they can fix, but it's still a new game. All in all: Highly addicting game that you do not HAVE to pay to play. If anyone else wants to play my username is of course, Reikadeniah :)
monkeypolo;-;Its a great game that has fun, fast paced shotter action. The missions are fun ( although not diverce) and the weapon and charextor levelinbg is relatively ok. The big fall off's from this game for me is the lack of a real story and the lack of super late game content. Overall an amazing game that is free to play and well worth picking up. 8.5/10
Nazher;-;I totally approve of this game, bit glitchy from time to time but what did anyone expect from an open beta game. I tried it once, got hooked and so did a friend of mine who didn't like it at first, there's potential and players seems to be part of how this game evolves. 3 major letdowns though: #First out are those russians and whatnot who keep insisting *NOT* to use english when doing online gameplay even when they are asked to keep it so everyone could understand. #Second, speedrunning kids who go from start to end ASAP without actually doing any real gameplay. #Third, is more of a personal preference as *even if* they support the Devs, i find it extremly lazy when people just buy their gear with platinum as it just takes out the fun of the game, everyone want it all, but no one seems to be willing to work and wait for it, shame. But other than that, it's a fun game and even more with friends so bring them. /Nazher
hapalove4u;-;This game is badass
MirHavok;-;This games great. I still enjoy it but its a gindfest game.
loopsorspool;-;one of the best graphics of any third-person shooter game. this is a titant amount dwarfs. the story is engaging and the combat systems are fun. I laugh at the AI sometimes, they sometimes run in circles. but this is truely a game with potential and i can't wait to see wht they come up with next.
JustDIAMONDS;-;The best science-fiction third-person shooter game ever!!!
JAROPIS;-;Im using up all my time on this game, its realy good
Wick-J;-;Plays alot like the multiplayer in mass effect 3 but this game! This game is so much more, the RPG element is perfect for anyone, simple for people who want action, but it has so many layers of complexity to reward you if you choose to experiment. Perfect with either friends or strangers, the missions are built to encurage comradship between players. If your a brawler you like the Rhino suit and the awsome cowbell abillities, if you like to play smart then your only limit is your imagination, and if you love guns you can build em, buy em, mod em, and 'test' them as you travel the solar system. The missions come in many veriaties: assassinate targets in insane boss fights, wipe out entire enemy garrisons either with unstoppable force or with cunning usage of the games stealth system, defend the center of your base until extraction or stay for ever greater rewards, and if you dont like the sound of those there are many more to choose from. 9.5 out of 10 because its still getting better
ImNumberPurple;-;Its fun. No pay to win... because its CO-OP.
Borat;-;Great game, really like it. Please make it for mac though, so I can play with my friends, you could make alot more money!
Unlivingsea [Nightmare];-;Keeps you on your toes, LOTS of fun, and extremely addicting. Such a good game.
Subwatt;-;SPACE NINJA'S! Think of this Diablo + FPS thats pretty much what this is. Maybe not something you play for years but its definatly worth a few hours. Why are you still reading, DL and play it now!
CrashPrimeGamer;-;Nice game. Free running could be little better and coordinated but still its very good game to have fun for free.
SwiftWinter;-;Wow, Where to begin with warframe this is a great game none the less but its pay to win can ruin its feel if they made it so you can buy materials with credits or even blueprints for materials this game would be so much better but other than that great game good Graphics 8/10
Diet Life;-;Dis gam hav spes ninjas and sheeot.
Shien's Shadow;-;This game is amazingly addicting. It has Space, Ninjas, and Guns. A combo that has blended quite well. The game does require time to be put in in order to reap the benefits, if you're going to play this casually, make sure you're playing with friends. This game is almost entirely free to play, with premium currency there mostly as a way to cut back on grinding and construction times. If there's one flaw to this game it's the grinding, if you want resources or blueprints, you'll have to put in some work, but in the end it feels very satisfying using a weapon you worked hard to acquire. Overall this game gets a massive 11/10 of my ratings. Loved every minute of it that I've played.
XenitreX;-;Awesome game. nothing else
King Wolfe;-;One of the best free games you`ll play.
WilliamEze;-;What a game! Simple coop but intriguing play-and-craft style.
Aerrow;-;Free-to-play, Amazing unique graphics, Option to pay(BUT... You can gather materials and blueprints and craft everything that you "Could" pay for with exception to some asthetic items. it is absolutely NOT "Pay-To-Win". Atleast check it out!
Void Kitsune;-;Well it is certainly a fun game. It focuses on loose teams of upto four players working together to accomplish a variety of goals; the assortment of weapons and armors is impressive and still growing, and the ability to customize the arributes of your armors and weapons just make it reign supreme when it comes to being allowed to do things your way. You can play it like an assualt shooting game or as a sneaky ninja game, there's even a solo mode for when you just want to have some fun all by yourself quietly. So if you enjoy co-op FPS shooting, stabbing, cyber ninja games; this one is probably for you. Go get them Tenno!
franksrocking;-;awesome free game!!! and its great to play with your friends!!!
XxaP;-;Well worth the price.
Krino TOP KEK;-;Not a bad third person shooter, considering its free its quite good. Takes a long time to get things i.e. you have to get matierals and then wait real time for them to build(any where between 1 hour and 24 hours. none the less it has alot of content and is fairly good. 7/10
KEVIN;-;awesome game one of the best on pc but keeps freezing up on me and makes me restart my comp and lose progress
A ROBOTIC WHALE(cole);-;this a game with amazing graghics and game play
Cyndaquil;-;Can't get enough of this game! The constant updates keeps this game interesting and enjoyable! While it will take awhile to become a relatively good player and feel like you're doing enough damage, the investment of your time will pay off. Also, unless you are going to constantly sink money into this game it will take some time to get better weapons and frames because you construct in real time and game resources are usurped quite a bit. The community is friendly and helpful, and the in-game trade is very nice as you can trade real money, in-game items, and in-game currency. All-in-all a great game that i would recommend to anyone and everyone. And the best part is...IT'S FREE!
Samuel L Jackson;-;BEST FREE GAME I'VE EVER PLAYED
TacticalChaos_;-;Great way to pass the time, and can be hard at time's to level, but keep you intrested!!!!!!!!!!!
Cirden;-;Good game,Fast Paced,Action packed. worth checking out
Rivers Cuomo;-;Do you like Sentai? Power Rangers? Karate Bugmen? Then this is the grindfest for you. Only complaint is not enough karate.
Orangereapor;-;So far its the best MMOFPS i have ever seen. The graphics are great, and there are several characters to choose from, but at first you can only pick from the 3 that they give you. So far the updates keep getting better and better. There are some items that can be bought with special currency, but there are also items that can be obtain just by earning money from the missions. If you wanted to do some missions on your own, you can play the game in solo mode. Some mission can be challenging but they can be done. At the moment, there isn't a signal thing that is negative about the game.
NxT Definition;-;The games graphics and style are awesome and 3rd person-shooter action s pretty solid though the melee could be better. The game has a crafting mechanic for the weapons which is cool as it adds replayablity, however i found it Very grindy and i play games like disgaea and Monster Hunter so when i say THIS game is grindy...it really is grindy, some people may infact love that but personally it was too much for me. -Overall its a good game and is worth playing at least once since its free to play. Give it a go.
Vyaelra;-;This game is incredibly buggy, but not so bad that it makes you want to stop playing. There's a lot that they can fix, but it's still a new game. All in all: Highly addicting game that you do not HAVE to pay to play. If anyone else wants to play my username is of course, Reikadeniah :)
monkeypolo;-;Its a great game that has fun, fast paced shotter action. The missions are fun ( although not diverce) and the weapon and charextor levelinbg is relatively ok. The big fall off's from this game for me is the lack of a real story and the lack of super late game content. Overall an amazing game that is free to play and well worth picking up. 8.5/10
Nazher;-;I totally approve of this game, bit glitchy from time to time but what did anyone expect from an open beta game. I tried it once, got hooked and so did a friend of mine who didn't like it at first, there's potential and players seems to be part of how this game evolves. 3 major letdowns though: #First out are those russians and whatnot who keep insisting *NOT* to use english when doing online gameplay even when they are asked to keep it so everyone could understand. #Second, speedrunning kids who go from start to end ASAP without actually doing any real gameplay. #Third, is more of a personal preference as *even if* they support the Devs, i find it extremly lazy when people just buy their gear with platinum as it just takes out the fun of the game, everyone want it all, but no one seems to be willing to work and wait for it, shame. But other than that, it's a fun game and even more with friends so bring them. /Nazher
hapalove4u;-;This game is badass
MirHavok;-;This games great. I still enjoy it but its a gindfest game.
loopsorspool;-;one of the best graphics of any third-person shooter game. this is a titant amount dwarfs. the story is engaging and the combat systems are fun. I laugh at the AI sometimes, they sometimes run in circles. but this is truely a game with potential and i can't wait to see wht they come up with next.
Purple_Whale;-;It's like Farming Simulator with guns.
Dr. Pootis;-;Really great game for those who like over-the-shoulder 3rd person shooters. The gameplay is just great, really fast (can lag a bit), smooth movement (parkour), challenging enemies, great competetive multiplayer, lots of enemy drops, & just overall great gameplay.The character custimization is incredible, over 15 characters that you can custimize with accessories, give mods to (which increase characters stats & give them abilities), you can even custimize the weapons. The characters & weapons lvl up outside the game, letting you give them more mods. The only downside I found was most items, characters, and equipment cost the ingame money you have to pay for (platinum).
Godaemus;-;Warframe is a very interresting and constantly evolving shooter game. A combination of driving storyline, highly mobile combat and compelling graphic makes it one of the best free to play game out there. The game as a large store for real money transaction, but there is nothing in there that cannot be gained by hard work and playing. Not a game for solo player. It really reward you for joining a Clan and pairing up with your friends. The game`s difficulty seriously ramp up otherwise. Also... Beware the Stalker.
TwistedZodiac;-;Warframe is a very fun game that get's updated regularly and is also very fun to play with friends because it has a stragey/stealth aspect that can be used. My only complaint about the game is the farming for crafting. It's very tedious and includes you getting the blueprint for the item, getting the crafting components for the blueprint (usually involving farming), then waiting for the item to finish after you use credits and the components. Other than that Warframe is very unique to any other game in the genre and definitly deserves some attention for how cool it is.
PlayBoyAntidote;-;Warframe is litterly an all around amazing game, the gameplay is very good, the weapon selection and combination possobilitys are funominal
pagant;-;very very cool
Tobiah;-;Warframe is beautiful in terms of diversity and content. You can play any type of build you can dream, and it doesn't stop being fun, even when you've been off for a while.
dargo;-;Others reviews will tell all the good points of this game. What my review's going to tell you is how fluid the progression is! After hundreds of play I still have a clear goal and I can just logg-in for about an hour and progress toward my goals. First of all, lets set how you get better at this game : _______________________________ Short version : You get better by doing one of those: -Farming XP (Defense/ Survival, requires good gear, The real challenge) -Farming credits (You go in a void mission in a team, easy, if you're faster it's better) -Farming Mods -Nightmare(Hard missions, you either need a good friend, luck or skills) - Vault mission(medium-Hard missions, you need a team) -Farming prime Gear ( Requires Void mission, may be rare for some pieces but some other pieces are easy) -Gettign new Frames (Reaaal easy, just kill the planets' boss) -Getting platinium without money ( You either get good mods or prime gear and tradi it with people... expect 1 potato / 2h) -Boost a weapon to its maximum ( Forma it 3 times, which reset its level to 0, so, about 8 hours to get that weapon from 0 to 30 4 times... you better really like this weapon ;) So you see, in youer 1st month, get all the frames and some better gear. In second month, spend credits on Mods and acquire beter mods. In other months, Get a Frame to be reall good (Forma), and taste the poweeeerrr!!!! Later, get every frame to lvl 30, with a potato... because every frame is awesome and allows you to play a completely different style! :) _____________ Long version : You get xp on your gear (weapon, frame), This xp doesn't increase directly its stats but instead allow you to put mods in the said equipement. The max level of a piece is 30, if you go on an appropriate map you can get a piece from 0 to 30 in about 2-3 hours. (Requires a good team) If you're starting, maybe 5-10 hours in you could have a lvl 30. On top of those 30 points for mods, you can insert an orokin reactor to DOUBLE those points! These are buyable for 20 Platinum (with 1$ you can have about 5 Orokin reactors (aka. Potatoes)) I don't know for you, but paying 5$ for my first 1-2 months of playing is quite acceptable ^^, Aaaand, if you really don't want to pay a dollar, you can! There's a trade system in the game allowing you to sell good parts for platinum. To give you an idea, 2 good mods (which you can get from 5-10 hours in the game or less if you're rushing for it) will give you about 1 Potato. After that, how to get better frame / weapons? You can clear all the planatary systems to get the basic warframes (which some are insanely good), just kill the boss of every planet about 5 times and you'll have ALL THE FRAMMEEEES!!! :D You'll get youre 1st frame about 10h in the game, then the crafting will take 3 days and a half... you gotta take a day off ;) Then, personnaly, I've got my 3th to 6th Frame in the same day... which then means, after 2 weeks in the game you "can" have access to HALF the frames! :D But then, you'ce got all that gear, but none is really powerfull, how comes?! You have to level up yor mods too! Some will be easy to level up, but some costs up to a Million Credits! So if you're tired of Farming gear, go get some more Credits, the Void missons are perfect for that, and you want a bonus on top of fast credits? ok! the void gives you some special gear too!! Then, you got your weapon lvl 30, with a potato... And with good mods in it, can you get it better? YES! there's a system called Forma, it gets your gear to lvl 0 but changes 1 mod slot to make it cost 50% less points :)
shadowlzr;-;This game is AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
maj1nben;-;If Ninja Gaiden and Mass Effect had a child, this game would be it.
darkfang628;-;Space ninja's ... need I say more
SwiftWinter;-;Wow, Where to begin with warframe this is a great game none the less but its pay to win can ruin its feel if they made it so you can buy materials with credits or even blueprints for materials this game would be so much better but other than that great game good Graphics 8/10
Diet Life;-;Dis gam hav spes ninjas and sheeot.
Johnnycup;-;Great game and stunning graphics. Has no storyline but thats good for playing multiplayer. Get this game it is the best!!!!
fuglyDUECE;-;very beautiful and fun game! the more friends you play with, the more fun you have! if you're not convinced yet, give it a try and you will be.
MYSTiK;-;Get this game, its worth the hours!
Tyler;-;This is a very fun game that has updates often so you never realy become bored with the game
Ricky Spanish;-;Great Free Game
SkeletronTheUndead;-;One of the best games I have played and seen, everyone should get it!
ST0N3ZY;-;Fantastic Game, Even better when you have a few friends to play with
Archer.Emiya;-;not bad~ got me on the hook for awhile
Paololoap;-;Ninja space shooter with guns and Swords. What more could you ask for?
Superdynamitebros;-;this game is great other than the fact you do have to be online to play. warframe is a good game for people new to third-person shooters and can be epic fun for hardcore gammers. this is one of my favorite free games to play right next to tf2.
[SNK]WANDA;-;quality except for the grinding that is such a
bluejay117;-;breathtaking graphics + ninjas + parkour + tons of wepons + supernatural powers + alien zombies+ ugly enemies + the fact you look badass doing everthing... what does this game not have
Buildable;-;This game is so fun
DVE_Tscooter;-;Very fun, well put together game. I enjoy playing this game online or even on solo mode. I recremend this game to anyone who likes fighting close range or at a distance.
benduxbury;-;AMAZING game absolutly love it i have the graphics on the lowest setting and it still a beautiful game
Wubs;-;Endless customization.
Randyblythe;-;Online Co-op Halo game with magic. Fantastic game, well optimized, great graphics, and fluid gameplay aside from melee. My only gripe is there are a few Warframes that shine above the rest, my Nova can destroy the entire screen instantly on everything but the hardest content, while my Nyx is much...much slower. My Rhino can solo everything in the game by just surviving through it all, but my Excalibur dies very easily and isn't even as powerful offense wise as my Rhino. The game is not pay to win at all - you can make Warframes by crafting them in 3 days, and weapons in 1 day. The materials are easy to get and it's mostly just the time spent crafting that is the hassle. Now - If you are going to play 100% free just know that you should stick to 1-3 Warframes, because you won't have enough inventory space for any more - it's still great fun though. I still fully recommend this game to anyone, as it will provide at the very least 100 hours of gameplay.
BabyRage;-;Imagine an Assassin's Creed, mixed with Mass Effect, and make it multiplayer-oriented. Oh, I forgot to mention: ALIEN SPACE NINJAS
Zandaki Oshinada;-;This game lets you play as a space ninja. Space. Ninja. With guns. And powers. And upgrades. AND IT'S FREE!!! GET IT NAOW!!!
Medic;-;A fun level-up rpg for all players on staem, basicly its amazing.....
Purple_Whale;-;It's like Farming Simulator with guns.
Dr. Pootis;-;Really great game for those who like over-the-shoulder 3rd person shooters. The gameplay is just great, really fast (can lag a bit), smooth movement (parkour), challenging enemies, great competetive multiplayer, lots of enemy drops, & just overall great gameplay.The character custimization is incredible, over 15 characters that you can custimize with accessories, give mods to (which increase characters stats & give them abilities), you can even custimize the weapons. The characters & weapons lvl up outside the game, letting you give them more mods. The only downside I found was most items, characters, and equipment cost the ingame money you have to pay for (platinum).
Godaemus;-;Warframe is a very interresting and constantly evolving shooter game. A combination of driving storyline, highly mobile combat and compelling graphic makes it one of the best free to play game out there. The game as a large store for real money transaction, but there is nothing in there that cannot be gained by hard work and playing. Not a game for solo player. It really reward you for joining a Clan and pairing up with your friends. The game`s difficulty seriously ramp up otherwise. Also... Beware the Stalker.
TwistedZodiac;-;Warframe is a very fun game that get's updated regularly and is also very fun to play with friends because it has a stragey/stealth aspect that can be used. My only complaint about the game is the farming for crafting. It's very tedious and includes you getting the blueprint for the item, getting the crafting components for the blueprint (usually involving farming), then waiting for the item to finish after you use credits and the components. Other than that Warframe is very unique to any other game in the genre and definitly deserves some attention for how cool it is.
PlayBoyAntidote;-;Warframe is litterly an all around amazing game, the gameplay is very good, the weapon selection and combination possobilitys are funominal
pagant;-;very very cool
Tobiah;-;Warframe is beautiful in terms of diversity and content. You can play any type of build you can dream, and it doesn't stop being fun, even when you've been off for a while.
dargo;-;Others reviews will tell all the good points of this game. What my review's going to tell you is how fluid the progression is! After hundreds of play I still have a clear goal and I can just logg-in for about an hour and progress toward my goals. First of all, lets set how you get better at this game : _______________________________ Short version : You get better by doing one of those: -Farming XP (Defense/ Survival, requires good gear, The real challenge) -Farming credits (You go in a void mission in a team, easy, if you're faster it's better) -Farming Mods -Nightmare(Hard missions, you either need a good friend, luck or skills) - Vault mission(medium-Hard missions, you need a team) -Farming prime Gear ( Requires Void mission, may be rare for some pieces but some other pieces are easy) -Gettign new Frames (Reaaal easy, just kill the planets' boss) -Getting platinium without money ( You either get good mods or prime gear and tradi it with people... expect 1 potato / 2h) -Boost a weapon to its maximum ( Forma it 3 times, which reset its level to 0, so, about 8 hours to get that weapon from 0 to 30 4 times... you better really like this weapon ;) So you see, in youer 1st month, get all the frames and some better gear. In second month, spend credits on Mods and acquire beter mods. In other months, Get a Frame to be reall good (Forma), and taste the poweeeerrr!!!! Later, get every frame to lvl 30, with a potato... because every frame is awesome and allows you to play a completely different style! :) _____________ Long version : You get xp on your gear (weapon, frame), This xp doesn't increase directly its stats but instead allow you to put mods in the said equipement. The max level of a piece is 30, if you go on an appropriate map you can get a piece from 0 to 30 in about 2-3 hours. (Requires a good team) If you're starting, maybe 5-10 hours in you could have a lvl 30. On top of those 30 points for mods, you can insert an orokin reactor to DOUBLE those points! These are buyable for 20 Platinum (with 1$ you can have about 5 Orokin reactors (aka. Potatoes)) I don't know for you, but paying 5$ for my first 1-2 months of playing is quite acceptable ^^, Aaaand, if you really don't want to pay a dollar, you can! There's a trade system in the game allowing you to sell good parts for platinum. To give you an idea, 2 good mods (which you can get from 5-10 hours in the game or less if you're rushing for it) will give you about 1 Potato. After that, how to get better frame / weapons? You can clear all the planatary systems to get the basic warframes (which some are insanely good), just kill the boss of every planet about 5 times and you'll have ALL THE FRAMMEEEES!!! :D You'll get youre 1st frame about 10h in the game, then the crafting will take 3 days and a half... you gotta take a day off ;) Then, personnaly, I've got my 3th to 6th Frame in the same day... which then means, after 2 weeks in the game you "can" have access to HALF the frames! :D But then, you'ce got all that gear, but none is really powerfull, how comes?! You have to level up yor mods too! Some will be easy to level up, but some costs up to a Million Credits! So if you're tired of Farming gear, go get some more Credits, the Void missons are perfect for that, and you want a bonus on top of fast credits? ok! the void gives you some special gear too!! Then, you got your weapon lvl 30, with a potato... And with good mods in it, can you get it better? YES! there's a system called Forma, it gets your gear to lvl 0 but changes 1 mod slot to make it cost 50% less points :)
shadowlzr;-;This game is AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
maj1nben;-;If Ninja Gaiden and Mass Effect had a child, this game would be it.
sleepysportdemon69;-;very good game the story is okay its kinda like halo but the fact its a 3rd person shooter im not a 3rd person shooter fan but i found that i love this game and also find my self running back to it.
paycaasi;-;Ruined my life 10/10
sean;-;great game updated regularly lots of content if a little grindy at times but played 200 hours plus and still playing
unknxwn;-;Enjoying the grind.
MrPsychoticRage;-;A bit complex to start off with, but after the first few hours it all becomes clearer. One of the most fun free to play co-operative- maybe even overall game Iv'e ever played. The deep customization & gameplay mechanics, it is just so much fun. Also chopping people's limbs off is a bonus. I would recommend this to everyone.
Spider18790;-;Very fun game. It's free so you can play with your friends.
MrPsychoticRage;-;A bit complex to start off with, but after the first few hours it all becomes clearer. One of the most fun free to play co-operative- maybe even overall game Iv'e ever played. The deep customization & gameplay mechanics, it is just so much fun. Also chopping people's limbs off is a bonus. I would recommend this to everyone.
Spider18790;-;Very fun game. It's free so you can play with your friends.
Monboy46;-;Pretty neat :).... NO REALLY PRETTY GOOD!!!!!!11
kris;-;free :) its bad  looking to and plays well , i just need to figure out the difficulty settings could be ive only done 1 misson
LatinPanda;-;You have to get this game, its alot of fun
Putnick the great;-;well it was good when i had it and i picked the wrong character accidently so i uninstalled it. Anyway it just amazing its like a futuristic version of deadpool
gripenemy;-;fun co-op game kinda reminds me of mass effect 3 multi
ShamblerKnight;-;I like the game however I only wish it was an actual retail game where I pay 20$ and get a physical copy with a good amount of stuff in it instead of a Free 2 Play game.
VirtualMadness;-;Warframe is a fast paced Third person Game set in our solar system in what seems to be the distant future. You play as a Tenno, from what I can see are a group of highly advanced space ninjas, set to eliminate hostile species in the solar system. While its a fun game, the levels just keep repeating, like Angry Birds Go. The levels are just :Destroy the core! or Find the Hostage! or Take out that guy! Each gamemode has a different map but that map keeps repeating. Each planet has a different mas though. Now the maps repeat over and over again but this game just keeps getting so addicting! With a wide variety of weapons which of course, You'll need to pay for them, make this game like TF2 with the weapon system except you don't really get weapons randomly like TF2. Warframe is a F2P that is only available on PC, but now there is a version the the PS4 which isn't a F2P and I believe costs 60 bucks. I'd say just buy the game, but you'll also need to create an account. Be wise when choosing your Tenno as each one is different. For new people, I suggest getting the balaned "Excalibur" class. Every class has a melee weapon, which you can buy different melee weapons. You start off with a sick Katana which you can slice enemies with, or if you wanna go complete mafia mode you can get the electric knuckles! If you want my rating I rate this 7/10! INSTALL THIS!
=C=Dr.Sturgeon;-;Great co-op game, unlike anyother. No extra fee's, it is awsome, some glitches, but, good support team 9.5/10
travasbates;-;this is a amazing game very fun more so if you have friends to play with
bitterlittlesweetie.;-;Four-player co-operative space ninja third-person-shooter. Of surprisingly high quality for a free-to-play title, but with unsurprisingly pricy boosters. Gameplay has been changing over the course of development, but there's a multitude of weapons to play with, sound gets better, DE is putting their love into development (despite what we say about them) and actively engages the community. Sure, it's a smoothly fit together amalgation of many existing ideas in a way, but Warframe is still one of the better free-to-play shooters around.
Demoseal;-;Warframe, a game with ninjas in space fighting robots, wierd evolved humans or something and aliens. also you are doing it all without effort in that full body suit that covers your eyes..... so i have no idea how you see, but still it is a great game and i give ot 5/10 for its bugs and glitches and weeks of trying to fix it
AbioticViper;-;One the best 3rd person shooters I've played in along time. Space ninjas with guns what more do you want. The game is still in beta yes but its extremely playable and enjoyable. For a F2P game you really don't need to induluge in mirco-transaction to compete which makes for a pleasent change. Overall 8/10, the game has pleanty of potential left in it for that to change to a 9.
Feenster;-;Great blend of action rpg elements
Paulie;-;Unrelentingly hard and crafting wait time simulator.... 10/10 Game of the Year
[RB] Pingy;-;So much fun. Even better with friends tho.
benduxbury;-;AMAZING game absolutly love it i have the graphics on the lowest setting and it still a beautiful game
Wubs;-;Endless customization.
Randyblythe;-;Online Co-op Halo game with magic. Fantastic game, well optimized, great graphics, and fluid gameplay aside from melee. My only gripe is there are a few Warframes that shine above the rest, my Nova can destroy the entire screen instantly on everything but the hardest content, while my Nyx is much...much slower. My Rhino can solo everything in the game by just surviving through it all, but my Excalibur dies very easily and isn't even as powerful offense wise as my Rhino. The game is not pay to win at all - you can make Warframes by crafting them in 3 days, and weapons in 1 day. The materials are easy to get and it's mostly just the time spent crafting that is the hassle. Now - If you are going to play 100% free just know that you should stick to 1-3 Warframes, because you won't have enough inventory space for any more - it's still great fun though. I still fully recommend this game to anyone, as it will provide at the very least 100 hours of gameplay.
BabyRage;-;Imagine an Assassin's Creed, mixed with Mass Effect, and make it multiplayer-oriented. Oh, I forgot to mention: ALIEN SPACE NINJAS
Schertz;-;It's ok
ShadowX;-;this is a fun game the download is long but worth it :)
Nanablue;-;I tried to play this game when it first came out but it was a bit to weird for me. But I've gotten back into it in the past few days. Once I figured out how to do everything and got my keys all set up I love it. The movement in the game is amazing! The ablility to run up along walls and climb on and jump on pretty much everything in the environment is awesome. I find the game menu a bit confusing with all the planets but its not to bad. The customization is pretty cool. I havent found much to buy with in game money yet, but im sure what will come. Most of the stuff seems to have a real money cost. I like the idea behind it. Its pretty original. So if you are looking for something new that combines a lot of different types of combat check it out.
TechnoKitty;-;this game is awsome its cool and ninja type
hansukas;-;Great game!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Wrhythm;-;I love this game, it looks amazing and new content is added almost weekly. It's the space ninja game you never knew you wanted. It's got weapons, parkour, co-op, crafting, trading, clans, Both male and female protagonists. Click this link to sign up for this awesome Free-to-Play game and well both receive cool rewards! https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=5157ce7a1a4d80917e0002dc Best, Wrhythm
Mata;-;this game is very awesome, the graphic, the gameplay so realistic. you all must try it:D and have you will have fun
G0r930us_Ni9htmar3;-;This game is great for co-op and interactive killing! XD
nickhankins291;-;this game is kinda challenging but really fun
Fiktyz;-;LOVE IT. Idk why but i wanna play it every day.
Mr. Gay Foox;-;This game is very addicting at some points. Don't believe the Metacritic score! Although it can be repetitive and grindy, the combat is very fun. Not to mention a lot of variety with weapons, mods, and Warframes. Highly suggest trying this game out. It's free, so not really any harm.
XxUnknownMonkeyxX;-;this game is freakin awesome
sadtrololo;-;a great game for players who are bored and seek action and a few challenges
Petit Gteau Cannibale;-;A game about space ninja's. Please ignore.
Rusty Shaquelfurg;-;This game is truly an amazing space age kinda game. I love it for it's customization and gameplay techniques. c:
The Lone Wanderer;-;It's a fun and fast paced game that successfully makes you feel like a badass. You are essentially a space ninja that carries out objectives on different planets, levelling up and taking on more difficult enemies.You can leap over railings, slide through doorways, all whilst firing at an enemy. You can then finish him off by slicing him in half with your sword and watch his body split in two. It makes you feel very powerful and very agile. The game is great for free to play and most fun is had when you work with friends. It can become a problem later on if you do play with randoms as you may need to collect loot whereas they may want to race to the finish. You then miss out on the bonus creds for finishing the level. Loot is necessary to build new weapons, warframes and sentinels when you have acquired the necessary blueprint. This is where the game becomes a little grindy. You sometimes have to repeat the same boss and same planets over and over in order to get the materials or blueprints that you want. (Update: Blueprints have been made easier to collect) You can however purchase them with real money in the shop and some items such as new skin colours can only be purchased this way. The levels are very samey and the map is randomly generated; you can sometimes run through an identical room two or three times in one level and that doesn't include the required backtracking.There is also a limited number of planets at this time and you can only level each warframe up to 30 which doesn't take very long to do. Perhaps this will be addressed at a later point as the game doesn't provide much incentive to keep you playing. The game doesn't scale down if you want to play solo, so it can be a refreshing change of pace and is great for someone that wants a serious challenge. Warframe can be very fun and I'd certainly recommend it to anybody who wants to hack through large waves of enemies and feel awesome doing it. It does become quite repetitive but it is definitely worth a go since it's free to play.
babyjoker0319;-;one of the few computer games that i play easy to navigate and enought action to keep me going.
FaZe Stalin;-;I've only played this game for a little while but it's an AMAZING game! At first it was a bit confusing but after a few missions everything makes sense. The actual boss fights requires you to use some strategy but that's a good thing because its not just a shoot and kill sort of game. But as with 99% of F2P games it does have some bugs. Sometimes if you slide thrugh a wall you might glitch through it. Another thing it lacks is after a while you sorta get used to fighting the regular enemies. The pros are that the gameplay is solid, it's fun to murder foes with friends, there are many weapons to chose from, & the warframes are also a pretty nice thing. Overall I give it a 9/10
Kobayashi Maru;-;Warframe is a bit of an enigma in the free to play market, as it is very different from most other free to play games. So instead of rating it the way I usually do I'm going to list the pros and cons and you can decide for yourself. Pros: -Very polished gameplay and mechanics -A large variety of frames and weapons, leading to many styles of gameplay (with new ones being added on a, roughly, monthly basis) -Very in-depth customization, I've yet to see 2 frames with the exact same color scheme -Built in alert/invasion system for bonus rewards, so the game doesn't get boring -Built in high difficulty setting for missions you've already cleared, so lower level missions are still worth coming back to -Seasonal events that shake things up a bit -Constant stream of rewards from doing missions -Generally nice community Cons: -Some frames are really hard to get if you don't pay. E.g. Components are bound to random alerts, etc. -There are a few balancing issues, making some frames and weapons far superior to others. -Limited warframe slots if you don't buy more (2 by default) -Game hits a slight difficulty wall around jupiter missions and beyond, if you don't have an orokin reactor. -Starting weapons are terrible, get others as soon as you can. -Some items seem a little highly priced for you get. ex. $5 for a new color palette. -Environments can get a little repeatative after a while Other notes: Things that could be a pro or con depending on your preferance and are worth mentioning. -PvP almost non-existant, 90% of the game is PvE -Generally not advised to play solo, and will get the most fun out of it with friends. -Has trading system, but is very limited -Damage system is fairly complex and deep, may be confusing to some -A little grindy to get some items, but if you have a fair amount of patience, shouldn't be too bad. -No dedicated servers, game just picks the best host and starts And that's the gist of Warframe. If you're on the fence, give it a try, it's free to play.
bob120981;-;best free to play i have played
Special Klams;-;Guns and ninjas... what's not to love!
Apachewasorus Rex;-;ing ADD everywhere... 10/10
Razzbry;-;If you like ninjas and guns that go 'ra-tat-tat' and 'pew pew' this is an ideal game for you.
Sir;-;Event to Win
we are the end;-;Have no idea what i'm doing, but you can run along walls, 11/10
counterblocks;-;really fun game must play!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
HI-GRAV;-;Do you have too much money? Too much time? Tired of buying expensive timepieces to rid yourself of money, only to be reminded by said timepieces of how much time you're wasting? Sick of games that become more detailed when you crank the graphics to the max? Do you feel the urge to immerse yourself in a complex, tone-uncertain story? Do you enjoy the idea of rubbery, fleshy looking armor? Is grinding for weapon components dropped by blatantly rigged RNG systems your idea of a good time? On an unrelated note, Warframe is mega-publisher Extreme Digitals' latest foray into the realm of microtransaction Ponzi schemes. This spiritual successor to Fatal Frame is packed to the brim with unbalanced unique player classes, more than four distinct mindless-enemy types, and enough post-processing effects to make a blind man see and quickly become blind again. With the new addition of fully 3D-rendered in-game transmissions, Warframe's dark, gritty, and sometimes NEITHER story unfolds before your very eyes. Your very strained eyes. Meanwhile, behind your very eyes, money slithers out of your wallet and makes a mad dash toward the developers. Do you have too much money? Too much time? And so on and so forth. If you said YES to any of those questions, Warframe may be right for you. You'll be saying NO in no time. Final Score: 3 out of 9 planets. Warframe receives the prestigious distinction of Mega Money Mangler, well on its way to Game of the Year if nothing else gets released for a year.
xPiratePaulx;-;Amazing game its a Ninja and more intense version of Call of Duty this is where the pro gamers roam
[VXA]Levi Athan;-;If you like farming and kick some Corpus a**, then this game is for you! Great events, good updates and it's only going to be better by time.
deltashadowx;-;amazing game, completely free and good design.
Screamguy;-;Good Game a lot of fun...
Weeaboo Shogun;-;This story requires a bit of setup. Last year, a friend of mine whom I'd known from gaming for a long time contacted me and told me about this great new game that was in beta that he was backing as a founder (called a "Grandmaster" in-game) called Warframe. A third person cooperative shooter with elements of Phantasy Star Online/Diablo loot runs, procedurally generated levels, and more content being added all the time. The game was difficult to start, as there are many keys for various secret parkour maneuvers. Running along walls! Sliding down ziplines! Soon, I was completely hooked; my friend and I were playing late into the night, trying to grind out just one more piece necessary to build a new component or weapon, or trying to beat our best time on the Survival missions -- where you fend off an ever growing wave of foes as life support ticks down. Over the year, there were many great victories, hair raising last second escapes, and new friends joining our little group. Many hours were spent joking around with each other on Skype, cracking jokes, blasting weird songs at each other, and coming up with our own stupid little catchphrases. Flash forward a year; Warframe now has space combat, new Warframes, new weapons, and new combat controls. The game still has its original style, but it's so much improved. Last week, our four player regular team developed some incredible strategies that let us get further than we ever had on wave defense missions. The only thing that made us stop was getting tired. On Tuesday, my friend who invited me to the game a year ago didn't show up that night. I found out on Wednesday that he had passed away suddenly from an undiagnosed health condition. The shock of it is still hitting us hard. The friendships that we had formed through the game, gone in an instant. It hardly feels real. I keep expecting him to log in and be there, ready to do another defense mission, and it's difficult to accept that we'll be going it alone now. We contacted Digital Extremes, the company that makes the game, and asked if there was anything we could do. They dedicated their 11/20/2014 episode of their webcast to the memory of our friend and read our memorials to him on the air. Their reactions were heartfelt and touching. They really do listen to and react to the community. I not only recommend the game for how much fun it is (I recommend you play it with a group of friends on voice chat -- up to four per session; your gameplay experience may vary alone, and form a clan or join one just because many items are clan-only), I recommend it for how responsive the game developers are to the community. They constantly improve it and add new content, items, and weapons. There is a storyline that is unfolding. The voice acting is delightful. You could easily play this game without spending a single dollar of real world currency on it (real world currency is used for cosmetics and increasing the number of Warframes and weapons you can own, or buying things that you can't wait for). Thanks, Digital Extremes. And rest in peace, Woxit.
AdduxP;-;How to ruin your life: 1) Download Warframe 2) Learn how to press buttons on your keyboard to play Warframe 3) Grind for hundreds and thousands of hours for that one thing that looks really cool. 4) Congratulations, you now have no life. This method is tried-and-true, I have even tested it on myself; that's how sure I was that it would work. Edit: A few people are adding me for help on WF. Feel free to add me if you wish, and I'll try my best to accept and answer any questions you may have, but just know I may not have time to play more than a few rounds with you :c Sorry.
BjornTheFist;-;first week: its ok Second week: cool game Third week: wow, great game fourth week: 300 hours? this cant be right! fifth week: 430 hours, i have a problem...
Corny Kelleher;-;| Update (24/4/14): It has been a fairly significant chunk of time since I wrote this review of Warframe, and some elements of the game have been expanded upon in ways that alleviate some of the issues I originally had. The premium currency, platinum, can now be traded between players. This provides an option for players who do not wish to put money into the game but want to participate in using the storefront. Users in the comments have pointed out that there are many powerful items which are not available in the store - if you want them, you'll need to grind. Multiple new game modes exist, including "Invasion", a mode which allows players to team up together with the Corpus or the Grineer to work against the opposing faction. This mode gives the player some agency in the kinds of rewards he receives for completing the mission. The latest update introduced Melee 2.0, which delivered improvements to the game's melee combat. The most interesting update comes in the form of Dark Sectors. Clans and alliances can own parts of the Solar System, and can fight for that contested ownership. Clans and Alliances can also set tax and resource requirements on anyone who accesses their conquered territories, leading to territorial battles for supremacy. In conclusion, a decent amount of content has been added to the game. While the core argument of my review holds true, Warframe is finally approaching the level of depth required to elevate itself above a mere grinding game. The new "EVE Online"-esque sector mechanics are particularly promising in that regard. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- | Original Review (25/11/13) A great-looking, initially interesting game that feels like one compelling part of what should be a greater whole. Warframe is an interesting entry in the free to play space. It has the looks and the gameplay, but after a while it begins to feel lacking in the way of substance. Gameplay largely involves clearing your way through various missions types as you progress in rank, leveling up your weapons and your Warframe (the game's metaphor for various Classes, each having their own unique abilities, advantages, disadvantages and so on) as you shoot a myriad of alien Grineer, infested hordes, and Corpus robots. Missions range from rescue scenarios where a hostage must be located and escorted to safety, to mobile defense missions where waves of increasingly difficult enemies must be held off as you protect a moving objective. These can all be completed solo, but are made more interesting by grouping up with other players. Higher level missions are tricky by yourself, making teaming up the more attractive proposition. Weapons and Warframes can be augmented with various modifcations that apply the standard Action RPG fare - elemental damage bonuses, increased critical hit damage, faster reload speeds, you name it. This allows for some diversity in gameplay between players, where you may opt to build out your Warframe in a more supportive role, or stock up on mods which provide a more tanky character. So far the game has been well supported with semi-regular content updates and special events, usually in the form of new warframes and weapons, and a "community effort" in which everyone can participate. The only "issue" is that the game is a bit of a grind. In fact, it's a complete grinding game. The main reason for going on missions is in the hopes of accumulating various materials with which to craft the new warframes or weapons. You can use the games "premium" currency to expedite the process of manufacturing said items (which take hours, days of real time to craft) or simply buy them outright from a storefront. Why do you want these new weapons and warframes? To grind more efficiently for materials. This might strike you as a monotonous loop, and to an extent it is, but the joy of the gameplay itself goes a way to allievating the game from being a total bore. Inevitably though you may become tired of the treadmill. The game sometimes feels like it is skirting the boundaries of being gross about its "free to play" nature - you can certainly get almost everything in the game without spending if you're willing to commit to the grind, but it can sometimes feel like game systems are designed to encourage you to give up and bring out your wallet - namely the sheer amount of materials required to craft better equipment, and the time spent waiting for these items to actually be built. It's always questionable when a F2P game includes a long timer alongside a button to make it go away for just a few pounds. Ultimately, if you're just looking for a good looking, nice playing third person shooter with online components and a decent aesthetic, you can do far worse than Warframe. After spending some time with it, however, you might wind up wishing there was a little more to the experience beyond what is currently available.
Dirty Dwarf;-;It's like a real life girlfriend. Only far less expensive and easier to grind.
happy horadays;-;they should add skateboards for all the grinding you do
Steve Urkel;-;Pros: Graphics Gameplay Controls Story Voice acting Mixture of Shooting and melee combat Feeling badass flipping off walls and chopping dudes up Cons: Not enough hours in the day to play Might destroy Relationship/Marriage Could cause loss of feeling in  Might cause loss of friends 10/10
HADOUKEN!;-;I bought a space gun using my space money, i used said gun on space zombies, I casted space magic on said space zombies, then i space ninja'd my way to the space boss, where i used my space parkour and my space sword to space kill him, I then returned to my space ship were i rubbed the space belly of my space dog. Today was a good day.
Brovahkiin;-;Before you read into this review, let me ask you one question. Do you think fun is the most important thing in any game? If you answered yes, stick around and keep reading. If you answered no, you probably wouldn't like Warframe. Warframe gets a lot of flak for being repetative, but I personally feel that the reviewers who complain about the gameplay being repetative are failing to see the bigger picture. Warframe is not about a deep, gripping narrartive or memorable characters, it's about action, fun, and pretty crazy weapon variety. And to top it all off, everything that impacts gameplay can be obtained for free. Warframe is a very specialized game, focused on action, flare, and fun. And boy oh boy does Warframe nail action and fun. With over a dozen unique Warframes(Powersuits used by the player, each with their own unique abilities and stats) to choose from you're sure to find one that you really enjoy playing as. And then there's the weapons. Oh boy, the weapons. This game has almost every kind of Sci-Fi weapon I can think of. We have small scale particle cannons, Beefy sniper rifles, plasma casters, living weapons that shoot everything from Electricity to streams of deadly viruses, an insanely powerful rocket launcher, a Grenade launcher with remote detonation, powerful bows, a gun that shoots spinning saw blades, and of course the obligatory pew-pew assualt rifles to ease new players into the experience. Oh, but that's just the Primaries. In every mission, you will have the option to carry a Primary, a Secondary, and a Melee but you can choose to carry only 1 or 2 if you please. The Secondaries include but are not limited to: Living weapons that shoot Corrosive darts and poison gas, a goo gun that shoots sticky globs of acid that eat right through armor, 2 deadly hand cannons, one of which shoots many metal balls in a shotgun spread while the other shoots a spread of radiation blasts, Miniature plasma casters, rapid fire dual pistols, a spread-rocket launcher that they somehow compressed into the size of a pistol, a pistol that shoots bolts that can pin enemies to walls, deadly and accurate burst fire pistols, pocket snipers, Revolvers, a Lever action beast, Throwing knives, Throwing stars, and a Standard semi-auto pistol to ease new players in. And then there's my favorite weapon class, the Melee. We've got Greatswords that can hit numerous enemies in a wide arc, more conservative longswords that swing fast and allow better mobility while attacking, Dual daggers which generate an incredibly fast flurry of slashes and stabs, whips for when you want the range of a greatsword but the mobility of a longsword, there's also the polearms, Heavy axes, Heavy hammers, ROCKET HAMMER, and even the Thrown melee weapons, useful for killing at a distance while conserving ammo and for stealth kills. More recently Digital Extremes added in 2 Katanas and a set of claws that pop out of your arms like Wolverine. Melee has become much more prominent lately now that DE has completely revamped it. No longer do you simply mash or hold E, now you can perform different combos that require different inputs. These combos are assigned to stance mods that you can apply to your weapon. Each melee weapon class I mentioned above has at least 1 stance mod, and each mod comes with it's own unique combos that are useful for different purposes and situations. My favorites are the Katanas with Decisive Judgement as the stance. I use it to make my tenno look and fight like Vergil from Devil May Cry 3. So yes, Warframe can seem repetative to some people, but not to me. I greatly enjoy the vast arsenal that is placed before me, and I truly believe that these tools of destruction make up for the lack of deep narrative. That said, I thoroughly recommend Warframe to anyone who likes Shooters or character action games, or anyone who likes having fun.
Sgt Teddybear59;-;Nine out of Tenno
Farseer Neith;-;Great game, can be played solo but is most injoyable wih 4 people, does get a little repetative and getting new stuff ccn be a chore but its still one of the best Free to play games out there and you should totally get it!
ALKA;-;love this game recomeded
LEMKER;-;this game is one of the best free to play games to ive played
buyao531;-;Great game with a bright outlook. The best F2P coop game hands down. Smooth gameplay, excellent variety of weapons and stunning visual. The only thing thats lacking is End Game, but that's coming out soon so don't worry. You can pretty much get everything except the cosmetics through grinding without spending any money. 5/5
Master Balthasar;-;Ily Rhino
[Xhanmourn];-;Action packed!
WrothBog;-;yes i recommend this game
Necros Dante;-;Two words. Space Ninjas. Pretty good F2P Third person shooter with parkour and group play elements. Can be a little grindy and repetitive after a while if they don't put out new content. Other wise it's one of the better F2P games you can download.
The Anti Spiral;-;Space Ninjas fighting space zombies, space russians, and space merchants. IN SPACE.
Mr. Moustachio;-;Warframe is a very fun (in my opinion) game. It has tons, of content, and almost everything can be gotten without paying for platinum. My only problem is that my computer is having problems updating it.
Schwamph;-;Fun co-op game so far, alot of upgrading/crafting aswell if you're into that. If you enjoy L4D2 and Mass Effect you will prolly enjoy it. I really enjoy the graphics in this game aswell! It's free hello?!
[1COG]bansheesled;-;Really laggy and slow. Motion is blurry and super fast. ITs a great concept go! just have to iron out bugs and movement as well as aiming.
Zaygher;-;Flying Space ninjas in space, it is so fun but i found it to be to heavey on the grind at some stages, but overall youll have fun from the amount of parkor and slide melee fliping ninkas
Irroro (2Squad);-;This is a MUST get game
Jonathan Joestar;-;MAXIMUM PAY TO WIN
Nova;-;top
fruit_bubblicious;-;I like to do the running on walls thing and shoot the aliens in mid-air and have explosions in the background like it's a michael bay movie. I recommend this game if you like shooting stuff.
shinycharmeleon;-;play warframe its so great best third person shooter ever!
abracadabra420;-;Awesome gameplay, upgrades, graphics, etc.. This game is highly addictive. Thanks to the developers for an awesome experience. :)
JvL.exe;-;I Recommend the game. Have you tried the GW(Gears of War) series? This is the closest thing as it gets. the only thing i dont like is the repetition of maps in different levels
T3NR0;-;Meh... JK, you guys should really try it =)
Steve Harvey The True God;-;Warframe is a great game. Just because it has a lot of platinum stuff in the shop doesn't mean you have to spend money.(platinum being the special currency bought with real money) you can use credits to buy blueprints and CRAFT the items no need to spend money it makes the game a lot better when you have to work for all your new guns etc.
Frozencraft;-;Fun, if you have a friend, otherwise it gets dull pretty qukcly
DragonDawn;-;Great shooter and competitive game great with friends and still offers a good single player experience very fast paced not recommended for those with slower computers.
JonnyRenegade;-;This game is the pinacle of online co op. While most developers are copying the first person shooter warfame broght back the 3rd person shooter. You are a powered and skilled person in a suit, but it has a realistic sort of element to it. I can't really put my words on it, but you need your team mated in this game. And thats what makes it fun. That you have to work together, protect, and heal each other. Its not just about pressing click, and aiming carelessly. Great things like good xping, story, bosses, and upgrades keep this game refreshing. The visuals also are great for a free to play game. They update, fix, and patch the game consistently. As for any online game it does have bumps here and their, but getting into a game is fast unline most. Definately download this game. I usually don't buy items online, but I bought one to show my little support of how I like these people who keep adding and fixing the game.
Elnathanking;-;ROBOT NINGA!!!!!
AbioticViper;-;One the best 3rd person shooters I've played in along time. Space ninjas with guns what more do you want. The game is still in beta yes but its extremely playable and enjoyable. For a F2P game you really don't need to induluge in mirco-transaction to compete which makes for a pleasent change. Overall 8/10, the game has pleanty of potential left in it for that to change to a 9.
Feenster;-;Great blend of action rpg elements
Paulie;-;Unrelentingly hard and crafting wait time simulator.... 10/10 Game of the Year
[RB] Pingy;-;So much fun. Even better with friends tho.
Marcus1010;-;I find this game to be somewhat of an oxymoron. It is centered around the thematic ninja, but is constantly devolving into chaotic button mashing and a screen full of bloom and particles. The game is given to us in the form of a crack A-Team of space-ninjas, but very rarely does one feel like an assassin. The Warframes are cool, and the art design for them is amazing, but some of these abilities are completely hit or miss, and especially in the late game, practically unusable. Enemy hit points are simply too large for some of the games spellslinging frames to be practical. Ability economy is at a low, but at least you can remove them from your frame. The game does do one thing right and that is the progression of equipment and building of new frames is very satisfactory. I cant tell you how desperate I was to complete my Frost. And after you start crafting your preferred frames, you start to enjoy the game much more, but maybe thats because I didnt care much for Excalibur. One of the biggest faults of the game is the annoying maps and the enemies pathing AI that dont want to work with each other, forcing the defense mission in question to be unwinnable. Just something that needs ironing out. Melee combat and movement combos are tones of fun, if not a little sensitive.
Titan Exodos;-;Wareframe is a damn good time, get three friends and play till your hearts content. I liked this game so much I've spent money on Warframes and weapons in the Real money market and i dont regret it, if anything its only made the game that much more fun. If you don't have the money to spend you can unlock almost anything just by playing enough. Lots of cool feautres and a solid build.
Krdax Drkrun;-;If you're looking for a time sink, you've come to the right place! A rather interesting game in the already hyper-saturated "Free-to-play" shooter genre. I personally enjoy the various mechanics and the iterative fundamental gameplay changes the developers continue to roll out every few weeks, just be aware that if you like this game, expect to spend massive amounts of time grinding through semi-repetitive situations. It is actually completely possible to progress in this game with the free-to-play model, as the game's scaling/progressive content is influenced by the number of missions that you do, and you can get in-game money for upgrades by trading valuable blueprints/mods to other players. Though the game seems to push that this is all about space ninjas, I think it's better to describe this game as a "Third-person mobile shooting gallery," as enemy AI is very basic, and your ranged weapons have the most effective damage throughout all stages of the game. The most recent update (U13) introduced Melee 2.0, which greatly boosted the effectiveness of melee weaponry, though that being said, only a small handful of weapons are effective at all in the late game. Would I recommend this to my friends? No. Too much time of mine has been wasted shooting and cutting millions of enemies to ribbons. I do not exactly regret that time, but I worry that anyone else who plays it may find their time consumed very quickly. Would I recommend this to anyone else? Absolutely. It's a grindfest with enjoyable replayability and a broad spectrum of content to satisfy your tastes. I find the game relaxing most of the time, that being said, the game really isn't intended to be that way, and from what I gather, new players have a very difficult time getting used to various mechanics, enemy types, and advancing in the game. Best way to start? Find a friend who's experienced, have them carry you through a few missions, to help you get some advanced materials. Playing the game with friends is quite a lot more enjoyable than with pubs. I look forward to the future of this game, and I sincerely enjoy participating in its continual evolution.
Superinfected;-;Although it's a huge grindfest, Warframe is fast, slick, and looks damn good. Effortlessly switching between gun and sword to eliminate a horde of enemies while bounding off a wall is nothing short of gratifying.
Wargasm<SNSNutrition>;-;Very fun game. You get used to what to do. I'd recommend!
Nikko;-;Its working now to me and nice and addicting game
BloodyShredder, Thermad;-;Great game
Vakure;-;Warframe is a kinda big game that's Free-To-Play and still keeps the quality of a game that you'd buy. Diverse gameplays on different maps and playstyles for different players. Overall, a pretty fun game!
^^ HaythemKenway;-;This is a very fun game Definentlay worth your time!!!!!!!
Borris The Soviet Love Hammer;-;Great game, requires time and devotion
Edgar;-;It's allright i guess...
TrepidFilms;-;Very good game Great EXP system and OP weapons everywhere to be found
Morbid Birdy;-;ninjas, farming, intense times, sums up the game and if you play for a while you'll get hooked major downside is you could say pay to win depending on your perspective
Kirby47;-;Survive the Grind: The Game
Mindeulle;-;metal gear solid YES!!! naruto YES!!! bleach YES!!! (masked and sword everwhere) avatar YES!!! starwars YES!!! lag yes...sometimes when the host suck BUT NO BIG DEAL all the AI also freezeing (freehit) F2P YES!!!
Cerberus;-;I really love the game and the diversity you can experience. Although I do believe they should lower the time to make things. Warframes take 3 days to make by themselves not to mention the 12 hours for each part. Other than the building times this game is very fun and I hope it can bring alot more warframes into the mix even though it already has so many.
HybridWarrior;-;Frankly the longer I pay this game the more I cannot believe it is free. Now believe me, I hate to say that because of the risk of it becoming something other than free, but this game has some serious high points. FIrst off, the game is beautifully rendered. The combat is very smooth and easy to pick up, even if you are just beginning. As you progress you become more and more aware of the acrobatic aspect of the game. This coupled with the different combat options makes for a truly interesting experience.
00jake00;-;Best online co-op i've ever played.
Rex regum;-;Slow at first, but when you get into it, its a whole new experience!!!
The Garian;-;Kinda fun to play, with friends or not, but it takes way too long to get any good items if you don't want to pay any money. Like me.
Nordice;-;Its awsome...trust me its ninjas in space running on walls IN SPACE! killing zambies and robots in SPACE while a NINJA its good trust me dont be a hater)
8Bit Medic[dyingLabtop];-;Love this game.The fun of seeing yourself improve in this game is just exicting.And for free you just cant not say this is the worst game in history,its even free for Playstation 4.
DRAGONHERO;-;this game is the best out of 2014 and i give it a 10 of 10 it is eating my hole life :(
SNOOOOOOOOP;-;Great game but takes some time to get into. Lots of co-op action and exciting gameplay. I would easliy name this my favorite game if it weren't for the fact that it gets uninstalled from my steam extremely often. I re-installed it before I went to sleep last night only to wake up to it being gone from my steam library once again. I'm quite fed up with this issue. Please resolve it, Valve.
AfroZ;-;Some guy ed me in the  while playing this. 10/10
Allah AK Bar;-;one of the most best TPS EVER!!!
cancer poro;-;BEST GAME FOREVER , LOVE THIS GAME ^.^
toad;-;Love it!
Ragna-Kun (_);-;The video says it all.
Lizard Squad;-;Best game ever created
Angry Old Wizard;-;Two main things I like about this game: First, of all those things in the trailers, I saw precisely one thing you can't actually do in game; it was when Loki stabbed two enemies at once, and if the Devs follow through with their promises, that might be possible by the next major update. Second, since the trading system's implementation, there is literally nothing in the game that you can't get as a f2p player (which I am). Paying helps, but hard work will get you farther than any amount of cash. In terms of originality, it seems like the developers had never played another video game in their lives. It's often hard to find games that aren't influenced by Star Wars, Halo, or other successful franchises these days, but this is one of those few. Overall, great game, and I wish more games were like this.
Boshi Senpai;-;Great quality, both in the graphics and gameplay department. Great variety of play styles, a bit grindy but an overall great experience, recommended.
Dildo Sagbag;-;Parkour and combat in a distant future. Figthing stinkin' humans and weirdo robots. With the moderate variety of weapon selection, nothing can get in your way. You are the Tenno. Well, your GranMaMa can stop you for dinner. You fall in disgust noticing your GranMaMa's terrible cooking and her soup reeks of stink. Next time, get your own crib.
Goddamn Lemons;-;Game is fun! Love it, a must play free to play game. Can't really put my finger on it but well its a well worth game! Try it out! You won't regret it.
Ulf Andersson A.K.A. Wolf;-;Awsome Game played it for 2 years Love it
awping shitter;-;Pretty good. It is pay to get better wepons but the wepons they give u at the start are not horrible. You can just upgrade ur default weps the make em as good as the others.
(A.S.S) Agents of Secret Stuff;-;I love playing this game sooooo much!!!! If I would rank this game, it would be 10/10. It the best free to play game ever!!!
Glyss[Dreamates Teamates];-;Its a good game but i cant stop lagging. but it is extremly well textured and well developed so that makes up for it
The Lightning Wizard;-;A great game, but later on it turns into pay to win. good job making a game developers crappy job making it legitley free.
bornacvitanic;-;The game has really nice graphics, a very interesting story line, a beautifull interface and a lot of action. 10/10.
Tricka;-;amazing game, there are optional microtransactions, but if you have patience you can avoid them easily, amazing gameplay you can still even notice the developers are into it, every month or less theres a new update adding more to do, with the daily activities you get rewards and the missions are diffirent everytime you do them, i can grind for hours and it doesnt feel like grinding, unlike many other games
my number 666;-;a++ recommended
TRR Vegeto247;-;It's a fun and beautiful game but the only problems are: it's FTP which means micro transactions, said purchaseable items are needed for the more difficult levels as free items are weak or take forever to acquire, you need to level EVERY NEW WEAPON YOU ACQUIRE, there will be areas or missions where you will NEED a full team. Play when you have nothing else to play or do.
Accused Phantom;-;Really fun game you could play it for days without geting board. Practly endless replay ability. Good bosses, crafting system, dojos, and drop system.
{XF}Sketchy Land Beast;-;Frieken awesome! Love every aspect of this crazy shoot-um-up-rpg-mmo-stratagy-kick  game! Only one con: the crafting is a bit annoying.
Mr M;-;yes its a fr8 game
Novaoni;-;Grind fest. A great way to kill large incriments of time.
Knorben Knussen;-;It'll take a day or two to fully grasp this game and it's seemingly complex play and mechanics. However, once you do, it's well worth every minute of time you sink into it, with varied weapons, highly unique Warframes, a friendly (VERY helpful) community, and dedicated Dev's willing to continuously add content and fix bugs/glitches. If you have the time, it's simply a no-brainer to download and KEEP playing this.
Unidentified Black Male;-;This game is awesome, great graphics awesome combat and endless fun. Although the turorial is lacking i would recomend chacking out the wiki on start up info. I would definetly recomend this and have to friends.
Knightshade515;-;Ninjas in space fighting Aliens. If that sentence didn't intrigue and excite you, then there's no hope for you as a human being. Enjoy nothingness, you joyless wasteling.
Reconterd;-;Really fun if you just feel like killing a bunch of things.
QBDLettuce;-;Best Co-op game I've ever come across, and I've tried alot. Simple yet complex and intricate movement and combat system, with smooth transitions into free running madness, all while under attacks from swarms of enemies. Do you and your group have what it takes to survive?
Just Call Me Kevin;-;This game is really fun to play with you friends, There is a stealth aspect to the game which I love and you're able to go in guns blazing aswel..
Giant Sax Meme;-;It's a radical game about space ninjas goin' round killin' stuff. It's NOT P2W, everybody has the same resources available, paying or not. So don't let others talk you into that. Though the game IS a bit of a grind at times. Search (x) for (insert resource and/or blueprint here.) and build up the credits to create what you want. RNG is a total hack, but don't let that water down your fun. Overall; It's a nice game to play with friends, or by yourself. Money will make the game easier, though you don't have to at all.
Mr. President;-;Quite possibly one the greatest Free-to-play games on the market, the community is decent, the graphics are dazzling, and the combat is explosive, however this game loses it's appeal once the equipment and character acquisition grind come into play. All characters and weapons are craftable, however pay-to-win is a very viable option unfortunately, with crafting times varying from 1 day to 3 days for each piece, let alone the actual multiple piece item. The environments are recycled and lose their shine after a while, though it really doesn't detract from the game seeing as how it fits the clone/pirate/zombie storyline. Overall a superb game, until you hit the equipment wall.
SOULSHOUT;-;WHAT MORE CAN YOU SAY BUT : MUST DOWNLOAD - MUST PLAY- BEST F2P ;3
FailQuail_Justicar;-;amazing game, but be prapared for lag if your on a lower end system
nac660158;-;Warframe was a different game for me. I usually don't play online third person shooters or any online shooter for that matter. The game had a interesting setup, I liked the fact that this game has a lot of customization on weapons. However the game has quite a few issues. First of all this game is heavy pay to win. Crafting in this game takes a lot of time (12 hours for weapons) and a lot of credits (in game currency). However people who pay for the game can just buy these weapons from the start. People who pay can also buy additional warframes from the start, which have to be crafted (it is very difficult to do) by non paying members. Non paying members are also limited in even the basic colors of their warframe. They are only given a tiny fraction of colors (That didn't include black which bothered me since its one of my favorite colors) that are honestly not that good with the exception of a few. As for gameplay itself it seemed to have good mechanics, I liked the fact that you can beat a level with stealth to avoid fighting masses of enemies (best done solo with loki warframe). Weapon balance seemed good. Combat is fast paced, fluid, and full of action. Live action and several different ways to use melee attacks along with awesome jumps had me, at times, just messing around with the controls for fun. The game feels kind of disconnected between players though. Throughout my time playing this game very few players would talk to me, and honestly there wasn't much to talk about. The game also has very repetetive maps. While I understand making a unique map for every single level would be impossible, throughout my time playing I only saw three maps. An underground cave, a base on a icy planet, and a warship. The individual sections are also repetitive. By one or two playthroughs of each map you will have seen almost every section there is. It would be nice to see a unique design for every world, which I think is possible. The missions themselves are highly repetative. I found myself doing the same thing over and over again with few alterations. Some new mission types should be added to the game to curb its repetetive feel. In the end, if you are going to play this game as a dedicated player, be ready to fork out some money because my f2p run of this game had me leaving by the time I finished mars. Some improvments that I think would help the game: Create at least three unique maps for each world, get a world chat lobby to connect the players a little more, make demos for weapons so we know what the gun is like before we go through the trouble of getting them, and add some new missions to make the game less repetetive. Well there is my review
StickManiac;-;http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Jnf8bAai2qg Check This out for a first impressions video i made :)
Fantasy #Aimware.net No Vac ban;-;Love Sci Fi Shooters This Game is A Must Get Game And its Free!
Black Supremacist;-;Warframe....AMAZING GAME!! You Can Get Different Weapons Also You Can Buy Different Charectors (Warframes) Go Through The Planets And Go Through Each Mission ! What Are You Waiting For Go Check It Out Now ...Its Free
Niggatron Prime;-;Insanely fun F2P game. One of my favorites actually. Amazing graphics on ultra, and fun to play with friends!
JWPig;-;Very cool and fun game reminds me a lot of mass effect 3's multiplayer
Splatooned Hoobit;-;I can't stop playing this game. It's got space marines, robotic proxies people, and space ninjas. What more do you want? Okay, you want more. This is a game that you don't have to pay for, and have a whole bunch of fun with or without friends. The game is a lobby-based MMO that is the 3rd most played free-to-play game on Steam, so there's never a shortage of people to play with. The development team holds the player base in high regards, often allowing them to choose the next Warframe's(Characters) abilities, and give a pool of weapons to vote on to see in the game. So if you want to play a game of ninjas shooting, blasting, and slicing through swathes of enemies, this is a game you need to play.
ryanbo23;-;Warframe is amazing. It keeps you coming back as almost every new update brings new things to the game. This game is up to par and quite possibly better than all of the other F2P games I've played to date. I stongly encourage anyone reading this to at least try this game out.
Charlezard;-;Not bad at all actually
Derangable;-;Mass Effect much?
-A- Coiledvipers;-;NOT THAT BAD Has few issues.
p8arced;-;A fun hack and slash + third person shooter try it
Angry Bison;-;It's a fun game to play but unfortunately with out putting a bit of money into it it can get boring and repetitive fast.
PlatinumXangel;-;as free to play games go this game has given me hours of enjoyment i do think that this is one of my favorit games and i would deffently recommend it to anyone wanting to play a good game.
Menethil;-;A smart and intuitive free to play shooter that gives numerous possibilities of gameplay. Its simple and fun to play, highly recommended for people who like shooters with huge wars in it
Kim Kappable;-;won't load and keeps crashing. i would get it though, since its free and alot of people play it. thats just my problem
[{OHD}] Foxy;-;Amazing game, the best f2p game I have ever played :)
Shoolace;-;This game is strait up amazing.
Silent Bob;-;Decent game, I don't like the art too much.
Swagger;-;Space ninjas... this is all that is needed to be said
wussybob;-;Do not payattention to the metacritc sorce becuase this game is one of the best free to play games of all time. To make things easier when you first start to game the games goes unto its oone seperate luancher which downloads all of the updates. Some people find that the updating process is annoying but after that this game gets very fun. Also you should know that this game does not operate on pay to play you can build wepons and new warframes you don't have to buy them, I repeat YOU DON"T HAVE BUY NEW WEPONS AND WARFRAMES. Take your time, be patent and don't buy new stuff and you will love this game. If you have a question just look up a guide on steam or google. Thanks
The Slayer;-;its a good and enjoyable game if u really understand it, its got varietes of classes adding to the joy
Spanky Kunuck Prime;-;This game in my opinion is one of the TOP 5 BEST free games on Steam! Although Warframe thrives off of micro-transactions everything can still be done 100% free.
ohDANpiano;-;The most addicting "Free to Play" MMO in which Ive spent the most money, more than years of subscriptions to pay to play MMO's. To me, this game has that addictive "magic find run" experience, you keep trying to find the best Mods for your weapons and Warframes. Crafting is simple, getting the parts takes time but it CAN be done relatively easily! This game is a MUST play, I have not re-subscribed to FFXIV because of this game.
Macckentosh;-;Warframe is a higly coorperative third-person shooting game, so you'd need some friends to be playing this game before you pick this up. To me this game is really fun - parkouring and killing aliens with your spectacular looking skills. But this game is sadly quite repititive and I'd love to see the developers make somemore maps and items for us 'players' to enjoy.
Mr. Profiteer;-;One of the best FTP's I've encountered. Stunning graphics, smooth controls and amazing levels of customization. It's like Ninja Gaiden mashed with a dystopian future. A++
Azurwrath6;-;Love this game
Chettone;-;Great game! Possibly the best free-to-play game out there. Real nice graphics and excelent gameplay.
Roisha;-;Ahhh Kick  Best free to play Model for a game of it's kind in my opinion, you don't really need to pay a dime to do everything you need to but there is time devotion necessary, but than again what free to play game isn't a time eater?
Nextronick;-;Its a nice game :)
ANIME;-;Its fun game!
Darth Derpy;-;its cool
KIM JONG-UN'S NUKE;-;Shocked by Captain Vor and dying 8/10
Silent Bob;-;Decent game, I don't like the art too much.
Swagger;-;Space ninjas... this is all that is needed to be said
wussybob;-;Do not payattention to the metacritc sorce becuase this game is one of the best free to play games of all time. To make things easier when you first start to game the games goes unto its oone seperate luancher which downloads all of the updates. Some people find that the updating process is annoying but after that this game gets very fun. Also you should know that this game does not operate on pay to play you can build wepons and new warframes you don't have to buy them, I repeat YOU DON"T HAVE BUY NEW WEPONS AND WARFRAMES. Take your time, be patent and don't buy new stuff and you will love this game. If you have a question just look up a guide on steam or google. Thanks
The Slayer;-;its a good and enjoyable game if u really understand it, its got varietes of classes adding to the joy
Spanky Kunuck Prime;-;This game in my opinion is one of the TOP 5 BEST free games on Steam! Although Warframe thrives off of micro-transactions everything can still be done 100% free.
ohDANpiano;-;The most addicting "Free to Play" MMO in which Ive spent the most money, more than years of subscriptions to pay to play MMO's. To me, this game has that addictive "magic find run" experience, you keep trying to find the best Mods for your weapons and Warframes. Crafting is simple, getting the parts takes time but it CAN be done relatively easily! This game is a MUST play, I have not re-subscribed to FFXIV because of this game.
GRID-055;-;With most free to play games, there are two catigores: 1) the free to play no catch, but the graphics are going to be s**** or 2) "Free" to play...but if you want to get anywhere in the leaderboards or storyline you have to fork over some cash. Warframe breaks this steriotype, the graphics are amazing, the gameplay has a few gliches but they are adressed soon after they are found, the gameplay is almost seamless, and most importantly the game is completely free to play. The game creaters are able to make money in the same way credic card companies do: you can wait anywhere from half a day week for that new gun, or you can give us $5 and we will upgrade it and get it to you instantly. In this manor players that are non paying members have just as much freedom as pay to play members. I find myself playing this game more then the games I actually paid to own. Overall: 5 stars
PainfulDJ;-;i had a lot of fun playing this game with friends
Abvthrst;-;Very addicting.
Radio;-;It's free and fun.
Alcasan;-;An enjoyable F2P game. Graphics are pretty good. I had trouble getting it to work initially on my system; required quite a bit of tweaking and googling to get it to run correctly. The biggest problem I had was intense random lag on certain hosts. I mostly played with a friend of mine ~300 miles away and the lag I experienced made the game near unplayable. We both have mid-to-high level internet service and have no problems in other games. Other hosts I joined 4000+ miles away were fine. YMMV.
FroschEthel;-;I dunno this will help or not but when i play warframe its just enjoyable with the Graphic setting and the gameplay itself
Shia Labeouf;-;A solid game, fluid gameplay and good action. A bit grindy at times, and the prices for customization and other things are a tad ridiculous (5 for a color pallette to upwards of 50 for some bundles), but there's a good core threre
The Welching;-;Repetative gameplay, cliche' setting, structured like a freemium iOS app. Don't waste your time.
Crash - Back form England;-;THS GAME SUX just kiddin this game is epic
Illumina Blade;-;Its fun at first and then a few hundred hours in upon realising that there are no real goals in the game you keep wishing you could just quit but your brain keeps telling you to log in again.
Shadow;-;Would I recommend this game? Abso-F***ing-lutely! Constantly adding new, indepth content, Warframe will keep you immersed in its galactic scifi-ninja style game. Go it alone or bring in some friends as you discover your favorite playstyle loadout. This is the best FTP game out there, as it's unique, not play-to-win, and definately not just multiplayer PVP deathmatches (though they have it too, if you miss them so much).
Squidward Tortellini;-;Now I have played games like this, all turned out absolute crap, but when I played this, I was blown away. The graphics are great even if you turn them down to low. The gameplay is so much fun. If you want to make extra fun, bring in your friends in some co-op. I highly recommend this game. 10/10.
Hisakaki Risaya;-;Ninja play free. believe...you won't stealth all day. just make your way but shooting and spamming Welcome to BUGframe
Your Local Deli;-;Great game! Although it's pay to win I don't really mind. There's still a ton of content without having to pay.
Maileigh;-;Oh Warframe, I wish my computer would let me play yew... :(
Ma.Petite-Chou|Fleur(Sorana);-;I love this game,at first i thought it was boring bu the next 5 mins its a hell lot of fun,i reccomend this game to anyone
Zerguest;-;Space ninjas with freakin lazerbeams! No really 10/10 - IGN The struggle for Argon Crystals is real...
Qua-Cha;-;i love this game and its super action packed.
Alexzander Eclipse;-;I wish that i could play but it keeps on saying to me that their is an update that can't be installed and that i have to close the program and start it again. Can someone please help me with this i really do wish i can play this game
Satan;-;outstanding game boi
alan297;-;I like this game but to get other chars its too dificult because of this 8/10
yomisusku;-;a lot of fun find some friends and spend some time playing the time will just fly.
FrostiieZ | Chillan;-;Such a great game to play
stone;-;hey can someone give circuits and every thing else please and this game is awsoem
Fred;-;The Game is smooth with great graphics. It shows interesting story and meaningful slots.
Weenie Hut Jr.;-;Its fun and reminds me of ascend hand of kul but harder, and there arent any bosses
Fastest Man Alive;-;Best f2p game out there
Dagur;-;i say OMG AWESOME my stomach says what too confusing and alien like dont play it
DaCreeper;-;AMAZING Best thing ever. Great graphics for a beta game I highly recommend this to anyone and everyone
Jarseph;-;this i want it to download faster
Angel Kate <3;-;Yes i recommend this game because of its graphcs and other sutffs its so good and the best part when you gonna defend some objects to complete and obtain blueprints :) Keep up!
-A- Coiledvipers;-;NOT THAT BAD Has few issues.
p8arced;-;A fun hack and slash + third person shooter try it
Angry Bison;-;It's a fun game to play but unfortunately with out putting a bit of money into it it can get boring and repetitive fast.
Sgt.Whipass;-;It is a really good game for people who want something free and futuristic
ss  (Kyle);-;I tried to stomach this game. The videos looked good, they really do look fun. I downloaded, jumped into a game with friends and could not stomach close to 1hour. It really is boring. It does nothing... All you do is go from one room to another swinging your sword around, that is it. Graphics are decent with smooth flowing but that is all it has going for it. Lucky to hell it is free because if this had a price I think I would pull my hair out requesting a refund urgently because it is mind numbingly boring. I suggest leaving it alone, maybe give it ago but then you'll see what I mean. It has no story, most things are buy for better stuff but it all seems to do the same effect, the character moves weird and makes me feel sick a little. Anyway nope not for me.
Snailbait;-;it's left 4 dead with space ninjas and a side of rpg
{XF}Sketchy Land Beast;-;Frieken awesome! Love every aspect of this crazy shoot-um-up-rpg-mmo-stratagy-kick  game! Only one con: the crafting is a bit annoying.
Mr M;-;yes its a fr8 game
CG Craftable;-;New update makes Uranus wet >:)
D3vo13;-;This game is very in-depth and even after 70 hours of game time and many hours reading the wiki the game still has some parts I don't fully understand yet. The community is always helpful and funny, really better than a lot of gaming communities out there.The weapon varieties aren't too broad just yet but they should have any weapon type one may need. The developers are always updating the game at least once a week so there is usually new content out after some time. The prices for the platinum are a bit much but nothing horrible, they have to make money somehow. But please make sure you are prepared to do some farming for exp and resources. One con I must add is the build times for items and dojo structures are relatively too long for my likings, but again not horrible. OVERALL:Great Game for FREE
Myria " Blank " Kurachan;-;First : Great MMO for starters , 11/10 cuz im a cutie space ninja chan . Second : Look at how long i played and you can do better . Third : Prepare a neat drink and some snacks ( be sure to be in a comfortable place ) and let the grinding begin , everything needs grinding unless you're really good at this game which actually pointless for for me to state cuz i really suck at it , prepare for some rage thanks to the last event ( if you were there for it you know how i feel ) . Lastly : Remember to enjoy yourselves while playing this game P.S. : Dont keep grinding shet have fun once in awhile
tombombtom;-;really good i have been playing for quite a while and still think it is brilliant
Saxsoa(FATALITY)>>>;-;I love warframe :)
lut;-;Fun gameplay, only wish micro-transactions weren't a thing. It runs like buddah tho.
spikeymatt;-;This game is fun and I never want to stop playing
mr white;-;i played warframe on minimun 20 hours and enjoyed every minute of playing of my life in this game in my opinion i think who play gunsz gonna like this game who like to play with friends and who like good epic ninja adventures i thank the game developers for make this game
Jack Soffalot;-;I CAN'T LOGIN. STUPID ERROR POPS UP EVERYTIME. I've tried everything the forums say and still nothing.
Steve;-;Space-Pirate-Assassin-Mercenary-Ninjas with JetPacks and Rocket Launchers. And also, it's not pay-2-win :D P.S.: Pay your respects to RnGsus and sacrifice a goat. P.S.S.: The Grind awaits thee.
CajunBhop * Kinguin;-;Very expensive, but it's worth the price. 9/10
kasididkrai;-;the devs just have no idea how to make authentication works
Griffnado;-;This game is the Biggest waste of time, rip off i have ever had the misfortune to play, unless you are either an idiot and like throwing money at a free game or have no life, you will have no fun playing this game, it is a gimmik i enjoyed it for around three hours after that i found out you need around 50 - 60 hours a week for farming and then when you finally have all the required parts for somethinf it takes anywhere from 12 hours to three days for it ot be complete. this game is a pure waste of time i would rather gouge out my eyes with crab claws covered in salt and lemon juice then ever play this again
labby92;-;This game is boring. All you have to do is complete uninspired missions such as defend something, retrieve data, kill all the enemies of the area etc. It's not fun, it's osnly repetitive. At least the gunplay is ok and graphics are not really bad for a f2p game.
doggu;-;Waste of time. Made account cant even log in. Reset password twice still no joy. Second account made still no joy. Server reporter says it up but a quick Google search shows this happens to a lot of people. Don't waste your time.
X T P;-;my god i cant even play it i keep changing my password,i confirmed my password and my email and skill nothing,im so mad but i want to try it it looks cool, LOLOLOLOLIKE
Chuck Norris;-;man this is the most awsome game ever i d'ont wanna tell wats inside because i don't wanna make the suprise lame so look for your self i think youl like it!
phstough;-;if you have anything less than 10gb of ram dont bother downloading pretty much unplayable
Tampei;-;Ever wondered what it might be like to be a ninja in space? Me either, but this game shows that its possible.
bpfoley89;-;I started this game back in version 7.0 and it was amazing. I spent enough time on it to make it worth spending cash on it, and it didn't disappoint. When update 10 came out I was a bit warry of the new UI and redone stamina system. But all in all it was still great. Then version 11 came out... They completely remade the damage system, ruining many people's builds, changing the weaknesses of the enemies, limiting your options dramatically. Melee weapons became almost useless, formerly amazing guns were now junk, and everything you spent money on was wasted. The time and effort people put into this game when they loved it, when it wasn't overcomplicated, was good. I loved the game. But change is always make-or-break for anything and in this case it broke me. I'll look back fondly on my time playing the game, but that was a different time. Pros: -Space Ninjas -Graphics -Audio Cons: -Cash items are overpriced -Takes forever to craft things -Takes even longer to get the parts to craft them -Don't even get me started on Neurodes... -Damage 2.0 made things far more involved -All the remakes of the maps are harder to navigate -It's now hard to distinguish enemies from friends, and those from the terrain -Boss changes that make no sense -Harder to navigate the menus than it used to be, your character even gets in the way now.
!TacticalWooki!;-;I love this game dont get me wong but why can you not have two profile! why
Spykilus;-;i can't buy platinum in warframe get 75% discount pls help error in Steam Wallet FAQ You may have been redirected to this page if something caused your Steam purchase to fail. You have not been charged. We recommend you read over this page for tips on how to correct any problems you are experiencing in the payment process.
|UK| Ben (1SpecYou);-;Great game
TheThanksIGetForWorkingOvertime;-;By mentioning "Too Many Cooks", a guy in the public chat, who thought TMC was like the funniest thing ever, rambled on about TMC, shortly before getting kicked from the chat.
Ingverd;-;I got suspened hmm
Booben;-;The game is fun to play, i can enjoy it and do something, but since update 16 there has been some bugs, e.g matchamking is down, you cant play with anybody becuase the chat is stuck on loading, but other then that i love it <3
N.O.B;-;This game is awesome, many variations in frames, awesome weapons. This game is one of my favorite games.
Shiina;-;EDIT: Help. So..addictive... *gasp*
AlmightyTarantula;-;Had to AFK for 10 hours so i could get a gun i found out i disliked 10/10 - Riveting Gameplay
CryVengeance;-;Actually surprisingly amazing, graphics are good, gameplays smooth and the story is well thought through. Its like a free to play Destiny. 9.5/10. Only flaw........ I have a bad computer. Definetly try it out.
Kakashka;-;i buy honor pack but i did not recieve anything . Why ? Did just pay for nothing ?? Really ? Fix this issue or I want my money back please !
The Lightning Wizard;-;A great game, but later on it turns into pay to win. good job making a game developers crappy job making it legitley free.
bornacvitanic;-;The game has really nice graphics, a very interesting story line, a beautifull interface and a lot of action. 10/10.
my number 666;-;a++ recommended
(A.S.S) Agents of Secret Stuff;-;I love playing this game sooooo much!!!! If I would rank this game, it would be 10/10. It the best free to play game ever!!!
Glyss[Dreamates Teamates];-;Its a good game but i cant stop lagging. but it is extremly well textured and well developed so that makes up for it
Potato;-;games awesome. not pay to win.
fatbiscuit395;-;the best game ever!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
zombiekilla216;-;One of my FAVOURITE STEAM GAME TO PLAY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! PS:THANKS STEAM FOR THIS GAME TO DOWNLOAD
Kim Kappable;-;won't load and keeps crashing. i would get it though, since its free and alot of people play it. thats just my problem
[{OHD}] Foxy;-;Amazing game, the best f2p game I have ever played :)
[] Y;-;Hi , I still cant find my brother in-game . We are already in friends list and even clan . But we are unable to invite to join game like before . Message show sended invite . But my brother cant see the invite message . It happens same when he invite me , Please fix these issue. Looking forward to your reply .
~PisspoTato~;-;great game at start things start to get boring after 300+(played 200+ house before connecting my warframe account to steam) hours of endless farming to get items that you want but the first 100 hours are amazing. the new contents added every update are really fun and if you are the type who like farming for items, warframe is one of the best games for you. new prime gears and new warframes every major updates or some of the sub updates give an additional 20-50 hours to farm all the items so if you wait patiently for the updates, warframe could be a never ending fun for you. i've quit warframe now but i still enjoyed the hours that i've played in warframe. its a great game to get and i also reccommend buying platinum just for weapon and warframe slots.
Lucifer;-;Space? Ninjas? Parkour? Aliens? Free to Play? Oh Dear...
RiFT (C001Guy777);-;Besides TF2, this is the best freee to play game. EVER!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Beautiful graphices, tons of weapons, blood and gore (but not a lot for the squimesh), and I could go on. A great game, and free.
Golimer;-;I cant run this GAME for some reason it keeps on saying "Update of directX failed''. This sucks
Stealthy Watermelon;-;Really good game, the graphics are awesome and the amount of weaponry is enourmous! With a bit of more bug fixes this game can become really good. I wish you could change to first person perspective for more challenging gameplay and for a bit of more realism. Overall the game is great and I recommend everyone to play it.
Purple;-;cool
Unknown;-;its not a "pay to play" and "play to win" game....nice
Revoxem;-;Warframe is a great third-person shooter,although it has some flaws here and there, which is to be expected from a game that is still currently in beta, It's still a great game to play with friends.
Cicolluis;-;amazing game, takes the best of mass effect 3's multiplayer and expands it. It is also a nice plus that when you pay for things the devs dont laugh in your face, that money is put back into the game and it shows. This is the best F2P models out there.
Trew;-;50/10 PLAY THIS GAME IF: you like a GOOD grind if you want to feel like superman if you want to oppertunity to kick some  out of pay-to-win players if you like dismembering things if you want awesome movement mechanics if you want to fly like a badass in space if you like a challenging co-op or solo game if you like to craft things if you like to die a lot when playing single player (challenging as ) If you like REALLY CHALLENGING levels with gold-plated enemies IF YOU DON'T WANT TO PAY MONEY THEN GET THIS GAME. Pros: Graphics that kicked Skyrim's  when it came out you are a ing ninja music that you can tune-in or tune-out amazing gameplay and character animations enemies that know how to dodge, while you don't you get your own spaceship and its front window is ing amazing ITS ABSOLUTELY FREE AND NOT IN ANY WAY PAY TO WIN you can play it on your  laptop different tilesets between planets CONSTANT ING UPDATES Cons: the fun kind of grindy stuff takes actual time to build (good for casual players) playing things solo is ing hard
Hebson;-;SUPER AWESOME MAC DADDY FLY GAME HAS SO MUCH SWAG CHECK IT OUT YOLO.
Ancient Terror;-;The game is a lot of fun. Gets a little repetative at times but still fun.
Scaraboosh;-;Warframe is a space ninja themed farming simulator. Other recommended games include Farmville, and Farming simulator. Remember to build your scythe! I'd finish writing this review but there's only 30 more seconds till I can harvest my extractor! but for real though it's a fun shooter with like, a million paygates. or you can have insomnia and hope for random events. Also, you have to grind alot. Alot. But it's really addicting, and the shooty shooty mechanics are good enough to keep you entertained.
LunarTrick;-;The Game's repetitive and boring...also they screwed over like 90% of the pc fanbase that went to ps4 like myself by removing the transfer account option just so they could screw us out of our hard earned things in the pc version and all the money we spent. Also...regarding the pc version...why does it not truly have full controller support? you have it with your console versiona and the gui on the pc version has CLEARLY! been reworked for controllers...so why do I still find myself constantly having to switch over to my mouse to use about 60% of the UI? it just seems nonsensical to me. also I feel like this game gets rewarded and praised for what AAA titles get cracked down for... repetitive gameplay constant grind boring uninspired linear gameplay and level design (you know...what every other pc player out there es at other shooters for) also quite a bit of the game is a shade of brown...a last gen console thing that was constantly harassed and criticized so...why isn't this for doing that? all in all the hyposcrisy is ridiculous and so is the cash shop...it's give or take about 5 dollars for a new weapon and 10-15 for a new warframe which is ludicrous!!! sure you can earn them in game...by grinding out for like 30+ hours hoping you get the right materials...and the right plans...and have enough credits...and then to top it all off you have to wait as much as 3 days for it to be built...an even larger slap to the face and another roadblock...and half the time it isn't even worth the effort it's high grind low-reward is assinine and I hope this doesn't become a trend for future titles that this studio may publish.
Elucidator;-;Nice game!!!!
Joshherz;-;Brillaint Free To Play
Lancelot185;-;New update is awesome!!
Edgar;-;It's allright i guess...
TrepidFilms;-;Very good game Great EXP system and OP weapons everywhere to be found
Morbid Birdy;-;ninjas, farming, intense times, sums up the game and if you play for a while you'll get hooked major downside is you could say pay to win depending on your perspective
TG Eggbeforechicken;-;It is about space ninja assasins from tron with super powers. Nuff said.
Bichson Hoang;-;I like this game. Don't like the bugs though.
Pckool;-;Best Free to play on Steam in my oppinion! If you like feeling Bad A**, then get this game!
Forexal;-;Brilliant, fun, cooperative and plenty of Action.
Reaper;-;This is an excellent game and wil recommend it anytime. Also it is free and some excellent in game purchases to help beginners
ChadBroChill17;-;Really great game. I can't believe it's free to play. It looks awesome, it's fun, and has a cool space ninjas/borderlands feel.
Big Hat Domo;-;I've played this game on and off for quite some time now, both the PC and PS4 versions. I must say it is a lot of fun. I find myself coming back with wach and every update with more excitement than the last, and I am a founder and have been playing since the second patch.
L4zyKill4;-;Best third there is ! :D
MesipHisto;-;Really fun game, especially with friends
Rabid;-;AAA quality game and free. Even with bugs it's good. 120% Recommended
Dwayne "The Brock" Johnson;-;honestly this game is awesome just give it a try
jwapplephobia;-;So now that I know a bit more, I'll go more in-depth. Gameplay is varied enough, with abilities, melee, and stealth if you can keep your party in control. Grind appears very short compared to other games I have played. While crafting does have those stupid wait timers, it is compensated by the few materials needed to craft items. I haven't yet delved into the part of the game which relies on random drops from mission rewards, though. There are many weapons, most of which are pretty unique and interesting. Augmenting weapons with mods is not tedious. Movement system is okay. You can navigate very well in theory, but a bad connection will make it clunky. Enemies within the same faction are somewhat bland, but across factions there is enough variety. Tons of customization; almost every color of every piece of equipment you have can be changed, but you are limited to a very small palette of slightly bland colors unless you play $5 or wait for a free event-themed palette to come out. Graphics are great but framerate is heavily influenced by your connection to the host. Extreme amounts of mouse acceleration take a bit to get used to, but it's not that bad after the first hour. Overall a positive experience. I will be playing this for months to come.
Scyfe;-;This game is very fun to play with your friends. A bit like Borderlands but less randomness and more tactics . (I prefer Borderlands :P ) The diffrent missions can be completed in diffrent ways . You can either come in all guns blazing or do the entire mission by stealth, using only your sword. After the first missions you might be a bit bored but after a few hours , when you have customized your character to make it personal , you have an arenal that your pleased with , and when you leave mercury (because you are always stuck on spaceships/Earth and the other planets are more beautiful to play in ), the game will progressively be more fun. At some point (when you are a reasonable lvl) you can raid and do instances , online with random players or just your friends... The Mod system (you mod your weapons so they become stronger) is very confusing for begginers but after a while you will get the hang of it , and it's preeety dope.. I recommend this game to everyone .
RabbidHawk;-;Really fun and amazing to play with 3 of your friends
thekix2010;-;i was loving the game untill i was baned for no reaseaon it said i could play again in 2035
reddog;-;I loved this game...for about a month. I still like it but i just feel it lacks good end game content. definitely recommend trying it.
Big L;-;have not played yet but looks good
Grinch;-;-      . The game is completely necessary to remove the use of machine guns and pistols - it nullifies the style of game. You need to create different modes of gameplay: level sweep speed, stealth, maximum damage, etc. Add to the exterior of the characters individual items that are not part of the character's body: bags, antennas, ammunition You need mutch more effects in kills. Enemies must to do something exept of just walking (every enemy). Each enemy wants something, something must to do, etc. Let enemies will be less, but every enemy becomes more interesting. The enemies have beds and toilets, a mess - a sign of life. More myths about ninjas in usual gameplay. The game will be alittle complicated but more interesting and exciting
SNOOOOOOOOP;-;Great game but takes some time to get into. Lots of co-op action and exciting gameplay. I would easliy name this my favorite game if it weren't for the fact that it gets uninstalled from my steam extremely often. I re-installed it before I went to sleep last night only to wake up to it being gone from my steam library once again. I'm quite fed up with this issue. Please resolve it, Valve.
jaderman77;-;One of the best games I have ever played. The graphics are amazing!!!
Human Proxy;-;i dont  know what to write here so but yea this game is  just like counter strike dota and league of losers.b0ss can i habe friends in this game pls kenneey123 is my name on warframe c:
Albert Finestein;-;All i have to say its a ps4 game and i have a 1.4ghz processor and it runs perfectly so in my ccase well made,
cancer poro;-;BEST GAME FOREVER , LOVE THIS GAME ^.^
NaviZahard;-;It's alright.
(stank)Captain Potato;-;this game is fun
BEN VI;-;1 of the best
Voracio Hellkekker;-;Very grindy, but bears all the hallmarks of A+ titles without the tedium and tarnished elements of them. Would recommend if you like Destiny
`Burden Of Life;-;Perfect
ShellSh0ck1212;-;Did I ever tell you what the definition of insanity is? Insanity is doing the exact... same objective... over and over again expecting... something to change... That. Is. Crazy. The first time somebody told me that, I dunno, I thought they were ting me.. The thing is... He was right. And then I started seeing, everywhere I looked, everywhere I looked all these players, everywhere I looked, doing the exact same thing... over and over and over and over again thinking 'this time is gonna be different' no, no, no please... This time is gonna be different, I'm sorry, but you will never get that rare mod or prime part at the first 20 trys. Further the game is okay, has nice graphics ( a very talented art team) and mass effect like mechanics wich i really like! But still the grinding is insanity..
Moka;-;It's a pretty good game the Tenno's are amazing
tyeberiusmcintyre;-;best CO-OP Shooter game i have played yet, if you don't play it you should!!
Beerz;-;6/10 the game is fun at first but quickly becomes nothing but a grindfest. can be fun, but it's definitely not for everyone.
crimson;-;GET IT NAOOOO
Mauson Haro;-;I didn't like this game very much at first, but then it turned into one of my favorite games on the PC. I strongly suggest you play this if you have not already.
GameDestroyer;-;This Game is awesome go and play it but i never play it anymore cuz my laptop cznt handle the graphics :/
Hati;-;Its pretty cool I guess
Zeozithis;-;Such awesome game you wanna be in the game
FloppyFishie;-;Its pay to win.
Kozaq;-;Very good game, good graphics, many gameplay options, still some bugs to be fixed... Pro's : -FREE to play -Many Frames to make -Many Weapons, including Primary, Melee and Secondary -Easy controls -Super Powers -Good NPC AI -Customizable colors (For weapons and Frames) -Sentinel sidekicks -Kubrow pets (acting like dogs) Con's : -Some minor bugs -Limited and repeated levels I would gladly recommend this game, couldn't find any more con's
lukeaustin915;-;amazing game even better as its free :D go play it now
obesesummer;-;Good 3rd person shooter, great customisation but my only issue is like most FREE games nearly all the items cost way too much (most have to be bought with converted money to in game points), the transaction cost from real money to in game credits is simply silly. I would like to give them a bit of money for the game but not at that rate. i.e 125 in game points is 6.99 when 125p won't get you a new character. 75p is to unlock a colour pallet! one! of the pallets. That said!! it is still a fun shooter with some interesting moves and a good story line. So I'd say give this game a go!
Greg;-;-Be a Tenno. -Save Universe. xD -Craft weapons. -Be a Leggend. Unless you are Batman.Then be always Batman.
Black Lister;-;10/10 Would grind again!
Kurulily;-;10/10 would farm again.
LordSquish;-;Haven't played yet Looks fun School 11/10 would play if had chance
Hotbox1087;-;I approve this message
DovahBear;-;Best 'social life demolishing' simulator on the market. Within hours of downloading this game, my social life was completely destroyed! 10/10 Would destroy social life again.
ORBIXAL;-;I spent 2 days straight grinding for golden shiny things then spent 100 on more shiny things 10/10 would grind again
Ziralkia;-;Don't listen to theses critics on metacritics. THEY judge to much about a game which is still in the beta phase! EACH MONTH comes out a great patch! More and more will be added, i mean more events over the weekend, more blueprints to collect and craft. More planets with more levels. Collect resources to craft items! THE GAME HAS POTENTIAL. We the players (Tennos) have to develop the game WITH THE DEVELOPERS. It's a good game ... >:| Silly Metacritics, why you listen to those people who thinks they know more about the game then they actualy does!
Enderbro597;-;This game is a hack. I played the first few missions, they were extrordinarily fun. But once you use all of your revives, the game f**** you. You can't play this game without rapid death. I just acidentaly jumped of a cliff, and do you know were it teleports me? Right in the middle of like 20 enimies. They do massive and rapid damage, and on certain missions, they respawn like crap. Unless your the god of video gaming, this is impossible.
deth by bunny;-;this game is the best, i think saints row 3 and 2 are sort of the same.
Avengerwill;-;Has a Destiny feel and has the potential to be almost as good.
DarkSkull;-;It gets boring after the first 250 hours. EDIT: It never gets boring.
RaxDown;-;Warframe is indefinitely one of my favorite games, despite the grindfest it is. While it can be a bit repetitive at time, the visuals are really good, the weapons are versatile, and teh warframes are awesome. Definitely recommended.
Domukaru;-;A game genuinely like no other. Amazing production base with always new experiences. Great crafting system that allows those who don't want to spend real money to get what they want without taking weeks to obtain. Graphically insane. Great depth and storyplay. Very unique 3rd Person Shooter and definitely one of the most amazing guild system i've ever been able to create and manage. Truly worth the time. HIGHLY recommended. It is a must!!!
Gangster1293;-;>Beginning of Game > OMG I KEEP DYING >End of Game > Oh look, I just blew apart 100 enemies- sweet 10/10
Haydeez;-;Best 3rd person shooter EVER
GameDroidFX -{ GDFX }-;-;it hates windows 8
markanthony1717;-;Good game needs more to do in it after awhile
CasualOtaku;-;this game is fun but its hard
ShroomPrankstorm;-;Po is now living his dream as The Dragon Warrior, protecting the Valley of Peace alongside his friends and fellow kung fu masters, The Furious Five. But Po's new life of awesomeness is threatened by the emergence of a formidable villain, who plans to use a secret, unstoppable weapon to conquer China and destroy kung fu. Po must look to his past and uncover the secrets of his mysterious origins; only then will he be able to unlock the strength he needs to succeed
FakThisGameSoMuch;-;great game, that is
Godzilla;-;Awsome game Stealth n  Companions Clans It's awesome
Join my sniper clan!;-;This game is amazing for a free game. 20/10 would play again
Relincanth;-;You can   up, get paid, buy and make more tools to   up and repeat. 10/10
#BioCastic;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING GET IT B4 ITS NOT FREE
K!R@;-;Very good game. Excellent actions. I love it. :D
Mega Man Zero/X;-;This game is for the SHOOTER GENRE FAN
Bonnie;-;it is the mosth awsomest game ever
Droxxy;-;Warframe is a free-to-play, team-based third person shooter, set in a war-torn solar system. I couldn't tell you exactly why I was fighting enemy factions, or what their motivations were. All that was clear was my role: as a Tenno, a sort of space ninja, it was my job to shoot and/or cut down bad guys, destroy their war assets and generally cause havoc for the Corpus and Grineer. Despite generally competent gunplay and well-integrated loot and leveling systems, countless flaws and hiccups hinder the game's flow. Warframe never quite outgrows its identity problem  and it never quite hooked me in. All Tennos have a Warframe, a sort of super-powered spacesuit, as well as access to guns and melee weapons with which to destroy their enemies. Gear can be modded with loot dropped in the midst of battle, or upgraded with platinum, the game's freemium currency. There's no way to earn platinum without shelling out real-life cash, so I stuck to upgrading the cheap way  by grinding for hours on lower-level maps until my Warframe and weaponry were up to par, then moving on to tougher fights and new areas.
kybeflybe04;-;p cool, the kinda game I imagined appeared unexpectedly free. to summarise v good
Chewy.exe;-;Its a really damn fun game, Quite high paced at times but all in all a Great game! Its a free to play AND you can get most of the weapons through just farming the matiriels! So yeah. give it a go. what have you got the loose eh?
Unwanted Meatshield;-;Good but need more contentz plz <3 1 star / 24235457567768765654654.2 starz
Evil;-;Grinding or donating, PvP bad, PvE fun.
Reaper[];-;I dont play this game ba.... :)))
Grifs;-;The game is free so you might want to try out Warframe's solid gameplay mechanics if you have the time to satiate your curiosity. Just keep in mind that the longer you play the game, the more you'll likely feel annoyed due to bugs, connectivity issues, excessive grinding, and that one of the hardest parts of the game is probably around the first few days of your game time. The community can also be a bit harsh at times - just to prepare you mentally. If you can get beyond that, I'd like to recommend you to stick a little while longer.
RedyD;-;Warframe is an Awesome 3rd Person Mutliplayer Coop Shooter, there is variety of Bosses, Characters and Planets. I Would Dislike only the same interior of some maps but when its only an interior its supposed to be on a spaceship so it makes sense why on different planets and same factions are same interiors of Ships. The Exterior of Planets is Amazing, rain, snow or sun. Characters and building: there are many Characters or Warframes, usualy you will have to scavange blueprints and parts for it through bosses of some planets but it doesn't take long time to "farm" but the longest is the building it self: Parts for Warframes: 12 hours, Warframe it self: 3 entire days. There are 5 Factions: |Grineer|- Enemies from Earth. |Corpus|- technologically advanced humans that have a variety of troops and drones. |Orokin|: Corrupted by power and eternal live theese Soldiers Live Longer than every other faction, unless you came and kill them all, |Infested|: All Kinds of Other Factions and some exclusive Infested Enemies, these are things are infected with some sort of biological weapon or virus. |Tenno|: Ancient warriors that fight for freedom and truth and you playing as one of their Soldiers, Tenno are the only ones that can controle the Warframes and their power. Nice things!: +Graphics! + Character and Weapons variety + Mods that can change entire game + Updates that always add a Warframe and Guns + Alerts or Time Limited mission plus Challanges + Stalker and Other Assasins that can suprise you and drop something good if killed Not so nice things about this game: - Long Building times that can only be skipped by paying 5$ - Hard Levling up on profile level that rewards you with acces to weapons. - Sometimes awfull long loading and Ping Problems. Unselected: +/ - Platinum isn't soo needed but you can buy Completed weapons and Warframes for it also some Prime Gear. I would give this game a perfect score of 97/100 Cause of its variety and Updates that always add something new! Please if you will notice any mistake feel free to write it down. Sorry for any Mistaked that could i have made, your RedyD.
Terrasil;-;Warframe is a game that starts a new genre of action games. For now it is available in Beta which grows very quickly and he are added new warframes, weapons and other items as well as items are created a new kind. The game itself is quite addictive. The idea per game is worth admiration. The battle between Corus Greener and Tenno. Yourself you become one of the Tenno Featuring new warframe body.
[TCC] Transmute titans;-;the game is great so far
Oaktree27;-;The game is a great third person shooter with fun melee. Space stealth make it even better. The only drawback is how long it takes to grind. 9/10
TastyCardBoard;-;Smooke some tabacco befor u play. 1/10 ign
BranQuest;-;i cant get it to work on updtae 11 it just says update failed what can i do
MageWrecker;-;Not sure why but it wont work, after i get past the launcher the screen goes black and glitches out and freezes. I can hear the game but thats about it. I have tried verifying the files multiple times and then changing the launch settings to -windowed but nothing works.
PokemanRuby;-;Warframe is a game where you shoot enemys. While you shoot these enemys they shoot you back. Now I would give this game a 0.1 out of 50 for effort in the servers because disconnection happens every fricken 5 mudatrucken seconds . Now warframe is in 3rd person. To all warframe users, don't use warframe. Cookie clicker I would recommend it takes 1 second to load and it's a multiplaer fun game for the family. The warframe tenno pack costs 76 originally and that is an ultimate ripoff so don't buy it otherwise I will call you Dave for a month. There are only 8 screenshots and 2 trailers this a ripoff because the website sucks balls for christmas don't download warframe becuase it will take atleast 5 minutes to download unless you have google fibre but that is all. My overall review I woud give this game a 0.7 out of 1000000 for innovation.
raffa2;-;Flat, alienating and dull, but somewhat addicting
nO_d3N1AL;-;Yet another disappointing free to play game. What is it nowadays with these games overcomplicating everything? Nobody cares about story or context. No-one wants to spend time in unintuitive user interfaces. A free-to-play should be instant jump in and play without the need for a tutorial. Warframe is yet another brick in the wall of free to play games that make no effort to attract your attention unless you are willing to play it for hundreds of hours. The graphics are horrible, controls aren't smooth and general gameplay is dull.
MaxMayHemer;-;It was fun at first, then got really really really really BOOOORRINNNG and repeative and they want me to spend money on upgrades? I rather spend money on hookers.
Evord;-;I do not like this game so far. Levels are confusing, combat is repetative, and the UI is poorly laid out. I cannot figure out how to find, make, or otherwise equip new gear. I cannot figure out where I'm supposed to get or equip new abilities. Character levels don't seem to provide any clear or obvious benefit. If there are stats that level, I do not know how to see them. Missions are lengthy and a pain in the  to finish, with very unclear rewards. Players will randomly join and leave missions, causing the difficulty to jump around during gameplay. Also, I've been randomly forced into missions from the character and mission selection screens seemingly at random. Lastly, the 'world' seems completely linear. I have not tried to play with my friends yet, but the serial (gated) nature of the starting missions makes me wonder how easy that will be.
Armage;-;I know I'm a harsh reviewer, but some positive reviews of this game really baffles me. the physics in this game have been programmed by an 8 years old. your character moves and especially jumps in an horrendously wierd way, like any time makes me say "what?!?!" and so you never know what to expect, thus making it quite difficult to control and to make him do what you want to do. yeah, I suppose that if you play it extensively you can get accustomed to crappy physics too, but why bother? This makes melee combat a total joke. Ranged combat is not bad, but it's really not enough. Even more... there's no pvp, just co-op.
Torvus Urses;-;Coll effects and a nice art style don't mask the big grind for even basic gear and repetitive levels and enemies.
greenmenace;-;Too much grinding and the gameplay that's decent in the first 5 hours or so gets boring really fast. Low enemy and environment variety.
Hephaestuzed;-;a piece of badness because I cant play on it
Lexe;-;If you like rushing maps as fast as possible, ignoring graphics, ignoring drops, just rushing the same map over and over and over, watching the back of the head of the guy who can load levels that tiny bit faster than you can. Then this game is for you. You don't feel like you're in space or even in a refreshing game, you feel like you are running a marathon.
[$$$] Shad0wfax;-;Don't be fooled by my steam profile, I have 400+ hours on this game from before i started playing on steam. The first few months were good, but I left for a while because of work and computer issues. When I came back, the damage system was completely different, and all of the maps and missions got very repetitive. As my friends all left the game, I noticed that the only reason that I played was because of the co-op with my friends. If you have no one to play with, it gets pretty boring and repetitive.
Illiante;-;This game won't run in full screen under Windows 8.1, at least with my high-end new nvidia GPU. Can't recommend wasting the download time for a game that won't run...
Lightning Man;-;Game is "pay to not grind"
Asmoday;-;Do you wish to grind for weeks to get one nwe item? Months for a warframe? Years for anything else? Well then this game is for you! 3 runs of a level and you will know the other maps like the back of your hand! Everything looks the exact same, the layouts are not really that random, its grindy, its repetative and there is no feeling of progression whatso ever. Why you ask? Because there is a cash shop, and they want you to buy from there to get the best items and warframes and such you can. The New UI causes so much Frame Lag that I actually had to turn everything down. The old UI was better than this grabage they have now but you will never see it again. The mobs, they are all the same. Nothing special about them at all and the boss fights, they are just the same mobs you have been fighting with maybe one or 2 special moves but they are still the same thing. With lots of hp tho! Not a good game unless you feel like grinding for no joke weeks at a time to get what you need in the same map over and over and over again.
Marlfox;-;After spending 100's of hours playing this game, I can verify that this game is initially extremely fun to play. However, once you've gotten to a certain point in the game where you've done all the missions and have certain weapons you prefer, the game loses its sense of entertainment. Besides the fact that the game is already completely littered with irritating grinding scenarios just to be able to use a new gun or do a special mission, there's no campaign nor any sign of the developers approaching a campaign any time soon. Another major issue is the huge lack of love for veterans in this game. The game's answer to dull gameplay is simply releasing more and more weapons and warframes. Warframes are ok, but the ratio of weapons is ridiculous. 1 decent late game weapon will get released to every 5-6 newbie weapons that get made. And, to a sense, there's nothing wrong with that. However, anyone who plays games is going to know that going for late game is more important because it makes doing events and bigger, more difficult missions easier. Its the point of becoming stronger. Yet this game bombards new players with too many weapons. Some of which are completely useless. And finally, the amount of involvement that whatever amount of story supposedly exists in this game is non-existant. The point of having the events and picking sides was for the players to determine the future of the game's history. And yet, if everyone decides to side with the evil side, the good side will always win. Or the developers try to make it a no brainer for the players by making one reward completely trash in comparison to the other side's reward. I wish I could get back into this game but, at this rate, its almost like keeping up with a comic that you wish would move on and get to the point. You check back in every month or so just to see what's changed or what -hasn't- happened and then you ignore it for another month or so. Its frustrating to say the least. All in all, its a well made game. But the developers aren't listening to the community like they said they would. Its a shame too.
Player 4;-;Extremely pay to win
Azor Ahai;-;Boring and repetative
Narcoleptic Narn;-;This game, man I've played it a lot and in truth, I can't honestly tell you why. It isn't terrible, no where close in fact, but the developers just don't seem to want to advance it beyond anything more than a concept. As a result there still is virtually no campaign to speek of. The game consists solely of grinding the same missions (sometimes 100s of times) to get items and blueprints to build new weapons and frames... and thats about it. What's annoying is the fact that, if the developers actually tried to make the gameplay (beyond farming for farmings sake) better then there is a lot of potential for a really good game here. Unfortunatly, after having played since the middle of last year I can't really see this happening ever. With each update comes more frames and weapons to grind, but beyond small UI changes and fixes to bugs no progress in expanding the game is really made. If you do decide to play this, just bear in mind that beyond just farming for materials etc there is nothing else to keep your enjoyment. A great concept let down by poor developement vision and foresight.
RaptRaven;-;I only played for 15 minutes. The intro and one mission. Then I was left to try and figure out where to go next and for some reason, everything was locked off and I couldn't go further and TBH, I couldn't care to go further. If you enjoy it, great... But I found it to be esoteric and terse, which is not a very good feeling to have by a new player. Maybe in the future, when I feel like checking it out, I will google some video tutorials on youtube but not tonight.
austin.lavespere101;-;if you hav nothing better to do this is the game for you.
REBEL;-;too much updates. but it is still an ok-ish game 5/10
Alokin;-;Very intriguing game but its for people that want to play one thing over and over and over.Tho it has stunning graphics and a wonderful story and a creative gameplay.It lacks adventure.I would recommend it to people that want to play something for some time for not any apparent reason.
CHICKEN MAN;-;its boring and doesnt reallly put u in any real action
monocle;-;Mass Effect 3.  .  .
Eves;-;why i keep repeating the tutorial -.-
ccsmith293;-;THIS GAME DESTROYS YOUR COMPUTER DON'T GET IT
Tio Wakedao;-;Pay to win !
Crunkit;-;The game has a lot of enticing artwork, and the gameplay itself isn't that bad. BUT, the amount of emphises the game puts on item transactions breaks the game. There aren't many proper tutorials that explain the game features either that lead to a lot of frustration.
WSadao;-;every time i try and play the game it fails to update never got to play it
Fred Phelps;-;Nice graphics for a free to play game, but the gameplay is dull. The story is pretty vague for the most part, the party function is almost broken, and I occasionally get tossed into missions that are halfway done. It's not a horrible game, but it's not great either.
biddster29;-;Lets say, it was free for a reason, basic storyline, and average graphics aren't a good combo.
kinder79;-;Way too expensive to play......
Light Pheonix;-;Warframe=good game,WAS a lot of fun,now I  new in-game trailer,whole story, the game is now complectly changed,but..... Everyone now is lost,on chat are messeges,that sound funny before update,but now there are serious problem;to unlock "full ship" need defeat a few boses,which is to new in-game are too far from beggining,traning is now med,but fixed ;) () I think that is nice to relase update,but this update.......it's a huge mess. I don't dis-recommend this game,but take my advice=don't play this game untill "the mess" won't be that messy as now Later Edma19
Miss.PuffyGamer;-;the frame rate of this game is terrible, good graphics looks fun to play but horrible frame rate
Nightowl;-;wait for the developer to fix all the bug, good game, but many bugs
Domi-Nation;-;Simply stated, don't call a game "Free To Play" when you have to pay real money to have ANY sort of fun. Micro-transactions are the biggest pain in the  in the gaming world. This game feels more like some EA p.o.s., rather than an independent developer's. And by the way, your new update killed the game for me completely.
Flailmorpho;-;it's quite fun, but the constant asking for money sort of kills the enjoyment
Hobbes the Geek;-;It was a lot of fun until one day it just wouldn't let me log in anymore. Thanks Warframe.
Ridrith;-;Warframe is a fun game for the first few hours of play. After those few enjoyable hours you'll begin to see that the only thing left the game has to offer is repetition in it's combat, enemies and game play. The one major high point for the game is that the developers are working hard and do semi-frequent updates that generally include a lot of content from sweeping changes to some of the game's systems, new warframes and other tweaks/features. It's a good game to play casually. Though I doubt it will hold your attention beyond a few months unless you just really like grinding. The upside to all of this is that the game is free so I'd recommend trying it out. If you're looking for a quick fix, try it out. There are better games out there.
Kengur;-;This is basically a fancy grind fest. The only polished thing in this game is graphics.
Arkanium;-;Kinda cool but the menu system was kind of annoying, and single-player was stupid easy.. In multiplayer there was a challenge but its super real money orientated.
Kozen;-;Gets old. Fast.
Reverend Arseface;-;Soooo boring, even with friends. It's all a looong grind, each mission being the same as the previous.
Purple Monkey;-;This game is great if you want to rage about not getting in a game session with your friends. The people who play this just rush through the levels, triggering enemy spawns getting your  killed if your going through opening all the containers. This game is so ed there is no hope. Reviewed on 6/30/14
nananabatmanjam;-;it is wierd how i can't start it
jango675;-;I can't even begin to express how boring this game is. it's the kind of game that looks amazing but feels half-baked. the gameplay is shallow and repetitve right from the start, the story is non-existant, it's grinding throughout and most importantly...the blade is weak. if your coming into this expecting revengance levels of precision and fun then you're in for disappointment. you may as well be swinging a baseball bat and since aiming your sword is the same as aiming your gun only in close-quaters you're likely to miss 80% of the time. if you must see for yourself then go ahead, it's free but I warned you it's not fun.
R Jr;-;(UPDATE) I HATE SPENDING MONEY ON GAMES AND THIS  SET ME OFF THIS  IS WORST THAN TF2's REAL MONEY IN GAME STORE!
[NSDAP] JosoFoso;-;This was a good game for a while and now it is just starting to fall. The fact that you and mates cant even connect is just wrecking the game.
mohaa;-;if you guys don't buy one of these Pack, you'll find yourself doing ,playing same map over and over, which makes me really sick
Nephelus;-;Warframe was fun for a while and running around as a space ninja is very cool, but it ended up being very repetitive after a time. Having only 3 factions to fight in the same boring corridors got old very quick. In addition, the way the mod system is designed mean that weapon and warframe upgrading essentially becomes dependent on the games Random Number Generator meaning that just playing for a long time does not guarantee any sort of improvement in a players stats. It eventualy felt like a grind to just find the right mods and it causes players to rush through levels just to reach the end instead of having fun fighting. The game is also very pushy about microtransactions by making some items completely unobtainable unless you purchase them with ingame money (platinum) and by making the creating of some items (namely, warframes) very tedious to do on your own by requiring you to posess the blueprints for 3 different parts, craft them each, then craft the final warframe with yet another bluerpint. By comparison, you can purchase the completed frame along with a pre-installed catalyst (an item that improves the mod capacity of a warframe) for a few bucks. I feel like I've had my fill of this game for now. Perhaps I will come back later if some serious changes are made to the progression system.
Swearing Pikachu;-;Every single time i put an Acount it wont let me start playing i checked again and the sing up was right
Dom;-;Cant update ... i reinstalled it 7 times ...
| trade.tf;-;Will not reccomend this game to anyone, I truly only played this game for about 10 min, that 15 hours played thing was the time that it took to update this game, since this game has huge upadates and does not update through steam it can only update when you want to play the game. I truly reccomend not getting this game until it is out of beta.
Tupac;-;I downloaded it overnight hoping to play it the next day. So the next day comes and I'm about to play it. It checks for updates and does all that stuff. Then I create an account in login. I start watching the cinematic at the start of the turoial and then it comes my turn to play... I move around for a bit while listening to Lotus speaking to me. At the moment she says "This shows vital signs like youe health" my game crashes. After attempting another two times to find it crashes at the same point I validate the cache files only to find out it's missing 11 files and wants to download the whole game again. I'm not even gonna bother... I'm sure it's a great game but this experience has really set me off.
Imageboardin;-;boring 3-rd person shoot-em-all
Fjellet;-;Its quite good yes i know, i played it for 12 hours but after that it just seemed pointless whitout buying things, because i couldnt get a better weapon/warframe after 12 hours of grinding, really stay away from this game, unelss you want to wait 24 hours before next rank, or 15 hour to craft a helmet, THIS IS A REAL P2WIN GAME horibble, but its quite good if you pay alot of money;)
Tao Naww;-;One of the worst games you could ever play. I would explain why... but it isn't worth my time, nor is it yours.
Spongeboobs;-;it's a big p2w but you can unlock all those things which can be bought by real money with game money but also you have to work a lot for it with crafting system and except the harsh true that no cutscenes and a hardcore storyline it`s fun to slash your enemies and stuff but also there are tons of hackers and you can complete mos missions by just running
Chocolate Rift;-;IT GOT BORING AFTER 30 min we had a competion about he could stay in the game for longest and we all died of boring ness
Dartmaul;-;Poor graphic quality, no custom resolution support (even single monitor 21:9)
Senpai-;-;I personally didnt find this game very fun. Yet dont take my opinion too seriosuly, try it for yourself!
lavalord;-;fugh no to meny bugs over heats my laptop and is lagggggggggy
dragonrage500;-;I know technicaly warframe was based around the PvE and all. but one of the reasons i played it so long was to get better stuff and play with them in the PvP. and now they have changed warframe settings so that everyone entering PvP is stuck with unranked/unmodded gear and frame. so testing builds out in the PvP is no longer useful. and testing out how your build holds up against others no longer works either. now all that matters for the pvp is that you have the higher base stats. The pve is ok but it seems like it gets a little TOO easy after a time. with the right build and game type you coul literally endlessly destroy your enemies. I use a simple valkyr with high ranked armor and a blade that drains hp for every hit. with that alone i cannot be killed instantly and i can heal back everything it does to me. so in a defense match I could literally just sit on the defend zone and cut up anything that comes. especially if its an infestation map with only melee units. atleast with ranged units you still need to dodge/ deflect. and run around in order to cach your enemies. but its pretty much the same thing for me. the other pve game modes make it a bit tougher to tank and all since you have to move around quickly, though a maxed rush mod fixes valkyrs weakness there. and when in doubt just using ripline can get you around faster then almost anything else. so i guess valkyr would be the cheapest warframe there is. especialy with the hp drainin attack. with the right mods you could probably make the other frames just as cheap though. so its just a matter of your visual tastes on your character i guess. anyway i probably won;t be playing this game again. unless they make a way to CHOOSE wether to have an unranked PvP or not. atleast that way then if people wanna go with all unranked items its their perogative. don't force unranked and unmodded items on everyone.
sHrEkEd By mE;-;HMMM. What can i say about this? The whole idea of the game is amazing... But ruined by the crappy F2P aspects: it is Pay-2-Win or Massive-Grind-Everyday-2-Get-Decent-****
Destiny;-;Warframe was a great game for a couple of week. After that it got boring. Most of the map and mode are the same, they just re-model the map. Most of the time you've going to be farming for the weapon,warframe parts. The drop rate is it very good. When you make a weapon or Warframe it take to long like 12 hours if you've not going to rush it with real money. The weapon and Warframe on market can be purchased with real money like 10 to 30 dollar for it, then you have you mod the weapon or Warframe to make it more powerful. The weapon and Warframe slot are limited, you have to spend real money to unlock some slot, sure they give you 50 cash to buy thing but you can't use those 50 to trade with people. Sure you can trade with other people for the parts if you have the cash for it. WARFRAME HAVE A LOT OF BUGS AND GLITCHES. The game have been updated quite a lot time and some old bug have not been fix yet. The game keep crashing, the chat log loading to long, stuck in the menu while selecting a mission, stuck in the loading screen, engine crash, server down a lot of times, etc.......
Rogue Fighter;-;DONT GET THIS FREE GAME UNLESS YOUR SUPER RICH,,,,EVER CLICK OF MOUSE COST MONEY
Huge Mistake;-;"Look at that Butt Simulator 2014"
Prophet;-;Yet another anera shooter. Rather go classic and play some QIIIA.
Jermaine Jackson;-;This game has a meta score of 66 for a reason, it sucks allow me to elaborate You will be forced to spend money, or you will never have a fraction of the power others have, The game is extremly buggy and someday you cant even login for a whole day. Your hard earned Credits just magically Dissapear This game has no support The forums are usless The staff is s
Protagonist;-;Game trolls you with throwing you back to Login Screen. Not worth playing cause takes your mood away from the actual game to wait 5-20 minutes just to relogin, Only to be thrown out again.. Disgusting. 10/1 Should not run servers on wooden pc.
lucifershen;-;I think that the word "online game" means you play the game "online", but this company does nothing to guarantee the quality of connection. I only have about 30% or 40% chance to complete a mission without crashing/disconnection. The game play is pretty good, but their server is the worst one I have ever seen.
First Officer Slug;-;if you dont want aids dont touch this game
DeusVulture;-;The problem with this game is simple: It never feels like you're progressing, because every step you take just opens more and more meaningless grind opportunities, and every update just piles more and more to it, be a new frame, weapon, mod or resource. That there are mods so essential to your progress locked behind a shit of a RNG is one of the most stupid and hostile gameplay designs I have encountered. Add to that the gameplay changes they do every now and then, nerfs that make your already  weapons completely useless, changes to damage types and values, new weapons that completely outclass the previous ones, new resources that require more grinding, etc... and it all becomes meaningless and disheartening. And if you want to play solo you're in for a world of hurt with so much grind, RNG locked content and 4 player balanced missions, a lot of then required to unlock new planets and with it, resources. It's not worth it, so I stopped playing. Nothing changed, nothing got better or made the game more fun or less of a chore (quite to the contrary), most of my playtime was spent trying to get the essential mods so that my weapons become useful enough to kill waves and waves of enemies quickly for me to solo through the missions and unlock new planets, where I would repeat the same process, while slowly gathering resources and blueprints to craft a marginally better weapon or frame that would become useless by the next update. Rinse and repeat, ad infinitum.
Reverend Fritz;-;Best free to play game out there in my opinion. It takes time to build up your weapons and frames, though that is the point of the game. unlocking everything. You can pay for items. Some are purely decorational, some are weapons/frames/pets. things you can't buy:the best weapons/mods in the game. If only every FTP game went with the no buying power model. And then they changed everything and went back on about every promise they made in the days before there were more than just the excalibur prime.
tobydog;-;extremely buggy, i was only able to play it twice before it never started up again. othing worked i tried everything from verifying the game cach to redownloading it. If they figure out how to fix the start up bugs then this will be one of the best games ive ever played. For the moment no, once fixed yes
Reverb;-;Although the gameplay of this title is solid, it's also repetitive. VERY repetitive. Not to mention the game suffers from bugs that it's had for a LONG time, which still haven't been fixed. And sometimes can't even update properly. Or at all. And has that really annoying Free to Wait mechanic, where you have to wait between twelve to seventy-two hours to bet an item that you're building, unless you speed it up with a microtransaction.
Proventus;-;Leveling up is too expensive. Moreover the game regularly crashes amid the mission.
Lightning Dust;-;This game isn't all bad. The gameplay resembles mass effect 3's multiplayer, as was said multiple times. Though what I do need to say is that the last thing this game will do is hold your hand and tell you what to do. I left the tutorial knowing how to run, do some of the parkour and some of the other basics. Though I had no idea of mods, getting materials and other things. I mean, most of my success was from playing mass effect and using some common sense. Though I feel quite helpless without my friends, and i dont enjoy playing alone at all. I dont expect tobe told about everything, but the equipment part of the game is very confusing and very much turned me off. The leveling up (not affinity) requires you to be put in a, what I feel at least to be an extremely unnecessary and bland "test". You fight enemies in a computer generated landscape almost copypasted from assasins creed. They dont tell you anything about it, which feels quite weird. The gameplay is pretty good, and although my military buff side of me doesn't like the impracticality of designs for characters and weapons that is not at all a complaint, because that's just opinion. The core gameplay is fun, but the grind and sheer scale of the game can be frustrating to overcome. I'd give this game a 5/10. (note this isn't gameinformer, 5/10 is average in my books)
Crimsonprodigy;-;Overall a good F2P, Only reason I don't like it is that it becomes extremely boring once you've gotten all the warframes and good weapons which will leave you wondering "why bother playing more?"
Bringit2theMat;-;PLayed it for a bit, was awesome, then you hit a roadblock, for platinum, and it just gets repetitive. same stuff over and over again. back to bf3
Honor Knees;-;Just downlaoded but doesn't appear to run on 8.1 with dual screen setup. Screens just flash and then returns back to desktop. Clicking on icon then goes back into game with black screen ( music playing )
RiO;-;- Tries to install the full DirectX SDK rather than the expected end-user runtime. - Needs full administrative permissions on its launcher to continue to install system-wide updates. - Unable to report these issues to the developer through official channels; forum requires an updated install and 3 played missions for posting priviledges to unlock. Support web address points to an empty knowledgebase. Instant fail and uninstall. How this was ever featured during the last winter sale is anyone's guess. I've seen Early Access (essentially early alpha) that was managed better than this open beta masquerading as a full release.
DirtyDan77;-;This game is designed to make you pay or grind for ages.combat is standard, the parkour system is clunky, the melee system is useless and to get anything i have to do the same missions over and over and if you do pay you get everything immediately. seriously  this game
To_Speak_Of_Wolves;-;I'm more so on the fence about wether or not to recomend it. The game is fun no doubt, but if you arnt willing to spend money its almost worthless effort. You can get most items ingame without paying, but you have to craft them and some parts are extremely rare. Colors for cutomization is very limited if you dont want to pay. No alternative helmets can be obtained without paying. The mastery tests that you have to beat to level up, are lets face it, broken. They are extremely difficult if you dont want to pay (next to impossible if you dont have or know what mods need to be equiped). I had to beat the first test twice for it to count. Some missions spawn an infinite number of enemies, I've been stuck on the same mission for the past 2 days, because there are way too many enemies. I would say wait till they fix some of this before getting it.
Swagrid;-;Hope you're willing to put tons of money into this game otherwise good luck getting any new weapons or rigs.
brooklynswag50z;-;nooo i will not play this on pc again i have for ps4 but when u move the whole ing screen gets blurry some one tellme to turn that  off
sellingfear;-;Free to play done wrong. This game is pay to win. Then add in long wait times to attempt to level up and craft items makes this game a epic fail.
PunchedHornet;-;I CANT PLAY cUS OF STUPID REGISTRATION IVE TOLD IT TO SNED A EMAIL LIKE 15 AND IT DOSNT!
Ceremony;-;After every stupid update they make , there are coming 100 hotfixes , they alwasy BUT ALWAYS ruin something in the game . WITH EVERY UPDATE THEY MAKE . I think the programmers are a bounch of gorillaz* . Seriosly if you dotn beliave me try it yourself waste your time .
Moon Dr4g0n;-;this game started off well until some of the best weapons and classes were nerfed to nothing. now its just like all the other semi -ok games out there. The ones that seem amazing for the first year or six months and then comes the nerfing... game ruined!
Verrckt;-;This is not my kind of game to me its dull boring strange
ImAFckingDragn;-;While this game is fun and action packed, it can get extremely repetative and pointless. The game is fun to play with friends, but it can be absolutely mind-numbing to play by yourself. Pros -Great graphics and lots of shiny environments -Action packed -The different warframes have a few unique elements that make for some fun gameplay -In theory, you can build the warframes (the ones you would usually have to buy) Cons -Game is super grindy -Environments, while pretty, become stale after a while. You are basically in the same 4 or 5 different environments with slightly different layouts -The system to level up cards to gain powers is interesting, but again the grind... -Little to non-existant story -Certain Warframes are completely unbalanced (namely the ones you have to buy) -Most things worth building take forever to create This was a fun game, but at the end of the day I can't recommend it. There's way too much grind and not enough going on behind the scenes. This is a fun little coop game to play with your friends, but you'll quickly start to feel the repetition as you reach the 10-15 hour mark. There are some games that are super grindy but hide it well behind interesting gameplay, a good story, or a variety of builds to work towards. This game is not one of them.
[BRN]Kibbles;-;Mabinogi should have won!
boshie;-;A 3rd person over-the-shoulder FPS. I personally didn't like the game. The controls felt a little clunky. Whilst the graphics were nice, a lot of the levels were poorly lit, and it was hard to pick out the enemies. Teams were really hit and miss - with one person racing off to the finish, leaving "team mates" behind. The tutorial leaves you to pick from a number of planets across the solar system, but the only choice is Mercury - a little tip to say "pick this first" would have been nice.
[$$$] Shad0wfax;-;Don't be fooled by my steam profile, I have 400+ hours on this game from before i started playing on steam. The first few months were good, but I left for a while because of work and computer issues. When I came back, the damage system was completely different, and all of the maps and missions got very repetitive. As my friends all left the game, I noticed that the only reason that I played was because of the co-op with my friends. If you have no one to play with, it gets pretty boring and repetitive.
Illiante;-;This game won't run in full screen under Windows 8.1, at least with my high-end new nvidia GPU. Can't recommend wasting the download time for a game that won't run...
Lightning Man;-;Game is "pay to not grind"
Asmoday;-;Do you wish to grind for weeks to get one nwe item? Months for a warframe? Years for anything else? Well then this game is for you! 3 runs of a level and you will know the other maps like the back of your hand! Everything looks the exact same, the layouts are not really that random, its grindy, its repetative and there is no feeling of progression whatso ever. Why you ask? Because there is a cash shop, and they want you to buy from there to get the best items and warframes and such you can. The New UI causes so much Frame Lag that I actually had to turn everything down. The old UI was better than this grabage they have now but you will never see it again. The mobs, they are all the same. Nothing special about them at all and the boss fights, they are just the same mobs you have been fighting with maybe one or 2 special moves but they are still the same thing. With lots of hp tho! Not a good game unless you feel like grinding for no joke weeks at a time to get what you need in the same map over and over and over again.
Marlfox;-;After spending 100's of hours playing this game, I can verify that this game is initially extremely fun to play. However, once you've gotten to a certain point in the game where you've done all the missions and have certain weapons you prefer, the game loses its sense of entertainment. Besides the fact that the game is already completely littered with irritating grinding scenarios just to be able to use a new gun or do a special mission, there's no campaign nor any sign of the developers approaching a campaign any time soon. Another major issue is the huge lack of love for veterans in this game. The game's answer to dull gameplay is simply releasing more and more weapons and warframes. Warframes are ok, but the ratio of weapons is ridiculous. 1 decent late game weapon will get released to every 5-6 newbie weapons that get made. And, to a sense, there's nothing wrong with that. However, anyone who plays games is going to know that going for late game is more important because it makes doing events and bigger, more difficult missions easier. Its the point of becoming stronger. Yet this game bombards new players with too many weapons. Some of which are completely useless. And finally, the amount of involvement that whatever amount of story supposedly exists in this game is non-existant. The point of having the events and picking sides was for the players to determine the future of the game's history. And yet, if everyone decides to side with the evil side, the good side will always win. Or the developers try to make it a no brainer for the players by making one reward completely trash in comparison to the other side's reward. I wish I could get back into this game but, at this rate, its almost like keeping up with a comic that you wish would move on and get to the point. You check back in every month or so just to see what's changed or what -hasn't- happened and then you ignore it for another month or so. Its frustrating to say the least. All in all, its a well made game. But the developers aren't listening to the community like they said they would. Its a shame too.
Player 4;-;Extremely pay to win
Azor Ahai;-;Boring and repetative
Narcoleptic Narn;-;This game, man I've played it a lot and in truth, I can't honestly tell you why. It isn't terrible, no where close in fact, but the developers just don't seem to want to advance it beyond anything more than a concept. As a result there still is virtually no campaign to speek of. The game consists solely of grinding the same missions (sometimes 100s of times) to get items and blueprints to build new weapons and frames... and thats about it. What's annoying is the fact that, if the developers actually tried to make the gameplay (beyond farming for farmings sake) better then there is a lot of potential for a really good game here. Unfortunatly, after having played since the middle of last year I can't really see this happening ever. With each update comes more frames and weapons to grind, but beyond small UI changes and fixes to bugs no progress in expanding the game is really made. If you do decide to play this, just bear in mind that beyond just farming for materials etc there is nothing else to keep your enjoyment. A great concept let down by poor developement vision and foresight.
RaptRaven;-;I only played for 15 minutes. The intro and one mission. Then I was left to try and figure out where to go next and for some reason, everything was locked off and I couldn't go further and TBH, I couldn't care to go further. If you enjoy it, great... But I found it to be esoteric and terse, which is not a very good feeling to have by a new player. Maybe in the future, when I feel like checking it out, I will google some video tutorials on youtube but not tonight.
austin.lavespere101;-;if you hav nothing better to do this is the game for you.
Ol' Cotton Balls;-;I hate games that make you sign up through your email address. Can't even play it because it won't recognize my password. Wtf?!
Disb[A]nd;-;Fun game but suck at connecting
o Kives;-;It is incredibly repetative.
Cooking Risotto;-;EHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH. Alright, i guess, but not for me. just remember to launch it every ne and a while to get the updates THAT STEAM DOESN"T AUTOMATICALLY DOWNLOAD.
TopGun;-;how to uninstall this game
Ardhanarishvara;-;Honestly? When I started, I was enamored with it. It looked cool. Frankly, it looked amazing. I loved the design aesthetics, and how everything looked so great. ... But over time, I grew disenchanted, and began to see what the game was. At its core, it's generic. Extremely generic. A third-person shooter with all the worst elements of the free-to-play business scheme, whose developers continually shaft and ignore their more reasonable users. Digital Extremes has turned into a company of yes men, with the head honcho going unquestioned by anyone because he's so extremely stubborn, and they regularly stamp out anyone who calls them out on this. Genuine, caring advice made for the sake of the future of the game is consistently ignored in favour of just cranking out another overpowered weapon or mod, furthering the game-destroying power creep. Instead of interesting mechanics that players would take time to explore, or genuine challenges that would test players' skills, new content is instead hidden behind further and further layers of grind and RNG. Grind within grind. The best option is always to take the fastest route and obliterate something before it can retaliate, and instead of implementing mechanics that would reward taking your time, exploring, or going out of your way to do something cool or gutsy, cheap tricks are employed and mechanics such as invulnerability periods are introduced to bosses with no real way around them, artificially extending fights. Challenge is introduced through the continual addition of either unblockable, time-consuming enemy attacks with no method of prediction, or ridiculously high-damage Area of Effect power spam with a damage-over-time effect that completely ignores everything and decimates your health - which, by the way is non-replenishable outside of getting lucky with a health orb off a random kill or checking EVERY SINGLE locker. And yet anything that would prevent or otherwise reduce the effects of these situations is made inefficient by the simple fact that brute forcing is always the most expedient and resource-saving method. Tank characters with high shields that replenish quickly, that have Energy Siphon and can recover energy without doing anything and are able to spam AoE damage with debilitating effects are the kings of the game. And yet, their response to this isn't to tweak the mechanics if the current system is encouraging a dominant playstyle, but instead nerf the only suits capable of weathering the storm. The only characters capable of weathering the storm without being tanks also happen to be the only characters that can simply avoid damage in its entirety: 1) Valkyr, whose Hysteria can make her totally invulnerable to all damage for a whopping one minute and change with the right min-maxing. The only trade-off is that it limits her to melee only, but with recent (and surprisingly not ENTIRELY disappointing) buffs to melee she's still just as lethal, even without her guns. And seeing as Hysteria is pretty much Valkyr's only redeeming skill (out of four. Maybe Warcry counts.) there is no reason NOT to min-max the hell out of Hysteria for maximum duration and power. You'll find that this is a common pattern with warframes. Honestly, some don't even have one good skill, only a mediocre one and three other terrible ones. 2) Loki or Ash, who can turn invisible and thus never, ever be detected by anything. They also happen to be the fastest warframes period, so GUESS WHO THE KINGS OF PLAYING SOLO ARE! Heck, even in events Lokis are pretty much all you'll see, because events are ALWAYS either grind-tastic, or survive-a-thons. It helps that his invisibility is marginally better than Ash's. Two points brought up in that previous paragraph were the frequency of warframes having very few viable skills, and then the concept of "Skill X, but better." Rhino Stomp, an AoE skill does massive damage in a HUGE radius, totally immobilizes enemies in aforementioned huge area for a straight eight seconds, and has a second instance of damage that further damages enemies closer to Rhino. Frost, on the other hand, has Avalanche - an AoE skill that does similar damage within a similar range, but merely staggers enemies for one, maybe two seconds, and has no second damage instance. Oh, and in general the damage type employed by Avalanche is worse for dealing damage to general enemies than the one adopted by Rhino Stomp. Frost's only other worthwhile skill is called Snow Globe, a nearly-impenetrable AoE projectile damage negation shield that happens to slow enemies to a crawl if they enter the area. Guess which one people use 95% of the time. Go on. Digital Extremes has nearly no concept of scaling and has only been figuring out how it works fairly recently - albeit it still manages to elude their grasp. Many skills, the bread and butter of the Warframes, are only viable in the very early game - a curious thing when Warframes with such skills only become available towards the end of the game's content. Their endgame is clan-versus-clan PVP in a game that they said would never employ PVP in any meaningful fashion. Anything they promise is typically several months late, and many times more underwhelming than it was hyped up to be. At this point I'm convinced that the game is kept on life support only because of an extremely loyal fanbase of yes men that basically figure that DE can do no wrong. It's curious why would they believe that, after DE managed to destroy Tribes: Ascend completely. In the end, Warframe is just another game that starts out extremely promising, and ends a swollen, bloated mess of unfulfilled potential. ... It looks quite pretty, however. If you truly must play this game, never pay a cent for it. That was my folly, and boy do I regret that it took so long for me to realize this. What started out as a cool space ninja robot game with the potential for sweet parkour tricks and kills that held the potential for stealth, turned into a generic cyborg space marine third person shooter with magic powers. My honest suggestion is, if you're truly interested in this game... wait a year. See if it's turned into something decent by then, because it sure as hell ain't worth your money right now.
MUCKSTER;-;Game was very fun at first but VERY quickly became grindy and I got bored...
Knudsen;-;As much as it is a fun game, its really really tedious and quickly becomes a grind. I spent a few hour(s) on the game and don't recommend it to anyone else. Playing with others becomes a rush to go through the level as quick as possible instead of enjoying the gameplay.
{Bozkurt} SHADE;-;this game suck
WSadao;-;every time i try and play the game it fails to update never got to play it
Fred Phelps;-;Nice graphics for a free to play game, but the gameplay is dull. The story is pretty vague for the most part, the party function is almost broken, and I occasionally get tossed into missions that are halfway done. It's not a horrible game, but it's not great either.
biddster29;-;Lets say, it was free for a reason, basic storyline, and average graphics aren't a good combo.
kinder79;-;Way too expensive to play......
Light Pheonix;-;Warframe=good game,WAS a lot of fun,now I  new in-game trailer,whole story, the game is now complectly changed,but..... Everyone now is lost,on chat are messeges,that sound funny before update,but now there are serious problem;to unlock "full ship" need defeat a few boses,which is to new in-game are too far from beggining,traning is now med,but fixed ;) () I think that is nice to relase update,but this update.......it's a huge mess. I don't dis-recommend this game,but take my advice=don't play this game untill "the mess" won't be that messy as now Later Edma19
Miss.PuffyGamer;-;the frame rate of this game is terrible, good graphics looks fun to play but horrible frame rate
Nightowl;-;wait for the developer to fix all the bug, good game, but many bugs
Domi-Nation;-;Simply stated, don't call a game "Free To Play" when you have to pay real money to have ANY sort of fun. Micro-transactions are the biggest pain in the  in the gaming world. This game feels more like some EA p.o.s., rather than an independent developer's. And by the way, your new update killed the game for me completely.
Flailmorpho;-;it's quite fun, but the constant asking for money sort of kills the enjoyment
minkman62;-;It suck because i can not make an acount
allam3.gamer;-;i know its i good game but.. all stages are the same and no diversity
ScumX;-;Needs work could be a good game though
SmarkusH;-;Not if you like a bit complicated 3rd person shooters with super powers.
mvthesavage;-;thas is a horble game if you wunt to lvl up you have to lvl guns but win the guns are lvled up thay only do like 100xp and the maxs for lvl2 is 10000 and win you are rety to lvl up you have to wate a day to lvl up and the enmys do way to mutch damege
Ninja Kitty;-;Like others here I've found Warframe to be a total grindfest. Not only is it a grindfest, Digital Extremes has built in a mess of frustrations just to make your experience that much more grueling. Postives + Large and friendly group of players in the community. You'll find no shortage of people to grind with. + Good graphics. + Nice Co-op features. You can play with friends in classic Co-Op style. Negatives - It doesn't take long for the polish on the graphics to lose their luster as levels become tedious and repetative. Tilesets are randomly generated into sometimes nonsensical patterns and it doesn't take long before you've seen them all as there are few. - There are few mission types and they repeat over several areas on the few tilesets. So you see the same thing over and over and over and over again. - Grind grind grind. While you're seeing the same thing over and over again, you get to farm for things over and over again. Rinse and repeat. - Horrible documentation and introduction for new players. Get ready to have to study for a while and go to a lot of effort Googling tutorials, reviews of the different items, reading up on all the little bits and pieces of the game on your own. There's no real effort put in the game to help new players quickly get situated. A lot of the player made tutorials and guides out on the web are outdated. - You can't have more than 4 people in your squad, so the Co-Op features are limited. However, given the connectivity problems detailed below, their servers and the game itself probably couldn't handle more. - Performance and connectivity issues. Their servers and their software are plagued with connectivity problems with seemingly no end in sight. It becomes a problem when you're into a 40 to 60 minute run and suddenly the game's chat servers go all wonky and cause the game to dump you back into the lobby. There's been sporadic problems where players lag out trying to launch the game and log in. You get a very definite feeling of playing at your own risk just on that alone. Posts are all over their forums regarding performance and connectivity, so it's a common issue and not just one person has seen or experienced. - Pointless time sink. So after you've done all that farming and probably bought a few things with cash, the devs will play the "this is a beta" card and "update" items in game so all that time and money that you've spent figuring out their convoluted system for gearing up properly is totally wasted as your character builds are rendered obsolete by their dev teams. Other Thoughts They use the term beta rather loosely. It's a beta product on the market? They accept cash and advertise specials on their micro transactions, so it's not really a beta. It's a commercial product that is unfinished and that's how it feels. This makes their claims about the game being an open beta more dubious as it sounds like an excuse for shoddy execution and delivery and a "Get out of jail" free card whenever they feel the need to overhaul, update, and nerf gear regardless of their promoting purchases for that same gear and build upgrades by their player base.
Vidar;-;If you like farming for 12 hours for blueprints, then waiting literally days at a time to build said blueprints, then running out of weapon/frame slots you have to pay real money for, this is the game for you.  you DE, I wasted so much  time on this worthless piece of  that you put no effort into making good. This had potential, you could have made a fun game, but no, all you cared about was making the most expensive free game in existance. At least CoD, even with all it's DLC, didn't force you to buy money at some point, at least CoD had an excuse of already being  from the start. God damn, games used to be about fun, they used to be beautiful and people cared about them, now they're all just about money.
HOLLOWSQUAD;-;terrible ing game wtf is it doing on here, but i have heard its better on console.
[K.S.G]swiftspeed;-;first time playing it, crash, almost finshing the first mission, crash, starting the second mission, crash. see a pattren here? it keeps crashing for me so i do not recommed this game. PS. i do not know why its crashing
Hoodie Ninja;-;As a player who played the game when it came out to as it is now. its absolutly sad. just a pay to win mess
Enfaed;-;The gameplay is entertaining and if you enjoy colecting and min maxing it is fun. But, the game still has many bugs and assort problems. The in game market is completely inconsistant and the developers don't seem to have any intention of fixing it. For example you can only trade if you are in a clan (a guild of kind) that bought a trading post and you are extremely limited to number of trades equal to level per day as well as a trading tax. There are small bugs that have been in the game for months and are yet to be fixed as well, nothing game breaking but anyoing to continue seeing heath orbs fall out of lockers and float there. By far the thing that bothers me the most and in fact angers me is the in game market. There are multiple game features that are basic to the game and one would assume would be apart of it that in fact you must pay real money to achive. For example color and custimaztion. I understand having to buy different models and complete cosmetic items but when the default color choices are not open to you unless you pay five dollars? When your starting colors are one row out of many in unsaturated color options and you even have to pay five dollars to unlock the other rows in that unappealing color palet it seems a bit insane. The worst thing of them all is the audacity to tell players and allow players to get items in game. Because yes you can buy almost all the items in the game for real money but you may also find and make them in game. But what they don't make obvious at first is that you have limited storage space. So if you buy a warframe or a gun with money you automaticly get the space for the item. But, if you were to make it yourself in game you do not get the alloted space and must buy platnium, the real money in game curancy, to even buy inventory space for you item! Over all the game is very fun but the constant need to buy things with real money and various small bugs as well as the idiot design choices for some game functions are holding the game back. Not to mention the game is horrible unbalanced as one can get to the point where nothing is really a chalenge.
Aclurace;-;Amazing graphics, well optimized, it's a blast.... for a while. The game gets repetitive quick, and there doesn't seem to be any great end-game value. By the time you've invested way too much time you realize that its just a P2W grind-fest with no real direction or purpose.
Warlord;-;Grindy but not fun At the beginning the content is good but later the game is boring grindy
Jeff Belinger;-;this game ing sucks. I cant even complete the first mission without dying. pay to win
The New Franklin_The_Forklift;-;This game is terrible. I really don't understand how people can even play this game, or why it has such a large following, becaue it is truly a GPOS (Giant Piece of ). Anyone who plays this game, and is on my friends list, please do me the favor of removing yourself from it.
FuS RO DAH;-;This game is meant for consols at home not computers its laggy it is hard to control and most of the things you need to BUY the coins to get it
sehakoziel;-;This game had promise. It is too bad that it was ruined by the f2p pay model. After only a few missions it forces the player into a grind session just like any other f2p game. Instead of focusing on game mechanics, design, and fun, the game is about repeating the same stupid levels over and over and over just to get enough credits to upgrade an absolutely necessary mod by one degree (or just to get the mod), in order to advance through to the next mission. I would have gladly paid $60 or even a monthly fee to play a game with real content and real fun. Too bad this game chose the f2p model, they'll not get a cent from me.
The Swedish Chef;-;Game is poorly optimized, graphics are a little dull. The game itself gets boring after playing the first 20 hours, there's nothing to do except play a level and get loot. Levels are the same basically, the maps get boring. It's hard to get certain materials to craft items. Overall, if you really want to enjoy the game you're going to have to spend a lot of money on the game. I do not recommend this game and I am giving it a 3 out of 10 for it's dull graphics, bad optimization and common server problems.
Geizhals;-;Fun game, but, after a while it becomes midly repetative.
Hilikus;-;Cyborg space ninjas that run out of stamina after 5 steps? Was good before they broke the stamina thing. No more parkouring and doing cool  all over the place? Just...no. Cyborg space ninjas shouldnt need to stop and rest after swinging a sword 2 times or jumping once or twice...They broke the fluidness and freedom of the game by making so many restrictions on what you should be able to do.
Boshtrich;-;i dont really understand what was wrong with this game for me. It was rather blocky and constantly was imposssible for me to shoot people. It was constantly lagging which i dont understand because i have a fairly good gaming computer and great wifi. It would be a great game for those who do not have these problems.
wennid;-;Short version: lots of fun SOMETIMES, but much still broken or missing. Community pretty much blows, and solo is a LOT more fun than grouping, at least with PuGs. For several reasons I won't go into, I've mostly being playing this in so-called 'Solo' mode. Obviously this impacts my impressions. If you're mostly going to be playing with friend(s) or w/e, your mileage will vary significantly. At it's best, a great game with a lot of potential. However it also often degenerates into tediously repetitive shooting gallery. At the time of writing, lots of stuff still pretty buggy/broken (enemies and other objects inside walls or floors, grenades and other blast-type effects that go through walls, and so on). Enemy AI/pathfinding is kinda messed up too, leading to enemies standing facing into corners dunce style, or groups of enemies doing the two-step trying to get around each other (often for long periods, esp if there are more than two in the group), and things like a guy running back and forth a few metres indefinitely. I get the impression that the dev's are more focused on expanding the game than on fixing these kinds of issues, so who knows if/when any of this will be fixed. Mission difficulty and balance is all over the place (particularly for a solo player) - some later higher "level" or higher "rated" missions are MUCH easier than earlier/"lesser" ones. Several mission types (particularly most of the ones you have to grind for various drops) are just ridiculous for soloing, esp when you get a 'bad' map. For example some "defense" mission maps have you trying to defend a target that is completely exposed on all sides against enemies coming from all directions. A solo player just can't be everywhere at once. This really makes me wonder why they specifically include a solo mode since they clearly can't be bothered putting in the piffling effort required to scale things and/or exclude such obviously group-oriented maps from solo mode, etc. And don't even get me started on The Stalker in solo mode. Hard to think of anything more stupid. The crafting system is interesting, but VERY slow (eg. Warframe builds take 3 days real world time, and that's AFTER you've spent 12-36 hours on building the parts), and very few crafting options are available early on since the vast majority of items require drops from later planets. Obtaining certain materials is heavily grindy and/or expensive. Finally, since soloing is not a realistic option beyond the very early stages, the game really needs some kind of "lobby" interface or LFG tool outside of just poking around the (huge) map looking for something interesting. A clan finder would be nice too - very few clans seem to bother posting recruitment messages in-game, at least at the times I've had an eye out. Perhaps they expect players to do this kind of thing thru website(s) or forums. Seems like a total cop-out to me. I haven't reached "end-game" yet, but am already starting to feel kinda burnt out on this. It's worth a look since it's free, but too broken and "limited" for me to give it a recommendation.
linkcharger;-;not that exciting
VertiBRO;-;They should have called this War-Farm instead. You spend a great deal of your time running missions to rank up weapons to make them more powerful; so you can run more difficult missions to potentially get more powerful weapons so you can run more missions with to make those new weapons more powerful. Unless you want to spend money: grindy and repetative to the extreme. I wish there was a way to pay money to make this game fun again after the first 20 hours of gameplay. It's Free to Play though.
goodpoltergeist;-;Can't recommend this game. Wasted too many hours on it. Devs and community moderators have incredibly questionable practices. They continue to dilute and obfuscate drop tables, and make the game as grindy as is possible. Power creep is absurd, and their money grabbing is just getting out of hand. I just uninstalled it recently due to certain "recent" events on the forums between players, the devs, and the generally useless community moderators. Don't get this game.
[DONE] Griffin;-;Money farm
Jimithi;-;Boo... It's too fast paced. The combat is too repetetive for very little reward or progress. While it's free to play, it's almost pay to win. The free options require an incredible amount of time to acquire the simplest of weapons. Grinding for parts against boring enemies for hours on end, only to have to wait 1/2 a day to assemble a single item. I may have not played the game for the required 5 hours before reviewing, but a group of my friends play this despite my protests. I have witnessed enough. Should you decide to play the game, choose your starting class wisely for you may be stuck with it awhile.
Warbucks;-;Ok...finally figured I'd try this game....Steam downloaded it, but play yields the ole "Win xp or higher is needed...blah,blah" crap! Like many of u I have Win 7 64bit...Warframe options button has Direct x 11 & 64 bit greyed out, so can't try ckng those...any suggestions? (local Cache ckd out....don't use Steam online overlay to talk to others ingame)
Democles;-;it is fun but co op is lame. It made the other guy lag out. He was running and was standing in the same place
jbill214;-;Honestly, playing this game as a beginner, far from the launch, wasn't too exciting. While the graphics are spectacular and the combat system above average the induction to the game was poor and the storyline was horrible. Playing this game for 10 hours was almost a waste if not for the graphics. The overall atmosphere of the game seemed like too many missions spent running through hallways to get to an objective that you cleared in the last mission. Most missions were just repeats and the gear availability for F2P was mediocre. The last aspect that was the least developed was the makeshift "crafting" in the game to get new toons or "warframes." All in all, it seems to be a game barely out of development and worth only a 5-5.5/10.
drangelmira;-;I was excited about it, until I actually tried it. It looks cool and I'd recommend it to people that haven't played many shooting games. It has cool moves, the graphics are decent and you get to use different types of weapons. Unfortunately the AI isn't exactly smart and the character you control is a bit overpowered, plus you get way too much ammo and health and power regeneration. It's way too easy! It looks pretty, it's relaxing, it's free and the classes look nice, but it didn't really manage to draw me in. In all honesty, I don't have much to say. I got bored on my first mission and quit, so maybe it gets better as you progress. It's not that it really is that terrible overall, but I got bored too early. So I do recommend it to casual gamers that just want some parkour tricks and some good old slashing and shooting of aliens, but it really isn't anything special. A lot of easy to kill foes and an endless pursuit of loot. If you've already played a bunch of alien shooting games and have high expectations about this one, spare yourself the disappointment.
lagrenouille;-;* Fake solo mode * Too many QTE
Thomolithic;-;Boring, takes forever to get anywhere. Totally not worth the time, even if it is free.
Obama Bin Laden;-;I mean it's a good game , but I only look at myself so I'm gonna say it's bad because since the last patch , my update fails everytime. And i also cri everitiem becuz of dis.
loiosh1;-;A goood Sci-Fi game, but rather linear and bland. It takes forever to find and craft items, especially warframes. Also, the dungeons are rather linear and straightforward and teamplay does not exist, unless you are hunting bosses.
zexel;-;I do not recommend this game. The movement and swordplay are clunky, at best. The levels and gameplay are repetitive. It's not terrible, but not fun either.
Where Are You Going;-;It's . Pay to Grind. Digital Extremes cannot into PR.
Cyan Guy;-;So I get to a rank up mission, and I fail it, because I suck at killling stuff. And when I try it again, It tellls me I can't try again for 24 hours. What a ing joke. Digital Extremes can go  themselves.
Dirtyshadow;-;Really hard to even start to play without friends already playing and into the game. While the games starting tutorial/first missions are a great learning curve, it really doesnt show you anything on how to best team up, socialise or interact with other players
Omidimaru;-;Play the first 3 levels and boom, thats the game, rush as fast as possible to the end and skip 3/4 of the mobs. Would not reccommend, gets boring after an hour.
DaFish;-;Awesome game, I like the mass effect 3rd person shooter feel. However it is too much of a grind if you do not want to spend money on the game.
DigitalDrone;-;its rubish its not even working for me
Boo the Dog;-;MLG - Major League Grindfest
The Grim Crim;-;too much grinding and too many bugs
Blaine the Moonshiner;-;Warface review, I mean warthunder, I mean march of war review 4/10
Sundial says its fuck time;-;This game is really fun, when it works. This is literally the buggiest piece of  I have ever played. If it cost anything, i'd be even more , but seriously, since it's kind of pay-to-win, FIX YOUR ING GAME
Coalf;-;This is one of the worst Co-op MMOS out there as it doesnt actualy focus on the Co-op but on the grind. Yes grind this game is nothing but a 24 hour grind with bosses. The most intense moment in the entire game was when i crashed after a very important mission, then again and then again this amount of crashes is unbereable not taking in that the game is extremely bugged and textures often get stuck in players and enemies. But as i said this game is nothing but grind, you grind to get a pet you grind enemies to get to the boss you grind the same area over and over just to obtain one more ceramics or whateverthe you need right now. The weapons take immense amount of grind to actualy even get the blueprint, then you need to get the required items that means, yes you guessed it MORE GRINDING. Then finaly if the starts are right and you have enough of items and credits you can finaly wait, yes wait whole whoping 12 hours for your new wepon to actualy get completed. THis isnt a multiplayer game this is a great GRIND simulator. YOU DO NOTHING ELSE BUT GRIND. So if you are looking for a way how to kill time and love grinding away this game is for you. But if you are a noraml and social person you will probably enjoy this game only when playing with friend. I would give it a 4/10 thus i dont recommend it to anyone that doesnt plan on playing with friends or hates grinding.
jmfoubister;-;super buggy, I don't know what we are waiting for. Can't log on when I want to play. Otherthan that, a good concept. Once if I ever can play the game again maybe I would recomend this game
Valgraath;-;I enjoyed this game. I have yet to get another warframe, because of the stupid pay to win model. Crafting is pretty stupid. You get the materials and start crafting and like a week later you have it. I really do not reccomend it, unless you can deal with the pay to win.
.;-;Just as a review of the first 60 minutes or so of gameplay, I've had the worst experience with this game than I have with any other in the past few months. Being as it relies on internet connection, the connection cut out during the tutorial not once, but twice. After Completing the tutorial FINALLY, I was taken to a loading screen where it simply stopped loading three times, and stayed at the same load point for an additional 30 minutes before I gave up and closed the game. I went through the intro cutscene and tutorial stage 5 times before giving up on this game entirely. As far as merits go, what little gameplay I had was entertaining after adjusting the graphic settings AFTER the lagfest of the first intro cutscene. The weapons were pretty neat, and the attacking felt fluid. I enjoyed the aesthetic qualities of the game, the design of the enemies and armor were pretty darn cool as well, but that's as far as the good qualities go. The only thing holding me back from reccommending this game is the constant disconnects, having to do the tutorial and watch an unskippable cutscene over and over again. I can practically quote half of the dialogue from the tutorial! I understand that while this is not the intended experience of the game, it's what I've experienced. After googling the issue, I've tried nearly every remedy listed, and nothing has worked. As far as I can tell, if you want to play this game, don't play it over steam. Get it from the website where you are taken to create an account anyways.
LuLu;-;great and fun but platinum donations is too much.. most items are canonly be bought with platinum.
Chuck Bartowski;-;MAKE IT AVALIBLE ON MAC
jorgen_kruger;-;The Short and Sweet Review: An addictive game at first, its pleasing graphics and myriad of missions and play options will keep you fairly entertained. It's myriad of bugs and issues will not. This game, like many of the latest "Pay to Win" MMO's, demands a lot of time be invested if you're only in it for the free content. This means days/weeks of grinding to get that weapon you want and for most of us this is an option we can live with. What we can't live with having spent the last hour or two grinding, only to see the game drop connection and the reward you work so long at, lost. This unfortunately can happen time and again, and is especially prevailent after large patches - the latest being 1.8Gb. Eventually this becomes tiresome and the complete lack of storyline however means the only thing that keeps you going is the greed of growing your arsenal. Purchasing additional slots for weapons and warframes is something invetable, expect to have to dish out your hard earned cash within as little as two to three weeks if you play often. The programmers insure that somewhere along the line, if you want to progress and grow your arsenal, you'll need to spend real money, this is called a paywall. Some will argue you can trade items in-game to make other purchases in-game, but the programmers have ensured that this platform remains simplistic to ensure that it does not affect their profits. There is no "market" or "auction house" and instead there is a single spamchat window with hundreds (if not more) of players selling items. Items drop rates are also regulated to ensure that if a particular rare items drops for one person, it will become only so much harder for the next person to obtain. A particular weapon may also start out as being fun and overpowered only to end up on the scraphead of "has been" weapons, with a current stream of "new and improved" weapons being available to purchase in-game and then eventually made available to the masses and the envitable grind required to get it. Eventually again, its nerfed, rinse, repeat. All in all the programmers will ensure they get their monies worth out of you and this game can quickly become as expensive as EVE which can easily cost the equivalent of a new PS3/XBOX/PC game every month. If don't mind spending the cash and you're looking for nothing more than blowing off a little steam, this game - when its working - can do just that for you. Throw into the mix a possible takeover by PWE, and you can bet your sweet  you won't be happy that you did. I'd recommend checking the reviews again in a year or so, to see if the programmers have listened to their existing customers. It sucks when you one promotes and supports the developers by purchasing in-game items only to find they'd rather focus on new content and making more money, than resolving existing bugs. This game needs another year of serious dev-time.
The Crazy Apple;-;I cannot play multiplayer games. When I enter the squad and the game starts, I am logged out of the squad and can't play. Please fix it and wil be a great game as it used to be.
Bubmeister;-;From gameplay on YouTube it looks like a good game. And it is. But the system requirements were misleading and it really does not run on my computer even though I fit the minimum requirements.
Tigure;-;This game is trash lol. Don't play it.
Xievie;-;I've rewritten my review about four times now, and each time has been a fairly positive review, until now. Currently, Warframe isn't doing that great. Many players are sitting around in a state of impatience for new content, and the many updates we've had still has not satisfied many players. We are missing many things such as polish, endgame, and fixes to some current issues. As much as I'd like Warframe to succeed, I cannot recommend the game to anybody looking into playing it. Other than the issues we have and the things we are months later than we should have them, getting into the game is extremely difficult and time consuming. Even 200 hours in, I doubt you would be even close to top tier content unless you were really good, are good at studying a game wikia, and had help. By the time you get as far as I have, you will very likely feel unsatisfied with where Warframe currently is and with the lack of content to go by. You will also be frustrated with Digital Extremes for not releasing any good content, and you will hope from update in to update out that DE will release something great, but in the end you will be sorely disappointed. I intend to change my review to a yes if they start making good releases and show that they know what they are doing, but until then I intend to give a No. Take care, Xievie
GOD;-;this is ing . idk if i can recommend this game because it wont let me play it XD this game wont lemme download it.
raulmtzjr2;-;cant buy platinium ;c
The_Conibear;-;I just didn't really care for it. Sorry
hyunit;-;Pure grinding. The grinding emphasis is so strong that most games are just people running through the levels, ignoring all enemies, to the end to finish the stage and get the rewards. New players will be lost as they try to fight and actually play the game. It becomes a "look how fast i can run through this stage" simulator. Graphics are cool, story is cool, gameplay idea is cool. Though everything got exploited into a weird grindy running "game". Many people will enjoy this, no doubt. I didn't get hooked though, and I LOVE grindy games.
reggiewill74;-;I give this game 2.5 out of 4 stars. Explanation: -1 star due my character getting stuck in walls just about anytime I use the run on walls skill. -.5 star due to difficulty setting up keybindings for use on a PC. This game would be much better played with a game controller - thank goodness the game has such an option or I would have taken a whole star away instead of half. The positives are: excellent graphics and character detail along with an awesome story line.
Austen (FlaringLead);-;Gameplay gets very repetitive... but besides that it's a very good game.
Damothirteen;-;A good game, and there is some real fun to be had however it is so buggy and unstable that it just ruins the experience. It becomes really annoying when you are getting higher levels and really need to finish a level and it glitches out all the damned time. So in its current state, I couldn't reccomend this game.
Snake;-;The pay to win in this game is absolute ing . If you want to play a game that's actually free to play and not free to suffer in ing agony without paying for even adequate weapons, go ahead.
();-;I had no idea what the  I want doing playing this game about half a year ago but I liked the physics part about it, other than that, it was a  experience with grinding being the only aspect the game has to offer.
meme so supreme;-;the holocaust of space
Mordred;-;Just uninstalled the game. The controls are horrible and nothing near user-friendly. I play inverted and the game just dosen't let you play that way (and yes, I've been throught the options menu and even if there's the option for it, still dosen't work properly.) If you want some badass 3rd person shooter game, spend some money and get Mass Effect.
Zaithe;-;The game is so buggy. If it wasnt i'm sure it would be a great game. Pretty much the story is you join then bug happens which causes game to freeze or crash. No autosave or saving during missions so you have to relaunch game and start mission over then repeat.
TheTorchwood;-;Update Failed. Please try again later. For three days... Never did get to even play.
Alexioan Dalkimi;-;Warframe can be fun, however a few things really ruin the game in the long run. If you want a new weapon for instance, you first have to grind credits to buy the blueprint, then grind mobs just to get materials for the weapon while also grinding for credits to actualy craft the weapon, and then you have to wait 12 hours just for it to be crafted. Sure its fun to run missions, but not over and over and over again just for a small item. If you want a warframe on the other hand, you have to grind missions for the credits to buy the blueprint, and then grind a certain mission to get all the components of the warframe, and then just grind for the materials for crafting all three of the components of the warframe, which then you have to wait 12 hours just to craft one of the pieces, you can craft all three at once, and then you have to grind missions to get enough credits to pay for the cost of combining all three pieces and wait 72 hours just for a new character. New warframes have different abilities and stats, but still use the same weapon, so gameplay usually isn't that different if you don't heavily use abilities (however if you use abilities, gameplay between warframes can be highly varied, and the stats do change quite a bit). However if you don't want to grind for weapons and new warframes you can simply pay 25-50 dollars for a warframe (25 for just the warframe and its abilities, and 50 for the warframe and a few weapons added to it), or just buy weapons for about 25 dollars. Somehow the game even manages to make boss battles a repetive grind, with for instance the jackal just constantly avoiding missiles and shooting the legs (or stabbing them to death if you enjoy melee) and then dammaging him. Parkour while featured in the game is clunky and glitchy, which can end in you accidently launching yourself 25 feet into the air by attempting to run up a wall and jump. Another interesting thing is that in the Kubrow quest, a glitch can happen where you have to leave and reenter the game just to instal the compoment you earned from one part of the quest just so you can actually instal it. The most fun I had in this game is actually just killing minor units. Mowing down Grineer, Corpus, and the Infected is hug amounts of fun, but can easily get boring due to the repetitive grindy nature of the game. I personally feel like the game is more of a money making scheme than an actual fully fledged game, due to the fact that its an insane grind for weapons and warframes, yet every item in the game can be bought for real money, although it is highly expensive. A good example of this too is the clan dojo, in which you have to run missions, to get one time run missions, to get a chance to get a blueprint which then in turn requires a ton of materials and credits to craft, and then takes forever to actually finish crafting, to just add a room to your dojo, note your dojo also needs energy rooms, and hallways just for it to function correctly, or you can just circumvent this process and buy a forma (the item needed for the dojo room) for ten bucks. All in all, this game is fun in short brief sessions, and if you just do not care about having alot of items or variety, but I personally do not recommend this game. The weapons are fun to use though.
Sploo;-;warbros #1 now and forever. Coding can be a bit sleek at times and it's behind a whole kind thingy grindwall. It's not pay2win, it's pay2notgrind4fiveyears
FaZe IlLuMiNaTi;-;Well, I would love to write a review about this game, if I could even make an account, but I can't because the Warframe team "reserve the right to ban any account/alias deemed offensive" when I enter "kieranballard2" as my alias. Pathetic censoring.
Eternal;-;You grind for keys to grind for materials to grind for weapon parts to grind for weapons to grind for more weapons to grind for Prime frames to grind for more  What do you get at the end of grinding if you ever get there? Nothing but emptiness that you just wasted your life doing nothing but living in a Skinner's box Get out while you still can. You're not having fun. You're being baited to unlock pixel after pixel.
your a wizzard harry;-;Needs more poofing flarms
ono.NoSound(:;-;It looks like an awesome game, but it crashs on me so no point in playing. I don't reccomend this game.
mmonuts;-;The Gameplay was extremely linear, the missions were buggy, and to make it worse the storyline is literally just a whole concoction of player theories who have pieced together what they heard from enemies what we were told and lotus. Unless atleast the gameplay is fixed for me i don't recomend this game.
mmonuts;-;The Gameplay was extremely linear, the missions were buggy, and to make it worse the storyline is literally just a whole concoction of player theories who have pieced together what they heard from enemies what we were told and lotus. Unless atleast the gameplay is fixed for me i don't recomend this game.
shamilton1993;-;Where to start with this one... Well first off, I like the ghrapics, the gameplay, and the abilities. However, after a couple hours of playing, I noticed that the enemies started doing way more damage, and I was doing roughly the same as I started out. So I decided to look for a new stronger weapon. I find out, that you cant buy a weapon thats better using the in game credits. OH NO. You have to buy the currency using real money, in order to get a decent weapon. Its that, or you can do the facebook style of upgrading, buy the blue print, play a level a half dozen times to find a resource, and then hopefully after a day of grinding you have what you need. Did I mention, the fact you cant kill the enemies even on the first level anymore, because their difficulty progressed with you? >.>... So good luck getting those resources! Yet another potentially GREAT GAME, turned to  from greed. I would have much rather paid 50-60 bucks for the game, and the ability to progress with ingame credits that I didnt have to buy, versus having to buy 20 dollars worth of game money, for a single weapon. Really. As for those of you who fell victim to that, and want to hold onto that "pride" so to speak, of this being a "great game", it is, sure, but only for about 45 minutes.
nuke147;-;Engine has repeatedly crashed before even completing tutorial. Found no readily implemented solutions
Lt. Dad;-;The game is very repetetive and after you've gone through the first 2 planet maps you will have seen basically everything the game has to offer. New content is added every month or so, but unfortunately not enough is changing to keep me playing. I want to like this game, but it is too gear based vs skill based.
Knaps;-;Warframe seemed to be an interesting space adventure filled with combat and with a new patch it even includes ships. I'm a simple sci fi guy and it was free so I bought it. The game was terrible but the controls are probably the worst way to control a charcter I have ever seen. E is melee attack while left and right click are to aim while f is to swap beetween your secondary and primary. The tutorial if you can even call it that places you with all of your powers depending on which class you play (warrior, ranger, mage) but as soon as you leave the room you are left with only the first power you get. As I played through the game and fought the generic humanish guys I felt extremly confused due to the starting senistivity being higher than snoop and using e to attack. I eventually reached the selection of my first few secondary pistols. I was told nothing about these guns so I never knew the difference, same with the mele weapons as you can choose a stick, guantlets or a sword. when I eventually got to a wall running segment I died 10 times, not because of my inability to press space but because my faceless avatar would kick off the wall or even better not be able to make a jump. The hacking is horrendous, think about it this way, would you like a timed minigame (about 15 sec) where you can't go back once you move a puzzle peice unless you flip the peice all over again, one that tells you nothing about how to do it and then will cut down the time when you get it halfway done!? The answer is no by the way. Did I like this game in short no in long N00000000000000000000 .5/10-kill it
MegaAwesomeAlex;-;It was good until the major update which made it SUCK!
xXDra9onSlayrXx;-;THIS GAME KEEPS ON CRASHING!!!!!!!!!!!!!! when i finish the tutorial and im in the ship it Crashes!
GABMAX101;-;I got a problem when i went to pruchase platinum fron the market with a 20% discount that i got from a log in reward. So as i said i got the 20% discount and i went trough the process of payment and everything like ive done before, but this time something happened that when i added funds to my Steam wallet the game registered the purchase but it hasnt charged my bank account or my steam wallet and i havent got my platinum after the purchase. I checked my Steam wallet and it still shows that the money for the purchase is still there and on the history on my bank account it says that the transaction is peanding after a while. When ive purchased platinum before i always receive it when i get back to the game but this time it did not happen and i really hope that this can be fixed because i look at the purchase platinum Tab on the games market and it says that i have the discount but when i click on it the deals show that i dont have any discount....... So yeah im pretty much  that i have not received my platinum and lost the discount.... Anyone that can help me with this ill appreciate it.
L0L;-;it is a little fun
| Trade.tf;-;I had alot of fun at first (I'd say maybe the first 3 planets?). After that, the grinding and repetitive levels get the best of me.
cyorus;-;im sorry but once again warframe has failed me. why you might ask? well here's the thing:since my last review i said that it did some mayor improvements and it did. but then i came back to a mayor problem:getting bored of my weapons/warframe and trying to get new stuff,but not being able to buy/craft anything AKA it costs way too much ingame money. first you have to spit up 20000 credits(which is one of the CHEAPER ones)and then you need to pay ANOTHER 20000 credits to craft it. and all the materials aren't even available yet in the beginning. so you might say:well then go do some frikkin' grinding and progressing so you can get those materials. mayby,but i don't wanna spend the first 20 hours of gameplay on grinding. the phrase "ninjas play free" is wrong,for you to have fun in experimenting with different loadouts the best way is to just spend real money on it. ps.the game is laggy as  final opinion:the key moments of your game are at the start,so that way you can win a gamers heart and make them keep playing the game,this is not something these people got. i am sorry but you could not win over my heart once again,mayby in another year of updates whil you get it right.
BlazeOfCamins;-;Pay to Win nuff said
KokoRO;-;It's like Farmville. But with guns.
Spheal;-;CUZ
0rcinator in Old Country;-;Grind so you can grind so you can grind so you can grind so you can finally use a macro to let the game grind by itself. Also saryn isn't real and won't sit on your face.
Moomoomike;-;It's a good game, and the model makes sense, but the biggest problem is the 24h wait time for mastery ranks. I went for my first test, and the game went to black screen with a big "Please Wait" circle for about 15 mins. I finally shut down the game and when i came back it said i have to wait 24h. The devs had no reason to add this game mechanic because it's not as if you can even play cash to simply pass on the time and try again. It's simply there to  with you. I give this game 5/10 for the simple fact that the devs are . Very uncanadian of you.
Phex;-;In Warframe you play as a Teno, a space ninja of sorts. The game is all about the fighting and gives you several options, you can use swords and melee, powers and ranged weapons. The selection of the weapons is large and the powers vary depending on which Warframe (model) you play as. Sadly the game isn't truly free to play. I'd put in a lot of time to try and get a few Warframes and weapons for free (not including time spend getting the components) only to find out that the inventory is capped. That was the farewell for me. Still, if you don't mind paying in some hard cash; this is a decent game to play. Oh and yes, the plot is inexistant.
SaunaChum;-;Not worth the time.
fecalsquat1;-;Has been saying "verifying download cache" for about 3 hours cant even start the game. very dissapointed it look like a fun game but it now seems to just be a waste of my time.
Josham101;-;This game could be fun for those who would enjoy a good game with good mechanics and of course the online multiplayer aspect. As a gamer I enjoyed this game imensely TOO BEGIN WITH! As a school student who works hard and studies after school i could not play this game everyday. And this is why I Dont like this game: because it demands attention on a regular basis to grind for resources. I don not have the time while my friends do. Along with the fact you need to pay for wepons slots (which my friends did) they poured hours off there life (OVER 500 HOURS) to get these elusive weapons that they refused to pay for. I can no longer play with them nor will i be able to catch up unless i pay money. THese games suck because they require some money to have fun and can not be played by the caual gamer like me. If its your thing to spend all this time then enjoy but if you dont have the time to commit then dont bother.
Humanxlemming;-;Pay 2 spray paint your weapon! Pay 2 Upgrade your weapon Pay 2 change your warframe Real money is what this game uses constantly.
CrappyMeal;-;Quite fun to play, but too repetitive. The first few hours of playing, you really enjoy it, but as you get into the 50-100 hour range, farming becomes 75% of what you do in the game. There is no such thing as a story in this game, no matter how many updates try to add lore. Now that all the new weapons require a clan research lab, the weapons before it researched, the lab resources to be researched, massive build times for all these items, it can take literally months to get a new weapon, if you have a decent amount of clan members to help. Not to mention that there are research weapons that are absolute trash.
Elderskorm13;-;If you like grinding for several hundred hours for the perfect build, just to have it nerfed and broken. Then this is the game for you. Patches get rolled out with A weapon here and A new frame here. Events have gotten pathetic. With every major update they roll out, 50 new problems come with it. Not to mention you'll be lucky if the problems for the last patch have been fixed. Support tickets are answered with " well something must be wrong on your end". They throw sparkles and pretty things at people to distract them from the honest problems. Game was great, now it's broken.
mylifeisdope&;-;Warframe is a fun diversion for a few hours, however there are several flaws that keep this game from becoming more than just a novelty. For starters, the game handles quite well. Combat is satisfying and the controls are responsive. However, very little outside of the basic game mechanics are explained. Things like crafting and progression are completely devoid of any meaningful explanation. I spent a few hours trying to figure out how to acquire a better weapon than the starter rifle. I ended up buying a blue print which appears to be completely unusable until much more progression. This seems to stress the microtransaction aspect of the game as its probably just easier to buy things than try to figure out how to craft them. Anyways it was fun for a few hours. Can't say I'll play again. Good visuals, good gameplay, but if you aren't sold on the idea of shelling out money towards this game, I can only imagine that it'll be worth a few hours of your time...
bloodfish7223;-;Warframe was fun and exciting at first this soon becomes mundane a total grindfest and for what so i can play the same tilesets over and over again once you get certain weapon sets the game seems to have a non accomplisment feel to it. It was very exciting at first a fresh new look at freemium but as ive said once you get in game it loses that glossy finish the very begining of the game got me going i thought yes just what i wanted a game with what seemed to be an excellent story line however after this small tutorial the storyline is none exsistant and to help matters the devs will release maybe a weapon once a month thats majorly op and makes it boring. basically youll need vauban synapse the grenade launcher and a decent secondary. there are many game modes but all in all end up the same kill some people or some dude in the hope of getting something good which rarely happens. there is also an alliance feature which after you have had all research gathers no point what so ever no alliance matches or progress nor rewards for team work. i used to really like this game and spent days on end playing but now cant even be bothered to login and see zero/little change. exciting at first swiftly changing to mundane dont bother
Forecast Octopus;-;While a lot of effort has been put into this game, and the polish is commendable, the further this game hase gone into development the more and more obtuse the entire thing has become. This game has all the markings of a AAA title, both for good and bad, except that it's F2P and still technically in development, which gives us gorgeous UIs that actually make it difficult to do what you'd like. The damage system used to be fairly simply, if not obfuscated, but now it requires a degree of research to even come to terms with. "Bleeding" applies through your shields, normal attacks have status elements, with combinations. The initial ambition of this project has begun to exceed itself.
ManlyMikeMolloy;-;Warframe was fun right up to the point were you max out the level of your starting teeno which doesn't take all that long and they make it ridiculously and unreasonably difficult to get a new tenno unless you just pay with cash.
datmarksmanbasturd;-;Shameful
Harcile;-;So, if you want a free(ish) game with lots of missions and great graphics and don't mind if the gameplay is unvaried and at times unpolished then, YES, Warframe is for you. Why do I not recommend it? Ah, glad you asked! Firstly the developers have gone with quantity over quality. The graphics do look great, but after a few hours you start to realise that the levels are just built from the same components and the enemies are not very varied at all. They just attack in large numbers. At first there appear to be hundreds of missions - but you soon realise there's just a few mission types, and the levels are simply rehashes of the same environments. Some of the mission types are very poorly put together; rescuing hostages and hunting targets is just so bleh. You are just playing the same missions over and over but in slightly different level configurations with slightly different enemies. There's tons of it, so many missions, but it's all so samey and therefore boring. The AI can be painfully dumb but the routine they have in place is enough to initially draw you in before you realise the flaws. The potential for the storyline is never quite realised as the game drip feeds you background information that doesn't really mean much. The promise to go through a story with other players occurs, you just run through samey levels killing samey enemies with faceless teammates and it's all a little bit sterile - which is a shame because the game looks so good and has some good gameplay mechanics that are massively underused (the parkhour, for example). There's no discovery or briefing in the levels, you just follow the arrow from one point to the next. The hours of gameplay on offer soon become a chore to go through to hunt the next material or get to the next stage. The drops are another good example. At first you'll see all the bonuses to collect and be happy. Several thousand pick ups later and its another chore. The lockers dotted around the levels are barely worth opening. The majority of drops are common items but you can't know until you get them. Which leads on to the next complaint... If you want to improve your frame/loadout without paying then you are in for a long grind. The only reason I made it past the Grineer boss (one of the more fun missions after hours fighting the same Grineer droves) was because a much higher ranked player was in our squad and dealt with him as me and other lesser frames alternated between reviving each other and being revived. The next set of missions gets even more tedious. After killing the nth 1000th crewman, you'll find yourself feeling a bit numb. The difference between freely equipped players and paying players is so stark that sometimes [should you not spend the vast sums required to get a competitive loadout] you'll just go on the defense missions and be in awe as guys level wave after wave of enemies that would wipe you out in an instant. "Well just buy the better frames/loadouts then cheapskate!" Yes, I could. However the gameplay would still be the same - the repetitive missions, unvaried enemies, etc only I could skip the initial grind. Then what? Have to pay more to get on to the next set of boring missions and enemies? Welcome to freemium! There is some crafting and buffs which can be combined which help boost your frame, although it is also a bit rough and ready in terms of the UI and I ended up getting - you go it - a bit bored doing it all. This is not helped by the many drops filling your profile with common cards which you get to combine with other cards. Many hundred times later, you just dread the thought of dealing with it. It is a shame because Warframe has a lot of potential. If the developers stop churning out samey content and focused on what's already there - developing the gameplay and mission modes, improving the level design and story, making better use of existing gameplay features that just don't matter (parkhour, ziplines etc) then this could be a really great game. Also better value improvements and better balance may lead to more free players investing in the game and sticking around. I might come back in a year or two but, for now, I've had enough. TL;DR: At first Warframe looks great, plays great, but really bored once me when I tried to dig deeper because - despite the masses of content - the game has almost no depth at all.
MR KUWAII;-;I dont like this game.
NOXIOUSVEGETA;-;good idea, but repetitive (copy paste maps), and a lot of grind for weapons and other stuff.
NouSkion;-;Very repetitive. I'm not even sure what I'm fighting for. Just strolling through level after level without any hint of a challenging opposition. Boring.
Tranquil-Dread;-;Entertaining at first. Might even entertain you for a week. But it is definitely not a game that can interest you for long when you're playing alone, and friends can only keep you playing for so long.
Playing Mantis;-;very monotone, gets boring after a couple hours... not to mention the ingame money is the slowest growing thing EVAH!!!!!!!!! unless you're into boring  farming all day which is also slow as hell!! The game idea was clever and new, but.... it gets boring because it has a linear gameplay, only thing that changes every now and then is the map route... but its still the same map!!
Salvo1;-;I'll admit that it's fun at first, but as time went on, I found the limited number of enemy and mission types to get less and less interesting, and then I got bored. Plus, the pricing schemes for purchasing weapons and frames outright are very high. To the point where just earning items in game and using real money to unlock weapon and frame slots felt like a better idea to me. Also, the community in the game's official forums can be rude and fanboyish at time, and if you criticize anything the developers do or offer even constructive feedback, you can be trolled and flamed by people who refuse to admit that the purpose of a beta is to test and tweak and improve a product by sometimes pointing out what's wrong or can be improved.
1033203756;-;Trash
[DONE] Griffin;-;Money farm
Jimithi;-;Boo... It's too fast paced. The combat is too repetetive for very little reward or progress. While it's free to play, it's almost pay to win. The free options require an incredible amount of time to acquire the simplest of weapons. Grinding for parts against boring enemies for hours on end, only to have to wait 1/2 a day to assemble a single item. I may have not played the game for the required 5 hours before reviewing, but a group of my friends play this despite my protests. I have witnessed enough. Should you decide to play the game, choose your starting class wisely for you may be stuck with it awhile.
Warbucks;-;Ok...finally figured I'd try this game....Steam downloaded it, but play yields the ole "Win xp or higher is needed...blah,blah" crap! Like many of u I have Win 7 64bit...Warframe options button has Direct x 11 & 64 bit greyed out, so can't try ckng those...any suggestions? (local Cache ckd out....don't use Steam online overlay to talk to others ingame)
Democles;-;it is fun but co op is lame. It made the other guy lag out. He was running and was standing in the same place
jbill214;-;Honestly, playing this game as a beginner, far from the launch, wasn't too exciting. While the graphics are spectacular and the combat system above average the induction to the game was poor and the storyline was horrible. Playing this game for 10 hours was almost a waste if not for the graphics. The overall atmosphere of the game seemed like too many missions spent running through hallways to get to an objective that you cleared in the last mission. Most missions were just repeats and the gear availability for F2P was mediocre. The last aspect that was the least developed was the makeshift "crafting" in the game to get new toons or "warframes." All in all, it seems to be a game barely out of development and worth only a 5-5.5/10.
drangelmira;-;I was excited about it, until I actually tried it. It looks cool and I'd recommend it to people that haven't played many shooting games. It has cool moves, the graphics are decent and you get to use different types of weapons. Unfortunately the AI isn't exactly smart and the character you control is a bit overpowered, plus you get way too much ammo and health and power regeneration. It's way too easy! It looks pretty, it's relaxing, it's free and the classes look nice, but it didn't really manage to draw me in. In all honesty, I don't have much to say. I got bored on my first mission and quit, so maybe it gets better as you progress. It's not that it really is that terrible overall, but I got bored too early. So I do recommend it to casual gamers that just want some parkour tricks and some good old slashing and shooting of aliens, but it really isn't anything special. A lot of easy to kill foes and an endless pursuit of loot. If you've already played a bunch of alien shooting games and have high expectations about this one, spare yourself the disappointment.
lagrenouille;-;* Fake solo mode * Too many QTE
BOT KBZA;-;BORING and Pay To Play
Thomolithic;-;Boring, takes forever to get anywhere. Totally not worth the time, even if it is free.
loiosh1;-;A goood Sci-Fi game, but rather linear and bland. It takes forever to find and craft items, especially warframes. Also, the dungeons are rather linear and straightforward and teamplay does not exist, unless you are hunting bosses.
zexel;-;I do not recommend this game. The movement and swordplay are clunky, at best. The levels and gameplay are repetitive. It's not terrible, but not fun either.
Where Are You Going;-;It's . Pay to Grind. Digital Extremes cannot into PR.
Cyan Guy;-;So I get to a rank up mission, and I fail it, because I suck at killling stuff. And when I try it again, It tellls me I can't try again for 24 hours. What a ing joke. Digital Extremes can go  themselves.
Dirtyshadow;-;Really hard to even start to play without friends already playing and into the game. While the games starting tutorial/first missions are a great learning curve, it really doesnt show you anything on how to best team up, socialise or interact with other players
Omidimaru;-;Play the first 3 levels and boom, thats the game, rush as fast as possible to the end and skip 3/4 of the mobs. Would not reccommend, gets boring after an hour.
DaFish;-;Awesome game, I like the mass effect 3rd person shooter feel. However it is too much of a grind if you do not want to spend money on the game.
DigitalDrone;-;its rubish its not even working for me
The Grim Crim;-;too much grinding and too many bugs
Blaine the Moonshiner;-;Warface review, I mean warthunder, I mean march of war review 4/10
Sundial says its fuck time;-;This game is really fun, when it works. This is literally the buggiest piece of  I have ever played. If it cost anything, i'd be even more , but seriously, since it's kind of pay-to-win, FIX YOUR ING GAME
Coalf;-;This is one of the worst Co-op MMOS out there as it doesnt actualy focus on the Co-op but on the grind. Yes grind this game is nothing but a 24 hour grind with bosses. The most intense moment in the entire game was when i crashed after a very important mission, then again and then again this amount of crashes is unbereable not taking in that the game is extremely bugged and textures often get stuck in players and enemies. But as i said this game is nothing but grind, you grind to get a pet you grind enemies to get to the boss you grind the same area over and over just to obtain one more ceramics or whateverthe you need right now. The weapons take immense amount of grind to actualy even get the blueprint, then you need to get the required items that means, yes you guessed it MORE GRINDING. Then finaly if the starts are right and you have enough of items and credits you can finaly wait, yes wait whole whoping 12 hours for your new wepon to actualy get completed. THis isnt a multiplayer game this is a great GRIND simulator. YOU DO NOTHING ELSE BUT GRIND. So if you are looking for a way how to kill time and love grinding away this game is for you. But if you are a noraml and social person you will probably enjoy this game only when playing with friend. I would give it a 4/10 thus i dont recommend it to anyone that doesnt plan on playing with friends or hates grinding.
jmfoubister;-;super buggy, I don't know what we are waiting for. Can't log on when I want to play. Otherthan that, a good concept. Once if I ever can play the game again maybe I would recomend this game
Valgraath;-;I enjoyed this game. I have yet to get another warframe, because of the stupid pay to win model. Crafting is pretty stupid. You get the materials and start crafting and like a week later you have it. I really do not reccomend it, unless you can deal with the pay to win.
.;-;Just as a review of the first 60 minutes or so of gameplay, I've had the worst experience with this game than I have with any other in the past few months. Being as it relies on internet connection, the connection cut out during the tutorial not once, but twice. After Completing the tutorial FINALLY, I was taken to a loading screen where it simply stopped loading three times, and stayed at the same load point for an additional 30 minutes before I gave up and closed the game. I went through the intro cutscene and tutorial stage 5 times before giving up on this game entirely. As far as merits go, what little gameplay I had was entertaining after adjusting the graphic settings AFTER the lagfest of the first intro cutscene. The weapons were pretty neat, and the attacking felt fluid. I enjoyed the aesthetic qualities of the game, the design of the enemies and armor were pretty darn cool as well, but that's as far as the good qualities go. The only thing holding me back from reccommending this game is the constant disconnects, having to do the tutorial and watch an unskippable cutscene over and over again. I can practically quote half of the dialogue from the tutorial! I understand that while this is not the intended experience of the game, it's what I've experienced. After googling the issue, I've tried nearly every remedy listed, and nothing has worked. As far as I can tell, if you want to play this game, don't play it over steam. Get it from the website where you are taken to create an account anyways.
LuLu;-;great and fun but platinum donations is too much.. most items are canonly be bought with platinum.
Chuck Bartowski;-;MAKE IT AVALIBLE ON MAC
Mchedla;-;This game is only for donat players
Jan Regal;-;Fun game - but seeing first hand what it can do to those who are addicted is disheartening. This game encourages, nay, forces you to pay if you want to keep up with the game. And the prices are scary. 500 later, my brother realised that it was time to stop Warframe. No refunds are in sight either.
bones7056;-;grind grind grind... wasted so much time. games is going down hill hard currently.
base9wario;-;As fun as the gameplay is; the ammount of grinding that you need to do is pretty hilarious and feels unecessary. Sure you have groups of people playing with you, but with ranking up and crafting being time-gated, it sometimes feel like you're grinding just for the sake of grinding. It just feels...not worth it at times.
NinjaThingy;-;This game I (personally) didn't enjoy for reasons you will not find out.
Mr. Stalker;-;Don't play this game if you want to play solo. It basically forces you to play co-op. If you don't than it just takes a ridiculous amount of time to get anywhere.
Rordan Gamsey;-;Ultra Repetitive. Very grind intensive. Takes too long to get anything good.
Link1969;-;I will go to open it up and it will load but,when it is in the server it will show my descktop but will still have sound from the game playing.
Ahous;-;its a grate game starting out but it soon get very repetitive as the maps all look the same but with diffirend room placement.
Drews105-2;-;Bad on PS4 and bad on PC
Fireflies;-;On the early this game is "FREAKING AWESOME" but after I was playing this game so long, and I realize this game so bored bored and bored, but if they doing more often the update and gameplay it's become awesome!
Strongestgimp;-;not really my cup of tea.
Unconquered;-;Grind so you can get more equipment, to grind in level design that rivals Halo 1 in terms of most amount of copy-pasting. It's got better polish than your average F2P game. The content is pretty expensive and also subjectively Pay 2 Win. Because Path of Exile or Dota 2 could have done the same thing, PoE could have charged for uniques and Dota for Hero unlocks except they only charge for cosmetics. Path of Exile is a Co-op PvE game too. In Warframe you either cough up the cash or spend eternity grinding to grind some more. It's pretty much single player because there's no communication and most players tend to just hit the sprint + crouch button to reach the objective rather than collecting resources. You are forced to chase them as they reach the "ONLY CO-OP" feature of the game, where two players are need to hit a switch together to open a door. Here is a quick explaination of the gameplay: You have an overview of our solar system, you start at Mercury. Each Planet has a particular amount of missions before you proceed to the next planet. Planets also consist of resources, which drop from killed enemies or crates/storage. In a nutshell you do Co-op missions which are bland, grind items, credit and resources, purchase blueprints with the virtual credit. Each item requires certain resources. For the sake of this review let's say I want to craft a Rhino Warframe, it requires W, X, Y, Z resources. Refer to the solar system map and see which planet has those resources. Now Mercury will have "Z", Jupiter has "Y" and pluto has "W". You will have to play missions, even repeat them to aquire the neccessary resources. Once you DO GATHER THE resources, you have to wait 12-24 hours in real time for the foundry to craft the weapon. This is nothing more than a way to nudge you reminding you that the game is free to play with inconvienience. Free to play really is a tainted model unless it's Path of Exile and Dota 2 and Loadout, where it actually works. I rather cough up 29-49$ to play a full experience. All hostility aside, the game has potential, and Digital Extremes is a talented company considering they did UT1999, 03, 04 and Dark Sector. The controls and graphics are fantastic. Get rid of the buy to unlock model and look at Path of Exiles as a blue print. Also for those who are complaining about wasting money on this game to only be dissapointed 20-30 hours later, it's not the developers fault, it's the risk you take when you decide to invest in "Open Betas" and "F2P". Give this game a try, or try it's prequel single player "Dark Sector" which was an underrated game by Digital Extreme.
matt.james2002;-;my pc cannot handle this stupid game i move, then my caracter moves 2 seconds later
alphablast212;-;it sucks so much it has a lot of lag and bugs
Karasumori;-;Fun game , beautiful graphics , good action. However it's a free-to-pay game , I never had near enough currency to buy weapons or warframes.
alorxico;-;A bunch of my coworkers rave about this game to no end, so I decided to hop on and try it. Good thing it is Free to Play or I would be asking for my money back. Though there is the option to play the game solo, this is not a first person game; this is an shooter MMO set in space. If you want to play alone, the game lets you but does not scale down the difficulty. In one mission, where I was supposed to prevent an artifact from being destroyed, I found myself up against 30 baddies with lasers and grenades while all I had was a rifle and a pistol with no ammo. Needless to say, I died alot and the game was oh-so happy to keep track of just how often that was. You are given a limited number of chances to "revive", the games fancy word for "respawn", but it does not have the decency other games have to moves you AWAY from the mob of baddies that just killed you. Instead, it drops you right in the middle of them, only giving YOU control AFTER it is done with the respawn animation but allowing the baddies to fill you with bullets as soon as the animation starts. Once your designated respawns have been used, you cannot continue playing the game. You can BUY respawns, however, for Platinum but that is currency you have to buy with real money, you don't EARN it. The controls are a bit wonky; moving the mouse moves the camera all the time and the direct your character is running about 45% of the time. You only start with a rifle and a pistol, though ammo for all the different weapon types drop from baddies and can be found in chests. The baddies, however, can use what every type of weapon they want and have no problem shooting you when you are behind cover. They also can stun lock you just by hitting you with the butt of their gun, which leave you open to attacks that can take away all of your shield or half your health before you get a chance to run. If you want more weapons, you have to buy them with Platinum and I'm not 100% certain you actually buy them; I think you buy the designs to build them should you find the parts later on. X is the defaut "do the thing I need you to do" button, but the promt to do said thing either doesn't appear or appears in the smallest font the game can access. I died several times because I was suppsed to access or hack or interface or something with a console and it would not let me until I stood exactly where it wanted me to stand, and by then all the baddies had respawned and knocked me down to 2 HP. There is also a foundry, the game's crafting system, but you don't have any designs available to you at the start of the game that uses the materials you find in the starting missions. You get "mods" that boost your health, melee damage, gun damage, etc, you for some reason you are only allowed to equip mods that have the same number as your level and once you do you can't equip one that, when added to the values of your other mods, is over your level. For example. You are allowed one "free" mod, which is actually a power of your suit. At level 3 I was allowed to equip a mod that increased my health by 40%. At level 6, I thought I could instal another power mod so I could stop dying, but I was stopped by an annoying little buzz sound as my level bar flashed. The new power was for level 6, but if I wanted to use it I had to remove the level 3 mod and instal it by itself. I could, however, install another level 3 mod, but when I tried that I got buzzed again because it I could not have two mods of the same type (ie two health mods) active at the same time. I know I am going to be told "If you play with others then you won't have these problems. Why don't you play with others?" Answer: because I want to know what my character can do BEFORE jumping into a random matchup, so as to try and avoid the ineffitable "OMG you are so bad at this! Stop playing, you're ruining this for the rest of us" you usually run into in MMOs. Also, if the game is MEANT to be an MMO, I don't think they should give the player the option of playing solo, because then you get players like me who think "Hey, I can play abit by myself so when my friend come online to play I will be a better teammate" becoming upset and writing bad reviews.
Weed;-;This is a  dont download it is veriffing every time i start the game and it says download 3.9 GB
SoanoS;-;For some initial boost in the game, you can use this referral link: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=517f97771a4d809d7c000088 . That will give you a 7-day Experience booster which will help you level up your warframe and gear faster. This game is getting more and more grindy with each update, and the sheer amount of grind will crush you. I had high hopes for this game but with every update brings another layer of RNG and grind, and it just eats away all the motivation and enjoyment.
lush venice (`);-;Game had potential, but DE is trying as hard as they can to get rid of it in favour of making a quick buck, and bans anyone who calls them out on it. Can't say I blame them, but it sure is a shame. [grinding intensifies] PS: warbros #1
Niruth The Redeemer;-;Greats game , but a lot of the levels are the same.
HolyRamenEmpire;-;When playing it for the first time, it was great and I really liked it. Now after playing it for a few weeks, its just old and repetitive.
Qbert;-;I feel reluctant to give a yes or no recommendation for this game. In fact I started writing this with a "yes" but eventually felt compelled to change it to a "no". The reason is that I love so much about the gameplay and the concept. There is so much potential in the idea and existing framework, it could be truly great, but it has no reward to its RPG-esque item grind. It exists for its own sake. If - like me - you actually don't mind laborious 'farming' to reach a goal (which in this case is always to purchase a new weapon or 'Frame, i,e, class), then even the grinding for materials is not really a bad thing. The real problem with Warframe is that - when the combat gameplay is no longer sufficient as its own reward - the 'grind' that is central & the only other motivation to play... has absolutely no point. As another review aptly described, it is at its core a 'monotonous circular treadmill'. Not just a treadmill, a circular one. In other 'treadmill' games you at least clear 'hurdles' during one, 'jumping to the next treadmill' so to speak ... but this one is like a circular treadmill in that you are never anywhere different in terms of progression than the day you start. Sure you will accumulate a warchest of a crapload of weapons and modifications and 'classes' ... but you only ever use one of each in a mission, so the more you accumulate, the smaller % of what you 'earned' you are using. What good is having a thousand options of marginal variation for one thing? You can accomplish that 'thing' with just one option, you dont need anything more, but that is the only progression there is. The missions are quite repetitive and quickly consumed content, after which your only gameplay is to repeat the missions to acquire loot. Then use that loot to purchase/craft tools that you will just use to continue grinding loot. The grind actually remains reasonable fun as you play around with cool weapons and powers... but inevitably you hit 'the wall' where you realize you are essentially just farming for the ability to farm some more - just with a shiny new weapon. Grind grind grind. Get a new weapon. Rinse, repeat. No competitive system, no long term goals, no real sense of accomplishment. It's a shame because the devs work quite hard and provide quite substantial updates on a rapid schedule... yet refuse to break away from a business plan of simply adding more things to farm. I've actually spoken at length with multiple devs of the game - who are very active in its community & open to feedback - vehemently voicing this concern ... but for some reason it has never become a priority for them to create any new macro progression. Just more of the same. I really hope one day this changes so I can return to the game I spent quite a bit of time playing (and even quite a bit of cash as I dont mind rushing a few things I really want or supporting development), but without a new 'purpose' to playing I will not... and continue to regret every penny spent.
JDC;-;At first, warframe appears to be something new and origional, with it's spectacular art style and graphics, and it's entire presentation is a feast for the eyes. However, after a few hours of gameplay grinding the same spots for the blueprients and materials to create the warframe or weapon you wanted, you will wonder to yourself "what now"? Do you grind for more gear? Get some more fancy augments? But what's the point when all your fancy warframes and weapons only make you more efficient at grinding for more stuff? Now I know what you're saying "Isn't that the basis of any MMO?" Sort off... If you boil it down any MMO is one big quest for loot, but what makes it good is how fun it is to play all the dungeons and missions to recieve these rewards, and Warframe fails it it terribly. This game becomes far too repetitive, you only have a handful of scenarios to play through on missions and the difference between them is barely remarkable. You're still fighting baddies through the same spaceship hallways, just rearranged each time. The warframes themselves are also fundamentally flawed. Each warframe has a unique set of abilities (which three are avaliable from the start, and the last only ebing avaliable when your WF is upgraded with an item that is conveniently found in the cash shop), sure, but you also have a rather limited pool of energy that you expend to use said abilities, and said pool can only be replenished by scarce pickups. So really yuor 'style' is more defined by what wepaons you have painstakenly constructed by grinding for the materials to make... and if you don't like them you're  out of luck. Not to mention the fact that there is little to no emphasis on teamwork on a multiplayer game... I mean they try to do something by making each warframe's abilities varied enough to try and do so, but if you're not sprinting down a hallway and killing things fast then you end up being more of a burden t the team. Same thing applies to pvp, nothing matters but outright damage, and you better built the right warframe for it or it's back to more grinding for you. Then there is the cash shop... while every weapon and frame can be built from materials and blueprints dropped in missions (which takes AGES of grinding) you can instantly buy them in the cash shop as well. This screams play to win in the most blatant way, but since grinding for your equipment is half the game you'll probably come to the conclusion that this isn't worth the time faster if you spend a few bucks. So despite it's flashy looks and first impressions, Warframe is a huge dissapointment. Don't get me wrong, I wanted this game to be good so badly. It's an absolute delight to look at, and the setting alone is quite good, how could you not enjoy what is essentialy a story revolving around an ancient race of alien space ninja? But sadly, the core gameplay mechanics fall short in what is a flawed game. Everything is so polished I can see someone forgetting that they've been running through what is basically the same randomized space ship for hours to find the last few materials for their lazer katana that burns things that it slices through. If only art direction could float a game on it's own, but I suppose if you're going to grind through the same spots for a while they might as well look pretty.
PREDATOR;-;Bad and boring game
whitefoux;-;I was enjoying the game, it is hard to really aquire anything outside of your starters without either grinding for gear and parts for hours, and or just spending money. I had put enough time to pretty much max my orignal tenno, when I got banned. For no reason, all was said was I some how violated the EULA, when I have done nothing wrong in my knowledge, I contacted support and said after "manual review" I did indeed do "something" to do such, was not told what still, and said ban could not be lifted. Glad I never wasted my money on this at this point. I will not recommend anygame that bans players without a reasonable explination and "violating the EULA" is not reasonable.
[13th]SteelWolfe;-;Now this game is awesome but due to the fact it's not server based but instead peer-to-peer it has extreme connection issues which makes it more frustrating to play then fun.
Dirk Strider;-;Good in certain aspects, like the combat, but the controls are kinda crappy
mmonuts;-;The Gameplay was extremely linear, the missions were buggy, and to make it worse the storyline is literally just a whole concoction of player theories who have pieced together what they heard from enemies what we were told and lotus. Unless atleast the gameplay is fixed for me i don't recomend this game.
shamilton1993;-;Where to start with this one... Well first off, I like the ghrapics, the gameplay, and the abilities. However, after a couple hours of playing, I noticed that the enemies started doing way more damage, and I was doing roughly the same as I started out. So I decided to look for a new stronger weapon. I find out, that you cant buy a weapon thats better using the in game credits. OH NO. You have to buy the currency using real money, in order to get a decent weapon. Its that, or you can do the facebook style of upgrading, buy the blue print, play a level a half dozen times to find a resource, and then hopefully after a day of grinding you have what you need. Did I mention, the fact you cant kill the enemies even on the first level anymore, because their difficulty progressed with you? >.>... So good luck getting those resources! Yet another potentially GREAT GAME, turned to  from greed. I would have much rather paid 50-60 bucks for the game, and the ability to progress with ingame credits that I didnt have to buy, versus having to buy 20 dollars worth of game money, for a single weapon. Really. As for those of you who fell victim to that, and want to hold onto that "pride" so to speak, of this being a "great game", it is, sure, but only for about 45 minutes.
nuke147;-;Engine has repeatedly crashed before even completing tutorial. Found no readily implemented solutions
Lt. Dad;-;The game is very repetetive and after you've gone through the first 2 planet maps you will have seen basically everything the game has to offer. New content is added every month or so, but unfortunately not enough is changing to keep me playing. I want to like this game, but it is too gear based vs skill based.
Knaps;-;Warframe seemed to be an interesting space adventure filled with combat and with a new patch it even includes ships. I'm a simple sci fi guy and it was free so I bought it. The game was terrible but the controls are probably the worst way to control a charcter I have ever seen. E is melee attack while left and right click are to aim while f is to swap beetween your secondary and primary. The tutorial if you can even call it that places you with all of your powers depending on which class you play (warrior, ranger, mage) but as soon as you leave the room you are left with only the first power you get. As I played through the game and fought the generic humanish guys I felt extremly confused due to the starting senistivity being higher than snoop and using e to attack. I eventually reached the selection of my first few secondary pistols. I was told nothing about these guns so I never knew the difference, same with the mele weapons as you can choose a stick, guantlets or a sword. when I eventually got to a wall running segment I died 10 times, not because of my inability to press space but because my faceless avatar would kick off the wall or even better not be able to make a jump. The hacking is horrendous, think about it this way, would you like a timed minigame (about 15 sec) where you can't go back once you move a puzzle peice unless you flip the peice all over again, one that tells you nothing about how to do it and then will cut down the time when you get it halfway done!? The answer is no by the way. Did I like this game in short no in long N00000000000000000000 .5/10-kill it
MegaAwesomeAlex;-;It was good until the major update which made it SUCK!
xXDra9onSlayrXx;-;THIS GAME KEEPS ON CRASHING!!!!!!!!!!!!!! when i finish the tutorial and im in the ship it Crashes!
GABMAX101;-;I got a problem when i went to pruchase platinum fron the market with a 20% discount that i got from a log in reward. So as i said i got the 20% discount and i went trough the process of payment and everything like ive done before, but this time something happened that when i added funds to my Steam wallet the game registered the purchase but it hasnt charged my bank account or my steam wallet and i havent got my platinum after the purchase. I checked my Steam wallet and it still shows that the money for the purchase is still there and on the history on my bank account it says that the transaction is peanding after a while. When ive purchased platinum before i always receive it when i get back to the game but this time it did not happen and i really hope that this can be fixed because i look at the purchase platinum Tab on the games market and it says that i have the discount but when i click on it the deals show that i dont have any discount....... So yeah im pretty much  that i have not received my platinum and lost the discount.... Anyone that can help me with this ill appreciate it.
Entropy;-;You have to pay real money to buy the ability to resurrect after your alotted 4 deaths a day. Complete , plus the game itself is not even all that fun.
ChupaMiPinga;-;it sucks
NanoHound;-;This game ends up being a grinding simulator
JZ802P;-;I dont realy know if i like this game because it looks really nice but it keeps saying checking for updates, the first time it told me to login but i dint have an account so i turned it off and made an account and ever since then it wont let me play :( I would reccomend this but it doesnt work for me, if it did and i like it then i would definately reccomend it
UQt;-;Went through the tutorial, once that ended put me onto some random screen circling planets, could not get to a menu, only chat was available, there wasnt even a way to exit the game besides alt+f4... 0/10  game, dont bother.
Bjorn_Serkr;-;IT IS HORRIBLE! over all 1/10 At first I was like this is an alright game... 6/10 feeling so far... Then you get past noob level and the gun/skin/crafting info is found/shown... little uninformative to a new player, 3 forms of money, and its bottom... 5/10 Then you learn that the character levels, but you have to do a training mission thing to level... You go in there and they do not tell you sh!t and put you in a circle and then have a ton of enemy spawn in an unrealistic realm... Worst of all if you fail you have to wait 24 hours to retry, EVEN WORSE STILL, when I got level 1 it said I had to wait like 5 hours to do the training mission... What, why the duck? 1/10 Over all it is a 1/10, most games I either tell friends it is 'awesome and they should play it', 'it has good aspects, but i can not recommend', 'its okay, i'm not a big fan', or 'i do not like it'... but this game I might actually tell my friends that it is 'a bad game and they should not even trial play it ever'... pretty much burn it with fire. Dr. Jackel Mr. Hyde for the Nes is a better game, lol.
IlluminatiSwag;-;Worst visual experience ever. Mouse lags so bad. Motion blur makes me think im actually blind. The first half an hour i didn't know how to play and I was looking at planets because the menu's didn't appear until i reset my game. Really micro-transaction based. Cannot upgrade anything even buy putting in the hours into the game. If the currency for the game was cheaper I'd think about buying some points, but it's not worth it because everything that requires it is also overpriced
[Solaris Owner] Ares;-;Is the gameplay good? I honestly have no idea. I played the game a while ago and really enjoyed it. I decided to get it on steam. However, When I did this there was a massive camera glitch in the missions. The mission/world select screen worked perfectly however the cmera glitched out and I just saw a mesh of green colours. I asked in the chat for help and it was full of unsociable and a trolly community. I looked through a help section and again had no help. Maybe if this was sorted out I could have recommended the game, But its simply buggy. The new "Patches" Haven't fixed the bug, so I guess I just have to do something else until then.
Waulk;-;Can't solve port problems. All the other games work easily without port problems. I hate this issue. When they solve it they will get a "like" from me.
[GOON] Mong00se;-;Does not work - the account creation is broken and never sends an activation email. I wasted nearly an hour trying to troubleshoot this and no luck.
Exodus;-;my warframe keeps on crashing it said that my evolution engine has stopped working pls fix it so i can play this pls :(
J Shuggy - COME JOIN ME!;-;I'm sure this game would be awesome, if YOU COULD PLAY IT. This game makes you take a series of steps to even start INSTALLING The game. First download from steam, then Make an acccount, then activate that account in email, then get the activation key from email, then go to the game and enter the activation key, then download the updates, then log back in again. NOT TO MENTION IF YOU EVEN TYPE YOUR PASSWORD IN WRONG ONCE, THE GAME BLOCKS YOUR IP FOR SOME TIME SO YOU CANT LOG IN. What a fricking hassle.
TheFaintSmile;-;This gets boring very quickly and requires you to buy stuff with real money constantly. Honestly. I dislike the game, simply of all the requests to buy things with real money and that it has no randomization of the sandboxes what so ever.
eTo -;-;Fun Games But Server management is a mess This situation is completely disappointed
someirishdrunk;-;This game is problably the most broken pieces of  I have ever even try to play the installer wont let you log in until you update but you cant update tell you log in.
chrisstauber;-;dont plway this game they will suspend you for nothing after yu spent money
thedesserted;-;Hardly played it. Wouldnt reccomend.
NINJANUGGETS126;-;some reason i play my warframe cause it come up with an error
SatanClaus;-;Needs more anal
Alice;-;Even with all unusual style and gameplay this game is terrible, because it requires tons of your time to grind, so you can get decent items/mods and become a player, who worth something. My favorite weapons was nerfed, new classes overpowered and old ones was nerfed hard. This game was made to suck money, because without "donation" you will waste many hours of trying to complete missions you want or get items you need. With money in your pocket you can easily get everything and turn on "easy mode". I've played long time ago and it was decent, there was of course one of the starting classes, that could win everything in solo, but the rest of them was useful. Now everything changed in a bad way. I am very disappointed.
Bluerism;-;i more of a fan of first person shooter and also the mouse movement is to sensitive
Monkeyofthefamily;-;My friends have been going on and on about this game for a little over a year now and so I thought I'd try it out. No thanks. Its really dry, maps feel cramped, it just doesn't seem to move well to me. If you're heavier into 3rd person shooters I'd say go for it, but I feel like it was laggy and not worth the space on my hard drive.
floris.de.jong;-;great game lots of fun. To bad it comes with to many bugs and crashes and these just take the fun out of the game. fix these and i would recommend it but for now i wont
TowerMonger;-;It's a simple 3rd person shooter that feels like you're playing by yourself even when you aren't. I got on and played a round alone and it was just lacking something, but it was alright. Then I tried out the online game play and this is where I would take a few things into consideration before using up hard drive space. The idea of the game, after reading up is that every unit is individual and contributes to the larger team effort in a unique way. Great concept! However it falls so flat that one might believe that it was tossed off the top of the Empire State Building. It turns into a run and outgun frag fest where all you end up doing if trying to get the most kills and score the most loot while leaving everyone else behind. The EXP has nothing to do with team preformance or teamwork and instead only values the indiviual. Thus turning what could be a great teamwork experience into Super Mario Party with guns.
fritzels and family DIY;-;DO NOT BUY THIS GAME its a great concept with good game mechanics but it is completely ruined by pay to play and more or less all of the interesting items you will never get because the grinding is stupidly tedious, also you have this 4 revive a day system so you cannot even grind for long periods of time. this game is great but yet another game ruined by micro transactions
Cthulhu;-;Game direction iffy, balance almost non-existant. Started off so promising but it's not getting what it needs.
UNO;-;Warning: this game and its studio (warframe/ digitalextreme) has sold to Perfect World Entertainment on July/2/2014. PWE has a long history of bad reputation and not before long warframe will become one of its revenue machine. Right now they are banning people talking about pwe in forum/stream. This game has its moments but it's time to move on.
TheVest;-;it wont let me play it
Bitb22;-;At first this game was epic. I was so impressed with the movement and guns. Then i noticed after about 9 levels. This game is the same level over and over again. nothing new enough ever happened.
Lord.V;-;Personally, not for me but for a free to play game I can see the appeal. sci fi slasher/shooter.
CleverBird;-;If you enjoy repetition, grinding, a complete lack of a story, and boring gunplay to be fun, I'd highly recommend Warframe. If not, I'd stay away from this game. The only good point that this game has going for itself, is its rather unique aesthetics, but thats about it.
Roboguy95;-;Avoid, it is a pay to win.
Event Horizon;-;Game looks interesting and fun, but that feeling won't last for too long. Missions and maps feel extremely repetitive, enemies are as well and crafting is an absolute joke, taking you days to craft a single thing and finding the materials for what you want will take you weeks, sometimes months for very simple items. It's fun, it's fast-paced and it's full of action though, so if you can endure the extremely repetitive gameplay, enemies and missions, you might like Warframe, otherwise do stay away from this game.
kaizer0002;-;It's fun for a gerbil wheel.
Arnold The Awper;-;ITS TERRIBLE
Paradise;-;Pay to win game. No thanks.
Shadow Fox;-;i've decided to rewrite a once good review on this game. this is a good, fun free game. i want to make that known. but since putting money into the game and spending my time in it, ive been extremely disappointed. since then, my email is now said to not having a matching profile within the game. my character is still there in my old clan but i cannot have access or log onto it. the only way to use the websites support is through logging in, which it will not allow me to do. therefore they've robbed me of my money and will no longer give me access to my old account. something should be done immediately to compensate people who've experianced this such as i have. as there is no reason this problem should have occured, nor has it with me with any game i've ever played before. what had been a good experiance has left me feeling completely robbed.
infidel 465;-;this game has a verry basic tutorial that only teaches you how to swap wepons move and so on but the game has allot of features that it pretty much just throws at you like they are simple and easy to use but they arent. also the game is more like a store than a game virtually all of the wepons and warframes will cost you real money.
yung ian;-;Very fun game to play with a lot to do at the start, customize anything about your character and buy items via the store. The only downside to this game is that as you get towards the end of the game it get's repetitive.
Chris Blackburn;-;Space Ninjas 'Nuff said
Positively Squack;-;An amazing game with the best (worst for us) business model ever. Definitely not a Pay2 Win. No downsides. Boom. HEadshot. #YOLOSWAG2014BLAZEIT. Yeah. It's free. :). Done. Period.
Kuryux;-;Its an open beta. Why doesn't it say ANYWHERE in the store that its a freaking beta? I had to download 6GB to find this out. If you dont want all your progress suddenly being wiped out, stay out.
LeatheryObject;-;Ultra-Fast-paced Dungeon Crawling, MMO, RPG, Shooter, Hack-n-slash. A robust tutorial to make the tiresome and difficult early game easier and a very expansove end-game round out this package. Pros: graphics; If graphics are your thing this will deliver, absolutly gorgeous maxxed, but you're going to need a decent computer pros; Armory: there are tons of different weapons to choose from pruimary, secondary and melee. Cons: Armory; once you find the warframe and weapons that let you win, it gets old really fast. Community: the community is great when it's not awful . rumors of devs having a secret war against one clan or another seem unfounded on the surface as the Devs and the community at large are helpful in all ways to both new (and long time gone) players.
Lloydy;-;Very good game to say it's free.
#KOALAS | Clueless;-;This is a free game that's not multiplayer! AWESOME.
Heilel;-;I loved this game, really like it. But after one update, this game turns out in a total pay-to-win S.H.I.T!!!
GriMax;-;Never played this game 10/10
Da Fallout Hype is Real;-;its like destiny except u actually want to play this game cuz ur a ninja and it isnt terrible.
Neptune (Purple Heart Nyaruko);-;My score? 4.5/5.0 I recommend you playing it. But heads up before you do. The game's engine is so up to the evolution and it's frequent updates keeps the game smooth and onto it's competitive edge like it's racing against Team Fortress 2. It's not TF2 alright, but it's all about being a ninja dude. Hack and slash. Go lone wolf or play with your friends. Doesn't matter, kick butt that is. Even uncover the stories and mysteries behind Warframe! Though, in Co-op however. Some would really go lone wolf. And they would eventually kill the enemies first before you do. Best to play with buddies at your rank. Go play with the higher ups to boost up your items and level though. Overall. Performance is great. Just keep an eye on  lone wolf t-bags when you play in co-op.
Kibble_Gunners;-;This game is like rough sex. You have to grind hard, but you have fun doing it.
SECO;-;Warframe is by far one of the best f2p games i have ever played in a while. The presentation is great, the atmosphere, the gameplay is fun and addicting, it makes you want to constantly evolve your character, you can play it with friends or alone with other people online. The game developers constantly update the game, having in consideration fans feedback, which makes for a great and overall fun game. If you are looking for a new game to try out and get lost in, Warframe is definitely a top contender nowadays.
[T.S.A] Sweet The Pirate Critz;-;Very Vast, Very Fun, And Pretty Damn Awesome
[R]:L0cKy;-;This game is amasing one of the best gems i have played online
Cyber.Wolf;-;I started to play Warframe from when it was a beta (not from Steam back then,reinstalled it recently) and already loved it to death back then! It was unique and something completely new and different from any MMO i tried. It felt like it will grow in a positive way and it did! They made such a huge step from the very beginning and sometimes i have a feeling that developers are working 24/7 nonstop! You will never get bored, cuz they make something new so often. Warframe also has one of the nicest community i encountered in my gaming life and devs are also often comunicating with players, give away free platinum on livestreams and much more! If I had to vote, I would give Warframe a medal for best MMO right now! Everything is perfect and nothing makes you so happy as developers who care about your opinion (they realy do). P.S. Proud to be a veteran of this game!
(_) Hentai Senpai;-;One of the best Co-op games that's also free ( with micro, but you can easily play without paying any money ). Recommended and Seal of Approval!
Niktuku;-;The premise of the game is a little odd, and the plot is well dry boring and best ignored unless you like obscure and wierd space drama. So moving on, the game play has alot of innovative idea's poorly implemented. So lets start with the big elephant in the room, the free to play set up of the game is a pharce. Without spending real money on platinum or items you are at a huge disadvantage. Gear , experience and money come slow grinding, not a little slow but insanely slow. Two weeks of playtime my gear is all around level 10 and everyone keeps telling me it gets better. So why suffer through crappy game play to get to end game content that once again favors people who are willing to dump real money in the game? Ahh spend money yourself you say, well here's my counter. When you swing weapons they follow a static path much like an old style mortal kombat game. Meaning things like hills or rocks or a slight incline will cause your melee weapon to whiff. Secondly try wall running or duck jumping, again confounded by terrair rocks poor control and slight inclines. And finally the deal breaker , mission types. Certain missions like say the spy missions , wretched at best. Where one twitchy mob or missclick causes mission failure. Now throw into that ability missfires and buggy mobs are just part of the game. I'm not talking about stuff that you can compensate with skill over, I'm talking about the game randomly screwing you because of crappy code. Hmm I shot the dude on the alarm yet he triggered it after he died, well balls. Or my favorite running an extermination mission and the wildlife attacks him and knocks him into terrain making it impossible for me to complete the mission. And my final beef with the game is its revive system, limited revives that you have to spend real money on to refresh or you fail on missions because you're out of revives when your randomly screwed over with a bug, Deal breaker. This game should not be played by anyone unless this sort of half arsed game design is your niche.
xyao19;-;This game just like some kind of virus, everytime i buy a new computer, it will always be installed in the first.
DizzBro1;-;i would recommend this game if it was for mac too. But other than that it looks like a great game.
TheNSAgent;-;I really dont like this game. Combat is fun, but the game and progression system is WAY and I me WAY too grindy to enjoy even in the slightest.
Fireflies;-;On the early this game is "FREAKING AWESOME" but after I was playing this game so long, and I realize this game so bored bored and bored, but if they doing more often the update and gameplay it's become awesome!
Strongestgimp;-;not really my cup of tea.
Unconquered;-;Grind so you can get more equipment, to grind in level design that rivals Halo 1 in terms of most amount of copy-pasting. It's got better polish than your average F2P game. The content is pretty expensive and also subjectively Pay 2 Win. Because Path of Exile or Dota 2 could have done the same thing, PoE could have charged for uniques and Dota for Hero unlocks except they only charge for cosmetics. Path of Exile is a Co-op PvE game too. In Warframe you either cough up the cash or spend eternity grinding to grind some more. It's pretty much single player because there's no communication and most players tend to just hit the sprint + crouch button to reach the objective rather than collecting resources. You are forced to chase them as they reach the "ONLY CO-OP" feature of the game, where two players are need to hit a switch together to open a door. Here is a quick explaination of the gameplay: You have an overview of our solar system, you start at Mercury. Each Planet has a particular amount of missions before you proceed to the next planet. Planets also consist of resources, which drop from killed enemies or crates/storage. In a nutshell you do Co-op missions which are bland, grind items, credit and resources, purchase blueprints with the virtual credit. Each item requires certain resources. For the sake of this review let's say I want to craft a Rhino Warframe, it requires W, X, Y, Z resources. Refer to the solar system map and see which planet has those resources. Now Mercury will have "Z", Jupiter has "Y" and pluto has "W". You will have to play missions, even repeat them to aquire the neccessary resources. Once you DO GATHER THE resources, you have to wait 12-24 hours in real time for the foundry to craft the weapon. This is nothing more than a way to nudge you reminding you that the game is free to play with inconvienience. Free to play really is a tainted model unless it's Path of Exile and Dota 2 and Loadout, where it actually works. I rather cough up 29-49$ to play a full experience. All hostility aside, the game has potential, and Digital Extremes is a talented company considering they did UT1999, 03, 04 and Dark Sector. The controls and graphics are fantastic. Get rid of the buy to unlock model and look at Path of Exiles as a blue print. Also for those who are complaining about wasting money on this game to only be dissapointed 20-30 hours later, it's not the developers fault, it's the risk you take when you decide to invest in "Open Betas" and "F2P". Give this game a try, or try it's prequel single player "Dark Sector" which was an underrated game by Digital Extreme.
alphablast212;-;it sucks so much it has a lot of lag and bugs
Karasumori;-;Fun game , beautiful graphics , good action. However it's a free-to-pay game , I never had near enough currency to buy weapons or warframes.
alorxico;-;A bunch of my coworkers rave about this game to no end, so I decided to hop on and try it. Good thing it is Free to Play or I would be asking for my money back. Though there is the option to play the game solo, this is not a first person game; this is an shooter MMO set in space. If you want to play alone, the game lets you but does not scale down the difficulty. In one mission, where I was supposed to prevent an artifact from being destroyed, I found myself up against 30 baddies with lasers and grenades while all I had was a rifle and a pistol with no ammo. Needless to say, I died alot and the game was oh-so happy to keep track of just how often that was. You are given a limited number of chances to "revive", the games fancy word for "respawn", but it does not have the decency other games have to moves you AWAY from the mob of baddies that just killed you. Instead, it drops you right in the middle of them, only giving YOU control AFTER it is done with the respawn animation but allowing the baddies to fill you with bullets as soon as the animation starts. Once your designated respawns have been used, you cannot continue playing the game. You can BUY respawns, however, for Platinum but that is currency you have to buy with real money, you don't EARN it. The controls are a bit wonky; moving the mouse moves the camera all the time and the direct your character is running about 45% of the time. You only start with a rifle and a pistol, though ammo for all the different weapon types drop from baddies and can be found in chests. The baddies, however, can use what every type of weapon they want and have no problem shooting you when you are behind cover. They also can stun lock you just by hitting you with the butt of their gun, which leave you open to attacks that can take away all of your shield or half your health before you get a chance to run. If you want more weapons, you have to buy them with Platinum and I'm not 100% certain you actually buy them; I think you buy the designs to build them should you find the parts later on. X is the defaut "do the thing I need you to do" button, but the promt to do said thing either doesn't appear or appears in the smallest font the game can access. I died several times because I was suppsed to access or hack or interface or something with a console and it would not let me until I stood exactly where it wanted me to stand, and by then all the baddies had respawned and knocked me down to 2 HP. There is also a foundry, the game's crafting system, but you don't have any designs available to you at the start of the game that uses the materials you find in the starting missions. You get "mods" that boost your health, melee damage, gun damage, etc, you for some reason you are only allowed to equip mods that have the same number as your level and once you do you can't equip one that, when added to the values of your other mods, is over your level. For example. You are allowed one "free" mod, which is actually a power of your suit. At level 3 I was allowed to equip a mod that increased my health by 40%. At level 6, I thought I could instal another power mod so I could stop dying, but I was stopped by an annoying little buzz sound as my level bar flashed. The new power was for level 6, but if I wanted to use it I had to remove the level 3 mod and instal it by itself. I could, however, install another level 3 mod, but when I tried that I got buzzed again because it I could not have two mods of the same type (ie two health mods) active at the same time. I know I am going to be told "If you play with others then you won't have these problems. Why don't you play with others?" Answer: because I want to know what my character can do BEFORE jumping into a random matchup, so as to try and avoid the ineffitable "OMG you are so bad at this! Stop playing, you're ruining this for the rest of us" you usually run into in MMOs. Also, if the game is MEANT to be an MMO, I don't think they should give the player the option of playing solo, because then you get players like me who think "Hey, I can play abit by myself so when my friend come online to play I will be a better teammate" becoming upset and writing bad reviews.
Weed;-;This is a  dont download it is veriffing every time i start the game and it says download 3.9 GB
SoanoS;-;For some initial boost in the game, you can use this referral link: https://warframe.com/signup?referrerId=517f97771a4d809d7c000088 . That will give you a 7-day Experience booster which will help you level up your warframe and gear faster. This game is getting more and more grindy with each update, and the sheer amount of grind will crush you. I had high hopes for this game but with every update brings another layer of RNG and grind, and it just eats away all the motivation and enjoyment.
lush venice (`);-;Game had potential, but DE is trying as hard as they can to get rid of it in favour of making a quick buck, and bans anyone who calls them out on it. Can't say I blame them, but it sure is a shame. [grinding intensifies] PS: warbros #1
Niruth The Redeemer;-;Greats game , but a lot of the levels are the same.
HolyRamenEmpire;-;When playing it for the first time, it was great and I really liked it. Now after playing it for a few weeks, its just old and repetitive.
Qbert;-;I feel reluctant to give a yes or no recommendation for this game. In fact I started writing this with a "yes" but eventually felt compelled to change it to a "no". The reason is that I love so much about the gameplay and the concept. There is so much potential in the idea and existing framework, it could be truly great, but it has no reward to its RPG-esque item grind. It exists for its own sake. If - like me - you actually don't mind laborious 'farming' to reach a goal (which in this case is always to purchase a new weapon or 'Frame, i,e, class), then even the grinding for materials is not really a bad thing. The real problem with Warframe is that - when the combat gameplay is no longer sufficient as its own reward - the 'grind' that is central & the only other motivation to play... has absolutely no point. As another review aptly described, it is at its core a 'monotonous circular treadmill'. Not just a treadmill, a circular one. In other 'treadmill' games you at least clear 'hurdles' during one, 'jumping to the next treadmill' so to speak ... but this one is like a circular treadmill in that you are never anywhere different in terms of progression than the day you start. Sure you will accumulate a warchest of a crapload of weapons and modifications and 'classes' ... but you only ever use one of each in a mission, so the more you accumulate, the smaller % of what you 'earned' you are using. What good is having a thousand options of marginal variation for one thing? You can accomplish that 'thing' with just one option, you dont need anything more, but that is the only progression there is. The missions are quite repetitive and quickly consumed content, after which your only gameplay is to repeat the missions to acquire loot. Then use that loot to purchase/craft tools that you will just use to continue grinding loot. The grind actually remains reasonable fun as you play around with cool weapons and powers... but inevitably you hit 'the wall' where you realize you are essentially just farming for the ability to farm some more - just with a shiny new weapon. Grind grind grind. Get a new weapon. Rinse, repeat. No competitive system, no long term goals, no real sense of accomplishment. It's a shame because the devs work quite hard and provide quite substantial updates on a rapid schedule... yet refuse to break away from a business plan of simply adding more things to farm. I've actually spoken at length with multiple devs of the game - who are very active in its community & open to feedback - vehemently voicing this concern ... but for some reason it has never become a priority for them to create any new macro progression. Just more of the same. I really hope one day this changes so I can return to the game I spent quite a bit of time playing (and even quite a bit of cash as I dont mind rushing a few things I really want or supporting development), but without a new 'purpose' to playing I will not... and continue to regret every penny spent.
JDC;-;At first, warframe appears to be something new and origional, with it's spectacular art style and graphics, and it's entire presentation is a feast for the eyes. However, after a few hours of gameplay grinding the same spots for the blueprients and materials to create the warframe or weapon you wanted, you will wonder to yourself "what now"? Do you grind for more gear? Get some more fancy augments? But what's the point when all your fancy warframes and weapons only make you more efficient at grinding for more stuff? Now I know what you're saying "Isn't that the basis of any MMO?" Sort off... If you boil it down any MMO is one big quest for loot, but what makes it good is how fun it is to play all the dungeons and missions to recieve these rewards, and Warframe fails it it terribly. This game becomes far too repetitive, you only have a handful of scenarios to play through on missions and the difference between them is barely remarkable. You're still fighting baddies through the same spaceship hallways, just rearranged each time. The warframes themselves are also fundamentally flawed. Each warframe has a unique set of abilities (which three are avaliable from the start, and the last only ebing avaliable when your WF is upgraded with an item that is conveniently found in the cash shop), sure, but you also have a rather limited pool of energy that you expend to use said abilities, and said pool can only be replenished by scarce pickups. So really yuor 'style' is more defined by what wepaons you have painstakenly constructed by grinding for the materials to make... and if you don't like them you're  out of luck. Not to mention the fact that there is little to no emphasis on teamwork on a multiplayer game... I mean they try to do something by making each warframe's abilities varied enough to try and do so, but if you're not sprinting down a hallway and killing things fast then you end up being more of a burden t the team. Same thing applies to pvp, nothing matters but outright damage, and you better built the right warframe for it or it's back to more grinding for you. Then there is the cash shop... while every weapon and frame can be built from materials and blueprints dropped in missions (which takes AGES of grinding) you can instantly buy them in the cash shop as well. This screams play to win in the most blatant way, but since grinding for your equipment is half the game you'll probably come to the conclusion that this isn't worth the time faster if you spend a few bucks. So despite it's flashy looks and first impressions, Warframe is a huge dissapointment. Don't get me wrong, I wanted this game to be good so badly. It's an absolute delight to look at, and the setting alone is quite good, how could you not enjoy what is essentialy a story revolving around an ancient race of alien space ninja? But sadly, the core gameplay mechanics fall short in what is a flawed game. Everything is so polished I can see someone forgetting that they've been running through what is basically the same randomized space ship for hours to find the last few materials for their lazer katana that burns things that it slices through. If only art direction could float a game on it's own, but I suppose if you're going to grind through the same spots for a while they might as well look pretty.
PREDATOR;-;Bad and boring game
whitefoux;-;I was enjoying the game, it is hard to really aquire anything outside of your starters without either grinding for gear and parts for hours, and or just spending money. I had put enough time to pretty much max my orignal tenno, when I got banned. For no reason, all was said was I some how violated the EULA, when I have done nothing wrong in my knowledge, I contacted support and said after "manual review" I did indeed do "something" to do such, was not told what still, and said ban could not be lifted. Glad I never wasted my money on this at this point. I will not recommend anygame that bans players without a reasonable explination and "violating the EULA" is not reasonable.
[13th]SteelWolfe;-;Now this game is awesome but due to the fact it's not server based but instead peer-to-peer it has extreme connection issues which makes it more frustrating to play then fun.
Dirk Strider;-;Good in certain aspects, like the combat, but the controls are kinda crappy
PoRSeO;-;Its been awhile since i played this game i unistalled it cuz it was boring, but now its so mutch better i was rly impressed how the game changed.
Grand General Zircon the Mighty;-;Two words: pure awesomeness Now where do I begin? The smooth gameplay? The amazing and beautiful design? The simple and streamlined UI? this Game has everything Pros: -Great UI -Smooth gameplay -Beautiful design -Tight controls -Nice and helpful community -good syndicate system -deep and mostly unknown Lore -Easy to navigate menus -Easy to spend more than one hundred hours on -Easy to use foundry system -Useful upgrading system -New content added like every month idontknow Cons: -Slightly annoying real-money system, though most things (minus frames) can be purchased for under 20 dollars or built in the foundry (frames inclueded) -Slight difficulty spike if you don't know what you can handle overall I rate this game a 9.8 out of 10. With some SLIGHT and acceptable flaws, this game presents itself with grace. Digital Extremes has done a wonderful job and new updates are released very often. I wouuld recomend installing this game immediately and slowly whittling away at your social life with the DAYS you will spend playing this game. and if you need help with the game just add me: dunlord1213 or later it will be changed to either Zircon (zircon), _zircon_, or Zircon1
CrowStorm;-;why is this not for mac?!? gr8 m8 i r8 8/8 call me my name is n8 my number is 888-8888
Tidgem;-;Get This Game I mean why not? It's free after all...
MAGNETO;-;Its unlike any other games i played before
*HGT*Sourotiri GR;-;This game, is brigher than my future.
chilicheezedog543;-;its fun easy to play and u can have fun anytie
Puvel-Vul;-;Its like a stealth-game + Action packed videogame for free, with a lot of POTATOES!!!
Null;-;Swords, guns and robots. 9/10
MrPhantomLlama;-;i would recommend this game its so good
Lol;-;This is game is for those who like: shooters, 3rd person and futuristic games. I highly recommend this game.
LoneWolf;-;LAGGG, LAGG ALOT! I CANT EVEN PLAY WELL BECAUSE OF LAGGG, EVEN I SET TO LOWEST SETTING EVEN ITS LAGG, BUT I STILL PLAY IT ALOT BECAUSE ITS FUN! :))
Bpy6;-;There are ninjas in this games. And they're in space. Do I even need to continue?
evilthorn666;-;THIS GAME SUCKS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Worst game I have EVER played. There is this mission which is basically like domination on COD. I took all 4 points i needed too and all of a sudden they took them back instantly. not 1 by 1. they were'nt on the points individually no they just took them all back and it wouldnt let me take them back. the game cheats and its absolute ! Do not install, Do not play, Do not give a . 0/10 stars
Solid;-;Wanted to play 2 hours play 100h
Felix;-;JUST AWESOME...
My main is GEM;-;Love it. You gotta buy platinum for all the extras but fun anyway
Magnamon;-;THIS IS COOL
Sir Alberth Thunderfuck;-;100 hours played in the last two weeks... it's okay i guess
rednekdashie;-;It's like Destiny if it were good. The game is extremely diverse and has so much to offer. Get this game if you enjoy a game that you will never be done with because they are always adding new things.
Dingus Khan;-;Good to see how much harder it is to exploit glitches... Even if I do miss them... The good ol' days... :,(
Inu;-;This game blows. Do not even download it not worth the space on your computer.
Res will be gone for a week or 2;-;A fairly exceptional game that does F2P how it should be, free to play. There are select items that cost cash, but a majority of items are earned through actual gameplay. But you can pay for colours, cause reasons.
Deevil;-;i like this game..........................:3 needs 50 platinum daily reward
EnderColosus;-;This is my life!. MY GAME!
Alice;-;Even with all unusual style and gameplay this game is terrible, because it requires tons of your time to grind, so you can get decent items/mods and become a player, who worth something. My favorite weapons was nerfed, new classes overpowered and old ones was nerfed hard. This game was made to suck money, because without "donation" you will waste many hours of trying to complete missions you want or get items you need. With money in your pocket you can easily get everything and turn on "easy mode". I've played long time ago and it was decent, there was of course one of the starting classes, that could win everything in solo, but the rest of them was useful. Now everything changed in a bad way. I am very disappointed.
Bluerism;-;i more of a fan of first person shooter and also the mouse movement is to sensitive
Monkeyofthefamily;-;My friends have been going on and on about this game for a little over a year now and so I thought I'd try it out. No thanks. Its really dry, maps feel cramped, it just doesn't seem to move well to me. If you're heavier into 3rd person shooters I'd say go for it, but I feel like it was laggy and not worth the space on my hard drive.
floris.de.jong;-;great game lots of fun. To bad it comes with to many bugs and crashes and these just take the fun out of the game. fix these and i would recommend it but for now i wont
